title,selftext,subreddit
[Contest] Banner + Icon,"Hello and welcome to our new contest!

As you may know our sub currently lacks of having an individual icon and fitting banner, so we would like to give you the option to create and vote for one of your taste. ( :

The icon and banner should both be of the ""\*.png"" file-format; dimensions for our sub icon (avatar) should be 256x256px 64kb big; dimensions for our banner should be;

- **Small background**; 	4000x80px 5mb
- **Medium background**; 	4000x144px 5mb
- **Large background**; 	4000x208px 5mb 

Don't forget to be inclusive! At last but not at least, we would like to remind everybody that we are not allowed to use copyrighted content. Thanks!

Hope you will continue to have a great time on this sub. &lt;3",asktransgender
I'm about to be homeless and alone. 28F,"Hi I'm Lilliun 28F I'm going through a pretty tough break up right now, I've lost my family up here and my home, im broke, have no car, no job and no safety net. This is so hard to type..

I live in Washington state and was wondering if anyone might know of any resources. I'm so scared and hurt and I dont know what I'm going to do. It sounds dramatic but scrolling down any trans thread can be a bit terrifying...I don't want to die out here. ",asktransgender
Anyone else hate being lumped into the category “trans and gender non-conforming”?,"I see this a lot, in all sorts of places. One was for a LGBT conference I went to where you put your identity on the application and the question was “are you transgender or gender nonconforming?” Like, they wanted to bring in diverse people, but what if they had been trying to increase the number of trans attendees but instead just brought in a bunch of butch women and fem men?

Or when people talk about the community and they say “trans and GNC people” as though we are all in the same category and have the same experiences, when we clearly don’t. 

This really pisses me off, because I am GNC, but that is not relevant to whether or not I am transgender. I personally would apply GNC to butch women, or to femme guys who wear makeup, and I hate putting the two categories together because it feels like they are saying that me being trans is just being super nonconforming to my assigned gender, as though I am just a super masculine women who defies female gender stereotypes. In reality I’m a trans guy who is also very feminine. 

It feels like they’re saying my gender is just my personality or expression, when they’re completely unrelated. ",asktransgender
My mum just deadnamed me three times over on purpose,"I have updated my name legally and getting everyone to gender me correctly and call me the right name has been an uphill battle. Whenever my mum gets annoyed, she calls me by my old name without meaning to. I picked her up on it tonight (as I do everytime) and because she was angry, she looked at me and repeated my old name three times over. It was really hurtful and I don't know when it is going to click with my family. I've been transitioning for 3 years in January. For my mum to use my deadname to insult me cause she's angry is the most evil thing and I'm really deeply upset. Admittedly I insulted her back in my own way and when I was leaving the room in tears I heard her misgender me to my father (who wasn't responding much) ""did you hear what he said?""

I have no clue how she thinks she is justified at all. She is normally supportive and loving but when she gets angry it's like she is possessed. Sometimes she threatens to cancel my scheduled SRS coming up (my parents are paying for and I'm paying them back when I graduate). I know it's an empty threat but to even bring my gender issues up and use them against me when she is angry is beyond what I thought she was ever capable of.

I don't have anyone to talk to about this. How do I get her to understand that insulting my gender is out of bounds?",asktransgender
Trans Life Regrets,I think one of my biggest regrets is not being brave enough to come out sooner. When I was in middle school I had finally decided to come out to my parents in a letter. I wrote all I had to say put it in an envelope and left it on the table to be read before I woke up the next day. In the middle of the night I woke up because my parents were giving my younger sister medicine for her nasty cough. As soon as they finished and webt back to bed I lost my nerve I went out to the dining room and removed the letter.  I have still not come out to them to this day. The only person I have come out to is my wonderful fiancee who is still unsure how to feel about all of it. She is overall supportive but obviously desn't know how to feel about it.,asktransgender
"Zero social dysphoria, but body dysphoria only?","Hi, 

how much it's common to have body dysphoria while socially being completely content with my birth gender?

It seems that all of the trans people DO really care about pronouns, but I honestly don't care at all. Kinda makes me wonder whether I'm trans at all.",asktransgender
I have a serious question,"okay guys I have a pretty serious question and I hope that I can get some serious answers because I really don't want to fckup my kid. My daughter, she keeps telling me she doesn't feel like a girl and she's 13, and  I am concerned with how do I even go about getting her someone to talk to about this because I don't know. My daughter means the world to me and I just want her to be happy. I haven't tried to push any gender on her since she was born because I didn't feel like it was necessary but now I'm just so worried for her because I don't know what to do. I love my kid and I just want to help. ",asktransgender
"I can't be trans, right?","Before transitioning did you do thru a phase of denial? Like I can't possibly be trans, I identify as lesbian. (AFAB) Or, no way, all the work involved! Or (a bad one for me) I don't like men at ALL! I can't be one! 

I've been seeing more and more little signs, and today was a big one. I was scowling, happened to be standing in front of my mirror topless, hands up to brush my hair. And I saw my stupid mustache that no matter how much I pluck it, it keeps coming back. And I saw my hairy pits that I hate shaving. (I cried the last time I shaved them to go swimming). And I paused. For a second I ducked lower, so I could see my pits, and my mustache, and my Resting Bitch Face, but not my boobs. And it just felt. . . good? Then I got back to getting dressed, put my bra on, and tried the mirror again. Seeing the top of my bra, and my straps, made me cry. And now I don't wanna look at a mirror at all. 

But no, not me. I can't be trans. Just. . . Fuck, my brain is so garbled and I can't find words. What if I lose all my friends? I mean, what if I change so much we don't click anymore? I don't know how to be a guy. All the male role models in my life have been scum, I'm not one of those! Would my female best friend still be able to hold me while I cry? How would her husband feel about that? 

Please, no gendered pronouns, and not they/them. I think I'd respond well to dude or sir, or I dunno, buddy, pal, anything gender neutral-ish. 

I can't be a girl today, but I can't even think about being a boy. So no genders, please. 💓",asktransgender
Is it okay to call myself a lesbian?,"So Im a young transwoman (19). And while I've never had sex, i believe im attracted to solely women. 

It isn't me confusing admiration or jealousy for attraction, I legit think i like women. I want to cuddle with other girls, to be intimate.

The idea of doing that with a guy is not enticing in the slightest, and male genitals are kind of scary.

So, it would make sense to label myself as a lesbian. But do i have that right? I pass and live as a woman every day but is sex and relationships where I have to draw the line?

I don't know why i cant just let myself be a lesbian. ",asktransgender
"When you first came out, what were your expectations about the trans experience? In hindsight, how were your expectations challenged?","When I first came out, I was pretty naïve. I thought misgendering would happen by accident (and only occasionally), and never on purpose. I assumed the worst that would happen is that someone might need some extra time to understand what being trans means. I never expected so many people to leave, and I never thought I’d eventually be thankful for it. I thought it would be easy to get on HRT and thought informed consent meant I could just walk into the clinic that day and get them (not that I’d have to make an appointment and wait forever). 


I think this is an important question to ask, especially for people earlier on in their transition who don’t know what to expect or have misconceptions. ",asktransgender
I'm being begged to stop my transition,"I recently told my mother that I have been on HRT for the past six months. She has always told me that I should wait until I'm older to think about it, but now that I've told her what I'm doing she has started to insist that I should stop. She says that I will regret this decision and that she won't be able to handle it. Her belief is that, if anyone from my family or small hometown find out what I'm doing, it will destroy the family. She has begged me to cut all communication to anyone who is transgender or at least supportive because she believes that it's their fault that I'm transgender. Her proposition is for me to stop my transition and wait until I graduate so she can handle it better. I have told her that I can't do that because it would make my dysphoria get out of control and it would be a very long time to wait. I don't want to stop, but I have no idea how to convince her that I'm doing the right thing and that I'm not being selfish.",asktransgender
Started passing and stopped hrt,"I've been passing recently and it freaked me out so I stopped hrt. I don't know how to get around internalized transphobia and it's keeping me from transitioning, even though I spend so much time and effort on that very thing. At the end of the day, I can't do this. It's too scary and risky for me.",asktransgender
So suppressing really doesn't work.,I tried suppressing my feelings about my gender and it worked! For about a month... now I'm back to where I was desperately wanting to be a girl but this time I'm not depressed 90% of the time which is good I guess still have episodes here and there but not as bad as before. Well I learnt this shit can't be suppressed at all I guess. ,asktransgender
I came out to my mother,"So, hello. I'm 18 years old, live in a notorious transphobic country you can guess which one and today I decided to come out to my mother who I live with. I finished high school without killing myself successfully while being close to it but now I'm pretty ok.

&amp;#x200B;

And to be honest I couldn't have expected it to go this way.. I think the reaction was pretty good. She accepted it and even said I can continue take my hrt and think together what to do next. It's... awesome! I mean I'm not killed, not homeless and can be open now more..

&amp;#x200B;

Though I don't think she understood me completely.. Of course. She asked why do I need to do this cause I can look like a woman without changing my passport.. And asked me why. She asked me for whom? I said for myself.. she said there are not beautiful people of either sex.. or I can wear long hair or feminine clothes at home, it's all ok. But why do I feel bad in my body? I said for others.. She said why do I care how they see me? I don't honestly know now.. But overall she was accepting. I mean she said it's ok if you want to do it and she won't stop me from doing hrt.. Or changing my sex but generally said maybe I can present as a woman with my old passport and just change a photo? But she is ok even with me changing it but I will need to earn money for it myself cause we are low on it..

&amp;#x200B;

Anyway.. I'm pretty confused now.. Mixed feelings. I mean I'm happy too. Now I have almost nothing to hide. And she won't stop me and will try to understand more. Honestly I expected a completely different reaction than discussing future with her with this fact in mind.. She doesn't mind it. Holy cow. And she will go with me to do bloodwork for me not to be anxious..

&amp;#x200B;

Edit: Oh, anyway, thanks for reading. My thoughts are very messy now and I was scared but I wanted to share it for some reason.. Today everything changed.",asktransgender
Help with detransitioning from nonawful people,"Ive been off hormones for a while now and I think I want to detransition socially, but I don't really know what to do next and I don't have anyone to talk to about it. I am not a terf or anything and I don't want to interact with them. I'd appreciate any like links or anything.",asktransgender
If you had the chance would you start from scratch?,"I've recently started my transition, and now I'm going to be moving to another part of the country soon where no one knows me.

I have the option to cut ties with my abusive and unsupportive family, delete my social media accounts which I only keep in touch with a few superficial fair-weather friends, change my name, change my number, and basically have a new life. I don't really even have anyone who will miss me, so it wouldn't be that big of a deal. The only thing I worry about is that the past always seems to catch up to us, and maybe someone might track me down, or someone might somehow uncover who I used to be...

My pretransition life is pretty depressing and sad and isolated. I don't want to remember it. 

If you had the chance would you do it?",asktransgender
Any update on the Perrigo generic estradiol valerate shortage?,"Any articles, statements by the company, FDA medication status, etc.?",asktransgender
gender non-conforming trans women,"My girlfriend\* (genderqueer trans woman) has been on hormones for almost 20 years, but she still does not pass all the time (her and I are both aware of the problems with this concept, but that doesn't make her feel better about her situation...) and feels like she hasn't changed a lot. She is queer and rarely presents in a stereotypically feminine way because that's just not her, but she is still sad about the lack of physical change and about almost always being seen as a man. 

I would love to help and make her feel better about herself and hoped that it would maybe help to introduce her to some really bad ass non-femme /and or non-passing trans women / trans feminine people (preferably 40+ years old).

Can you name some for me? If you have other comments on how to help a partner cope with dysphoria that would be great as well.

I'm trans myself, but feel pretty helpless anyways as the hormones did the trick for me when it comes to ""physical"" dysphoria.",asktransgender
Can I really blame myself for not transitioning earlier?,"I'm 20, MTF, 16 months HRT.

Every day when I look in the mirror, at my face, I am reminded of what male puberty did to it. I look at my jawline, my brow ridge, etc, and I am reminded of the price I paid by delaying transition until 19. 

When I was 14 and still in the closet, my parents joked with me when we were watching a news piece about a ftm, that if I ever wanted to be a girl they would accept me. 

I think what mainly held me off was the fact I went to a religious school where being gay was very frowned upon, let alone being trans. There is no doubt I would have been extremely bullied. And I feel knowing my parents they probably would'nt have accepted me and instead blamed it on autism or obsession.

It wasn't until I came out at 18 that I realised how drastic puberty was and that HRT couldn't change bone. I very wrongly believed that it was okay to delay in case it was just a phase.

But at the same time it's not like I wasn't warned. 
I was repeatedly told by trans people on Yahoo Answers to see a gender therapist and get on t blockers so I would have a better time than what they were going through. But I never listened, kept delaying and posting the same question ""Am I transgender?"" every month hoping for someone to say I wasn't. And when someone said I wasn't I would repost to hear what I wanted to hear.

I'm not in  total despair rn, I feel like I only need FFS for my life to feel complete and then the rest of my body will match. I have to view it this way because there's nothing I can do about any other aspect of my body. 

But I can't help but blame myself so badly, life would've been so much easier if I had somehow managed to medically transition at 14. I already knew I wanted to be girl by the age of 10. 

I feel like it was my very reckless and deeply-flawed determination to live in denial as something I wasn't to avoid transition altogether rather than accepting that it was always inevitable. That is why I feel I can only blame myself.




",asktransgender
crash course on makeup?,"hello! i am a 22y/o trans girl (been on HRT 3 days lol) and i've been practising makeup in anticipation of going full-time. i really enjoy applying it, but to put it bluntly, i end up looking like i'm going as an 80s drag queen for halloween. i am terrible at it. does anyone know of any good guides (ideally aimed at trans women) for those who don't know a great deal about it? thanks in advance!

if it matters, i tend to favour a gothic clothing style and have a very pale skin tone, so i try to pick muted dark colours that go with that. also a fun fact is that i have six lip piercings which makes putting lipstick on take a lot longer than it should (´;ω;`)",asktransgender
"i sent myself into a gender crisis, got any advice?","title!



i don’t know how to explain this, but i’m going to do my best. apologies for any typos, i’m typing on my phone and i’m kinda shaky because of nerves.



i’ve identified as a boy (FtM) for three years now, but i’m starting to question it. it started with me meeting someone on omegle, as dumb as that sounds. i lied to them about being a girl because i panicked, they said they were a girl and i knew if i said i was a boy they’d disconnect, but then i didn’t mind. i didn’t mind that they assumed i was a lesbian when i mentioned my girlfriend, i didn’t mind that they thought i was a girl. i didn’t mind when they asked for my name and i gave them my deadname.



i don’t know what to do because i struggle with internalized transphobia a lot, and a lot of mental issues from my past relationships, so i’m not sure if it’s that or if it’s me genuinely feeling this.



my first girlfriend, she broke up with me because i came out as trans and i told her it bothered me when she talked to me about girls she found attractive. before this, before i broke down, i had lied and said i was genderfluid for months so she could still call me her girlfriend. this experience, me having to lie about my gender to get someone to stay with me, has since left me fucked up in the head and now, i constantly have to ask my girlfriend for reassurance about things like this. i also get the urge to come out as cis, just to get rid of these thoughts.



so i don’t know if this, if me feeling no annoyance whatsoever at the idea at this person thinking i was a girl, is really something i’m feeling or if it’s my head fucking with me.




but i started thinking about it. and i realized it never bothered me too bad, being called a girl, until after i came out. i was homeschooled, very sheltered, didn't have many friends outside of my online friends, so i was basically always called a boy, always referred to as my chosen name, etc. she/her, and just  being called a girl in general only started to bother me when it became something that rarely happened, seeing as i had no social interaction with anyone in real life.


i've got such a vague sense of my gender identity and stuff that i am just so confused and stressed. i don't think going back to she/her, going back to using a feminine name, would bother me but i don't know how to test that without confusing my entire friend group. i'm also very masculine, so i don't think going from one end to the other would be the best for me. i just. don't know what to do. that's why i'm here. i don't have anyone else to talk to about this, and i need advice. 


what should i do? how do you all think i should try to relieve some of this?
",asktransgender
Will this electrolysis scarring go away?,"When I have treatments the pain is so intense I can hardly bear it even with lidocaine and plastic wrap, my face is swollen for days after, red for weeks and now pits and scars are starting to show. Any chance they will go away? Not sure what to even do next, since I obviously have to keep getting treatments...

&amp;#x200B;

[https://i.imgur.com/WXIGTeI.jpg](https://i.imgur.com/WXIGTeI.jpg)

&amp;#x200B;

[https://i.imgur.com/jjxa81Z.jpg](https://i.imgur.com/jjxa81Z.jpg)",asktransgender
Questioning gay man(?) looking for 2nd opinion,"Hi guys, 

I am AMAB that came out as gay when I was 19 after a suicide attempt. I have been living as a gay man for about 4 years and I have had a boyfriend for 1.5 years who I love feeling cute around. I shave my entire body twice a week, I wear nail polish on my toes (not my hands to stay discreet), and I currently have surfer hair that I want to grow to shoulder length or longer. 

I have been browsing the trans subreddits religiously for the past year and have been researching trans issues for the past 2-3 years.

I told my therapist about my gender research about 2 weeks ago. It felt like a really big deal for me to tell her this and I was excited for having done it. However, after I left, I felt like I didn't qualify as being trans. I got this feeling because I started imagining scenarios I wouldn't like about being trans. People's reactions, having to be feminine in *every* circumstance, trading male stereotypes for female stereotypes. 

I think I want to take HRT but I don't think I want to fully transition or call myself trans. I want to be a gay guy with boobs, and typing that out makes me feel really stupid. 

I think I might be non-binary, but I am scared to say that, because I have a lot of internal conflict with the idea of being non-binary. I don't really understand what it means to be non-binary. It kind of feels like a non-statement. Everybody embodies some male and some female characteristics, what's the point in making a distinction? Does a gay man who wears a blouse have to call himself non-binary? In all cases? What's the distinction?

Does it sound like I am just a femme gay man? Am I non-binary? Pls send halp
",asktransgender
Nonbinary people: how did you decide which term to use?,"Hello everyone.



So I am a genderfluid person and I came to this conclusion after years of fluctuating dysphoria and finding/contemplating the various terms under the ""nonbinary"" category. I'm curious about other nonbinary people.... How did you figure out which word to use for yourself? Agender, genderfluid, genderqueer, bigender, even nonbinary trans women or nonbinary trans men. What led you to this/these word(s) ?


Thanks :) ",asktransgender
When did you start using your new name?,"Pretty much the title - what’s the appropriate point to start using your new name or when did you start using your new name?

I live in a country where I need to be evaluated by psychologists and so on for at least a year before getting any treatment, so I’m not sure if I can wait until that’s done and I start getting hormones and such. I’d really like to have a female name and using my current name is just painful for me, but I can’t even imagine what others would think about me changing my name (someone who’s physically a male getting called female must be weird to others, especially in a pretty conservative country). So basically I’m really torn on the issue. 

Specifically talking about names in conversations etc., changing your legal name requires sterilisation and I’m not ready to go that far. ",asktransgender
Facial hair regrowth after electrolysis?,"Hey sisters,

I’ve been undergoing electro for a few months now, and despite having some parts of my face cleared multiple times, I’m still having regrowth (albeit slower and thinner) especially in my upper lip.

My electrologist said to expect some recurrence, as dormant follicles wake up, etc. That said, I’m far enough along with HRT, and otherwise physical changes, that this is starting to really bug me.

So, my question for all y’all is: what’s your experience been? I know everyone is different, and I’ve also been tempering my early, somewhat unrealistic expectations. But I’m also really looking forward to not having to shave, not having any shadow, and not dealing with the pain and expense.

Thoughts?

Thanks!",asktransgender
I thought my mom was supportive but now I don't know what to do.,"So, I don't visit my mom too much but we get along fine. At least we always have. She invited me yesterday for lunch to see my grandparents and things just spiraled so fast. Lunch was fine and then when we got back it was just my mom and I and she wanted me to explain what my rhetoric class that I was taking in college was, so I was doing my best but then she interrupted me about how the news was all biased, which I agreed with and then she was like ""I went to school for journalism, I know"" and I said I agreed it was just not what I was focusing on for my story and she laughed all snippy and told me that she didn't realize I was the only one talking, even though she was asking me to tell her about the class so... Anyways she basically got into how I don't tell her anything, that I put up walls and don't tell anyone anything and how she doesn't know what to talk to me about anymore and if I even wanted to have them be in my life. And I said ""of course"" Then she said she hated walking around on eggshells with me because I get all defensive. And that I get all made when people call me my deadname or ""he"", that I needed to realize that my transition affects others and to consider how it's been for her. The thing is that I NEVER correct them on deadnaming me, I'm not confrontational. Then she said it's really hard for her to treat me differently because I look and act exactly the same and that I'm not feminine at all. I've been on hrt for over two years.That I don't dress differently or do anything and that it's so hard for her and that maybe if she saw me be myself it'd be easier because I'm just not female or different in her eyes. I'm definitely more of a tomboy, I pretty much identify as a butch transbian but I honestly haven't been misgendered for months so I figure I pass. I started tearing up here and said I was leaving. She closed with ""thanks for talking to me"" all sarcastically and then I left. I don't know what to do now, she's always said she was supportive and this is so out of the blue. I've been making every effort to talk to her more because I know I can be defensive and I feel so betrayed. She also controls my schooling. Without her I can't go to college. I'm scared and hurt. What do I do.",asktransgender
"I sort of feel dysphoric about being called ""dad""...?","Are there any other good gender neutral or preferably feminine names for a parent which do not impinge on ""mom"" territory? I know most lesbians are just both ""mom"" but it feels weird for me.",asktransgender
"I came out to my friend this summer and I think I may have came out too early and it seems to have made my dysphoria worse than better, has anybody experienced this?",Recently I’ve felt dysphoria about things I didn’t use to and I think it is because I came out to my friend.,asktransgender
Question for guys and gals about emotion.,"Hi!  I'm 30, MtF and been on hormones for about 10 months now.  Everything is going great with my transition, I feel so much happier about who I am and can actually look at myself in the mirror and see me.  I've had to deal with mood swings a little, they're noticeable but not too extreme.

My question is this, for MtF girls have you noticed estrogen making you feel more, for better or worse?  I've spent pretty much my entire adult life alone, with almost no friends and no significant other.  For years this bothered me but not much, and now being on estrogen the pain of loneliness is practically soul crushing, and I've never felt this bad before.  I guess hormones really can be a double edged sword.  Have any FtM guys seen the opposite?  Do your emotions affect you less now at all with testosterone?",asktransgender
Hi,How do you keep. The feel going   That. Still.  A girl. When closted when out side tells u you are boy,asktransgender
Question about srs/gcs and Idaho Medicaid.,"I know theres a transurgery subreddit but it looks sorta dead (posts generally get 0 to 1 comments).  

I'm trying to figure out if medicaid can cover srs in Idaho.   Ive been googling all day and went to the idaho medicaid website and it had a very short not helpful list of things it covers like ""doctor visits"" or ""medications"".  Very vague and general.  

Does anybody here have experience trying to get srs through Idaho medicaid?  

Im going to probably have to call the help line eventually to know if nobody here has experience with it but Im putting it off because phone calls make me super anxious and theres probably a long hold time.  And talking to strangers about trans stuff.   Etc.  

Please let me know if anybody knows about this stuff.  Thank you!",asktransgender
Scared to Start Transitioning FTM,"So... My father, who I still have contact with at this point, is very homophobic and transphobic. Two very big things in my life. I can hide my sexuality just fine, but if I start to transition, that won't be so easy to hide.

I suppose I only talk with him on the phone now and then and rarely see him, but even the voice would be a give away after a while, and I don't know what to do. I could lie, maybe say I was sick, but how far would that go? It makes me so anxious whenever I think of him somehow finding out. 

Does anyone have advice? 
I'm also scared of how people in this small town I'm living in would react... Especially any employer I would be working for. As far as I and my girlfriend know, I'm the only transgender person in this little city. If there is anyone else, I have no idea how I would find out.

Every comment is appreciated...
I know I want to transition, I was just wondering if anyone had any advice on how to deal with any backlash I might get.",asktransgender
"I am confused about my sexuality, how can I figure it out?","Before my transition I was pretty sure I am into girls. But at not I seem to be attracted to men and it does feel different. 

It feels more like sexual attraction. But I am not sure if I just want a guy because that would make me feel like validated as girl or something stupid like that? So far I have only fallen in love with woman but that was never about sexual attraction only about personality.

The thought about kissing someone, anyone just feels strange to me. Maybe it wont be if I like that person? My sexual experience is very limited for someone that is 38y old. And that just adds to my insecurity.

I'll guess I need to force myself to go on dates just to find out? I think I would actually love to have sex with a guy but I just cant imagine doing that before SRS. 

Any tips? Should I wait until after SRS? It's just I have wasted so much time of my life already and I would really love to have my love life progressing somewhere only if it just is self discovery.",asktransgender
"Talking about ""trans stuff"" with friends all the time","I have a lot of trans friends in my social group - friends as in, we chat often online in a group, and see each other once in a while IRL... but not \*close friends\* i guess? Since coming out to this friend group, they've been supportive and helpful, it's been super super great.

But I can't help feeling that I want... I dunno, like a \*closer\* group of friends I can hang out and gripe/chat trans stuff with, like on the reg. All of these friends are a lot further along than I am, either late in transition or have ""completed"" transition already (some a while ago, even). It feels awkward to me, not even on HRT yet and still super baby trans and fragile, to DM them or reach out specifically to ask for time to chat or hang out. Like, that's gotta be super annoying right.

&amp;#x200B;

Should I try to find some more friends, nearer to my own situation, to build that kind of friend interaction? I just feel like constantly tapping my older-trans friends on the shoulder to ask if we can grab coffee so they can listen to me barf early-transition feels is... a lot. Feels like a burden.",asktransgender
So many questions... Though I'd like to ask if my current decided route is smart please.,"Hi everyone! I think I'm MtF? Some hidden doubt, but I'm mostly sure. It's strange... I want to be female, take hormones and such, but I don't really want breasts. Either none or small at best, but I also want to be clearly seen as female with no questions. Anyway! I just turned 21, but more like 15 mentally due to severe isolation and lack of schooling and such. I don't exactly know what I am, but I do know I'm not ""right."" I enjoy being anything but what I actually am, and hate to be called ""he/him."" 

Either way, enough rambling and to the point. Sorry. lol I have a million questions ranging from stupid small stuff that likely everyone knows, to major things probably only professionals can answer. I have absolutely no clue how to go about asking everything though... I guess to start, I'll ask the most important one. Is what my current plan is ideal?

I'm... really broke. I live with my parents who live bill to bill. No money, and I can't function as I am in public to get a job or anything. I'm kinda crippled by the Dysphoria, so I want to desperately rush to be female already. Be called ""her/she,"" and at least be seen as one. But as I am, I just can't do it... I can't just say, I'm female. I don't feel it at all. Nothing will change just switching right now. I truly feel I need more work done first. To me, I think that's voice? Among other things of course, but voice being the upmost important. However I'm an idiot or something, as I just can't make progress on my own. Following guides isn't getting me anywhere, and constantly failing draws dark thoughts in... So I was thinking, I was thinking of selling some stuff and getting voice therapy. Get a few session to help get a feminine voice. I believe, I truly believe that'd be the ticket! Getting my voice down! After getting voice I believe I'll feel ready! Once that happens, I can switch sides and finally start getting my life together. Get out of the darkness.

Though I'm also scared... I'm so very scared. I'm so worried I'm putting my expectations too high or that it won't be enough to make me feel ""ready."" I know I'll likely never feel truly ready, but I just simply can't do it as is. So I guess my question is, is my chosen path at all smart? Am I being stupid?

I know I need real therapy and expert help desperately, but it's not an option for me. I'm on my own. I won't lie, this chosen path might be my last shot. So please, tell me if it's right? Maybe I can do something better with what little funds I have?

Sorry for the wall of text! And if anything was confusing... I tried my best to make sense. I can answer any questions. Anywho! Thanks for reading, and for any help you lovely people give!",asktransgender
I came out of the closet with my mom...,"(sorry for the grammar my first languague isnt english)

So last week I told her that I was trans (ftm) I think that the first day she was in shook because she took It very well


But now her cant stop saying that ""I Will never be loved"" ""you are making my Life so much difficult"" ""Men have pennis"" ""If a man loves you that is because he is a fetishist"" and ""Woman Will know that I am missing something"" that ""I am gonna dissapear And change completly""

Now I am kind of dating another trans man and she says that we are togather because no other person Will want to be with us.


I am almost one month in T and I was wishing start seeing changes and I still want them but I am not comfortable with her seeing It , is all very weird...

I am never been so Happy In High School And going out with Friends and being myself but she doesnt care ",asktransgender
does sleeping on your stomach affect breast growth?,hi. i've been on E for 3 months now. i'm a stomach sleeper. i can't sleep in any other position. i have really tried because i'm afraid it might affect breast growth (also it kind of hurts). im just wondering if it would affect growth or if i'm just being too cautious over nothing?,asktransgender
Do you need a therapist for MTF hormones and any advice you could give me as a heads up? Thanks. :),"I posted something similar before. Anyways, I'm having trouble trying to find a local place in Augusta GA to provide the HRT (MTF). I feel like once I start the hormones that it will help in a way. I know I have bad gender dysphoria. 

August is when I had a bad breakup. I devoted myself to becoming a guy full time. I became suicidal. That's when I outsourced and found a few friends that I have now. That's also when they explained it to me that I need to be myself. For 12 years I have wanted to be a girl. I look up to Selena Gomez and many other females and be jealous about not being a female. 
I'm trying to find a place to start the hormones. 

However, my step mom is concerned about me and says that I need a therapist. My insurance sucks and doesn't cover much. Don't even have co pay so affording the blood tests will also be a struggle. However, most of the therapists charge $80 an hour. My step mom is only concerned about me. However, I know hormones effects everyone differently. Do I need a therapist? I wanted to see how it feels to be on the hormones before I start seeing a therapist if I even decide to do so. Issue is I'm very tight on money so I can't just go to a therapist unless I absolutely need it. 

I know I want to be a female. No one can change my mind as I always said I was going to take my secret to the grave and August I almost ended my life. I want to start the hormones, but I don't want to have to drive 2 to 3 hours to take them. I work a 6am to 4:30pm job so I can always take a few hours off, but anything far away will require me taking an entire day off. 

Any advice? Thanks. :) ",asktransgender
"If I Wore This Tommorow, Would I Get Looks?","https://imgur.com/a/O2EZPfu

I'm a MtF who hasn't started transistioning at all yet. If I wore this outfit (the jeans are women's jeans) would I get weird looks from people or does it look pretty inconspicuous?",asktransgender
Is penis envy a sign?,"So, whenever I look up penis envy its like INCESTTT and I'm like WHATTT so I came here for help. I'm a questioning, young bean sprout who's always felt envy towards dicks, even in a non-sexual way. I've always rather pee with a penis, standing up, even when guys talk about how peeing while sitting down is like ""heaven"" or whatever. Sexually, I've always played with the idea of having a penis, even if I was bottoming in the fantasy. This may just be paired with the fact that I'm attracted to dicks on anybody (on girls, on boys, on anything) or that I'm just fascinated with dicks. It could just be a fetish or smthn, smh. ",asktransgender
Hair removal/feminizing effects without HRT,"Hey friends, bit of an in-depth question:

I've been on estrogen for a couple of years now, and in that time my bipolar-2 has gotten considerably worse. I'm currently doing an experiment where I go off e for two months to see what having testosterone in my system does for my mental health. So far, my depressive episodes are more rare and less intense, and I have slightly increased executive function. I'm already on mood-stabilizers, and they're helping a fair amount, but I'm worried that it would be emotionally healthier in the long run to not be on HRT, which is scary, because I love what estrogen does to me physically.

The thing that gives me the worst dysphoria is facial hair. I had a full round of lasers and a fair amount of electrolysis to get it under control. It wasn't entirely absent, but when I shaved, it was invisible for two days or so. Since this testosterone experiment, it's already grown in thicker. I'll see if going back on E thins it out a bit, but for the moment, and potentially moving forward, I have stubble and shadow again, and people have been consistently misgendering me because of it. My hairline has started re-receding as well.

So my question is: in the event that I can't healthily continue with HRT, what can I do to control my facial hair? If I finish a full expensive program of electrolysis, will that be permanent? I'm unclear on the science of hair growth; does being on T produce new follicles, or just thicken the ones that already exist? Is there a real way to stop my head hair from receding? Maybe even better, is there a way to induce alopecia universalis? What can I do to fix my face without hurting my brain?

Thanks for your help.",asktransgender
How to tell my family?,"Most of my friends already know about me, but nobody in my family knows.

&amp;#x200B;

I would like to start with my brother, but I don't have courage to talk in person, I wrote a letter for him, but I wonder if it will too much information and it could be overwhelming.",asktransgender
Flier suggestions,"I've been thinking about putting up some simple trans-positive fliers on  bulletin boards in my area as a simple, visible show of support. Maybe a  ""Trans Rights are Human Rights"" one, but I don't know if any of you  have other ideas or suggestions. ",asktransgender
Has anyone come out despite no plans to medically transition? Thoughts?,"TL;DR - Is it worth giving up cis privilege if you're not going to medically transition?

I've had a breakthrough in the last few days where I finally feel pretty confident that I'm trans masculine (and NB, but I already knew that). And now that I've finally figured out what I want to look like, I'm realising that it's not actually achievable for me. Long story short, T has effects I definitely don't want, and it won't help with some of things I *do* want, and it's not like I get to pick and choose. So barring major medical advances, my least-bad option is to just focus on what I can do with exercise and styling, and eventually top surgery if I can ever afford it.

I'm not sure I can cope with hiding my gender identity indefinitely though. I need people to understand who I am and what I'm going through. Maybe not everyone I know, but at least those who are important to me. I feel like it's a bit weird to come out though, seeing as my appearance probably won't change all that drastically. Why sign up for all that negativity without even having the benefit of passing?

On the other hand, I want to be authentic, and frankly I hate the idea of being viewed as a butch woman (nothing against butch women, I'm just not one!). And people probably will wonder what's up with the changes I do make, and I'd like to be able to explain. Mostly, I'm just exhausted by hiding.

I'm interested in hearing any personal experiences with this or just thoughts in general. ",asktransgender
Anyone else freelance online? I want to use my chosen name but don't know how to do that with contracts and payments and stuff because it's not my legal name.,"Okay a bit of background on me. Due to my home life situation and the school program I am in, I cannot come out at this time so I present female, even though I don't even look female.

On the side I also freelance online though website like [Upwork.com](https://Upwork.com), I get hired for art and illustration, things like that. 

Now I'm starting to get a little bit ready to come out bit by bit. The first thing is I'm switching all of my online presences to reflect my gender (male) and my chosen name (Colin). I really want to change all my freelance profiles to my chosen name. 

Obviously though that's not my legal name.

So my question for anyone who freelances and gets paid through a formal site like Upwork, how do you handle the name issue? When the name you want to use is not your legal name? How does that work with contracts and stuff? My legal name is suuuuuuuuuper fem, and it just doesn't go along with my appearance at this point, it's just confusing for people.",asktransgender
"My grandma sent me a letter after coming out telling me that she’s convinced I’m not trans because I didn’t show any signs and a bunch of other very ignorant stuff. It made me laugh at first, but now it’s making me me feel really shameful and guilty. Advice?","She was basically raised in the Catholic Church (went to school taught by nuns) and I know she loves me very much, as she is like my second Mom (I grew up with my mom and grandparents), but her letter basically told me I was wrong and that I shouldn’t tell anyone outside of my close friends because it’s my “personal business.” I know this is all out of love, but I didn’t feel that from her words. I feel so alone, insulted, rejected, and all the things I was afraid of feeling by coming out and of COURSE it was her...has anyone else dealt with something like this? What should I do?",asktransgender
"I really want to get on HRT, but don't want to go through surgery?","I have a female body build naturally. I (thankfully) took after my mother genetically. My father is bigger boned and broad shouldered. My body is smaller built compared to most men. I'm a 22 year old male that would like to start HRT.

I don't care if I become sterile. I have no want to ever have children. I might possibly adopt, but I don't want a child of my own. Odd I know, but that's how I feel.

I want to start hormone replacement therapy to make my body even more feminine. I want my body to change into a more female style body. I've thought about it, and I have no problem telling anyone about this transition.

However, I want to remain a male, but I want to get on HRT and have my body become more feminine. I understand that I will have to keep doing HRT to keep my body looking feminine after a transition, but I have no problem continuing HRT long-term 

I want to have a more feminine body. I've thought about this for years and I want a feminine body. Curves, smoother skin, boobs, etc. This is what I want.

I have no problem coming out as transgender and I have no problem with strangers judging. Basically, I want to remain a male, and want to transition my body into a much more feminine body.

Any thoughts?",asktransgender
Hey Trump. Screw you. Screw you and your pathetic administration of nobodies.,"You really think that I'm going to change how I present to the world just because you don't want me to exist? Well guess what, you have no impact on how I live my life and there's nothing you can do to change that.",asktransgender
ouch,"hey. i had to leave work early yesterday and now im home again today because theres this looming dreadful feeling every time i remember im supposed to be a girl (im pre-everything). 

it incapacitates me. makes my hands shake and my eyes water. i have depression, anxiety, and ocd, but im wondering if being trans was the secret spice that is now crippling my whole body?? does anyone else experience this??? is this dysphoria?????",asktransgender
My partner came out to me last night,"Moved to r/mypartneristrans, I don't I know how to delete my post",asktransgender
I'm a little bit curious. Have you voted yet?,"https://www.strawpoll.me/16737529

This is just a quick informal question I'm asking of all of you. Thanks! ",asktransgender
I went too far,"Over the past week I finally got my ears pierced, and after putting a little makeup on, I saw 'her' for the first time. I also am starting to look very androgynous in my presentation, but to the point where I feel uncomfortable doing so. I still think I'm Trans, but I just feel like going back into boy-mode for a while, I've been changing too quickly and between my other problems in life, the nervous prospect of coming out to my family and the rise of these anti-trans fascists, I feel that I don't have the guts or the mental strength to transition at the moment. Fuck, I'm nervous just trying to tell my Mom (I'm 20 and in uni) that I got my ears pierced, she wouldn't like it.",asktransgender
Am I a transgender or not?,"Hello! I'm a 28 year old cisgender woman who is truly confused whether I have gender dysphoria or not or whether I am a transgender or not. To start with, I don't actually see myself as a man or think that I am a man but I do want to be one. I always daydream of being a guy and if there were a button that I could press that would turn me into a man, I would press it in a heartbeat. I have had this ""desire"" even before I entered my teenage years; I would often pray to God to turn me into a boy only to end up incredibly sad and disappointed in the morning when my prayer wasn't answered.

I'm currently single right now but I have been in several relationships and I hate seeing photos of myself together with a boyfriend as in my mind there should be two guys in the photo, not a guy and a gal. Also, I'm still into guys and I'm not in anyway attracted to women. Basically, I want to be a gay man. Which I think doesn't make sense. 

I have never told my family about this ""desire"" in a serious manner, but I have jokingly told my dad about it and he only said ""Who doesn't want to be a man?"". I also asked my older sister what she thinks about Chaz Bono (Cher's son), and she thinks ""she's"" been corrupted by the patriarchy into believing that you have to be a man to be able to do traditionally manly stuff, wear manly clothes and that she fell for the lie that manly stuff = good, girly stuff = bad. The only person that knows about this is my best friend who happens to be gay. He thinks that I am nuts to want to be a gay guy because it is so much easier for me to get hot guys as I'm a ""pretty"" woman, according to him.

I have also thought a lot about this ""desire"". Do I really want to be a man or do I only want to be what I think what a man is? Is what I think what a man is only truly based on traditional gender roles? What makes a man a man? One thing I know though is that I want a fully functioning male reproductive system attached to a biological body of a man. I want to be Chris Evans. lol. But then, is biology the only thing that determines whether one is a man or not? If Laverne Cox has been a woman even before she transitioned, then that means biology isn't the only factor, right?

Now regarding transition, I don't think that it is something that I could ever go through as there is no procedure that could truly give me a fully functioning male body. BTW, I have no intention of being discriminatory against anyone by saying ""fully functioning male body"". Right now, I'm just almost always sad, I don't want to say I'm depressed as I have not been diagnosed of it, because I could never be what I want to be. I hate looking at myself in the mirror and seeing a woman there. The only thing that somehow gets me through and cheers me up a bit, though it may sound extremely vain and truly pathetic, are the compliments I get about how pretty I am. It somehow reassures me that I don't have it so bad, that being a woman is who I am meant to be and that trying to be a man would just mess things up. 

I don't know if what I feel makes me a transgender. I don't even know if what I have is dysphoria. Does anyone feel like this? How are you coping with it?",asktransgender
I don't know what to do (FTM),"It's like this every day.
I can't stand my own body.
I can't even properly put my words together to describe how I'm feeling...
I'm trapped.
It won't stop.
I know it must sound overdramatic, but I think about it all the time.
Progress is so slow, I wish I could start changing already. 
It feels like it's eating away at me.
I don't want to annoy those around me, so I try to stay quiet. When I'm not, I'm overly apologetic. 
I don't know anymore.
I just wish I could make it all stop.
I know my situation is better than most, but I still hate the constant nagging that's going on in my head.
I hate my body.
If anybody found out, I'd be disowned. Looked at as sick. I don't know what to do anymore. I can't come out.",asktransgender
So what’s with the term ladyboy?,"It makes me very uncomfortable. My family uses it a lot of the time even once indirectly called me that. When I ask them why they use it they tell me it’s because trans prostitutes in Thailand call themselves that too. And I don’t understand why even they use it maybe cause everyone else does and it became a norm? 

Anyway... is being a ladyboy different than trans? Or is it also a derogatory term? And how can I counter the argument about the Thai trans prostitutes if so? ",asktransgender
Not sure my mum is understanding any hints... plus a recent brightly-coloured hoodie may not be making things more obvious,"Hello again! Still unsure about my gender - I hate having to talk about it at all in public, I froze up one time when someone asked me if I was male or female - but I'm trying to hint I'm trans... by cosplaying characters that are generally headcanonised (is that a word?) as gay for MCM Comic Con. I did buy an Overwatch-themed hoodie that bears a strong resemblance to the trans pride flag, though. I'm considering cosplaying Chihiro Fujisaki (semi-important character in Danganronpa; wears a white shirt, dark green idk what to call it, floaty brown skirt, thigh-high socks, short shorts) for next Comic-Con, but I'm unsure if my mum would get the hint even then, as I've made the mistake of explaining how the gender of a character isn't important when it comes to cosplaying. Plus it'd be embarrassing to speak while in costume. Anyone got any good, quiet, and money-free ideas on how I could suggest seeing a gender therapist? And also any low-effort methods to raise the pitch of my voice at home?",asktransgender
I am done with waiting,"Last night I went to my schools drag show. It was incredible, I had not realized how much I needed this.

But the best part of the night was recognizing one of the drag queens, I saw her several months ago at the Sephora trans class. She was the model, and I remember looking at her and thinking shit look at what hormones can do… they can do this for you… you can change.  

After the show, I got up the courage to say hi, I asked if she had modeled for a Sephora class, she had, and I got to thank her, and she remembered me! Lol I mean I was the only trans man in the class but honestly I was just so happy to be able to thank her and tell her that the night of the class I was able to cut my hair and start making changes.

It was during the class that I realized that if I wanted to survive as a trans man in grad school then I needed to be known as a man. I couldn’t go back to being Amanda after Aiden felt so good. I couldn’t stand having strangers call me, she any more. I wanted to be Aiden.

Seeing her preform last night…. She is a woman, she is gorgeous, and there she was preforming and smiling and living her best life and it gives me hope that I can do that too one day soon.

I plan to start T in December, and although I sit here crying as I think about all the time I have lost to Amanda, I also cry with joy, because soon I will be like her, soon I will start living life the way it should have been.

So to my parents and all those other people who don’t believe me or are “having a difficult time with it” take time, take all the time you need, just don’t expect me to wait. I hope to see you again sometime, if you decide to catch up.  

I am through with waiting, I am ready for my life to begin.",asktransgender
Is it common to go through the questioning period of bisexual &amp; enby before finally accepting myself as a transguy?,"I’m sorry, I realized it’s a long post after finishing writing lol. But essentially, it’s the story about my questioning phase and the question is really what the title says anyway.

For as long as I can remember, I knew I’ve always wanted to be born in a male body instead. It’s not until I’m around 19 that I discovered trans people exists and that I can relate myself a lot to them. 

Then, goes a period of time where I constantly keep accepting and denying back and forth that “yes, I’m a transguy. no, I’m just a girl that likes several masculine characteristics and likes being a tomboy”. I acknowledge that I do like some feminine stuff and act girly sometimes.

So to make sense to myself, I started identifying myself as non-binary and I’ve concluded for a while that I’m bisexual because I’ve always been attracted to women and men. Life went pretty normal from there.

Now that I’m almost 24 yo, I started to have social dysphoria again, probably because I’m now thinking more and more about my near future, like my adult life: career, marriage, family, etc. I think it’s getting harder and harder for me to live as a female and be treated as one as well as I grow older. 

Also, my body dysphoria has never been more intense than ever. I don’t hate my body to the point that I’d want to do harm to myself but I dislike the feminine features more and more. I envy more and more to be a guy and be in a male body. Before when I discovered I may be trans, the idea of taking HRT didn’t appeal to me. Now, I’m really considering it. I’ve never dated someone before but I would feel uncomfortable to date anyone in my current body.

I’m still not sure about this but I also believe that I’m actually straight and not bi. I start to realize that I’m attracted to male because I envy to have their body. I have thoughts of getting into dating relationships with guys before but for any serious or sexual relationships, I’ll start feeling uneasy. I don’t feel like that with girls.

Anyway, I’m still not out to most of my family and friends yet and I still present myself as a female to my surrounding people. I’m at the stage of questioning where I’m pretty certain that I’m a transman and thinking about medically transitioning which can be a hard process. I also have a bit of concerns whether my thinking will shift again later on, like after I start transitioning and then realizing that it may not be what I want. I’m afraid of that...My therapist suggests me to explore my male identity further so I can really confirm it because for my entire life, I’ve been suppressing myself a lot and don’t give enough chance to express myself more masculine.

",asktransgender
Just a rant.,"I've been thinking about this more recently, and I'm wondering *would* I really be happier male? I know for a fact if I were born male that I would probably be a more confident, comfortable person. But that's not the case. I'll never be able to be 'biologically male' so what's the point in even trying? And now I'm starting to think that maybe if I were born male I'd want to be female, and I'm confused further. 

I'm not very happy being female, I know that, but how do I know that my discomfort and 'dysphoria' isn't being caused by trauma? Or, perhaps, the dislike of stereotypes? 

A big part of me wishes that I could just be content with a stupid female body, but then another part of me would feel like a huge dick for speaking for transgender people and claiming that I was transgender in the past. I don't want to be a dickhead. But then again I don't want to claim to be something that I'm not. 

My parents always told me not to lie- But they want me to say that I'm a girl. I feel like I'm lying when I say that. When I look at myself in the mirror I don't see a girl. When I look at my face I don't see a girl. I feel like I'm violating women when I use the women's restroom. I feel like a pervert when my female friends undress in front of me, thinking that I'm a girl. Though I don't feel too guilty. They don't know, and I'm not that attracted to women, anyways, so it's not like I would actually have sexual thoughts. 

Every day I feel like life is becoming harder and harder to live. If I were able to just wake up as a boy I feel like living would become easier and maybe even enjoyable. Sure, it would take some getting used to, as I'm usually easily affected by change, but I think I would be much happier.",asktransgender
how to tell coworkers i’m trans,"so i recently got a job at food lion stocking and i work with all guys, and i pass as a guy most of the time until i speak so i had just hoped they would see me as a guy without me having to say anything. well, at first that worked, but the other night someone said “go help her” in reference to me and then last night a lot more of that and like, that shit makes me highkey want to die. it doesn’t help that the weird older custodian found out my deadname and keeps asking me about it, and literally said “no one knows your name...yet!”. anyways i really need them to stop misgendering me or i will quit this fucking job, but i don’t know how to bring up the fact that i am, in fact, a dude to my coworkers. it’s just awkward. and i really need money so i cant quit this job. also i’m starting T in 7 weeks so eventually everything that makes them misgender me will go away. i just REALLY hate having to explain that i’m trans, like why tf do i have to ask ppl to not call me “her” when i look like a dude, and pass, am obviously trying to look like a dude by binding? ",asktransgender
"Question about breast growth, 19, MTF [NSFW?]","Are there any ways to piece together what size breasts I'll have when I'm done? I'm 3 months in as of the 24th, and I have clearly felt the breast buds and they're fairly large \[I assume\] but I'm nervous that I won't actually have any boobs any bigger than they are now :(   


At the moment, they're beginning to turn from hard and firm to a bit more squishy than they were before, which is great but help me get rid of some anxiety here.",asktransgender
I can't talk about trans stuff with cis people. Anyone else?,"so i have a friend who is a part of multiple marginalized groups, and because they are trans supportive, and because I have no other trans girl friends, i like to talk to them about my issues, but idk, i don't feel like it's worth it anymore. the only person who kind of gets me is my afab enby housemate.

anyways, last night i wanted to express to them how shitty it felt that i did my makeup for like an hour and put on a wig and i still was unhappy and sad with how i looked, and they responded with ""you need to learn to love what you have, even if you don't like it""...and that's basically how the conversation happens every time. it just sucks because it's not like it's a matter of confidence (at least completely)...like for them being a poc, they have struggled with her features being seen as lesser, but it's not the same. when i look at myself, i get afraid of how others would perceive me...it's not the same thing, and i can't explain that.

i also mentioned how i wanted to be perceived as cis and she told me that was problematic, which was annoying because there is a huge pressure to fit in to cisnormativity to survive in society, and I mentioned that and they understood, but idk, i felt like it wasn't their place to say something like that.

idk, does anyone else feel this way? i feel like i have no one irl to talk to about my issues.",asktransgender
"i took an extra tablet, will i die",im on 350 mg spiro daily (i know alot) and i took an extra tablet by mistake so that means i took 400 today. will i die im scared,asktransgender
Anyone have any experience with the kind clinic in austin?,Hi guys i just moved to the killeen area and have heard good things about the kind clinic....have anyone experienced this clinic? ,asktransgender
"Probably a dumb question, but...","Is there a sub where pre-everythings can post a pic, or pics, of themselves and get feedback on how hrt might effect them. I know that this practice seems to be generally frowned upon in subs like r/transpositive and r/transtimelines. 

And yes, I know, ""passing"" shouldn't necessarily be the goal, or the thing your striving for, but as someone who's increasingly considering hrt, and being driven crazy obsessing over their (in my case) masculine features, I feel that a trans positive sub where one could get objective feedback on such things would be great. 

Edit: by feedback I mean simply objective statements regarding appearance. I know that the combination of constant confusion and on and of dysphoria can kinda shift what it is one focusing on at any given time. Like sometimes I'll hyper focus on my chin, then a minute later it'll be my jaw. The shifting about really screws with my mental image of myself, and having an objective 3rd party tell me definitely that I have X and X feature would be helpful.",asktransgender
I had sex for the first time with a guy and it was freaking AWESOME!!!,"Hi, Lena here.

First of all, thanks for all the support from you guys. I am a serious lurker and now I am really excited about this first post.

I am a 18yo M2F girl, now in HRT for around 8 months and I have met an amazing Indian guy from r/sissykik about a month ago and we were kind of cuddling for some weeks ;). He is super charming and funny and he love to sleep on my laps and belly. I am not really comfortable with my transitioning body (even though he loves it) so I was always a bit resistant to get physical. Yesterday we went for a movie and after that we were just chilling at his place, watching one scary movies. Somehow one thing went to another, we end up having a super amazing sex. He was really happy after that, so do I. I tried my level best to make him happy and he did the same. I have never expected that my first sex (as a girl) going to be this great. 

I always want to be a girl since my childhood and I am happy that all my preparations including crossdressing, HRT and workouts finally paid off. ",asktransgender
"So. I came out to my parents a few days ago, lets talk about that","So as the title suggests I came out to my parents two days ago about being trans (MtF) and it honestly went a lot better than I expected now heres what i'm asking what next both me and my parents know very little on where to go from here, I explained to them that I want to be full female and start hormones etc. for reference I live in the UK and i'm just confused on the steps I need to take from here, Thanks in advance ",asktransgender
Online therapy?,"Just came out to my wife and we both need therapy. The thing is we're moving abroad in about 12 weeks. Looks like there's a bunch of therapy sites but I'm not sure how to tell if they're any good. Do any of you have suggestions? Ideally we'd like to see someone as a couple and I know I need to see someone alone as well, because I'm a mess. Thanks!",asktransgender
How to move forward?,"Hi all! First time caller, long time fan... (well, I lurk).

I finally came out to myself like a year ago and thought  'Right... time to get things done M'. I had it all planned out; Get GIC referral (booo UK!), lose the gut (very overweight), lose the fur (seriously... gorilla over here), practice the voice, come out to family and friends, move on with my life.

Then, in ways I'm sure many here are familiar with, life gets in the way. The doubts ('what if its actually just a fetish'), the fear (I'm gonna be the fat freak in the corner with nothing going for her), the shame (seriously wtf), and the complete lack of anything you try seeming to work just piles on top of work and other general life stuff and things get delayed and stalled:

  - I gave up fizzy drinks, I gave up crisps, I gave up sweets, I try fasting but nothing seems to work.. I've lost like an 1/2 an inch in 10 months. I'm still a disgusting blob.

  - I'm so scared of people finding out (there's that shame) that I haven't booked any laser for my fur because when I get close to making that appointment I kind of freak out and stop because as much as I hate it, I can hide behind my hair.

  - I've been growing my head hair out... out being the operative word. No amount of conditioner or brushing/combing seems to stop it being more than a large ball of fluff (its super thick too).

  - I screwed myself up enough to talk to my GP for a referral which got done in July but I haven't heard anything from the GIC.

  - I found a therapist (well, counselor) who seems to work with trans people in my area but cant seem to get a response to my emails (and I'm too scared to do it by phone)

  - Finally, and for those of you who have read down this far, this will not be a surprise, I haven't come out to anyone except my GP and dermatologist (yay psoriasis). I'm just so scared that people will reject me and hate me that I hide away and pretend things are fine (like ive been doing for the last 25 years).

As you can see. I'm kind of a mess. But I still feel I need to do something.. I can barely even look at women walking down the road or online (especially in porn) without wishing I was them.

Well... that turned into more of a rant than I intended but I need some help. Some advice. Some compassion.. I'll take anything at this point. So I've come to you lovely people to get some thoughts from those who know what I am talking about.

tldr; hlep!",asktransgender
Would the straight/bi trans women on here be okay with dating a cis male crossdresser or drag queen?,I'm curious to see what you guys might feel about this hypothetical. ,asktransgender
What are your opinions on the “boy challenge”?,"I personally kinda hate it, but I know a lot of people don’t mind it.",asktransgender
Burning sensation,"I have a question , i am 34 years old and i recently started hrt  5 days ago , i am on spiro 25mg twice daily and progynova once daily . My question is i started feeling this burning sensation in my left arm and sometimes in my left leg near to the ankle  can any one tell me why? I am so worried? ",asktransgender
Tips on separating childhood biases when trying to be introspective?,"So this is going to be a mess of a post I'm sure. And its also most like something that has been asked a million times, doesn't have a real answer, or both. Anyways, I mostly grew up in a very conservative and religious rural area. My family was very religious and although they were big on ""never be mean to people"" I definitely grew up with idea that this, that, and the other thing are all sins and if you do it your going to hell. Fast forward 20 or 30 years and I've moved away from home and have become one of the ""damned liberals"" I heard about growing up. But despite that I still find myself with thoughts that I feel can be traced back to those times. A perfect example is that about a year ago now I finally came out as being bi to a few close friends. It went really well, but since then I've only have one partner that identified as male, it was only a one time thing, and the entire time I had a voice in my head saying I was bad. Now a few weeks ago I was linked to egg\_irl, from there found traa, and finally my where here and it has got me thinking. But every time I try and do any serious introspection those same voices come up. Hell, even just writing this has been unexplainably nervous. Anyways, I'm not sure what I'm hoping to here, but maybe people who have had more experience with stuff like this has some hints for dealing with stuff. ",asktransgender
My boobs are big enough to jiggle,"My boobs are still really small, though they are much bigger than I expected, seeing as im only 2 months in.

This morning I looked in the mirror and I noticed that if I shook my body my boobs would jiggle, and for some reason it felt incredibly validating.

Theres no one in my life that I can talk with about this, but at least you guys understand :)",asktransgender
"Can anyone recommend therapists in the Indianapolis, Indiana area?","I have done some research my self, but since there aren’t really reviews about this sort of thing I was wondering if anyone could provide some insight before I make any decisions.",asktransgender
What are some resources I can give to my mom to help her understand and support me?,"So I've come out to my mom a week or two ago. She was really surprised and worried but she absolutely supports me and wants me to be happy. She just doesn't really understand though, I've had to explain to her it's different from just wanting to be a feminine gay man and other common misconceptions like that. As well she's worried about me transitioning and regretting it. Just in general she's not very informed, so any resources I could link her to would be very appreciated.",asktransgender
There's a rally for trans rights in Dallas today @3pm,"Want to go hang out in a park on a nice day and stand against the Trump administration's attacks on our community? Go check this out at Belo Garden Park 1014 Main St Dallas, TX 75202

https://www.facebook.com/events/1888576761207372/",asktransgender
Is it hard to find a partner that is non-transgender?,"Hi,

In my journey to better understand Transgender and the LGBTQ community. I wanted to know something..

Is it difficult to find a partner that is non trans? Does any MtF ladies found a man (or woman) that is non trans that accepts them?

Anyone married to anyone like that or have a similar situation? 

You have to forgive my lack of knowledge even though I'm an incredibly intelligent man.

When we were raised it was rooted in us that gays are bad and they deserved to be hanged and beaten and anyone different like trans. I believed this for a very long time and my feelings interwined this way because my trusting adults, figures, and role models instilled this into me. My home country is the only country in the South America and Carribbean's where being Gay or committing ""Homosexual Acts"" go severely punished by law or death. They have a savings clause in their rules so this will not be changed.

I am an actively practicing Christian, I am now only starting to learn more instead of only believing what I was told and to love everyone. I'm so sorry for not taking the time to learn.",asktransgender
"I hope this is okay, but could anyone give me feedback on a script I just wrote about realizing being transgender? It is tonally a cross between Tomboy and Sense8 IMO","So I am transgender myself, one who didn't realize until they were past 20, and I felt I haven't really seen that represented so I decided to write a script that could represent it. I wanted to get y'all's feedback before asking a cis audience. Now just a warning I finished this draft at 3 AM this morning so there might be a typo and it is a rough draft so some patches of dialogue are rough, but the basic beats will not change. Just as a warning I decided to use the pronouns 'he' until my character realized they are a woman and same with using their dead name. In one or two spots I have a note to myself on one section being there in case another one does as this is very much a vignette script and I wanted to have back ups. And trigger warning, protagonist called a freak and bad fight with mom. Also I am early into my transition so there are some blind spots in it where I might not have included something I haven't experienced, if you have any suggestions I am all ears! [Transfixed, rough draft](https://drive.google.com/file/d/1ek1VJdG5Pn_TJSHvuCxjWOuNIasgU5K_/view?usp=sharing)

Also, is the pacing bad? I feel worried I spent too much time in the first half and the second half breezes by too quickly ",asktransgender
"Is “I don’t agree with ‘transgenderism’, but you can do whatever you want” the worst statement of support?","I see this in the comments of every video relating to trans issues, all the time. It reads, and means, “I don’t think you exist, but you can wear a dress, i won’t stop you” and it’s more invalidating for me than any other statement, even compared to total transphobes. It is so condescending and treats transpeople as though we are children playing pretend, not to mention it’s always worded with the idea that it is A) a debate and B) being transgender is an ideology.

Seriously it gets under my skin in the worst possible way.",asktransgender
What is your sexual preference?,"I was sitting thinking today. When someone goes through MTF SRS, they ""usually"" date a man or a FTM man. 

However, do any MTF have girlfriends, but still conversed to their gender.

**I apologize for the horrible wording of this. I'm not trying to get attacked.**

It's hard to word these things.

I guess what I'm asking is how **common** is it for a trans man or trans woman to bisexual or just prefer one gender? Or the same gender of their conversion?

No hate, I know very little about gay, lesbian, bisexual, transgender, transexual etc etc.

I also understand sexual identity and preference are not the same. I am curious though 

Thanks.
",asktransgender
Worried if my kids will remember me.,"Anyone else ever dealt with the thought that their kid won't ever remember what you looked like before transition. My daughter is 6 and my son is 2, so my daughter might, but my son will probably not. Most of me thinks this is probably a blessing as they won't have the dissonance. But if I'm honest, there is a part of me that is sad that they won't remember ""dad,"" especially my son. Maybe I'm just being sentimental.",asktransgender
"Is it offensive to date a trans boy again? This isn't bait, I'm worried about being entitled","I dated a trans boy but our relationship went sour, I can't go into detail but I was focused on him potentially abusing his own friends than ""relaxing"" and doing normal relationship stuff. This isn't me shitt talking him.

If I date a trans boy again will it be me being entitled? since it went so bad last time, keep in mind I don't know if I'm  a chaser or not, because I had dysphoria as a child and I might actually be trans myself.

So what should I do? should I date a trans boy again?  I know trans people face stigma and I don't want to act entitled to them, especially after I had a real relationship gone wrong.  

&amp;#x200B;

I hope this doesn't come off as non-sense

&amp;#x200B;

tldr; dated a trans boy, want to date one again, is it creepy?",asktransgender
"I'm giving up. I'm not a girl, and I'm not trans.","This isn't a question. I just need to put my thoughts out there so I can move on. I'm sick of living in this purgatory, stuck somewhere between genders - stuck being unhappy.

So I'm quitting. I'm just going to learn how to cope with being a man, and leave it at that. I am a man, and that's all there is to it. I can wish and dream and fantasize about being someone not so hateful and miserable, but it will never change. I hate myself, I hate who I'm stuck being. Who I am is never going to change, though. All I can do is change the way I feel about it. I think enabling this fantasy that maybe I'm trans is just making it worse. Now I hate that I'm not female and I'm miserable that I don't have the ability to transition.

I have so much respect for my brothers and sisters out there who are living their truth. It is incredibly empowering and exciting to see everyone post here, /r/transpositve and /r/traa about their journeys and struggles. I'm so proud of everyone who is able to take control and be who they know they are.

The problem is that it's also devastating to me. I'm jealous of your ability to know what you need and actually seek it out. I'm so jealous that you are able to be happy and love yourself. I'm not happy. I have never loved myself. As long as I live with this fantasy that I'll never be happy unless I can be female, I never will be.

I'm a boy. That's just the reality. I'll never be a girl, and putting on some makeup and a dress won't change who I am. I'll only wind up dead this way, and so I have to get out. I'm unsubscribing from the trans subs.

I'm not giving up the battle, though. We all have to keep fighting this fight for respect and acceptance. I'm just going to have to be an ally, because that's all I can do. Maybe I'm a coward.

If any of you need acceptance or validation, please let me know. I'm here for you. I just have to be here for myself, too.

Be well, and keep being beautiful.",asktransgender
Sexual Orientation and HRT,"I'm curious about how frequent and when MTF Transgender individuals have had their sexual orientation flip while on HRT.  My Endo made sure that I was informed that this may happen and to be prepared and OK if it does.  He didn't elaborate on the subject though.

Has anyone experienced this?

Cheers
Alicia ❤💕💖💋",asktransgender
Need advice about moving to the US,"**TL;DR:** Planning on moving from Berlin, Germany to Boston, New Haven, Chicago, Palo Alto or Toronto. Any personal experience with these cities? How safe/tolerant are they? I’ll be post legal name change, about 1 year on HRT but not stealth.

&amp;#x200B;

Hey all,

I have a question for those of you living or having lived in North America:

I am currently living in Berlin, Germany, just finished my first month of HRT and am in the process of having my gender marker and name changed.

My soon to be wife is currently applying for PhD positions in Boston, New Haven, Chicago, Palo Alto and Toronto. We would move where ever she starts her phd next september, by the time we will be married (as two women), I will legally be a woman and be on hrt for one year. I obviously don’t know how well i will pass but passing is not a big focus for me and i will not want to be stealth, no matter if i could at some point or not.

Any of you with experience with the cities mentioned above, could you tell me a little about the current climate? how is it to live as a visibly trans person in any of these cities? I have been very lucky so far, berlin is extremely tolerant when it comes to LGBTQI\* issues, coming out to my friends, my work place and all other social circles has gone very well, i have experienced nothing but acceptance and support, i feel safe walking around in the city presenting as myself (fulltime for the last 7 months, not even close to passing) etc. no matter where i am, i have only used the woman’s toilet for half a year and have never even had an uncomfortable situation (this is as close as i have gotten: random cis woman: “this is the ladies room” me: “i know” them: “oh, ok, sorry”).

Hearing all the horror stories of folks being harassed on the street or in public toilets, of violence against trans people etc. worries me, especially since i grew up in a context where discrimination and harassment against both queer people and women in general seems to be much less prevalent than in the US. While the PhD positions are going to be the main factor in deciding where to move, we obviously won’t move anywhere where i would not be safe (as safe as any woman would be, living in a big city).

Reading all the news lately has obviously not helped with my anxiety about moving to NA.

Thank you for taking the time to read my post, I would very much appreciate any input you have.

Have a wonderful day,

Laura",asktransgender
How did your friends and family react when you came out as trans?,,asktransgender
Hair styles for my hair type,"I’m not sure what I can do for my hair. I get pretty dysphoric when I see girls with long flowie hair. I wish that I could have that style, but I refuse to wear wigs as i get hot wearing them for long periods. It makes my face sweat and in turn my make up can easily smudge. I’m African American, and have no idea what short hairstyles I could do. 

 ",asktransgender
I'm desperate... Will things ever get better?,"So… I started HRT at 17 in January 2018, but it took 8-9 months before my dosage was high enough to put me in the female range *(141 pg/mL on 150 mcg patches).* I’m 18 now, 10 months in, and all I have to show for it is my disillusionment.

&amp;nbsp;

If I’ve learned anything about HRT/transition, it’s that unless you’re like &lt;16, age really doesn’t matter; it’s *all* genes. I’m 6’ tall, broad-shouldered/chested, with no hips or waist, giant hands/feet, a disproportionate/large/manly face, and an overall masculine figure. HRT hasn’t helped in the slightest; all I am is a guy with gynecomastia. I’ve *never* male-failed; nobody’s noticed a thing! I’m genuinely too far gone; no amount of time on HRT will help me… I’m just too masculine; I’ll never look feminine, let alone like a girl… Deep down, I’ve known nothing would help me, but over time, that small sliver of hope I had turned to disillusionment. I’m almost certainly going to be permanently closeted. 



I’m only out to my parents and a half-dozen doctors. The former *(who I live with)* aren’t the least bit supportive, even after a year; my mother has made everything about herself and what *she* wants. She’s seen me bawling my eyes out countless times, but hasn’t changed any of her hurtful behaviors *(I won’t go into details; it’s too long and frustrating).* I’ve given her PFLAG resources to help her understand, but she didn’t take any initiative; she just moves the goalposts. As for my father… well, at least he’s honest; he doesn’t pretend to care.



The only girly things I have are a small handful of skincare products; I don’t have anything in the way of clothes, accessories, makeup, etc. The things I have don’t even make me feel that much better, only *’not worse’.* My dysphoria is intense and it rarely lets up. I have severe anxiety/social anxiety, and probably dysthymia. Everything takes energy which I don’t have, and I’m in the process of withdrawing from university to take a gap year; it’s just too much right now… As comforting as the thought of simply… *’giving up’* and having all the pain disappear is, I promised my friends I’d never hurt myself. Admittedly, it’s hard to believe anyone would really care. Even so, I’m too much of a coward to try…



I can’t function and I’m getting desperate; I need to do *something* soon. I can’t ever transition, but dysphoria is killing me. I can’t even hurt myself… I don’t know what to do… I genuinely don’t think things will *ever* get better; my situation is impossible. Am I wrong? Can things *ever* get better - even for me?

&amp;nbsp;

**TL;DR: I’m lost and hopeless; I can’t transition but dysphoria is killing me. I can’t even hurt myself… Things are only getting worse, and I don’t know what to do… Is it at all possible for things to get better? I genuinely can’t imagine things ever improving, let alone being happy...***



Sorry for the huge rant… I’d really appreciate some advice.
",asktransgender
Coming out to HR tomorrow. Advice?,"So I have been struggling with my dysphoria for five years (probably longer)and have now accepted that I am a man.  I will be going on T in a month at the latest, perhaps sooner.  My plan is to disclose this to HR tomorrow so that they are aware when changes begin to take effect and can inform the company I am contracted at right now when the time is right.  I do not want anyone to be caught off-guard and would personally feel deceitful if I started HRT without giving them advance notice so it doesn’t creep on them suddenly.

I do not anticipate there being any issues with the company I am contracted through.  They are a very small, independent company that recruits people with disabilities for full-time employment and have never treated me as anything less than a family member when I worked there.  (For comparison, I now work in a corporate environment, which is...not family-like, at all.) Nevertheless, what advice do you have for someone like me?

Thank you in advance!",asktransgender
Were old HRT methods available in the 1700s?,"So i've been trying to look into if there was HRT in the 1700s but have yet to find anything or understand the methods. 


[This link is about Chevalier D'eon who was assumed to be trans](https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Chevalier_d%27%C3%89on)

It explains that upon checking their body after they died this is what they found: The surgeon who examined d'Éon's body attested in their post-mortem certificate, that the Chevalier had ""male organs in every respect perfectly formed,"" while at the same time displaying feminine characteristics. A couple of characteristics described in the certificate were ""unusual roundness in the formation of limbs,"" as well as ""breast remarkably full.""[11] These informations suggest D'Éon might have been intersex.


Or is it more likely they were intersex as the article states? 

This is not to discredit intersex individuals, this is more me just asking out of curiosity if there were HRT methods back then.",asktransgender
What's normal after FTM top surgery?,"My (FTM) boyfriend had top surgery on October 2 (mastectomy/free nipple graft with Dr. Raphael in Plano, highly recommended), so tomorrow will be the 4-week mark when he can stop compression. The aftercare sheet they gave us said that by this point we shouldn't have to do anything daily to his nipples anymore, maybe just a band-aid. 

Everything's looking great, but he says he's still in a lot of pain, not in the big incisions but just his nips. Not debilitating, but constant and maddening. Is that normal? I think maybe we should reach out to the surgery center like they said we could if we had any problems, but he doesn't want to because he doesn't think there's anything they could do, so I'm reaching out here instead. 

Did anyone else still have pain at 4-weeks post-top surgery? Is there anything we can do to help lessen it?",asktransgender
Info about laser at UCSF Dermatological Surgery Dept. in San Francisco? (Special Needs / Accessibility),"The laser place where I have facial hair removed may not be taking Medi-Cal anymore, and I've been referred to UCSF. I'm worried about whether it's accessible to me.

&amp;#x200B;

I have  trans lady-related dysphoria &amp; ptsd that add up to agoraphobia. I can't deal with what happens when I go out in public, and with very rare exception I only leave the house for medical appointments &amp; always with my IHSS worker. I need to avoid waiting rooms as much as possible.

&amp;#x200B;

So I have questions! While I'm going to ask USCF Derm Surg if/when I call at them at the right time to reach someone, I wanted to ask the world too.

Here's my questions:

* Do you have to walk through a crowded space to get to the office?
* Do the staff ppl seem up to date on treating trans ladies well?
* Do they give you room &amp; time to take off &amp; put on make-up in privacy &amp; in front of a mirror with good lighting?
* Is there a one-person bathroom there / nearby?
* Do the bathrooms have decent mirrors?
* The waiting room 
   * is it often crowded?
   * how physically close are you to others?
   * do the seats face each other?
      * If so is there also a part (or just a seat) of the waiting room where people aren't facing you or are actually unlikely to see you?
   * The photos in Google Maps look like the waiting room has windows that let people in the hall see into it. Is that right?
   * Are they good about finding a room you can wait in alone?
      * (Not the same idea as a room for taking off/putting on make-up, though it may actually be the same room)
   * Is there a spot in the hall that's less exposed (an alcove/corner/etc.)? (So that I can hang out there, while my friend stays in the waiting room for me if necessary)

&amp;#x200B;

I'd appreciate any other info that might be helpful!

&amp;#x200B;

Thanks everyone for reading &lt;3

&amp;#x200B;

&amp;#x200B;",asktransgender
"has your doctor laied about, refuesd to and or forgot to file a referral to a gic (UK)","something similer just happned to me (have got some good news from the closeed gic so it should get sorted hopefully don't want to get in to it here) but the fast reaction to this made me wonder if this was a common thing to happen so i want to use this sterw poll https://www.strawpoll.me/16737298 to try and get some data.
only respoces form the uk please as to keep the poll focused",asktransgender
Just officially came out to my S/O last night...now what?,"TLDR: After wall of text

&amp;#x200B;

So I (33 AMaB) have been lurking for 15 years now, here and every other transgender subreddit and forum that I could find. Now I finally have told someone. She (33 F) had already put it together from finding some of my girl clothing and  conversations where she was trying tor get me to tell her and I could only bring my self to half admit it.

I have known for years that she would support me and she does wholeheartedly (we have been together for 8y). The real breakthrough here is that I have finally come to terms with the fact that I have to actually do something about this. I have buried this for 20 years and I can't keep it down for another 40.

I have never come out to anyone before. It's both terrifying and liberating that there is someone that I can actually be open with for the first time in my life, not that we have gotten to deep into it yet. But I am already exited, I spent all day thinking about getting rid of some old boy clothes and dedicating part of my half of the closet to some of my girl clothes! It feels amazing to think about walking into my closet and seeing that, I can't imagine what it will feel like when it is reality, not just in my head.

So now I am faced with needing to figure out what to do next. Who else do I tell and how do I figure out who needs to know? Who deserves to know? Who can handle knowing? Who can I handle knowing? I don't even know how to think about this. And therapy, I know I should start with someone, but how do I open up to someone who is only there because I am paying them to be there. I haven't found anyone in my life so far that I have felt like I could tell the truth about myself to and not just about trans stuff.

Trust has been hard for me in general in my life, I have always been a ""i'm good, working alot, bla bla bla, lets not talk about me"" type of person. I don't tell anyone anything real. I guess (and I am kind of just realizing this right now as I type) that is because I don't have anything real, my entire persona is false. I have spent my whole life creating a persona and now I have to discover myself again like I was a teenager, but I have to do it while holding down a job that I wont be able to keep if I transition (more on that later) as an adult and paying rent...

&amp;#x200B;

Anyway It's time for bed, we'll talk more later. Goodnight Reddit. Thank you for being here for me.

&amp;#x200B;

TLDR: Trust is hard, how do you tell people the truth? What is the truth when your entire self has been manufactured to bury the truth?

&amp;#x200B;",asktransgender
Get prescription for casodex (bicalutemide) ?,"I'm sorry if I'm not exactly in the good subreddit to ask this (I don't browse reddit much, but to be fair I don't know where else I should have posted this), but I'm a 29 french mtf and want to start HRT. I met with 2 endocrinologists the lasts two months, and, well to put it frankly, it wasn't a particularly enjoyable experience. The first one was extremely brutal and left me under the impression that he hated trans people or maybe even people in general. Not going into full details, but he was enough of a jerk for me to want to be treated by another doctor.

The second one wasn't very nice either, but at least wasn't that bad. Thing is, there is a pretty big scandal in France about androcur (cypro), which is apparently relatively bad for your health and could be responsible for creating small tumors in your brain. Needless to say that I'm not particularly thrilled by this possibility (also the possible depression as a side effect, is scaring me a bit). So I asked the doctor if casodex could be an option, which she answered me by a cold and smug ""I don't even know what that is"". I tried to tell her that it is another form of HRT for mtf, with \*seemingly\* less side effects than cypro and spiro (""I don't know what's spiro either"") and she just stopped the discussion abruptly, visibly annoyed that a patient knew something she didn't. And for God's sake, I don't know jack shit except what I read here and there on the web, I was actually expecting her to tell me more about this. Welp long story short, she's just an androcur doctor, like apparently a lot of her colleagues.

So I guess it's a bit of a specific question but do some people know if there are french endocrinologists (in Paris would be great but hey I'll take what I have) who can prescribe casodex instead of androcur ? Thanks",asktransgender
You don't need dysphoria to be trans?,"Hey, I'm a MtF trans woman and I've always had dysphoria and HRT really helps.

I don't really get the dysphoria arguments though. There's one side that says you need dysphoria to be trans and another that says you don't.

On the truscum(hope thats the right term &gt;.&lt;) side though i see a lot of bullying towards people who aren't gender non conforming, like feminine ftm's which is absolutely terrible and toxic behaviour, as gender is not gender expression and bullying people for their personal choices is NOT ok, nor is forcing trans people to conform to traditional gender roles ok

On the other side though i don't see how anyone would like to transition if they didn't have dysphoria. Obviously being trans is NOT trendy, nobody wants to be assaulted, denied rights, harassed, murdered and so on because its ""cool"" and HRT is quite stressful to your body and I don't see how ANYONE would want that without dysphoria.

Some people say that transitioning because you don't hate yourself right now but would be way happier the other gender is an example of not dysphoric trans people but there's an obvious drive to be the other gender and wanting to be more comfortable means something about your gender assigned at birth is making you uncomfortable and therefore dysphoric and i still can't see how anyone without real dysphoria(even if it isn't intense) would want to transition.

Honestly it's confusing.

Thoughts? ",asktransgender
Shrinkage MTF,Do the penis and testicles shrink on HRT?,asktransgender
Should I gain weight now or wait until E?,"I am 18 pounds underweight (recovering anorexic, used to 25 pounds underweight.) Im eating great again and everything is going great. Ive been on a high spiro dose for 5 months and in starting E soon hopefully. Should I hold off on eating like a pig until i get estrogen? I really want feminine fat redistubution. ",asktransgender
Can tucking cause you to pee blood?,"I was tucked all day yesterday and this morning I peed blood after my BM. I've been on spironolactone and injectable estradiol for about a week!

I don't think I peed any blood yesterday. I just went again a little bit and I didn't see any blood.

I'm freaking out. Last time this happened I had prostatitis.

I have terrible health anxiety and if I have to go through stuff like this I don't want to transition.",asktransgender
Did/Can I get taller?,"I started spiro 5 months ago, a week before my 17th birthday. Im still not on estrogen yet. Is it possible to get taller at my age and the fact i’m on t blockers? Idk if I did but im just paranoid about it. I have pretty bad height dysphoria. (Not saying tall women aren’t  beautiful, yada yada yada)",asktransgender
"I'm not closeted but I'm also not ""out"". How do I out myself without having to spell it out for people?","I'm in the awkward position of being (mostly) passing physically as a woman but my voice outs me 100%. Thing is though, it doesn't out me as being trans to people, they just assume I'm a gay guy who likes dressing androgynous/femininely and simply looking like a girl.  

That's the case with my coworkers, boss, and roommates. None of them know I'm trans, but I don't hold anything back as far as my transition goes. They all just think I'm gay or a femboy or something I guess.  

I've been out to my family for at least a year now (some family members I've been out to for 7 years) and on hormones for 7.5 months now. I don't know my roommates and coworkers well enough to where I feel comfortable telling them I'm transgender and transitioning from male to female. Not because I don't want them to know, but because the actual act of telling them would be strange.  

So yeah, I mean I wear all women's clothing (no skirts or dresses though), I wear makeup, my nails stay painted very femininely, I wear feminine earrings, I look like a girl lol, etc...   

...yet people still call me man, dude, bro, etc. I obviously don't expect them to know and just start referring to me as a girl, I would just think they'd be very suspicious and maybe try to avoid things like calling me the above terms and asking me things like what it was like being the only boy growing up, etc.  

So yeah, basically how do I out myself?

",asktransgender
I call myself Diana when I'm not thinking about it now.,"For over a year, I dead-named myself. Not out loud, not to anyone else. But in my head, when I was say ""don't be silly, name"" or ""come on, name, time to get up and go to work"".

For a while I just dead-named myself and felt like shit. Then, for a long time, I would call myself Diana, but I'd have to stop and think. Neither name was automatic.

Today I just realized it's automatic, no hesitation, no thinking. I'm just Diana to myself in my head, with total visceral certainty that's correct and normal.

It's fantastic. :)

Did it take anyone else that long?",asktransgender
"Can anyone recommend a good book with a transgender protagonist, preferably at least mature young adult or older?","I just finished Dreadnought and loved it, but I am looking for more good books preferably written for a slightly older audience. I am trying to read as many trans protagonist books I can because I am writing a short on a trans character and want to make sure it doesn't only feature my experiences as a transgender individual",asktransgender
barriers to health care in the transgender and lgbt community,"currently at a conference trying to create a presentation on the barriers of lgbt/trans healthcare. what have you experienced and how could federal policy makers help. this is a conference concerning youth decision making. decisions i've indentified are: how will I transition, who can help me transition, how do I get the neccesary care.",asktransgender
I'm starting to lose hope that things will ever get better *NSFW*,"Before I start to talk about this, I would like to mention that I am transgender woman (MTF, 26), and that I have been on HRT now for the past 3 years. 

I have made several posts here before, but this time is different. While I am still going through flashbacks from the two times I was raped in my first relationship, I am also now going through extra layers of fear I with the appointment of Judge Brett Kavenaugh, a person who has been accused of rape was just trivially investigated in a one week period, fear that Donald Trump and his congressmen will attempt to make it impossible for me to be able to have an F on my driver's license, and the combination of everything that is going on at work and the fact that I just had a very breif one date third relationship, things have not been great. This past week, mutliple times, I found myself crying for hours on end and losing large chunks of time to flashbacks. With how my first, second and now third relationships have gone, it feels like I am being told by everyone that I date that I am nothing more than a blow up doll to be used for whoever wants to use me. I have been having suicidal thoughts for the past week as well and I am starting to make a plan on killing myself. I have not been able to afford any surgeries, and at my job I get called by my given name and missgendered all the time since I work in a call center and my voice is still very deep since due to my rape whenever I start to work my voice for longer than 30 minutes, I begin to feel as though my rape is happening all over again. I cannot afford a name change at this time as it takes all my money as it is to make ends meet. I am living paycheck to paycheck and do not really have that much wiggle room at all to start saving towards surgeries or to buy nice things for myself. I started on the Keto diet back in April and I have lost a lot of weight, but my clothes do not really fit all that well and I have been unable to buy new ones. Despite having a four year degree in computer science, which took me six years and now $40k in debt to get it, I have been unable to get a job that pays above $13/hr. Everyday that I wake up, it seems that there are more and more things that are getting in the way of me completing my transition, be they monitary like the $40k in student loan debt and the almost $5k I still owe in credit cards from earlier in my life, I have no idea how I will be able to ever pay off this debt and start to afford surgeries, hell even a legal name change is out of reach to me right now since I have to pay for it and changing right now means telling all my creditors of my name change and if they should contest it, would probably result in me running out of the court room and finding anything or anyway that I can to kill myself. I am numb right now, which is not good. When I get this way, I know I will do it. Last time this happened I ended up in the hospital with my liver starting to dissolve from taking over a gram of Tylenol. I don't know what to do. Help.",asktransgender
"Timing for name change, IDs, documents, etc?","So, I've only been out in public once in full girl mode, and I'm just finishing up first full week of estrogen. Early days, and a long way to go. That being said...is it premature or paranoid to be considering bumping up name change, driver's license, SSA records, passport, all of that stuff to be done sooner rather than later? What with the current administration being...hostile...and having a penchant for evil and cruel actions, I guess I'm just kind of thinking worst case scenario...do it while I know I still can? :-/",asktransgender
How to pick a name?,"Hi. I'm pre everything mtf and having a very hard time picking a name that will stick with me all my life. 

I really like the name Hani I use online but it is a Korean name and i look typically European. Maybe I'm over thinking it but I think it would sound weird in my day to day life.

I want a name that does not relate to my current name and (i was born in France but i plan to leave at some point) ideally something that would pass flawlessly in English speaking countries but wouldn't be too hard to use in France while i still live here.

I've always had a hard time choosing MMORPG characters names knowing I'll spend hundreds of hours with that character, and this is just next level commitment.

I also want a name that preferably matches my calm and withdrawn nature, as well as being easy to memorize and short and clear to pronounce and understand.

I'm not making this post to get suggestions but rather to see if any of you can relate and maybe share some tips. Or maybe I'm being unrealistically picky? Or would Hani be fine and I'm over thinking it?

I appreciate any input, have a good day!",asktransgender
Didn't realize just how hard it was gonna be to come out to family,"I'm getting my passport renewed, and my dad was helping by going over the requirements to renew by mail with me.  While going through the section about valid IDs, he saw it mentioned about those having ""undergone or are going through sex transition.""  He laughed and made a loud comment about it.  Then he went off on a rant about socialists?

I knew it was gonna be hard coming out to him because he's a hardcore conservative.  But he's flat out told be he'd support me if I'm gay (I am but not how he thought I'd be), he doesn't like Trump, and doesn't just blindly vote based on party.  I guess I was hoping he wouldn't be transphobic because he never showed any thoughts about it?  I don't know.",asktransgender
Am I trans?,"So I made a throwaway for this question. I am a cis gay guy, but there is not one moment in my life where I don't wish I could be  agirl, sometimes to the point of crying, or being to sad to do anything, but I don't ***feel*** like a girl, I just constantly feel like I want to ""escape"" my body/***become*** a girl

I regurarely act like I ak a girl online, and I get so happy when people call me, even mean things, that mean that I am a girl",asktransgender
What to make of myself?,"Since shortly after puberty (just about four years ago), I've been questioning my gender on-and-off without reaching any proper conclusions about it. Having been referred here by one of the few people with whom I've discussed these issues, I hope y'all can take some of your experience with yourselves and the community to have a look at my particular issues and see if you have any thoughts on what it all might mean:

\-Extending even in a certain capacity well before puberty, pronounced envy of the female body and female clothing  
\-Interest in cross-dressing and having female features (long hair, breasts, vagina, big hips'n'thighs) both for reasons of comfort and sexual arousal, the latter naturally being a big part of what makes me doubt the weight of all this  
\-What I've taken to calling the ""goddess complex"": highly pronounced and deep-seated male guilt; envy of female fertility, menstruation, etc.; the observation and belief, true or not, that socially and emotionally women are the markedly superior sex; an unfortunate tendency to find myself at times unwittingly buying into pseudo-spiritual TERF rhetoric; which has at times manifested itself in literal worship of certain women, an interest in extreme sexually submissive behaviors, and even urges to castrate myself [Gallus](https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Galli)\-style  
\-A habit of nonchalantly spouting weird statements about the above that others consider rather concerning",asktransgender
I’ve finally decided on going through with getting SRS. I’ve told my family and I’m going to be taking the necessary steps to fulfill this goal. But.. I have concerns,"I know someone who’s experienced vaginal collapse, and I’ve been reading a lot on the complications that can come during or after surgery. And I have to be honest, I’m starting to panic about my luck being mixed with the potential for failure.

I have fairly poor luck, so I’m pretty sure something would go wrong (such as a fistula or vaginal collapse)..

Honestly, I just need some reassurance. I want to know how common these complications are. I already know that this is a necessary step for my mental health and well-being. Please just tell me something good..",asktransgender
For other trans men: Have you guys found a way to stop getting your period cause I’m sick and tired of it so if anyone has found any ways (besides birth control n that jazz) please do tell 🧡🖤,,asktransgender
Connecting with Los Angeles trans communities without Facebook?,"I'm realizing that most of the trans people and organizing near or accessible to me are on Facebook. I'm not, though.

Does anyone have thoughts on how I could get better connected with the queer people in Los Angeles?",asktransgender
Gift ideas for my FTM boyfriend?,"With Christmas and his birthday coming up, I've been trying to brainstorm ideas of gift(s) for my boyfriend. I have a few ideas such as a nice flask or wallet engraved with his 'proper' name (as he calls it), but I'd definitely love to hear some other ideas from you peeps. What meaningful gifts have you received? 


PS: y'all are so brave and wonderful and amazing. And I'm proud of all of you! ",asktransgender
Spiro's diuretic effect is pissing me off,"Pun might be intended.

I've been on spiro for almost a week and while I'm liking the testosterone blocking, I get dehydrated so easily, to the point where getting myself hydrated for a trip to Walmart wasn't sufficient for the entire way there and back.

I also dissociate if I'm not adequately hydrated. Feels like I'm high, but it isn't pleasant. Drinking water makes the feeling subside. Does anyone else on spiro experience this?",asktransgender
Disappearing for a bit,"(sorry yall this aint gonna be a happy post)

I know y'all most likely have heard about the recent suggested US legislation, both the definition bullshit and the civil rights protections bullshit. It's not exactly at the forefront of my mind right now, but it's been... creeping up on me, I guess.

I just... I'm tired and I'm scared. I know eventually I'll flip back to being angry and confident again, but for now? I just want to lock my little world away from the big shitty one and try and work out my bullshit first. But... I can't do that.

I just want to disappear for a while. Be in some pristine place where I don't have to think about everything that's happening. Stop time for a little bit and escape and scream for a while and live without everything crushing me constantly.

I don't know, is there any way to do that?? I mean I can't go on some recreational vacation, I have school obligations. I wish I could end up in the hospital or something and just... exist in an environment where things outside of it don't seem real. But hospitals are fucking expensive, especially in the US. And IDK about you, but jail doesn't sound like a fun time, even if it'd get me out of this for a while. I'd probably just end up even more dysphoric and feeling awful, lol.

Does anyone know what to do? Like, for me to do, or just in general? What do we do? How are we supposed to balance everything else while trying to fight something like this?

In the meantime, I'm going to try the artful strategy of curling up under my blankets, thinking of my cat, and wishing myself unconscious. Thanks in advance.",asktransgender
Resources for a questioning trans women?,"Hi everyone, I'm recently coming to grips with the fact that I might be a trans woman. Are there any good resources online (youtubers, tumblrs, forums, etc.) to talk to and learn from other trans women about what I'm going through and what to do?",asktransgender
Optilube in the tubes from amazon is far worse than the sachets of the ostensibly same stuff?,"from hospital i got a bunch of little 5g sachets of optilube, it was quite viscous and really good at lubricating. since mostly running out of those, i've moved onto the tubes i bought from amazon, but it doesn't seem as good? it's more watery, requiring me to use more (getting through 1 tube in a day and a half), and just doesn't feel as if it's the same?

can you get the good viscous stuff in tube form, or at least really cheap in the little sachets? or does it not really matter",asktransgender
uneducated kid confused,"Well good evening I guess, I....guess that's a good place to start (idk) as well as saying that I'm not a native english speaker but I will try my best as to not upset or become an incomprehensible waste of user's time and therefore their life, but I don't want to make any fake promises because guess what! I'm autistic. I'm 22,  I was assigned male at birth.....that's all for now...also sorry because I'm barely able to organize my ideas so that the structure of what I write is coherent.

&amp;#x200B;

With that out of the way (oh and apologies as well) I decided to write this post while in a state of confusion because I don't even remember when I felt so attached  to the idea of the ""concept"" of being transgender. All I know is that I'm from a third-world country (sorry if this is an improper way to put it I don't even know half of what I'm doing) and since little I was terrified of the implications of puberty. This already turned into an entire paragraph and I'm kicking myself in the stomach for how of an insecure person I am. Basically I just want to know if I'm MTF transgender, heck not even that, who am I? (This sounds stupid there's no denying that) I claim to be asexual but am I just a misanthrope? I mean I have no desire for sex but idk If that's my brain playing tricks on me? I've been told  by people who study social sciences that I'm a straight up incel, and I froze in fear and hated myself for months until I wholeheartedly tried to accept their statement in order to ....well you know, not be a douche. But then I've read what an incel is And I honestly don't think I act like that. I'm a gamer junkie, I basically have not talent other than rapping (SFW I guess? I like Twenty One pilots and George Watsky, is what that means I suppose) and being somewhat fluent in two languages. But, how can I even put what I'm about to say, at one point in my life I wished to confess that having male privilege feels like blood on your hands (it's not an agenda, it's just a feeling/thought I once had related to past circumstances) My personality and own beliefs/creeds/dogmas, I feel, Have twisted in ways that make no sense. I'm throwing random stuff out here that is kinda random, but in my brain it's linked together. And if I say that I've never masturbated, watched porn what would it matter, is it my primal instinct telling me to call for attention on something that I deem important to me...oh heck I'm already going back to the aexual thing....ufff I will gladly edit this post if a mod/as soon as a mod notifies me so they don't have to celan up this embarrassing wall of nonsese. I've been on this reddit before for years, I've been on Tumblr, Buzzfeed, and even started studying librarianship and information sciences so I could verify and find good sources (didn't finish the career because I'm lazy garbage. There's still a part of me that denies the world of everything and just wants to believe I'm an MTF TG individual and I live in constant fear THAT THE WORLD DOESN'T NEED ANOTHER CHRIS CHAN (okay okay Idk if its wrong to diss on her, it's not an agenda, or wait, is it?) I what I'm trying to get across here is that I've done whatever I could think of since an early age, to not be a douche. I think He was or well I don't remember

&amp;#x200B;

Look, I'm writing this at 1:30 PM CST Time (-6 or -5 I think) because I know that even though this post is an absolute catastrophe, I feel like tonight was the only night I would feel brave enough to post this.

&amp;#x200B;

TL:DR I'm 22, I'm a High functioning autistic individual (Asperger's Syndrome, for short) who's been very attached and observant  and curious of the existence of MTF Transgender people.  


Thanks for not banning me kai bai",asktransgender
Apparently I was pretty attractive pre-transition,"Before my egg cracked, I didnt associate with my body at all, and pretty much didnt care at all how I looked. I let my mother choose what I wore, and always hated going shopping in general.

I was quite introverted and thought everyone just thought of me as an ugly nerd, because thats the only way I could see myself.

However, after coming out, Ive spoken with some people that knew me pre-transition, and the fact that I was considered pretty conventionally attractive came back a few times. One friend even said ""I literally just hung out with you because you were the hottest boy in the year"" (hes was a bit shallow back then, and very gay)

Its hard for me to internalise this because I just didnt see myself that way at all at the time. I was the weird introverted nerd that nobody really talked to. Definitely not the hottest guy in the year.

I never gave it much thought, because I was still focusing on my identity now as opposed to then. But now that ive been on hrt for two months and my identity is pretty much settled, ive been thinking about it more and more.

Did anyone else find out that they were precieved as much more attractive than they thought pre-transition? Id be curious to know if this is at all common.

I just wanted to add that, because I never considered myself as attractive, I didnt feel any difficulty giving up an attractive male body for a potentially unattractive female body. I can imagine this might have happened to some of you, and that sounds really tough.",asktransgender
I Have an Important Presentation for School,"In my school we have psichology and we are currently studying Active Minorities and each student has been tasked with representing and doing a presentation about one minority. I'm MtF and luckily (?) been tasked with the representation of the Transexual community in Argentina. This project is very important as it defines my entire grade for the third trimester. Now, the question... What should I wear? How should I act? I'm still not in HrT and haven't come out in my school yet. I want to really look like a woman but I think that if I try way to hard they might start suspecting something",asktransgender
Is it weird,"To feel envy when seeing anime girls? Idk, I might just be weird, but when I transition I will definitely dye my hair if I pass",asktransgender
Anyone here perfectly ok with their name and keep it even after transition?,"I actually like my name, the fact that is extremely unique and gender neutral at the same time that I want to keep it. Not only that, it's also save the hassle that your friend has to get use to call you by your new name. Now I see a lot of post from here that said they do not like their deadname, so I wonder if there is anyone else here that keep their original name when transition, and if so, why?",asktransgender
Accidentally told my work WhatsApp group I’m trans,"So I got very drunk last night and for some reason I thought I’d chat on my work WhatsApp group, all was going fine just some light hearted jokes back and forth but then drunk me decided to come out as Trans. 

I haven’t really got a response to it, people just kind of carried on chatting as normal, I mean it might not have been a big surprise but I just don’t know and now I have to see them all tomorrow and my anxiety is killing me. Literally didn’t sleep last night and combined with my hangover today I just feel really down.

Any advice? I don’t think I’m ready to be out, I just feel really awkward and embarrassed about it all.",asktransgender
Does anyone else call themselves gay instead of transgender to evade judgement?,"I am struggling with this right now.

At school, I am very open about liking guys, while being AMAB. Everyone is totally fine, including my friends. But almost nobody knows about me being transgender, and how much it eats at me inside.

I so badly want to say ""I'm not gay, I'm straight. I am transgender"" to someone I can see regularly. I take a Social Justice class as one of my high school socials credits and we covered what Trump is doing to trans rights as part of our LGBTQ+ rights week and while covering the clinical symptoms of gender dysphoria I wanted to just educate people and say something but I couldn't because I don't want to come out and be potentially ostracized. I'm 6'4. I'm already not normal compared to guys. But being transgender, I don't want to be treated as lesser of a person or that I am insane because of who I am.

Is there anything I can do? My friends are totally supportive of the LGBTQ+ community if they aren't already LGBTQ+ themselves, but I still am deathly afraid just due to the size of well, me.

",asktransgender
Choosing a name is harder on me than my ocs,"I'm not out yet, and I'm not even sure that I'm even trans yet. But I wanna have a name prepared. The list is so frustrating, but I do have one. I just wanna choose a name that I like and won't regret later. But anyways, here's the list if you wanna help. Choosing more than one name would be helpful so when I come out they can choose. 

Michael
Clyde
Andy
Travis
Shawn
Zayn 
Zeke
Dylan
Ryan
Elliot
Riley

Sorry, just can't choose. Though I really like Shawn. And Dylan. And Ryan, and Elliot, and.... Yeah. Can't choose.",asktransgender
How do I get myself out of a mutually abusive relationship,"My spouse and I have been together for 7 years. For the past 5 years, I have been the sole financial support, as they began to suffer from extremely debilitating anxiety. A fear of doctors and of being locked up, kept them from seeking help for years, all the while their health continued to decline. The worse they got, the greater the strain on our relationship.

Last year, I came out as MtF. A few months later, they came out as non-binary, with worse dysphoria than I, by far.

Our family doctor gave me a referral to a gender therapist , with my appointment about 4 months later. My spouse was refused a referral, while also asking invasive questions about our sex life. So we had to get a new doctor. It took us 4 months to find a doctor, but they were overloaded with patients, and the doctor required a number of tests to be done before he'd do the referral, a process that ended up taking 2 months. When we got the referral, it was for 6 months later. Over a year after we first talked to our doctor.

This was extraordinarily demoralizing to my spouse  causing a major boost to their anxiety, which contributed to making their mild OCD suddenly becoming completely debilitating. Shorty after this, things became extremely difficult, and over the past 6 months, they have become incapable of doing almost anything without some amount of help. I now do all of the cooking and cleaning, and they have become increasingly demanding of how I do everything. Any mistakes, misjudgment, or remotely selfish behavior results in yelling, increasing amounts of verbal abuse, and occasionally, violence. They regularly threaten suicide if things don't improve.

For my part, where once I could handle any of my spouse's problems, and helped them work through everything, I've gradually gotten worse and worse. A few months ago, it seemed that part of me gave up. Most of the time I'm home, I'm emotionally absent. Incapable of providing any sort of emotional support. I have no free time anymore, and I'm rarely getting more than 4 hours of sleep every night.

We both want out of this relationship. But we have no family or friend support, and they have no ability to make money. We only this year managed to get them to meet with mental health professionals, but it could be months or years before they qualify for any financial support. They regularly threaten to walk out or kill themselves, and sometimes, I find myself wishing they would. I feel like I can't  leave, because even if they didn't commit suicide, they would be forced into the streets. 

But I don't know how much longer this can go on. I don't know how much longer I can go on.

I'm probably leaving a lot of details out. It took over an hour to find safe moments to write this. I just need some advice.

",asktransgender
How do i (13FtM) come out to my right wing dad.,So my mom and dad are divorced and my dad has me and my older sisters Monday Tuesday and Wednesday. I'm scared of what he is going to say I'm already out to everyone else in my life I have to do it I can't hide it anymore and my sister said if stuff goes south she is going to drive me to my moms house. Thank you for your help.,asktransgender
Tachycardia while on HRT?,"Hai. 23yo M2F here. I live in Ukraine, and we have this mandatory conscription for men, right? So I've been doing medical examinations based on my previous conditions. As far as I remember, I had a ""heart valve prolapse"" (?) like 10 years ago. So they sent me to do an ECG. I was kinda lost looking for the place where it was performed, so I ended up running around to make it in time. When the doc did it, she asked me,  
- Were you running or something?  
- No I wasn't?   
- Well unless you want to serve I'm just not redoing the test.  
- Do I look like I wanna serve?  
- K.  
After finishing all of the tests I was given I finally started HRT (25mg of cyproterone - antiandrogen, and 2mg of estradiol valerate - crystal fucking estrogen / every day in the morning, pills). Jokes on me, the drafting place memed on me, and gave me another hospital to go through regarding my gastritis, as well as to do a heart ultrasound in the same place. Having tied the tachycardia to me running prior I decide to be little bit more hyperactive before the ultrasound, but nowhere near as much, cause running around inside a hospital is odd. So, the guy ultrasounds my heart (20 days after the start of HRT), says,  
- You have tachycardia while rested.  
- Ok?  
- That most likely means your thyroid gland is making more hormones than usual. Lemme ultrasound that to just in case.  
- Ok?  
- Doesn't look deformed. But maybe look into it at some point?  
- Ok.  
So I googled about HRT causing tachycardia, but couldn't find anything. I really don't wanna bring up Transsexualism with the commissary until I get a passport change. I don't feel terribly safe going to a random cardiologist to ""look into it"" cause Ukraine and I'd have to mention HRT. I could probably find out a name of a specific friendly doctor, but they probably won't be in my city.
So, can HRT cause tachycardia? Could the hormone explanation of his just be a coincidence with the fact I was maybe just worried about what he was gonna say?  
Any recommendations on what to do about it if anything?  

Edit: Also unrelated question, is all estradiol taken sublingually or no? From what I can see in the instruction, I should just swallow them like a little slut, but seeing some posts on this subreddit makes me feel like an idiot.  
  
Thanks in advance!",asktransgender
New trans policies,"I've been seeing a lot of talk about Trump redefining sex as being strictly biological. A lot of responses to this are along the lines of ""erasing trans people from existence"" but I don't understand how those are at all related. Can somebody explain?",asktransgender
Does hrt get better?,"I'm on my first week of HRT and while I've definitely had some moments of a very child like calm, my anxiety has shot through the roof and Ive been experiencing a lot of depersonalization. Ive always been really scared of being sick and, having gone through a depression, really concerned about my mental health. I can see how the changed in my body might trigger a sense of weirdness that might trigger my anxiety. I havent feel outright depressive or suicidal, but I get these intrusive thoughts that I might fall into a depressive episode or have suicidal ideation and it's really scary.

Also, while I had definitely reached a point of feeling like I had to pursue HRT, I'm only out to my mother and my gf, and its not something that ive integrated to my life. Now that I feel myself abandoning being cis and being a man for good, I feel scared because I havenr found a home in being  trans and occupying a place in femininity. 

All in all, after seeing so many threads about how HRT improves mental health, I'm scared that these days have been very rocky. It would be nice to hear from similar experiences and whether this gets better.",asktransgender
I just want to disappear,"Everything just feels so pointless.  I wish I could just be gone.  I'm a burden on myself and everyone around me.  Life just feels like pain, all the time.  I'm so so so tired of being alive...",asktransgender
When is intersex awareness week? Between intersex awareness day and intersex day of solidarity? Or something else?,,asktransgender
German mtf's HRT question,"This question is to all mtf's in Germany: How long did you have to wait to get approved for HRT??? I read somewhere that it takes two years! One year of going to the therapist, and one year experimenting in which I live like a woman 24/7... but I don't want to wait that long! I just can't! I feel like doing the SRS myself every time I'm in the kitchen! 

I will see my therapist for the first time on the 14th December 2018 and I plan to come out to my parents on New Years Eve. I want to celebrate my 23rd birthday as Emily, in a more feminine body than I have right now. 
",asktransgender
Help me understand so i can help.,"So recently ive seen a lot of posts on facebook about trumps possible proposed policy to remove the legal term trans. So i posted on it asking for what it does and why it was bad as well as looked over the notes of the policy. So my understanding is your gender will he the sex you were born as. 

Someone explained some issues but out of the issues stated then only one it would effect was that the legal fees you paid to have your gender changed does go to waste. 

While it doesnt effeft me and i dont think it important i understand it means a lot to some people.

They also stated how it remove there rights. But i didnt get this reason. If your legal gender is made male or female then youd have the same rights as a male or female. So wouldnt you then have more rights? I know sadly there are laws that are harmful or dont protect trans. But this would fix that problem. And theyd have laws the have been in place for decades or longer. It wouldnt effect thier medical since if you are born male and transition to being female you cant get pregnant or have periods. And for females that transition to males you dont have a prostate. 

So long question short. How does this negafigely effect the transcommunity besides the fact of legal fees lost and not having yoir current gended reflected on legal documents?

**Follow up**
Some of you are very hateful people.

Given that the vast majority of you were kind and polite. And i learned quite a bit. 

Some certain circumstances were pointed out to me why this is could be a serious issue.
And one major issue was pointed out that isnt circumstancial but a serious issue. 

So i still have more to ask and see why the other side thinks this is beneficial. But in light of what i learned thered have to be something pretty big.

I just want to say i appreciate the help from almost everyone hear. And i hope everyone can learn to trear not just trans people but eveyone with kindness and that ones merits amd actions towards humanity should be the qualitt we care about not something they think or color etc.",asktransgender
Suporn Clinic payment options,"Hello,

I have a question regarding payment options for suporn clinic.

The situation is is that my insurance provider will pay for the surgery, but only after the surgery. Whist the clinic requires the sum to be paid 30 days in advance.

However in their email to me they specified this:

&gt; *On request, an alternative schedule for payments or payment terms may be made by prior agreement by the Clinic*

Now I wonder whether they would accept a letter from my insurance provider as proof that I can pay.

I've already wrote this letter:

&gt; Dear Sir/Madam,  
&gt;  
&gt;I would like to inquire about the possibility of payment.  
&gt;  
&gt;My situation is is that my healthcare provider will only pay after a surgery has been completed.  
  
&gt;  
&gt;Now I would like to ask whether it's possible for my healthcare provider to provide a letter confirming they will pay the sum by proxy of me.  
&gt;  
&gt;As for the 20% deposit. It forms no issue for me to pay that sum.  
&gt;  
&gt;If this is not possible I do understand  
&gt;  
&gt;With Kind Regards,  
&gt;  
&gt;\[Name\]

There aren't many other alternatives for me to finance this as no bank would give me a loan leaving the only option being a  private loan, but I know of nobody that would give me one. 

&amp;#x200B;

&amp;#x200B;

So what I am asking is if anyone else had experience with alternative payment methods with thai surgeons.

&amp;#x200B;

&amp;#x200B;",asktransgender
"Brazil looks like it's about to elect a virulently anti-gay, anti-transgender president. Are there any resources or options for people looking to stay safe or leave the country?",,asktransgender
Feel like I'm stuck in the middle after transitoning,"Hey guys. I kinda need some help regarding my transition. I'm not sure if this is normal and apart of the transition process. 

So I came out as transgender at 13 and started to present more masculine. Once I realized, I didn't have a second thought. I came out pretty quickly. I'm now 19 and have been on testosterone for 2.5 years, since I was 16. I've had my name legally changed for 2.5 years too.

For the past year or so, I've been wishing I could've stayed a girl. I never had this 'guilt' up until recently. I guess it's not guilt, but I wish I could've been 'normal', if you know what I mean. 

I know I have discomfort with my body and want top surgery eventually. There's some days where I wish I could just live as a girl, but just for a day. 

I know it's also odd but I do want to get pregnant one day if I can, and I wish it would be 'normal', like being a pregnant girl is. You don't see pregnant men. 

I guess I kinda feel like I'm stuck in the middle. I envy pretty girls. I was never a good at being a girl. And I do have dysphoria and feel like I'm a man, but I wish I could switch once in a while. 

I don't think I want to detransition, but if I did in the future I wouldn't want to feel the shame of saying ""I was wrong"", and going off T and already having my name legally changed. But I don't feel like I want to.

I know there are short guys, but I'm so tired of being that uncommonly short guy.  

It's just frustrating because I wish so badly I could've just stayed a girl but I had this pull to be male. 

I want to be normal. I don't know what to do. I don't know why this has hit me so late in my transition instead of the beginning. Anyone else feel like this? ",asktransgender
"Almost 19 months hrt, testicles tingling when sitting and they seem to be getting much smaller?","So my cum is literally water , most likely a sign of no testosterone which is great!

But the last day or so I’ve noticed when I’m sitting my testicles like radiate a slight uncomfortable tingling sensation and seem much smaller than ever before

Is this normal? Seems a little late to have testicle shrinkage after everything has shrunk so much to begin with

Edit: forgot nsfw tag sorry!!",asktransgender
Bad Injections?,"MTF here. I’ve been trying to do my hormone injection like I do every week but for some reason it’s just not happening today. I did last week and the week before but I just can’t do it now. This has happened to me in the past as well.  I don’t know if I’m not in the right mindset or maybe it’s a bad needle or what. I just keep pricking my skin but the needle won’t go in. 

Wondering if anyone else has had similar issues like this and what you did to overcome it. Thank you!",asktransgender
"Medicaid, HRT and Trump: what can I expect","I livein Montana and I get my hrt through medicaid. My state explicitely covers my hrt via health and human services ruling. Can if the federal health and human services rule go through, lose coverage for my hrt on medicaid, or will it still be up to my State for this. I dont know what to think",asktransgender
Quick question,Does anyone know anyway or exercises to get rid of waist and stomach fat. Thanks in advance.,asktransgender
Experiences being admitted to a psychiatric hospital?,"I'm in a bad place and I've been in a bad place for a long, long time. I have tried a lot of different meds and a lot of different things over the years, and nothing has helped - not even a little bit. I want to admit myself because at this point I need serious help and a drastic solution or else I'll probably end up taking my own life.



Has anyone here been admitted before? I've heard it's already a jarring enough experience when you're cis and that they tend not to really listen or believe what you tell them.  Will they even take being trans seriously or just chalk it up to my mental instability? Will they let me keep taking my hrt while I'm there? Does being there even help anything? 



I know all of them are different, but I mean, generally, I guess. I'm just scared and want to know as much as I can before I do this. 
",asktransgender
"Questioning (MtF): One thing that still makes me doubt myself is that I still don't see myself growing old as a ""woman"". Anyone experience anything similar when cracking your shell?","I'm questioning my gender and have slowly come to realise over time that I'm probably a trans girl. In the process, there's been a lot of self-doubt and uncertainty and always feel really horrible when I feel uncertain.

One thing that especially bothers me at the moment is that I don't see myself as a ""woman"" or growing old as a woman. I've always considered myself to be male and even trying to see myself as female is a bit difficult especially in boy mode (though I really want to and when I feel feminine, I feel the happiest). If anything, I can definitely see myself as a ""girl"" or ""sister"" (love being called that) but not a ""woman"". Growing up, I always thought I would grow old as a man and have never had many female role models (looked up more to my dad than my mom).

I fit so many of the criteria for gender dysphoria and being a girl has been a longtime dream since I was quite young with so many other things pointing to me being trans. I really want to start hrt but am scared I'll regret it. Is seeing myself as a woman just something that comes with time/coming to accept yourself or am I right to have these doubts? Is it just undoing repression over many years? 

Thanks for your help! ",asktransgender
Know any good places to talk to transgender folks?,"I know this sub is literally called ask transgender but it's a public forum and not really conversational. I was wondering if there was a way I could talk to some folks with experience. I'm mostly just looking for help figuring out how to understand my experience. I know therapy is what I need, but I cannot afford it, not even close, so I was hoping there was a way I could get in touch with some folks who might have relevant knowledge. Sorry if this has been asked before but I couldn't find anything. Thanks!

Edit: Can I just add that ya'll are so sweet and supportive and I love it, so thank you folks! It's just nice to get so much good advice from folks right off the bat and offers to directly, personally help. Again, thanks. It means a lot.",asktransgender
How do I tell my dad that I wanna see a gender therapist?,"Hey, I'm 13 and really confused about my gender and identity in general. I don't want to come out and just say ""Hey! I kinda feel like a boy, wanna take me to a therapist to confirm that?"" Especially when there are so many transtrenders in my area, and I'd hate for my dad to see me as one. He also has this idea that guys in my family basically have these ""alpha male"" personalities and ""beta males"" are dumb and I'd probably be a ""beta male"", so there's already a reason for him to assume that I'm trending. My male siblings are all pretty aggressive at one point or another, so I'd just be THE ULTIMATE BETA. I'm just so scared about being wrong about this. I've been planning to do it over phone, since I'm such a beta and can't handle confrontation in any way. Sorry this was some incoherent garbage.",asktransgender
Is this gender dysphoria?,"Sorry if this is not the right sub to ask, but I’m a bit confused with how I’m feeling right now and am too uncomfortable to ask anyone I know personally about it.

I’m extremely uncomfortable with my body and often wish I was male. But I don’t always wish I was a man, if that makes any sense.

I like being a woman but I dislike physically being female. It’s not that I dislike femininity— I actually dislike my many of my more masculine traits/features— I just dislike my own body, and I know that if I was born male, some of the issues I have with it wouldn’t be there.

Like, if I could recreate myself, I would be a non-binary/queer male. But I feel like that doesn’t make sense; because then why can’t I just be happy as a non-binary/queer female?

I’m struggling to categorize the way I’m thinking. I don’t know if it’s a gender issue, a self esteem/eating disorder issue, even an internalized misogyny issue— or some terribly confusing combination of the three.",asktransgender
If You Pass But Aren't Stealth: How/When Do You Tell People You're Trans?,"For most of my time transitioning (and being a genderfluid person before that) I assumed I didn't pass (though that may not have been true).  But now I find myself in situations where I might, actually, be passing well enough that I need to disclose that I'm transgender, which I've never done before.

This week I had a job interview, the first since I transitioned. It dawned on me only afterwards that I might have passed the entire time. The company in question is reasonably progressive and in San Francisco, but still, I'd feel bad if me being ""out"" caused problems after I was on the job, so I'd prefer to be ""out"" beforehand.

Even more scary, I met someone at a club last night - something I've never done before (Avril Lavigne's girlfriend was playing, and we both basically pointed at each other and pantomimed ""Hey Hey You You I Could Be Your Girlfriend""). We were making out, and wound up going back to her place; her severe intoxication pre-empted the conversation, but how to tell her was almost all I could think about (I'm non-op, too).  Normally I meet girls on dating sites where I'm explicitly transgender, so I never have to have that conversation.

So how do you do it? Any tips or tricks? I live in a very liberal and accepting area, where being out hasn't really been a problem. ",asktransgender
What am I experiencing?,"I’m biologically female, currently identify as cis and bisexual? Questioning? I’m questioning everything. I’ve always been masculine. I thought I was just a butchy lesbian but for a brief time I cut my hair and binded my chest and went by the name “Malcolm” But eventually I went back to female pronouns and grew my hair long. Yesterday I looked in the mirror and felt wrong again. I wanted to cut my hair again. Today I still want to cut my hair. My chest feels humongous. I feel horribly unattractive. I’m full of self hate again. What’s happening to me?",asktransgender
Friendly Transgender Discord Server?,"I'm searching for a server that gives me an experience like [https://www.reddit.com/r/traaaaaaannnnnnnnnns/](https://www.reddit.com/r/traaaaaaannnnnnnnnns/), with wholesome memes but also wholesome friends, I'm searching for a new social circle and I hope to meet my new friends soon because I need them, I don't want to loose my hope with internet.",asktransgender
how should i come out?,I feel like I need to come out. how did you do it and do you have ideas?,asktransgender
why is it so hard to find other trans anarchists to chat with?,seems like there are plenty of trans discord servers and anarchist chats too but finding where they intersect has been way harder than it should be! i'm willing to use any chat program as long as its actually active,asktransgender
Stuck in a rut- coming out to my girlfriend?,"   Okay, so its a long story so I'll try to start.

   I'm not 100% sure yet, but in the time I've spent sorting through my thoughts (~1 year? Wow time flies) I've become more certain that I'd be happier identifying as female. I just want to see now how it feels to be adressed as such and to dress accordingly in public, rather than just privately.

   I'm quite sure my parents wouldn't mind (they put great effort into understanding and supporting my trans cousin) and I'm not too close with any of my real-life friends, so I'd be cool with waving some/most goodbye if they turn out to be assholes. No big deal, really.

   But then there's my girlfriend.

   We've been together for almost 2 years now and have become what all our friends consider as 'ultimate couple goals'- caring, understanding, supportive, and cute. This girl means the world to me, and I have more respect for her than I have for myself.

   But I'm pretty sure she's straight...

   I know that bringing this up to her would be stressful- not entirely sure how she'd react, but enough that it could cause her grief. Unlike with my friends, I don't want her to feel any of that! She's already got a stressful enough home life, and every time I even consider telling her either something new comes up and I don't want to pile more stress on her or we're finally getting an alone moment and I get to finally see her relaxed and comfortable and how could I ruin that!? 

   So since I'm not completely sure she's straight, I've been trying to think of ways to find out, then I can determine what to do from there. If I just ask her up-front, that'll be obvious that something's up. We enjoy truth or dare, so I could always ask then, but idk if I could conceal my displeasure at her potential response; again, something's obviously up. I've considered asking her best friends (others always know more about each other than I seem to) but oh boy that's gonna be another mess, not to mention I'd have know way of knowing if they really know or are also just assuming based on history. I can't ask her family (pretty sure the dad's transphobic, but no one likes him anyways so idc what he thinks of me).

   And then if I find out for sure, then I gotta confess to her! How could I find a way to make that not dreadful? I'd either ruin a happy couple mood, leave her tense and worried until we can meet, be completely disrespectful by practically breaking up with her over text, or coming out in one of our groups and completely causing a scene!

   As for the stress reduction, while I'm not super bothered by being adressed as a guy, it's becoming tiresome and I hate keeping secrets. I want to be open with the world, and the wait is slowly driving me crazy. I've considered waiting until summer vacation to discuss since no school will mean less stress, but idk if I can wait that long...

   Any advice would be greatly appreciated, and I'm so glad I finally got to vent this somewhere. Sorry again for the long post.",asktransgender
Over My Head,"Hello,

I'm new to this forum.  It's quite a pleasure to meet all of you.  

Currently, I'm only on 25 mg of Spironolactone.  I really like the effects because in many ways, I feel significantly less like a man.  

I'm not quite sure if I identify as female or as non-binary, as there's kind of evidence for both I suppose.  Anyhow, I like most of the effects of androgen deprivation, except for the weight problems, cognitive problems, hot flashes, and loss of libido.  

To counter these problems and to see if I like Estrogen, at my upcoming Endocrinologist appointment soon, I was thinking about asking to try a low dose of estrogen.  

Is this a good idea?  Also, on a low dose of estrogen, if my testosterone is down to castrate levels, I know that I'll grow (hopefully small) breasts and my skin will further change, but what about facial feminization?  I'm fearful that I won't look how I want myself to.

There's so much more I want to say about my current situation, but I feel so overwhelmed right now, and I feel like I'm not able to think clearly.  I guess I've always just envied thin and attractive girls who were in lesbian relationships and were treated in a way I wanted to be treated; and they got to do things like play a dating and sex role with women that at least wasn't so easy for me to play as a man.

I feel I've had to wait way too long to go ahead with this, too.  I live in central PA, and I'm sorry for dissing the area, but it's not exactly the most progressive and advanced place in the USA.  I feel like there's way too much red tape.  For instance, I've had therapists tell me to grow my hair long, paint my nails, wear makeup, and wear women's clothes in public before going on hormones, and just to be able to go on hormones people most often need a stupid referral letter.  It's just absurd.  My hair's too thick to grow down right now, it'll feel uncomfortable.  And I don't want to wear makeup or paint my nails; it's too redundant for me.  Also, I think a therapist who advises me to wear women's clothes in public is out of touch with reality.  It's still very much a stigma to do something like that, especially in Central PA.  I'm not going to risk my life and risk being bullied/harassed for the sake of trying to be feminine enough just to be able to simply try female hormones.  ",asktransgender
Payments plans for ffs?,"Hello fam!

I've been applying to Starbucks a bunch lately in various locations hoping to get a job as I've recently lost mine. I really want to get a job with them and get as much ffs covered as possible but I realize there's a chance I may never get in with them so I'm going for plan B. Are there any half decent ffs surgeons who take any sort of payment plan anywhere? I have roughly 2 grand but I'm jobless and it's gonna run out quick so im trying to use sparingly while considering my loan options&amp; credit options. I'm not too worried about finding a job tbh, just want to hang on to this savings as much as possible. Currently I pass to normies but I still see a man face and it feels terrible. I have to get rid of at least a few masculine features if I ever have a hope at seeing a girl. Are there medical loan options? I'm not sure I want to try and damage my credit by taking out a bunch of credit cards but if I have to I will and I'll try and consolidate it later. Pls send help",asktransgender
Am I depressed because I want to be with them or because I want to BE them?,"So I’m a bi 20/M and oftentimes I can’t tell if the depression and jealousy I feel from looking at r/transtimelines is because I’m lonely and seriously attracted to some of them or because I desperately want to look like them. I actually had to stop myself from browsing that sub because it would be so bad for my mental health at times. 

I know people are going to say “porque no los dos?” but I’m not so sure about that. There’s a lot I can’t relate to when I see “egg” stories/memes on reddit. I don’t fit most of the “criteria” like I should. Every time I ask myself if I would want to look like that, it’s like my brain freezes up and says “uhhh idk maybe?” but it isn’t that common. A majority of the time I feel just fine with my body, but then again, I am very slim and lack muscle. 

Ive been very indecisive about all this for nearly a year. 

And the jealousy doesn’t come when I see just any transition. The person really has to look stunning, otherwise it has little effect on me, which is why I’m thinking my sexual attraction to them might just be tricking me into thinking something I never thought previously. 

When they look androgynous, the sadness and envy I feel is so much worse. Like when I saw [this person](https://www.reddit.com/r/transtimelines/comments/9kmtrj/yall_want_a_glo_up/?st=JNSGFU1U&amp;sh=da977e51) and [this other person](https://www.reddit.com/r/transtimelines/comments/8ycga6/feeling_alive_and_powerful_24_mtf_1_month_and_6/?st=JNSHUPFD&amp;sh=39369f7d) and [another example.](https://www.reddit.com/r/transtimelines/comments/7pmr10/21_mtf_6_months_hrt_c_filtered_a_bit_really_need/?st=JNSI36ZA&amp;sh=8263f620). Coincidentally, I’m also insanely attracted to all these people :/ so maybe it is just that?",asktransgender
"What will happen if for a year I experimented with taking estrogen pills? When that is over, and I rebalance my hormones, will I be the same guy I was before doing the experiment?",I've posted this on another forum but i'm looking for more advice,asktransgender
My friend deadnamed me last night and I don't know how I feel about it.,"I (MTF) was drinking with some friends last night and had a few too many. I don't remember any exact details, but I was about to do something that I shouldn't have and my friend, who was also drunk, was trying to get me to stop. She kept saying my name to get my attention, but, of course, I was drunk and not listening, so she said my deadname to me thinking that would get my attention. It did and I told her she shouldn't of, to which she said ""I know, and I'm sorry, but I needed to get your attention and didn't know how else to do it."" I just remembered it again and it keeps playing over and over in my head and making me anxious because I've hardly been called that name in person in over a year. I know I shouldn't get mad at her, but I don't know what to do. I can't rationalize either side of it for myself

&amp;#x200B;

EDIT: Posting this as part rant, part looking for advice",asktransgender
Is starting hrt with slightly higher estrogen levels good or bad?,"My doc told me all my bloodwork looks normal and healthy, and that she'll ""start me small"" because I have slightly higher than average estrogen levels (normal T levels).


This probably seems like a stupid question but does starting with already slightly higher than average E levels change anything? Will it make for a quicker transition physically? Can it negatively affect anything either? 

Thanks!",asktransgender
Partial support from parents (Rant),"So I feel like ranting because of a situation that happened with my mom recently. I’m 20 currently living with my parents, and I came out as trans(mtf) 3 years ago so I’ve been on hormones for 3 years now. My parents didn’t disown me or anything when I came out, they understood and everything. Since they only speak Spanish they are respectful enough to not call me by my dead name, but my dad sometimes still calls me Hijo(means son). For some reason Spanish pronouns don’t tigger me that much mostly because we live in a area where not a lot of people speak Spanish, so people don’t really know what they’re saying. However the people that do speak Spanish here, whenever my parents speak to them they use male pronouns, which I hate because they’re saying he and son but when they see me and see someone that looks like a female and dresses like a female they get confused. It’s pisses me off so bad but when I try to correct my mom about it she thinks it’s disrespectful. Like today she was on the phone with my sister in law(I think) and she said my deadname, I don’t think she knew I heard so I told her not to say that name and she got mad and slam the door in my face, I know she says my deadname behind my back and it honestly makes me so upset because I only feel like I’m getting partial support from them. I have spoken to my mom about surgeries and all that and she’s perfectly fine with that. But it feels like she’s just going along with it I don’t think she really wants me to be this way. I could understand if she’s just getting use to it but it’s been 3 years now. For anyone who read all this thank you. I know they were a lot of spelling errors and punctuation errors but I just really feel like I had to let it all out. ",asktransgender
Does it ever get better?,"I’m fifteen, AMAB, and I’m honestly tired of it all. Since as early as I could speak, I would say things like “I wanna be a dirl” [sic] (I was a toddler, don’t judge.) I would wear my mother’s dresses, do my nails, receive “Hello Kitty” toys for my birthday, and I was happy. My mother would always let me be me; my dad not so much.

When I was 11, I began to fear that I would soon hit puberty. I went to my father, and asked him to talk it over with my mother (I was going through a rough patch with her, so I preferred that he talk to her) and see if I could start HRT or Puberty Blockers. He said that he would talk to her about it, and eventually came back to me and said they decided against it (I later learned that he had never talked to her, and had lied to me). 

The next few years were misery - as soon as I hit puberty, dysphoria hit me like a bullet train. I was afraid to go out in public now that I was developing an Adam’s apple. My voice was deepening, meaning that my greatest hobby - singing - was also my greatest stressor. As the years went on, I sank deeper into depression, at one point attempting suicide, and more than once drafting suicide notes.

This year, I finally found the strength to confront my parents about their choice relating to puberty blockers and I, and I learned that my mother had know that I was trans all along and had just been waiting for me to make the first move. Finally, a stroke of luck had hit me; within the next six months, I was on HRT.

Among other tests, my doctor ran an x-ray to see what stage of bone growth I was at and, unfortunately, I turned out to have the bone growth of a seventeen-year-old. This means that I would not experience any of the bone changes I would have if I had started at the age of eleven.

I’m scared. I can barely afford college - my father is in terrible health and I have a bipolar older brother, meaning we spend large sums of money on medical bills, and are inversely unable to put that money into college savings - so I am afraid as to how I’m ever going to be able to afford all the different costs associated with being trans.

I have few friends what with me being afraid to be seen post-puberty, and this problem was only exacerbated by some of them leaving me when I came out. The only romantic partner I’ve had was a manipulative chaser, who did specific nsfw things without my consent.

I honestly don’t see a point to life any more. I’d love to have a husband who loves me and cares for me unconditionally, to be able to give birth to and mother a child, to experience the little things that define womanhood, such as menstruation. As much as I wish for these things, I know that they can’t happen - straight men simply don’t love trans women in our current society, and the rest of my wishes are biological impossibilities. I don’t see an end where I live a happy life within sight, and I don’t want to live in misery, so my life only seems to have one possible ending.

Now that you know my story, I ask: Does it ever get better? Is anybody out there able to relate to my story and, if so, what changed your life for the better?",asktransgender
"Checks and balances in politics: ways inadequate, clearly broken","When I hear the words “checks and balances”, it conjures up warm and fuzzy feelings that there are controls to ensure the safety, wellbeing and empowerment of others.. as Montesquieu said (paraphrasing): “the laws should be organized such that no person in a country should be in fear of any other person”.

However it seems that there are massive holes in this coverage. Permitting policies to be abruptly implemented that would fundamentally permit denying the basic requirements of life (discrimination permitted based on gender or nationality or residence, for basics such as food, housing, education, medical treatment) to entire groups.. be it immigrants, or lgbt, or some other at risk group.   Discrimination, in this context, is at its heart hate. I hate you enough to profit from your weaknesses.

While ever our political and economic systems continue to be based on permitting some person or group of people to profit from a different  person’s/group of people’s exposure to risk and hazzards,  all we are doing is fine tuning the levers to say what level of abuse is “fair game”.  And when those levers get turned towards more exploitation permitted, we see the results all around is in what seems like only days (e.g. in Brazil with increase in lgbt attacks, in USA with families being torn apart by ICE) , and they flow on for months and years.  Turning the levers down a little bit towards less abuse, does not address the core issue that the system is postured such that profiting from hazzard is fundamentally okay.

We really need to find ways of effectively communicating that profiting from other people’s exposure to risk / hazzard is fundamentally unethical and (at least to me it seems to be) the crux of the issue that tears apart our families, suburbs, cities, countries and civil systems. 

Surely we can create democratic, decentralized systems that prohibit exploitation of others vulnerabilities / risks for profit?

B. 



",asktransgender
"For those of you who weren't feeling dysphoric 100% of the time but transitioned anyway, how are you doing now?",,asktransgender
I have some questions about dysphoria and questioning ?," **\[TW\] Quick mention of eating disorder.**

Hi, first, sorry for the long post. I have a few question, but each requires that I explain a little my life, feelings and all.  

First, I’m AFAB, 20 yo, actually questioning my gender.  

I always acted as masculine when I was little, and was lucky that my family raised me in a pretty neutral way. So, until my early teenage years, I was more or less happy with who I was and how I was treated. I felt really disconnected from my body and sense of self, so as far as I can remember I didn’t felt body dysphoria (tho now I do).  

**Am I the only one who felt disconnected from my body when I was younger (0-14 yo) ?**

&amp;#x200B;

When puberty hit, I started to eat a lot to hide the curves that I was having. I took like +10 Kg a year minimum. When I think about it, I think it was how I coped with dysphoria. Plus, in the summer, I kept myself hidden under a blanket and couldn't bear to wear a swimsuit.

**Am I the only one who started coping with dysphoria with an eating disorder ?**  

&amp;#x200B;

I started questioning for about a year now, first it was watching FtM videos out of curiosity, then really starting to see that this curiosity came from something else. I started to be more connected with my body and myself in general and lately I started to feel social and body dysphoria a lot. I think I always had them but didn’t really knew what it was and thought I was just not feeling well. I have a lot of discomfort around my chest and hips (my hips are huge:/) and i can’t bear with being treated and seen as a girl anymore. I might even cut secretly my hair because I can’t stand having it long anymore (but that would out me for sure). I’d tried a binder, and since then it’s difficult to go out without it. I hate bras, like it’s worse than not wearing anything.  

**Does it sounds like dysphoria to you ?**  

&amp;#x200B;

Lately I’ve found that I’ve only ever liked people from the point of view of a guy. I literally cannot have romantic and sexual attraction as a girl.  Aside from that, I’ve never had bottom dysphoria (though I would prefer masculine genitals, I don’t hate or feel discomfort about my female genitals).  

**Is it normal ?**

&amp;#x200B;

I soon will be seeing a therapist (we don’t have gender therapists here) for all my questioning but thought about talking about it with people who really know this subject.  **Do you think it’s possible that I’m trans ?** I know I’m the only one who have the answer, but I’m really confused rn and I really needed to talk to someone while I wait for a therapist appointment.

&amp;#x200B;

Thanks a lot if you take the time to read all of this and answer !",asktransgender
Is having zero testosterone bad in MTFs?,"Is having zero Testosterone bad for MTFs? Spiro has suppressed mine to 0 and I was wondering if that is ok. I've read articles that say low testosterone can cause problems like hair loss, fatigue, difficulty concentrating, and anxiety in cis women. Does this hold true for trans women? Should I try to get my T in line with cis women levels?",asktransgender
Anyone else not really care about pronouns?,I don't know if it's cause I haven't really sorted out my identity yet but I really feel okay as long as I'm not called a man.,asktransgender
Does anybody know any trans friendly places in the boston area for laser hair removal?,basically title. just looking into getting laser for my face and want an inclusive place. i was wondering if anybody knew any place in boston or could give me tips on how to find a good spot. thanks!,asktransgender
"Periods of obsession wanting to look like opposite gender, help?","Hi,

For many years, at different points in the year I have intense times where I start obsessing about wanting to look like the opposite gender to what I am.   When this happens I don't want to look in the mirror because I don't want to see myself so it doesn't break my feelings.

This is not a hatred of genitals etc. But it's like I've got another personality at odds or something. I don't know. Don't really understand.  What is the best thing to do for support on this issue in the UK?",asktransgender
Fellow transgirls currently on HRT!,"How far along on HRT are you and what's your current band/cupsize? As a followup question, do you happen to know anything about your genetics? 25% Ukranian, 12% Puerto Rican, stuff like that.",asktransgender
How do i react,"Hello. Soa little back story. I'm 27 years old.   Been on hrt 2months or so.  Not really out amongst most friends. Anyway. So I was on Facebook tonight. My friend is far left wing politically. And I'm not a big fan of Jeremy Corbyn and what he is or socialism tbh.  And we got into a fairly normal debate.   And he straight up just outed me in about 5 different comments. Which everyone will have seen.  I used to work with the guy and my friends circle and his massively overlap.  I pointed out in a comment after that clearly he doesn't know me or anything I stand for or what he thinks i am by his comments so should probably not comment about my personal life.  To which he subsequently removed me from social media, (facebook) ie blocked me.      Hopefully removed his post. But idk.   I don't know what to do and now who knows. Or anything.   I'm very anxious right now. Sure il be fine as to me. Nobody actually matters unless they're family.    My grandad died in September and it really opened my eyes to what family means.  Anyway.  Any kind of comment or messege would be nice.  Thanks.    ",asktransgender
When would be a good time to do FFS?,So I’ve made up my mind that I want to do FFS. I have to start saving up money for it but I don’t know how much it would cost. Especially as it varies from person to person right? I’d have to go consult a surgeon for what procedures would be done and how much it cost right? But I don’t know if it’s early to go for a consultation? Because I’ve heard people say wait an year on HRT before consulting for FFS. Or is it totally okay for me to consult now? (I’m 6 months on HRT right now but if I decide to consult now I’d be able to after 3 months so I’d be 9 months in then) ,asktransgender
I think I just accidentally became non-binary?,"I pass as both a guy and a girl, and also I don't pass as either a guy or a girl, and yesterday I was called a very handsome guy and today I was called a beautiful young woman.

&amp;nbsp;

And I'm starting to love it??

&amp;nbsp;

Also I'be stopped going by my very gendered birth name and my very gendered name that I chose when I started me transition and started going by a gender neutral nickname.

&amp;nbsp;

And my body dysphoria is starting to go away but I'm only partially transitioned??",asktransgender
Question about ethinylestradiol VS estradiol usage between cis men and cis women...,"Does anyone happen to know why ethinylestradiol is considered the 'best' form of estrogen for (premenopausal) women to take, yet when it comes to trans treatment, people say to avoid ethinylestradiol at all costs because it's too dangerous and instead take estradiol? (Example: https://www.reddit.com/r/asktransgender/comments/2vy5wi/lets_talk_hormones_premarin_vs_estradiol_and/com0n3q/ )

IOW, why aren't women given the supposedly safer version of estrogen also (but still with progestin to protect from endometrosis)?
",asktransgender
Where do trans people hang out in Amsterdam?,I’m just finishing a Euro trip in Amsterdam for the next couple days.  I’m sort of over doing all the typical tourist stuff and just looking to relax for the next couple days.  Bonus points if you can tell me about a cool guitar shop.  ,asktransgender
How common are doubts? And what were your doubts in the beginning?,,asktransgender
How do I get my mom to stop outing me?,"My mom keeps telling people I’m trans like when talking about me she’ll say “my trans son”. I understand when it in the context of family friends that knew me when I was little, but her random co workers and more recent friends don’t need to know. I’m about a year and a half on T as well as post top surgery and I’m read as male almost exclusively. I’ve tried asking her to stop on multiple occasions and explained how dangerous it can be to out a trans person (and also that it’s basic fucking human decency to let me come out to people on my own terms) but she always brushes it off by saying that we live in a very LGBTQ+ friendly part of the world. That might be true but it doesn’t mean that like half an hour away a trans man didn’t get beaten until he was in a coma this past summer. Or the people at the next table at dinner last night didn’t talk about how bad “transgenderism” and “the transgendereds” are. She just doesn’t seem to understand that the fact that I’m out to all my friends (who are almost exclusively LGBTQ+) doesn’t necessarily mean that it’s fine to out me to random people in our small town and then claiming that she’s only doing it to help normalize trans people. 

TLDR: my mom keeps outing me to people despite me asking her not to under the claim that it’s just to normalize trans people and idk how to get her to stop.",asktransgender
"Hi, teenage boy here with moderate gynecomastia looking for ABTF. I followed the MtF guide, (totally not an egg btw), and I used tape and a measuring tape. No idea if I did it correctly. Help please? Thanks!)",,asktransgender
Calling all butch trans girls,"My friend is a butch trans girl and really self-conscious about it.  She thinks she's not ""really"" a girl if she doesn't like dresses and goes on and on about ""why did I even transition if I'm still gonna act and dress like a guy?""

Also, she's convinced no girl will ever like her as a girl, and any girl who DOES like her only does because ""they obviously just want a man.""

Can I hear from some happy butch transgirls so I can tell her how silly she's being?",asktransgender
Transitioned from a sub/bottom to more of a dom/top. What about y’all?,"Since puberty, I’ve always thought of myself as submissive or as a bottom, sexually speaking. After 2.5 years of HRT and SRS, it seems that I now prefer to be more dominant or to top. I guess as I became more comfortable with my body and the way I’m perceived by others, I became more open to other aspects of my sexuality. I used to be reluctant to date anyone shorter than me (I’m 5’5”) but now short girls and guys are back on my radar. It’s honestly been pretty liberating. ",asktransgender
Does anyone else cringe when someone is using your incorrect pronouns talking about someone else?,I don’t know why this happens but even when people say “she” to refer to an actual girl it just sounds... grating on my ears.,asktransgender
What do transphobes think when they suggest we go to therapy?,"They say we need help, and they don't mean transition. Conversion therapy had been proven not to work.",asktransgender
Emotional changes switching fromm testosteronende to estrogen,"How does it feel when testosterone goes down? How fast do you notice something? When you start with estrogen, what do you notice emotionally and how fast do you feel it?",asktransgender
“I want to be a woman but I don’t identify as a woman.”,"So I’ve had several sessions with my therapist and he seems to think I may be NB based off my experiences. What that means for me I really don’t know. I’m a 36 year old male... I don’t identify with most women whether not on TV or real life. Aside from sexual experiences, trying to relate to women all seems so foreign to me. However, ever since I was sexually active before my teenage years I typically always wanted to be the women I was attracted to. For example, If I were watching porn I would put myself in the woman’s place. Generally it’s just been in a sexual context or wanting to look attractive. 

Transitioning seems like a really bad idea if it’s just tied to sex or me “wanting to look hot.” I’ve always put women up on a pedestal and they always held power over me emotionally. Anyways, I was curious if anyone has similar experiences or have come across someone similar. This has been bothering me off and on for years now. I do have some form of OCD that makes me want to seek out a clear cut black and white answer that I believe is probably impossible.",asktransgender
my experience switching to taking my hrt sublingually (estradiol),"wanted to post this for those of you who are not sure or want more info on it. was gonna wait longer before sharing this as its only been 3 or 4 weeks but i didnt expect the difference to be this huge. i was on hrt for 3 years and my breasts werent even halfway to A cup and was almost non existant. started taking it subbucal however its spelt (between gum and cheek, works same as under tongue but easier) and immediately noticed alot more side effects like acid reflux and mood swings but was happy about them because i could feel the meds were actually getting absorbed now. my breasts already grew quite a bit in ONLY 3 weeks, looking in the mirror i can visibly see them now and its not even a full month. so yeah , wanted to share this with those of you who are abit skeptical on if its more effective or not ",asktransgender
What's the relationship between Gender and Sex,"So, I'm just looking for clarification. I've been lurking pretty hard for a long while now, especially after I've started transitioning, but I just have a few questions. I'm wondering what the relationship between Gender and Sex is. Like where do we draw the line. I understand that Gender is pretty fluid and not really based on anything physical, so I understand that the moment I realized I was trans, my gender switched from Male to Female. Now, Sex is really the part I'm confused about, are trans people the sex they were at birth unless they get bottom surgery? Do they fit into a middle ground Sex where you either have boobs and a penis, or no boobs and a vagina (if boobs even get factored in)? I'm not trying to make anyone (including myself) feel invalid, I'm just curious what everyone thoughts were on how Sex fits into transitioning.",asktransgender
Change in meds...feel horrible,"5 days ago my dr upped my E from 6mg a day to 8mg a day and lowered my Spiro to 100mg a day (my T was at 2 and she said I should have a little more to support libido and such). Yesterday I was out shopping with my wife and I started feeling dizzy, really hot, and super tired, we went home and I slept it off, but am still feeling it today. I am waiting to hear back from my Dr, but in the interim wanted to see if anyone else had similar issues when changing doses. I definitely didn’t have this reaction when going from 4mg to 6mg of E. ",asktransgender
Can I use my passport with the wrong bane and gender?,"Hi, I have a valid passport that has my old name and gender on it. I have since legally changed my name and gender. Im wondering if I bring my name change documents if I can still use my passport?",asktransgender
Parents abandoning me if I don't turn back...,"So I came out to my friends and coworkers awhile back and everyone was really encouraging and accepting. Some of my best friends even offered to take me shopping which totally blew me away. My parents however did not take things well and no matter how hard I try to explain how I'm happier, my friends accept me, and that this is a good thing, they insist that they were brought up differently and won't change their values. They told me that if I start ""looking weird"" I can basically kiss them goodbye. I asked if they'd seriously abandon me (I currently live with them) and they said that I'm the one abandoning them... They won't read or watch anything that could change their minds and they won't give me a straight answer as to why they think transitioning is wrong. If my parents were abusive and horrible maybe the decision would be easier but I love them and they've honestly been really good to me my whole life...things only really went downhill when I came out. Now they're ready to completely write me off and I feel really guilty I'm the one ruining their lives just to be able to accept myself. I always knew this would be the reaction I'd get from them which is why I put things off for so long. I honestly don't know what to do, I'm supposed to start hormones soon and it's making me just want to stop altogether and go back to the way things were so I can have my parents...",asktransgender
does anyone here know how cis people feel on their genders?,"Honestly I would check if there was an ask cisgender sub, but lord knows that might be a massive shitshow. I just want to know if its a normal thing for cis people to question their gender, or if they are just completely and utterly confident in their gender.",asktransgender
What would you say to these ideas about gender roles?,"Full disclosure: 24 year-old white cishet male. I've had some trans and queer friends who I care about deeply, but overall have had nothing approaching any experience of oppression.

So I became familiar with gender variance during the years I spent on Tumblr (2012-2016), in which I followed several trans women for a long time. Now I'm sure we all have our own thoughts about how toxic and far gone parts of that community and discourse were in that time, but I saw how people banded together and cared for each other, proclaiming nearly all identities and self-identifications as valid. IMO, that's pretty important in a society that has had no culturally sanctioned roles for gender and sexually variant folks for over a millennia, since the Christianization of pagan Europe. Most of us here probably know that this variance is as old as human kind and that hundreds of cultures have had additional gender roles to accommodate such people - [this Twitter thread](https://twitter.com/robinmarceline/status/942542605623029762) is the best collection of info on that I've ever seen. But we in Western (post) Christendom have long since had any ancestral vocabulary of alt. genders erased, so from the mid-20th century onward (especially in the last 20 years) we've created them from scratch. And as a result of coming up in an individualistic culture, today's gender and sexually variant Westerners hold self-identification to be paramount. Again, all identities are valid, even if we have to extend the LGBT acronym into an alphabet soup salad or have rigorous debates over whether or not agender is the same thing as non-binary, or whether this person can claim that identity yadayadayada. I'm not a direct part of those discussions but I've seen all of that happen.

So my belief is that if we had a culturally sanctioned ""third"" gender (or more) we wouldn't be having a lot of these discussions. People wouldn't grow up trying to figure out just what kind agender they were, or call themselves nonbinary (defining themselves against something else), they'd just call themselves ""[freerf](https://youtu.be/HeIkk6Yo0s8?t=1095)"" or something. Or (more likely) one or more of the identities we have today will gain enough social inertia to become that category, so that in 500 years the choices will be ""man"", ""woman"" and ""nobi"". Perhaps this process has already begun. If so, a clearer path to becoming more culturally sanctioned would be to help it along rather than advocating the destruction of all genders (which I'm not sure has ever happened in human history; gender's just something we all do on the species level), or some kind of anarchism where we have to remember 300 different categories and multiple pronouns. (That old nounself pronoun debacle from Tumblr. Sheesh. Singular they won that battle a long time ago).

I'm not advocating for some new rigidity to replace the old mind you. Honestly nearly all of the problems that plague trans people would evaporate if we simply recognized man and woman as mutually overlapping categories - something more like yin and yang - that we can freely move between. I just think in creating new structures we should recognize that everything overlaps, and that people can freely move back and forth in a process of self discovery. That's not too much an extension from what I see trans folk doing now.

Anyways. Just a thought. In one way or another this will show up in the far-future space opera I'll write one day :D",asktransgender
How do you feel about a cis male dressing as a bearded lady for Halloween?,"I'm asking because my cis male friend showed up to a costume party last night as a bearded lady and it kind of caught me off guard and I didn't really know how to feel about it. I should add that his costume wasn't based on anyone specific.

I was curious how you all might feel about this costume idea?",asktransgender
anyone else feel that passing is intrinsically inextricably linked to feeling female,"for themselves. i dont mean do they feel thats how it is for everyone, i dont mean that at all.   


to me, going out in public mid transition just means feeling like an androgynous guy. no two ways about it.   and its why i dont leave the house at all.  i become what others see me as, and in a way, thats how ive always been.  need for external validation? yeah.  i take their opinions as fact and truth.   i dont think i can change that, its really a part of me.  so, i feel like death. that or fear, depends on the day/mood :/",asktransgender
I'm seeing a specialist tomorrow. Do you think I might get an orchi in NHS?,"So, it's embarrassing but throwaway anyways. I'm wondering if I can get refereed for orchidectomy. I've got a lot of problems with this crap down there, mostly:

&amp;#x200B;

\-Intersex condition (PAIS)

\-Cryptorchidism

\-Persistent pain over the past \~6 months that grows stronger, kinda like that cord is swollen or something and it's so bad now that it really bothers me

\-2,5 years on HRT (12,50mg cypro daily)

\-Cypro dosage is definitely too big, but can't find smaller tabs. My T level is below female norms and prolactin is 2x the norm (but had MRI, no problems there)

&amp;#x200B;

So makes me wonder. Anyone who had similar issues maybe?",asktransgender
My mom is outing me to my transphobic grandparents,"My mom decided that I need to come out to more of the family, I told her not to but she is doing it anyway. The really bad part is I love with my grandparents, they have the full power to kick me out and I'm very scared that I will be homeless soon... I don't feel like it's my mom's place at all to out me before I feel comfortable at all... Is this as bad as I see it or am I overreacting?

UPDATE: My mom followed through but so far everything is okay",asktransgender
Genderfluid/genderfree- please help me understand!,"Hey there everyone, I’m hoping for a bit of clarity here. Let me preface this by saying I mean no disprespevt to anyone, this is something I literally do not understand and I’m trying to understand it better. For full disclosure, I’m a 36 year old ciswoman. So here we go.
Originally posted in NoStupidQuestions, someone pointed me over this way. 


So I think I get the whole trans thing, as far as anyone who is not trans can ‘get’ it. You were born male but feel like you are actually a woman. Or vice verse. Or any variation thereof. But how does genderfluidity work? Do you go through stages? Something like ‘I felt more like a girl in my teens but now I’m in my late 20s I feel more male?’ I realise that’s likely a horrible oversimplification of things but I can’t seem to find a better way of putting it. Maybe you can help me with that. If so, I’d appreciate it.

Also, genderfree. I was brought up in a culture where there were two genders, male and female. You had intersex people too but they were a minority and...shamefully, were not seen as equal human beings, they were seen more as freaks of nature. I’m trying to get out of that strict male/female way of thinking and have a much more open mind so this is why I’m asking here. How is it possible to not have a gender?

Again, I mean no disrespect so I am truly sorry if I offend anyone. This is not my intention, my intention is to educate myself on a topic I do not understand.",asktransgender
Does it ever get better?,"I’m fifteen, AMAB, and I’m honestly tired of it all. Since as early as I could speak, I would say things like “I wanna be a dirl” [sic] (I was a toddler, don’t judge.) I would wear my mother’s dresses, do my nails, receive “Hello Kitty” toys for my birthday, and I was happy. My mother would always let me be me; my dad not so much.

When I was 11, I began to fear that I would soon hit puberty. I went to my father, and asked him to talk it over with my mother (I was going through a rough patch with her, so I preferred that he talk to her) and see if I could start HRT or Puberty Blockers. He said that he would talk to her about it, and eventually came back to me and said they decided against it (I later learned that he had never talked to her, and had lied to me). 

The next few years were misery - as soon as I hit puberty, dysphoria hit me like a bullet train. I was afraid to go out in public now that I was developing an Adam’s apple. My voice was deepening, meaning that my greatest hobby - singing - was also my greatest stressor. As the years went on, I sank deeper into depression, at one point attempting suicide, and more than once drafting suicide notes.

This year, I finally found the strength to confront my parents about their choice relating to puberty blockers and I, and I learned that my mother had know that I was trans all along and had just been waiting for me to make the first move. Finally, a stroke of luck had hit me; within the next six months, I was on HRT.

Among other tests, my doctor ran an x-ray to see what stage of bone growth I was at and, unfortunately, I turned out to have the bone growth of a seventeen-year-old. This means that I would not experience any of the bone changes I would have if I had started at the age of eleven.

I’m scared. I can barely afford college - my father is in terrible health and I have a bipolar older brother, meaning we spend large sums of money on medical bills, and are inversely unable to put that money into college savings - so I am afraid as to how I’m ever going to be able to afford all the different costs associated with being trans.

I have few friends what with me being afraid to be seen post-puberty, and this problem was only exacerbated by some of them leaving me when I came out. The only romantic partner I’ve had was a manipulative chaser, who did specific nsfw things without my consent.

I honestly don’t see a point to life any more. I’d love to have a husband who loves me and cares for me unconditionally, to be able to give birth to and mother a child, to experience the little things that define womanhood, such as menstruation. As much as I wish for these things, I know that they can’t happen - straight men simply don’t love trans women in our current society, and the rest of my wishes are biological impossibilities. I don’t see an end where I live a happy life within sight, and I don’t want to live in misery, so my life only seems to have one possible ending.

Now that you know my story, I ask: Does it ever get better? Is anybody out there able to relate to my story and, if so, what changed your life for the better?",asktransgender
Addicted to seeking out invalidation.,"Ever since I realized I was trans and even began to accept it about myself, I have used the internet as a tool to put myself down and invalidate myself. I would, and still very frequently do, purposefully try to find the most inflammatory, hateful, ignorant, or downright stupid comments made about trans issues (like in the YouTube comment section, on Reddit, 4chan, etc.). It will, without fail, make me feel shitty, and is a major, major reason why I put off on transitioning and forced myself into the closet for so many years. I justify it initially as “I’m gonna go laugh at the idiots” or “I feel like being angry” but in actuality I’ve done it enough and know the consequences enough to think that I do it as a means of hurting myself for some reason, as though there is some catharsis there...

The deeper I go, the deeper I want to go and the more I want to take more drastic physical action against myself due to it. It gets to the point where part of me begins to believe that’s “this is how every person sees transpeople”. I can feel the danger, like doing this may contribute to me wanting to kill myself or detransition because I would never be able to function in a society like that. I think it is a big cause of a lot of my mental health issues that aren’t related directly to gender dysphoria and, yet, I keep doing it. It feels like an addiction. Every time I seek out hateful, bigoted people to tell me I’m wrong/evil/whatever I end up very hurt and emotionally confused, and it only gets worse every time, but I cannot stop. I feel like I need to figure out how to stop it but I’ve tried a lot and can’t.

I’m sure I’m not the only one to do this, but I need help on how to stop as it seriously is affecting my mental state and making my life more difficult.

P.S. I was tempted to call this “digital self-harm” but I hesitate to imply that the suffering I cause myself is worse than the physical suffering others can inflict on themselves, plus I don’t know if it’s already a term...",asktransgender
Passport gender UK,Hello I am trans girl from the UK I am 14 and I want to change the sex on my passport to female could anyone who has done this before tell me what I need to say and how long it would take to get the letter written?,asktransgender
Mount Sinai and dr. Ting,Can anyone tell me how long it took them to get plugged into the system for vaginoplasty with Dr. Ting at Sinai in nyc? ,asktransgender
I don't have disgust with my male genital but I certainly have a problem with my problem with my body developing as one. Am I a trans girl?,"Edit: title fix: as one -&gt; as a male

Warning: Despite our country is being LGBT friendly in the recent years, our education never truly recognized this problem, so this post may contained incorrect noun and some bad grammars.

Let's see:

- I have a disgust with my own body, but I never seem to have a problem with my genital at the current moment.

- I feel uncomfortable being a male in some certain instances. But I still throughly like certain male activities such as male's athletic activities...

- I don't really like the way my body is developing at the current moment

- I love dressing female clothes, but at the same time I don't really have any difficulties with male clothes as well, it's just that I don't have a fashionable taste when it comes to male clothes.

- I love role play as female in roleplaying but I have no problem doing the same in a male role 

- I do feel depressed and sad at some points in my life for no reason, I just feel worthless at some points in my life.

- I do want to participate in female activities in some instances(makeup, dressing,...).

- Preference for friends depends on gender: I love making friends with boys and girls equally so yeah, idk, my preference is equal for male and female.

- It's clear that I'm bisexual

So uhh, am I a trans girl? Or am I something else

I would be appreciated if you help me on this. See ya 👋 ",asktransgender
Will androgen cream make my clit bigger and feel more pleasure?,"Curious if any of you have experience relevant to this!

I'm a 28yo cis-woman with a very small clit. Very low pleasure sensation on my clit, and never had an orgasm.

I'm wondering if I can grow my clit using a topical cream... maybe this would increase the surface area of the glans and give me more access to pleasure.

&amp;#x200B;

Apparently small clits are associated with anorgasmia, so I wonder if growing mine would help lead to orgasm. [https://www.huffingtonpost.com/pere-estupinya/having-a-smaller-clitoris\_b\_5908452.html](https://www.huffingtonpost.com/pere-estupinya/having-a-smaller-clitoris_b_5908452.html?fbclid=IwAR08Xq6W76HcDWbakfYYeNZWaTZ_2aluPjx9X3SdYXdbxvgsPlNkhE78IFk)

However I'm hesitant cuz it appears that some of these creams can have bad side effects such as headache or skin rash. And I'd prefer not to develop other masculine traits. Though that's not a huge issue to me. For the past couple years I've been growing some new hairs on my chin and it doesn't really bother me.

&amp;#x200B;

I read a story from a woman who was accidentally exposed to her husband's Androgel cream. Her sex drive went through the roof, and it was bothering her. But to me that sounds really tempting! I would love to have the experience of feeling horny for no reason. Currently, my desire to have sex is very high, but I don't actually get turned on until about 10 minutes into a sexual experience.   


More background info:

My clit is so small it's difficult to find visually, the glans looks like a grain of rice when aroused. If it try to find it with my finger when I'm aroused, I can't find it. I've always had very low sexual pleasure from it. It used to be overly sensitive and hurt whenever it was touched. Now my partner touches it all the time, I've gotten used to it, so the extreme painful sensitivity has gone away. It's still pretty sensitive now, but not as painful and can give me a general feeling of pleasure. I can get kind of a ""general sexual pleasure"" when it's touched, but my clit itself doesn't actually feel good. As a comparison, I like getting my feet licked. When that happens, my body starts getting turned on, AND my actual feet themselves feel pleasure. But if you touch my clit the only effect is that I get turned on. Though, once by accident I got pregnant... during that time, my actual clit itself felt pleasure, it was a miracle I had never experienced before. Then I miscarried after one week, and the sensation went away.

Thank you for any help or feedback!

&amp;#x200B;

&amp;#x200B;",asktransgender
Chest-Pain?!,"Hey everyone out there. =)

&amp;#x200B;

So i´m about 4 Months on HRT-MTF. My bloodwork was done last month and my T and E are perfectly in range.

But for about 2 weeks now, the pain in my chest and nipple is gone. It is very weak, sometimes it\`s completely gone.

Now i\`m in fear. 

Maybe my T and E aren\`t in range anymore or is this normal?

&amp;#x200B;

&amp;#x200B;

&amp;#x200B;",asktransgender
Was My Boss In The Wrong? Update!,"Original post: https://www.reddit.com/r/asktransgender/comments/9rf25n/was_my_boss_in_the_wrong/

Hey everyone, thanks for your help. I took your advice into account and took many of your suggestions when explaining the situation to a coworker of mine that i trust who is an assistant manager. She's going to be having a chat with the management team and talking to them about how to deal with these sorts of situations, so as it stands the issue seems to be on the path to being solved.

I noticed a pretty large amount of people commenting on my last post which kind of ended up in ""roll over and deal with it,"" which rubbed me the wrong way. I live in Canada, and pretty much any policies made regarding gender and illegal down here, and trans rights are quite well protected. Now, maybe its different where some of you are from, but while I understand we have to pick our battles, I think its also worth noting, especially to those who are newly discovering themselves, that these situations can be resolved, in many cases. Every situation is different and has many nuances which will lead you to decide how to make your decisions, but be sure to know your rights.",asktransgender
"Unable to get erections at all, four months?","Hi everyone~    
I just had a quick question that will dive into nsfw stuffs. It isn't a huge deal for me, but is something I got curious today.    

So for the last two months or so I've switched to masturbating with a wand, because touching it was too dysphoric and I would just end up crying. Where as the wand did it's job and I was okay. However.    

I noticed I stopped getting hard while using it, and now I barely get a semi when I orgasm. Which again, is fine 99% of the time, but just got me curious as to why. I probably orgasm 2-4 times a month, so I don't think it's damage or anything, plus my toy doesn't go *that* fast like the Hitachi or something... I just am curious.     

I tried stroking and doing the old way today just to see if maybe that would help, but nope. It felt great but absolutely no actual growth/erection in site.    

Instead of just get *really* wet. After a few minutes it honestly looks like I peed myself sometimes because for some reason when I lost my erections, I became a fountain.    

Anyone else experience something like this? ",asktransgender
Is it possible for a transgender person not to go through gender dysphoria at all?,"Pretty serious question. ofc everyone has gender dysphoria on different levels.

I have dysphoria all over my body some people don't have bottom dysphoria.

But are there people who don't have gender dysphoria?

Sorry if this comes out as offensive but i'm curious.

Do they still ask to use other pronouns or do they not change anything at all?",asktransgender
How do you deal with dysphoria???,"Hey everyone, so basically I want to know how you deal with dysphoria? 
I'm dysphoric about:
- my face. I'm afraid I look quite masculine (my boyfriend disagrees, and I love him for this! He said I have many feminine features) but I still have doubts when I see myself in the mirror and I'm afraid I will just look like ""a boy in a dress""
- my height. I'm 182.5cm or 5.97'' and all cis-women I meet are smaller, and I'd kill to be at least 10cm smaller!! There are a few on the streets that are as tall as I am, and from time to time I see women that are taller than me. So this is nice, but I'd love to wear shoes that have a little heel, but it's not possible because I'd be a giant!! :( 
- my voice. I know I can train it, but does it work with every voice? I've been told I have a very deep voice. Can I still sound like a cis-woman with enough practice? What about shouting? I want to be a teacher and, let's be honest here, you all know how students can be at times. I will have to get loud from time to time, and I don't want to sound like Batman! 

Can E change something about this? Can it make my face a bit more feminine and maybe my voice a little bit higher?? This would be amazing! 
Can you maybe give me a few hints how you deal with it??? I try to ignore the doubts but it's not that easy. As soon as I lay down to sleep or see myself in the mirror, they come back. :/

Oh some information about myself: I turned 22 years recently and I'm mtf. Pre-everything and my first appointment with the therapist will be at the 14th Dec. 

Thanks in advance! ",asktransgender
Am I being unreasonable?,"I live with my parents, and came out to them as trans MtF over 6 months ago. They said they would support me and try to understand. Since then, we have spoken about me being trans maybe three or four times. I started HRT 3 and a half months ago, and the past month or so I have started to femme my wardrobe a bit (wearing women's jeans, tshirts, cardigans, etc). Again, even when I've gone out in full women's clothing and am visibly trans, my parents have never said anything. 

A couple of times I've gotten upset because they've said things that were hurtful, eg. 'you will always be our son.' Whenever I get upset, they say I'm too easily offended and that talking to me is 'like walking on eggshells.' They then will blame my HRT for making me upset. Today I was told that they love and miss male me, and they don't like the person I'm turning into. I said that was hurtful, and they claim that it's not, as they are 'merely having a hard time with the changes.'

I personally think I've given them plenty of time to adjust. I have always ended every conversation about trans stuff by saying I'm very happy to answer any questions they might have, but they never ask. I've offered to give them information on gender transition, or even just stuff like documentaries, but they have declined. I even forwarded the details for a trans information night to my mum, who declined because it was 'too far away' (it was about 20 mins away). Am I being unreasonable in expecting my parents to be a bit more accommodating and accepting, or should they be given more time?
",asktransgender
There's nothing wrong with us!,"We're trans no matter what. We're male, female, other genders, all, none, fluid and mixed in every possible way. The names and pronouns we identify with ARE our names and pronouns. And we don't need to give anything in return to the cis society if they accept us. We know better who we are. We don't need to be flawless examples and we don't need to fit into their categories or be compatible with their world views. We don't need to be conventionally attractive, fulfill any expectations people have of our genders, we don't need to ""pass"", we don't have to know how to explain our identities or even be fully certain of them. Being cis is not the default and even if you fear you may be wrong, you should not be afraid to assert your best understanding of yourself. And we don't need to prove anything. Some trans people are horrible, yet they're still trans! A female trans murderer or rapist is still female; we have all rights to condemn her and hate her, but there's no point in denying her womanhood. Cis women also happen to be rapists and murderers, but no one doubts in their identity as women.
We are valid and there's nothing wrong about us. It may feel this way because of the omnipresent transphobia we've experienced directly or indirectly. It's their transphobia that's wrong and damaging.",asktransgender
Is referring to transgender people as “transgendered” “transgenders” offensive?,"It definetly SOUNDS offensive to me, and I’d hate to be called that. But is it proper grammar to say it?

I attribute it to the way some people refer to black people as “the blacks” or “you’re a black”. It doesn’t have to be black people neccessarily but you get the point.

Is it rude?",asktransgender
Reverse Validation?,So I'm on a hrt(m2f) little over two years now.  I dress mostly andro mixing gendered clothing pretty evenly.  I've gotten gendered as female 3 times maybe by random employees at different shops.  Now on to the weird one... in the last year when ever I have to talk about a nurse/pharmacist/rando and they know I'm on hrt they automatically assume testosterone.  Is this cause I'm starting to look like a Butch girl? or do they assume that I'm trying to boost my t as a boy?   I always find the situation kinda weird and don't know what to make of it.. but since it's happened a few times I thought I'd ask the fam for thoughts!?,asktransgender
How do I go about finding a gender therapist?,"After a fair bit of soul searching and ignoring a ton of what are now obvious clues, I'm like 95% sure I'm trans. Either way, I think it would be good for me to talk it out with a therapist. How do I go about finding a good gender therapist? I'm in North Texas if anyone has any recommendations.",asktransgender
What conversations helped your parents get to where they are now/a better place in terms of acceptance?,"hey everyone, I'm theo, 18, and ftm. I've been out to my parents as transgender since I was 14. In that time, they've come a long way but I want them to be on board with my transition when the time comes for me to start; family's important to me. They really just want me to be happy and don't seem to see that this is what would help. :') 


 I know I can get them to come around, just like they did with my sexuality. They really just want me to be happy, but I can tell that they're also terrified (even if they won't admit it.) I want to get them to start talking about this regularly so it becomes a normalised topic to them, that way it won't be as scary to face. The issue is, I'm not sure how to begin. I don't know what else to try and talk about, or how to get them to attempt to open a peaceful dialogue about it. 


SO my question is: if your parents were once like mine and have changed their ways, what helped or made them see it through your eyes? Was there a turning point or one conversation that made it click? I'm at a loss of how to move forwards, but don't want to stay in place. Ugh :\ 


thanks in advance for anyone who comments and shares their stories, it means the world to me!",asktransgender
What’s the point of coming out if I’d lose all my friends in the process,"I’m in college and I feel like I have some of the best friends I could ask for, and I was even planning on coming out to my best friend soon. However, after my friends learned that another person who we knew was coming out as transgender they started voicing their opinions to me on trans people. My best friend even said that he would not ever want to be seen with this person again even though they were pretty good friends before they came out. 

Now I’m lost because I feel like there is no point in coming out if I’d have no one afterwards. I like to think that my friends wouldn’t care and would still treat me the same but I also know that is a long shot. It doesn’t help that I’m very heavily closeted so they would probably all be very surprised and it just makes me so sad that I can’t be myself around my friends.

",asktransgender
The Chromosome argument,"I often hear the opponents of transgenders use the argument that our XY or XX chromosomes can never be altered and therefore we can never be the gender that we think or feel we truly are.  And despite the fact that most of us feel and think with every fiber of our being that this is not our true gender the chromosomes win the argument because DNA is black and white and hardly indisputable. After all, it is something that you can’t hide from; it is what it is. Zing they got us. We cannot argue with that. On the surface it would seem that we have no other option but to concede to their point.

Nevertheless, I say this should not win the argument on gender. Why should the unseen XX or XY chromosomes in our DNA get the final say about who or what we are? Sure it is the set code that determines our biology and physical characteristics— but I don’t know about anyone else—but I have zero awareness of what is going on in my DNA and I have zero awareness of what is going on in other peoples DNA unless I put them under the scrutiny scientific testing. But that is not how people relate and interact with one another in society! It’s not as though you can see that without the help of scientific testing. That is not how people function society in the everyday reality of our lives. People relate to the world with their senses and that is where the debate should stay. Transgenderism is something that is experienced on a societal and very personal metaphysical level; or dare I say, ethereal level. We feel it with every fiber of our being that we were born in the wrong gender. So why do chromosomes get to tell me who I am or who I get to be? It’s not as though I or anyone else can have a conversation with them. Also many within the faith communities use the same metaphysics to justify their faith in God. So why can we not equally use the same ethereal metaphysical system of thought to express the essence of our true nature that we believe ourselves to be? And why is it morally wrong to outwardly express that nature by transitioning our exterior to match what we truly believe our nature to be? I personally believe that being inauthentic is the bigger social crime.

Compassion for our plight is completely lacking when they have to break us down to our DNA to tell us what’s what and who we truly are. This issue goes far deeper than what our DNA says about us on paper.   Anyway…Food for thought.",asktransgender
I'm not sure about what to do,"Recently, I realized that I may be a trans woman. For as long as I have remembered, I have always felt uncomfortable in my own body. As a 6'1"", 138lb man, I always associated that with not being a traditional masculine build. A few years ago, I went through a phase of cross dressing, and I realized that was the one time I felt actually comfortable in my own body.  


I started wearing dresses, bras, and breast forms at home, to see if that feeling persists, and I find myself actually waiting for the workday to get home so I can get into my female role. I'm planning on keeping this up for a while longer. As a late 20's man, I'm afraid that I'm conflating a crossdressing phase with something else and I'm trying to find justifications. I wanted to see if others have gone through this, or if I'm overthinking things in either direction.",asktransgender
dealing with toxic masculinity as a trans guy,"do you know any ways to deal with toxic masculinity as a trans guy? i hate how emotional i've always been, how insecure and wimpy i am and how i constantly have the need to vent out feelings on the internet. i just can't see myself as a man if i behave in any sort of traditionally feminine way (i've been starting to feel like even the way i type gives off the feeling that i'm a girl)
i'm insecure about bringing up feelings in any way, i don't want to appear vulnerable and i wish i was stronger and intimidating so much.",asktransgender
Confused about gender spectrum,"Lately I've been trying to understand where on the spectrum I fall into. I've known for a while that I'm trans, knew I wanted to transition but it still feels like something was off that I couldn't identify.

Here are some of the things that I know for sure on the woman spectrum:

* Physically
* Voice
* Mannerisms
* Femme (Makeup, hair, etc)
* Socially

With all of this, I can't say for certain that I care about pronouns and struggle with identifying as a woman. One thing for certain is that I'm not a man. Any thoughts on where those could possibly land within?",asktransgender
"SRS, no vaginal cavity","Has anybody here had SRS without the creation of a vaginal cavity?  Until recently i did not know that this was existing.  My psychologist told me about this possibility when we were talking about SRS for me.  I am 100% lesbian and don't actually need or want a hole that somebody can penetrate.  But I did not know that such a surgery was done, and that was the reason that I wanted to hang on to my not very well liked penis.  
Now that I am aware of it, and that i can be a woman without this undesired cavity, I wonder if somebody here had this type of surgery and what the outcome of it is?  
",asktransgender
Any advice for finding shoes?,"I'm making massive strides towards becoming myself (buying feminine clothes, practicing with makeup, purchasing a wig, etc.), but I've hit a bit of a snag: I wear size 15-17 shoes in men's sizes and have no earthly idea where to find giant women's shoes. Any tips would be helpful!",asktransgender
How to deal with a certain circular logic,"Clearly there are groups that dehumanize us and want us extinct.  On the basis of them not liking trans people.

When we in return dehumanize or want that kind of thinking eliminated, members of those groups throw fits of how evil we must be.

Like... How could you possibly explain the difference between persecution of a group vs persecution of those who persecute?  It's frustrating the hell out of me.",asktransgender
Mtf HRT dosage question,"Hello, I'm new here. I downloaded this app so i could get some opinions about my HRT dosage. A little background, im 18, started HRT about a year and some months ago. Here's the question. So, ive been on only 3mg of estradiol max since I started transistioning. Also, my spirolactone dose ( 200mg a day) seems like enough, however I feel that my doctor is going a little too slow with the estradiol. My chest has stopped hurting from growth about a few months ago, and overall I feel things have slowed down, so I'm a bit worried about my estradiol dosage. I recently had an appointment about a week ago, and my doctor is going to increase my estradiol to 4mg a day, after my blood work is processed. So please, let me know what you guys think... Am I going too slow, or does it not matter? Thanks! :-)",asktransgender
Being gendered correctly IRL only makes me anxious,"Sorry to vent, I'm just. Deeply frustrated.

Whenever I imagined finally being gendered correctly by a total stranger, no asking for my pronouns, no prompting....... I mean, I didn't imagine it as this grand, beautiful event that I would cherish forever or anything, but in my head, the idea of it always felt....... a little freeing. Being gendered correctly by someone who doesn't know I'm trans, without having to ask the person to do it, or without them being prompted to do so by others who Know I'm trans........... I thought I would feel relieved. 

That. Has not been the case. At all.

Because in the extremely rare cases where it's happened, I haven;t been able to feel anything but extreme, overwhelming anxiety. Because I know I don't pass. I *know*. So every instance where I'm gendered correctly by a stranger becomes a waiting game for ""when the other shoe is gonna drop"", so to speak. Usually it's instant, the person sees my face and instantly apologizes for mistaking ""such a beautiful woman"" for a man. But it's almost worse when it never happens. 3 times now a person has called me ""sir"" or something, and not ""corrected"" themselves, but I haven't felt even slightly happy about it, because in my mind I know it's not because I pass, or because they actually see Me. I know they really didn't ""correct"" themselves because they were just awkward, or were hoping I didn't notice the ""sir"". So I can't relax, I can't be happy, I don't feel relieved even a little, I'm only able to feel anxious and paranoid, caught up in what they're really thinking. Which is Not that I'm actually a ""sir"", or a ""he"".

This is probably stupid, but I feel sort of robbed, almost,,, I just wanted....... to feel even a *little* relieved. But I actually feel more frustrated and anxious with each passing day. I'm so tired of being anxious. I just wanted this small little ""victory"".......... but. Gggrhg

Does anyone else feel this way? Did you feel any better about it once you were much further along in your transition? Is anyone else hung up on the paranoid fear of being """"discovered"""" by anyone who genders you correctly? ",asktransgender
How can I best articulate the struggles trans people are facing with civil rights today?,"I’ve gotten pretty good at cutting outright toxic people from my life, but I still keep semi-friendly contact online with a few folks who are... indifferent, clueless, or even callously uncaring when it comes to taking trans rights seriously.

It’s so blatantly clear to me that LGBTQ+ rights are the civil rights movement of this generation, with rights for trans people as the contentious cornerstone, and it frustrates me to no end that there are decent people (or is that “previously decent?”) who’ve fallen hard for the right-wing dismissal of trans rights as “oh they’re just upset about what bathroom they want to use.” I’ve been debating with someone who doesn’t even think that the right is actively getting in the way of what trans people want, and that the trans populace are completely overreacting. This is someone who wasn’t even aware of the fact that being transgender isn’t protected under laws for hiring practices, and dismissed the Trump administration’s attempts to write “transgender” out of existence.

Sometimes I want to verbally tear into these people and let them know how ignorant, cruel and horrifically stupid their attitudes are, but as cathartic as that might be in the moment, I don’t know if that would do much good. Are there any pointers or viewpoints you are willing to share regarding how to debate and frame these issues, so that a cis-straight-male like me can get better at being a productive ally in the fight against hate (and sleep better at night)?",asktransgender
Legal name change question,"So I’m starting paperwork for my legal name change and I’m wondering what’s a good answer to put for reason to change my name? I live in a semi-conservative state (Missouri) and will be visiting a courthouse in a conservative area, and I don’t want to put on the form “because I’m transgender” for several reasons but mostly because I don’t feel like that’s a good enough reason. Any ideas?",asktransgender
Let's Try This Again?,"(Quick redo because my last post was heavily medicated and on zero sleep)

I'm back on this subreddit, and some of you might remember me from the posts about my family reunion?

Anywho, since then my bio-dad, who has spent the last 15 years searching for me, has re-entered my life (when I was still re-closeted) and we seen to be hitting it off fairly well; though we've only had a few phone calls and face to face meetings. 

My one issue with this is that being of rust belt working man African-American persuasion (I'm biracial, if that's important) my dad has...conservative views on things.

This makes me worried about coming out to him. 

I'm afraid of how he might take me being all, ""Hey, your son? Your only biological child? He wants to be a woman.""

He hasn't said anything too derogatory about the LGBT community (but has said some iffy things about race, class, and drugs)

Now a lot of people (including my weekly LGBT group and my therapist) have suggested that some one who puts this much effort into finding someone doesn't really care who they turn out to be.

I'm just worried that its such a shock and something so alien to him that he'll take it poorly and I'll wind up in the situation I did with my mom's family (most of them wanting nothing to do with me).

How do I approach this?

Do I just stay closeted with him? (He's in very poor health and has only a few years left at best.)

Do I just come out directly and hope for the best?

Do I come out slowly and just test the water with each step?

I'm just a bit lost and scared about this thing.

I love him and want him to love me for me but I also don't want him to bail on me like my birthmom and her family.",asktransgender
"NSFW I'm having a problem and I need some help. MTF, HRT","So for the last month, it has burned every-time when I pee. I've been on 6mg estradiol and 250 spiro for 2 months now. Before that it was 4 and 100 respectively. The tip of my penis is not red, my urine tests as fine (without antibodies and no STDs). My doc is just as flabbergasted as I am. It feels like a UTI (I've had them before) but I haven't tested positive for one twice now. 

Is this something anyone else has experienced? My doctor just told me to let her know if it gets worse at this point. But it's kind of annoying. Thought I'd turn here for help.

eidt: SUPER NSFW UPDATE, POSSIBLE GENITAL DYSPHORIA TRIGGER:

So, pain got worse throughout the day. Worse than its been all month. Then I got home at 12am and proceeded to find blood in my urine. That was new. Looking down I noticed blood, just blood - not blood and urine - dripping out of my penis. Instantly I hated my genitals more than normal cause fuck this noise! But then I calmed myself down. New experience. Breathe. That means something somethings clearly in bad shape. 

Went to the urgent care this morning (I'm not paying my 100$ copay at the hospital if I didn't have to). Got a doctor who was certainly friendly but new nothing about trans issues (she had a harder time with my hormone pronunciation than I did). She ran more bloodwork, and a urinalysis and checked (with a swab) for a yeast infection. Which no one had done. 

Now to find out if I can take the prescription to fix it with my hormones. She told me to wait to talk to my regular doctor because she had no idea and didn't want me to die. 

Bonus: she ran bloodwork for kidney function, but when I asked if she could do estradiol and testosterone serums she said she'd be happy to. I'll find out my levels tomorrow a whole month til my next check-up. ",asktransgender
How do I even begin to date? I feel sick without intimacy. I'm just dead.,"Background: 21 year old NB, graysexual. Intersex. Only started to have any friends at all recently, never dated. Ugly and obese and a general cloud of negativity no matter how hard I try. Dysphoria has been beyond regular and crippling for as long as I can remember.

I just want to be with somebody who really gets me, but I don't think that's possible. That just makes me want to stop existing. Not die, I just wish I never wasted anybody's time. Intimacy is something I have always needed, but I've held myself back and repressed myself so long that I don't even feel comfortable with my own family. I never got to be a teenager. I haven't lived at all.

I'm amazed that I'm alive now. I was waiting to die until very recently. I let myself become disgusting. I have never felt comfortable in this horrible, disgusting androgynous body. I see so many beautiful androgynous people but I can never be that. I've always been the fat kid boys thought they could grope, even kiss. I have two trans friends, and they are the only thing that makes me happy. Are they even my friends? No, I have none. They just bear with me out of pity.

Why was I even born at all? I'm a talented person, that is something I doubt but people say it so I believe it,  but I have this indescribably miserable life completely preventing me from ever being happy. And why do anything at all, then? I'm the type of person that needs intimacy, and I will never have that. Not interested in sex, just somebody who will be there for me who I can squeeze and just lay with. Somebody with a beautiful head of hair that I can bury my face in.

I've caught the interest of ONE guy ever and I was so completely dissociated I wasn't even my real self. It was online, in a game. If he had heard my disgusting stammering voice he would find me disgusting like everybody else. I was somebody I made up. Maybe that is some part of who I am, but that just isn't enough. I need somebody who makes me feel valued at all, because at this point I am doubting that every single day.

ANY advice, please. ",asktransgender
Like My Username Suggests,"Hi. You won't recognize me, but I'm back with a new account for similar reasons as last time. I am confused about my gender identity. Two years ago, I believed I was trans, and started crossdressing at home, wearing makeup, etc. I say ""believed"" because maybe 3-4 months after starting to really think I was trans, I came to the conclusion that I probably wasn't. A year went bye, and tonight I've identified a weird feeling that I've been having all week. The same feeling I had a year and a half ago. To describe it is difficult, but I'll try my best: I kinda want to be a girl. However, it's more complicated than that. I was looking through Instagram and came across an account that posted cute/cool pictures of girls and I was immediately attracted, but not in the normal ""oh she looks cute, I wonder if I could date her"" kind of way. The one thing I can tell about this feeling is that is distinctly not sexual/romantic. It was more in a ""wow, I want to BE her."" kind of way. However, I'm not sure if this is due to being trans or simply thinking she looked really nice. I also recently have been having vaguely negative feelings towards my own body, and have always have negative feelings for my low voice. However, this could be related to my less-than-great body, and bad singing voice. I'm not making any decisions tonight, because it hasn't really been a problem until today/yesterday. However, I'd like to ask your opinion. In my very young childhood (4-9) I was known to play with dolls and dresses, but nowadays I like to do woodworking/metalworking, but am not adverse to makeup/fashion so the ""do you like stereo girly things?"" question is kinda jury-out. I feel like if I passed 100% as a woman I would like it, but my past crossdressings that look very obviously trans give me serious cringe/dysphoria, and being a guy isn't some terrible thing for me, so I might be non-binary? My overall problem is that I can't identify whether i'm feeling dysphoria or cringe, envy, etc. What do you guys think?",asktransgender
Is it normal to have a paste left over while taking estradiol sublingually?,"I got prescribed 2x 0.5 mg sublingual estradiol, and got [these](https://rxpillimage.nlm.nih.gov/RxImage/image/images/gallery/original/00555-0899-02_NLMIMAGE10_442F2209.jpg) pills from Teva Pharmaceuticals. Even after an hour of holding them under my tongue, though, I still have a lot of white paste floating around, that seems to be little different from the amount I have at 30 minutes or 45 minutes. 

Should I expect there to be filler left over at the end? Is there a way to tell when I've absorbed most of the estrogen and can just swallow the rest? I've looked into people's advice for taking pills sublingually but I don't know if they mean ""there's nothing left"" when they say the pill is dissolved or just that it has no structural integrity and is just grit.",asktransgender
Yet another 'Am I trans'?,"I'll summarise reasons for/against at the bottom :)

I'm a 17 year old female. I know a lot of this is gender roles, but stick with me!

As a kid, I wasn't super girly (never played with barbies, didn't like pink, instead had tea parties with toy animals).

When I was in year 6 (about 10-11), I started wanting to shop in the boy's section. This lasted about a year or two, then when I got to about year 8, I started wearing girly clothes. I was pretty insecure at this time about fitting in, but I don't think that's  why I stopped the boyish clothes as I don't remember missing them or not wanting to wear girly clothes. I also started questioning my sexuality.

I was depressed for a couple of years around 13/14/15, this got better in year 10, and sort of returned when I went to college as I was away from my friends and feeling lonely again.

In year9/ 10 I started feeling way more girly. I'd always been a huge fan on lana del rey, and I wanted to be like her a lot.

I'm currently 17, and my clothing ranges between very girly (knee high socks, tying ribbons in my hair) to casual (trackies and a jumper). My hairs long and I like it this way. I've never really had male friends.

&amp;#x200B;

My only issue is, that the gender questioning keeps coming up.

&amp;#x200B;

So, this is the third time I've questioned my gender, which is very weird for a cis girl I know! The first time was a couple of years ago, and lasted about a week. The second was in April this year, after I suddenly had the thought while tripping on mushrooms. It gave me a lot of anxiety, waking up at 4 in the morning and stuff. I couldn't concentrate on anything. I even dressed up as a boy real quickly and looking in the mirror made me feel nothing.. it didn't feel 'right' or whatever. Weirdly, the best relief I had was to dress up girly. I browsed this forum, but didn't really relate to any of the stories. Then I found some people on the internet talking about TOCD - trans-OCD. I have a history of OCD, and their description matched me better than any genuine trans story. This period lasted a couple of weeks. Both these times, the questioning started when I was watching a lot of RuPaul's Drag Race.

Now, in October, it's back again, although without so much anxiety.

&amp;#x200B;

SUMMARY:

Reasons I may be trans:

\-The fact I'm even questioning it. (however, I do have an obsessive mind, and since it's a question that can never truly be answered, it's possible my brain is just clinging to it)

\-I've always been confused about my sexuality. I know I like girls, and feel something towards boys, However, I don't get proper crushes.. more infatuations, even if I don't know them well. This only happens with girls. I wouldn't call myself a lesbian though, but maybe that's just internalised homophobia. I also don't connect with people very well, most people in my college think I'm a bit weird I think, and I feel demisexual. So maybe being trans is the missing piece?

\- As a kid, I remember sometimes playing a boy character in 'poptropica'.

\-Depression at the start of puberty. Wanting to wear boy's clothes, then changing when I got to a new school. I remember my friend saying 'Are you a tomboy?' and denying it strongly. idk what I was so offended about.

\- I remember when I was around 15 thinking it's best to be a girl, then boy, then man, then worst to be a woman. I've always been scared of getting older though.

\-I've always felt 'different'. I know everyone does, though. But I used to google mental illnesses like bipolar/schizophrenia because I thought there must be something wrong with me.

&amp;#x200B;

Reasons I'm cis:

\- No dysphoria, even when at my most anxious questioning. In fact, almost the opposite; I feel uncomfortable with how wide my shoulders are, and still am unhappy with how boyish my body is in general (narrow hips/wide waist, flat chest, skinny thighs). Not because I want to be perceived attractive, but just because I'd prefer to have a girlish figure.

\-Being trans just makes no sense?? I'm happy as a girl and always have been, yeah my sexuality is a bit confused and I find it hard to connect to people but I may just be a weird, introverted person? I feel like I'm looking at transness as a magic pill that answers all my lifes problems.

\-Whenever I've fantasied sex, I've been a female (I know the reverse is a common thing with trans people). I've never had fantasies of being a boy - occasionally I've thought 'if i was a boy i'd wear that and look cool', but nothing serious. In my daydreams I'm always a girl - there was one summer, on a road trip, I'd imagine myself being lolita and dancing around.

\-I like being a girl! I've even written in my journal about how lovely female friendship is and stuff.

\-I've connected to female characters in books (I don't remember about male ones), and queer female love stories. Unless I'm actually a straight boy just fetishising them...?

\-I used to think about women doing steroids and I couldn't believe they'd willingly want to inject testosterone! Like it was very alien and weird to me.

&amp;#x200B;

Since being a teenager, I've felt a bit insecure about being masculine, not in how I behave, but my body. I remember constantly looking at my fingers  to see the ratio between index and ring (my rings are longer), as it shows how much testosterone you were exposed to as a fetus. My I feel weird about my chest because it looks like a boy chest with boobs stuck on, because I'm skinny with wide shoulders and small boobs. Sometimes when I'm doing something my brain just goes 'that's a boy hand doing the writing' and I hate it.

If the questioning just went away, I'd be perfectly happy. I've thought about the button test a million times, the answer is I don't know! I imagine if I woke up with a penis and a flat chest and hairy legs etc. and it just feels weird to think about? I don't think I'd hate it, but I don't long for it either. I actually shave my legs a lot, even in winter, cause I like being all soft and smooth.

I think maybe I'm bigender?? Or like Jung's animus - there's a boy I could have been, like a twin. I'm happy being a girl, I just want to know if the questioning will go away. I've read dysphoria never goes away, it comes back stronger each time. But this isn't dysphoria, it's just my brain questioning. Also, it's less strong this third time.

But yeah, this is my story, I'm only posting because I haven't come across one like mine. Thanks so much for reading, I will appreciate anything you have to say!

&amp;#x200B;",asktransgender
Finding others nearby,"Does anyone know of any ways to meet other trans people nearby? I know that there are groups in my area for that sort of thing, but I'm mainly only looking for people to talk to online, as I'm not out yet. I've already posted on my school's subreddit but got no bites. If anyone has any ideas (or lives in the Santa Barbara area) please let me know!",asktransgender
Trans child upset by Trump,"My 15 yr old non-binary trans child is so upset by Trump and his bigotry. They were crying tonight and worried about their future. We tried to explain that Trump is temporary. That any crazy shit he does can be undone. 
What are you hanging onto as a reassuring or even stabilizing force? My husband found a little video by a trans gender person Jeffrey Marsh in which they spread love and support to trans people and reassurance. It helped, but my kid is still upset. Just looking for resources for trans positive supports. Thanks. ",asktransgender
How Did You Come Out at Work?,"I’m getting ready to come out at work, I am a month away from FFS and it’s time to drop the bomb on them.

The only question is how to go about it.  I mean telling HR and my boss is the “easy” part, but company wise? I’m not sure there.

My first instinct is to just send out a company-all email, if HR is ok with it, and explain things.  I don’t want to make this some big deal, my thought is more that i want to head off the rumor mill.  We have several people who will gladly spread information that is their option other than fact, id like to avoid that.

Thoughts?",asktransgender
Spiro,"So, just curious I know I’ve read that spiro can make you really thirsty and crave salt. However, whenever I drink tons of fluids it doesn’t seem like it’s enough. Is this something I should be worried about or have looked at? Just didn’t know if anyone has experienced excessive thirst issues with spiro?",asktransgender
"(AFAB) hrt, partial transition, androgyny",I want transition just enough to pass as a feminine gay man would that mean a partial transition?,asktransgender
"Trans people that were raised in conservative households, how long did it take for you to accept yourselves?","I have a moral dilemma every single day. One voice in my head tells me that this is me, and this has been me since early childhood, and that I need to transition to be myself. Another voice tells me that I'm choosing this, that I'm mentally ill, and that I'm justifying all these ""unnatural"" thoughts by ""misconstruing"" my past, and that God made me a man, and I need to accept that. Every time I look at a mirror, one of my inner voice will say how I can't identify with this face or body, and I ask myself how I would look as a woman, and I feel this incongruency between my soul and who I'm looking at in the mirror. Erstwhile, another voice tells me I just have low self esteem and if only I'd be more ""manly"", I'd be ok with how I look, and that if I were to transition, I'd make an ugly woman, and be lonely no matter what. I have these thoughts every single day. I might go to sleep, being content and sure that I was meant to be a woman, only to wake up saying the opposite, and justify it by saying how I'm depressed and only ""pretending"" to be trans to cope with it, and how all the dysphoria I experienced even as a young child was what all guys went through. I grew up very repressed, and still live very repressed in a very conservative household. Sometimes I'll love and accept myself, other times I'll hate and want to blow my brains out. I keep having these conflicting thought processes. Sometimes I think this is all a ""fetish"", but other times I think back to how I've always thought of myself being the woman during sex since I even discovered sexual feelings in late childhood/early puberty. I feel like I die and am born again every single day, like I tell myself ""ok, no more trans thoughts, from this day forward, I'll be the manliest man!"", but then I get severely depressed and I will starting thinking about being trans again, and wishing I was in a woman's body. But then my conservative nature will hit me,  and I'll tell myself to ""man up"" again and try to force myself to focus on other things, but even then, these thoughts are always in the back of my head. Part of me feels like I'm repressing myself, and another part of me feels like I'm just pretending this is all real as a panacea to justify my own personal problems and deeply troubled childhood. Idk, anyone else been through this and come out the other side? If so, how?",asktransgender
I’m so confused with my gender please help 😔😖,"There is no lgbt therapists near me and even if there was I don’t have tho courage to go face to face and talk about it so I found pride counselling but they said that it’s not the best option for me so I didn’t get a counsellor and redit is my last option (because I got no friends😂😕) so if you can help I will really appreciate it ☺️ just a little back story 

Ever since I was little I’ve played with my sister’s toys dressed up in my mum’s clothes and my sister’s costumes and I even asked my mum when I’m going to get breasts. Even when I was older I dressed up in my mum’s clothes as a joke but I actually liked warring the clothes it was ocword and embarrassing though. I’ve always gotten along with girls easily and had a couple guy friends too and I’m not fully sure but I think I got jealous of girls with how there body’s look. I’ve found. A lot of guys cute and going into high school I was embarrassed in the gym Chang room. I had a guy sit on my lap, there was no lock on the bathroom door there so ppl barged in sometimes and I never liked showing my body but I was always embarrassed with how fat I am and the shape of my body. Near the end of grade 10 I went to anime north 2018 and I saw guys dressing up as the sailor scouts and I smiled and sorta wish I could join them.

Then Toronto Pride 2018 came around it was my first pride parade I went to and I was with my girlfriend that is bi (I also thought I was bi and thought I was gender fluid) but then I thought to myself how I have romantic feelings for well Amy gender and that I’ve been feeling more female than male or gender neutral for almost all the time. then grade 11 shows up, I’ve been thinking to myself saying things like “what if I’m trans female, I did use to think I was a girl when I was a kid” and  here we are now I’m just confused and question my gender.",asktransgender
How to start dating again,"So,  I'm realizing that after four years of being single,  I'm quite lonely and I'd like to start dating again. 

Before as a guy I had luck with online dating,  and if things were still the same I'd go do that.  But things aren't.  I don't know where to start trying to find a date.  I don't have friends to go out with,  I'm a bit of a homebody. 

Is there a website that's better than others for this?  I'm sure I'm over thinking this but I'd love to hear from some people who have been successful meeting people since starting transition. ",asktransgender
How to tell if a gender center using inform consent,Does anyone know how to tell if a gender center using inform consent? I am looking on their [website](https://www.chcb.org/services/medical-care/transgender-lgbtq-health-clinics/) and am unable to tell. Also does anyone know how to speed up facial hair growth using Minoxidil 2% I've been using for about a month now and not much is changing. Btw I'm ftm.,asktransgender
Good electrolysis in Vancouver area,"Hello, 

I am looking for a good electrolysis practitioner in the lower mainland area of BC, who has positive experience working with transgender women and is known for good results. I am okay with having to travel a little bit, so anyone who is known for being good with trans people and is good at what they do is alright. It is especially preferable if you or someone you know has had good experience with them. 

Thanks, all. ",asktransgender
I have been feeling like I want to die way too often,"Pretty much this. My dysphoria has been hitting me like a truck a lately, and it’s become freaking hard to handle, some times I just want to give up uni and everything else and just hide from the world as I have done before, but I know I absolutely cannot do that, so just dying seems a lot easier most of the time.

What I am most dysphoric about is my bodyhair, and most specifically my chest hair. Like I epilate/wax/shave it but I can never get rid of the of the black spots it leaves cause of my freaking pale skin with very dark hair combination. 

I can’t look at any girl friend or even any woman’s photo with a revealing top or even a bikini that it reminds of how awful I look in comparison. I mean I literally just want to die, immediately. I feel like my puberty has fucked me over in every single way it could, and now I am just some kind of wannabe dreaming about things, life would be so much easier if I had the courage and understanding to just transition earlier. 

I have started lasering it this last week, but I can only get treated once each 2 months, and I am starting on P and E next week, if any of these things make a difference about this I don’t know what the fuck is going to happen with me.


Sorry if this post doesn’t make a lot of sense, I just needed to take this out of my head somehow.",asktransgender
I think i might be trans,"my sex is female, but i struggle to identify with any of the girls at school. 90% of the friends i have made at high school have been boys. I despise most things  ""girly""  (makeup, dresses, being ladylike, sports we do in Pe) and what is expected of me as a woman when i'm older. I identify more with boys and my male friends and only recently began to doubt my identity.

&amp;#x200B;

if there was a button to make me a boy, i like to think i would press it. BUT i am not sure if it's just a phase or i've just convinced myself id be happier as a boy.

&amp;#x200B;

i feel dissatisfied as a female and i thought i would talk to some people online before i talk to anyone IRL.

&amp;#x200B;

I began to doubt my self, i don't ""feel trapped"" like what i've heard from others, i dislike my boobs but not my genitals and i just feel i would be happier if i was viewed in others perspective as a boy rather as a girl. i only began to wonder about this about a week and a half ago. about 6 months ago i bought myself a binder because i disliked my chest, but those feelings went away and i felt unconfortable wearing it because my mum kept calling it a ""boob squasher"" ( I never told her i felt unconfortable about her joke and i don't think she meant badly either). My doubts have come in waves just over and over again and i just wanted to hear other peoples experiences. i have a friend whos only 15 and came out as trans and im scared im just trying to identify with him (Ftm) or copy or got inspired.

&amp;#x200B;

im also kinda scared to tell anyone then later realize its a phase, or for them not to believe me ( Especially my sister and mum)

The word trans or transgender sounds alien and wierd to describe myself with(Not that it might not fit but sounds too weird to be true)

&amp;#x200B;

if you have any thing to say please do.

thanks for reading,

Laur",asktransgender
Anyone need Gamer Friends?,"Ok so I don’t really have any gamer friends. I think it’d be cool to get some in the trans community. I play on PS4. I’m usually on most nights after 11pm EST and before 4PM. 
I play sports games, some shooters,.But what I’m really looking for is a Crew for when red dead redemptions online comes on in a few weeks.
If you’re interested PM me and I’ll give you my name.

NO CHASERS!!",asktransgender
How to Come out?,"So I'm 6 months hrt, and hormones have been really effective on me (already have b cups). I've been wearing girl clothes for this whole school year but generally on the more neutral side (like girl hoodies and stuff). Granted, my hair is still just growing and just starting to get down to the end of my face. I have been girl-mode everywhere except school.  


I'm a junior at my small university, where there are about 40 people in my major and class combo, so we all know each other.  I'm in a team of 8 to do a year long project for school, and I honestly have no idea how no one caught on. Some of the eight have caught me with a clip in my hair and they even saw my background for my computer (see: [https://imgur.com/a/798uADc](https://imgur.com/a/798uADc)). I figured it was getting close to the time that I honestly wouldn't be able to hide it and figured they were so fucking oblivious they wouldn't get it ever. We have a group slack so I decided it would be easier to come out there. I sent a message to everyone saying ""I'm a girl. My name is &lt;insert name&gt;. Deal with it."" only for them to seem even more dumbfounded. I'm scared to use my new voice with them, even though I know it passes 100%. I'm scared. How the fuck do I even come out anymore. The only thing I can think about is if I show up in a dress or skirt or something.",asktransgender
'Am I trans' like you've never seen it before!,"I'll summarise reasons for/against at the bottom :)

I'm a 17 year old female. I know a lot of this is gender roles, but stick with me!

As a kid, I wasn't super girly (never played with barbies, didn't like pink, instead had tea parties with toy animals).

When I was in year 6 (about 10-11), I started wanting to shop in the boy's section. This lasted about a year or two, then when I got to about year 8, I started wearing girly clothes. I was pretty insecure at this time about fitting in, but I don't think that's  why I stopped the boyish clothes as I don't remember missing them or not wanting to wear girly clothes. I also started questioning my sexuality.

I was depressed for a couple of years around 13/14/15, this got better in year 10, and sort of returned when I went to college as I was away from my friends and feeling lonely again.

In year9/ 10 I started feeling way more girly. I'd always been a huge fan on lana del rey, and I wanted to be like her a lot.

I'm currently 17, and my clothing ranges between very girly (knee high socks, tying ribbons in my hair) to casual (trackies and a jumper). My hairs long and I like it this way. I've never really had male friends.

&amp;#x200B;

My only issue is, that the gender questioning keeps coming up.

&amp;#x200B;

So, this is the third time I've questioned my gender, which is very weird for a cis girl I know! The first time was a couple of years ago, and lasted about a week. The second was in April this year, after I suddenly had the thought while tripping on mushrooms. It gave me a lot of anxiety, waking up at 4 in the morning and stuff. I couldn't concentrate on anything. I even dressed up as a boy real quickly and looking in the mirror made me feel nothing.. it didn't feel 'right' or whatever. Weirdly, the best relief I had was to dress up girly. I browsed this forum, but didn't really relate to any of the stories. Then I found some people on the internet talking about TOCD - trans-OCD. I have a history of OCD, and their description matched me better than any genuine trans story. This period lasted a couple of weeks. Both these times, the questioning started when I was watching a lot of RuPaul's Drag Race.

Now, in October, it's back again, although without so much anxiety.

&amp;#x200B;

SUMMARY:

Reasons I may be trans:

\-The fact I'm even questioning it. (however, I do have an obsessive mind, and since it's a question that can never truly be answered, it's possible my brain is just clinging to it)

\-I've always been confused about my sexuality. I know I like girls, and feel something towards boys, However, I don't get proper crushes.. more infatuations, even if I don't know them well. This only happens with girls. I wouldn't call myself a lesbian though, but maybe that's just internalised homophobia. I also don't connect with people very well, most people in my college think I'm a bit weird I think, and I feel demisexual. So maybe being trans is the missing piece?

\- As a kid, I remember sometimes playing a boy character in 'poptropica'.

\-Depression at the start of puberty. Wanting to wear boy's clothes, then changing when I got to a new school. I remember my friend saying 'Are you a tomboy?' and denying it strongly. idk what I was so offended about.

\- I remember when I was around 15 thinking it's best to be a girl, then boy, then man, then worst to be a woman. I've always been scared of getting older though.

\-Felt indifferent to people calling me pretty/beautiful. Not to sound conceited (trying tot be as honest as I can here) but I know I'm fairly good looking, so I just don't care what other's opinion is. Also I'm used to it, mainly from family.

&amp;#x200B;

Reasons I'm cis:

\- No dysphoria, even when at my most anxious questioning. In fact, almost the opposite; I feel uncomfortable with how wide my shoulders are, and still am unhappy with how boyish my body is in general (narrow hips/wide waist, flat chest, skinny thighs). Not because I want to be perceived attractive, but just because I'd prefer to have a girlish figure.

\-Being trans just makes no sense?? I'm happy as a girl and always have been, yeah my sexuality is a bit confused and I find it hard to connect to people but I may just be a weird, introverted person? I feel like I'm looking at transness as a magic pill that answers all my lifes problems.

\-Whenever I've fantasied sex, I've been a female (I know the reverse is a common thing with trans people). I've never had fantasies of being a boy - occasionally I've thought 'if i was a boy i'd wear that and look cool', but nothing serious. In my daydreams I'm always a girl - there was one summer, on a road trip, I'd imagine myself being lolita and dancing around.

\-I like being a girl! I've even written in my journal about how lovely female friendship is and stuff.

\-I've connected to female characters in books (I don't remember about male ones), and queer female love stories. Unless I'm actually a straight boy just fetishising them...?

\-I used to think about women doing steroids and I couldn't believe they'd willingly want to inject testosterone! Like it was very alien and weird to me.

&amp;#x200B;

Since being a teenager, I've felt a bit insecure about being masculine, not in how I behave, but my body. I remember constantly looking at my fingers  to see the ratio between index and ring (my rings are longer), as it shows how much testosterone you were exposed to as a fetus. My I feel weird about my chest because it looks like a boy chest with boobs stuck on, because I'm skinny with wide shoulders and small boobs. Sometimes when I'm doing something my brain just goes 'that's a boy hand doing the writing' and I hate it.

If the questioning just went away, I'd be perfectly happy. I've thought about the button test a million times, the answer is I don't know! I imagine if I woke up with a penis and a flat chest and hairy legs etc. and it just feels weird to think about? I don't think I'd hate it, but I don't long for it either. I actually shave my legs a lot, even in winter, cause I like being all soft and smooth.

I think maybe I'm bigender?? Or like Jung's animus - there's a boy I could have been, like a twin. I'm happy being a girl, I just want to know if the questioning will go away. I've read dysphoria never goes away, it comes back stronger each time. But this isn't dysphoria, it's just my brain questioning and being obsessive like it always does. Also, it's less strong this third time. I'm aware of non-dysphoric trans people, but I don't want to be a boy enough to transition.  I can imagine myself as a boy, but it's not something I long for.

But yeah, this is my story, I'm only posting because I haven't come across one like mine. Thanks so much for reading, I will appreciate anything you have to say!

&amp;#x200B;",asktransgender
I don't know if I can be trans anymore!,"I know I am transgender, I know that dont even have to think about it. The thing is I'm so alone, I have no friends, no family,and no one likes me enough to go on a date with me( especially when they find out I want to be a woman) and it hurts so much. I go to work, I go home that's all I do. I try and try to get people to hang out but it always falls apart at the last minute. At first I was okay life gets in the way, but every single time that cant be life right? It has to be me! I know my jokes are lame, and I'm not all that cool to hangout with, but I'm loyal and loving and kind. WHAT AM I DOING WRONG!! I have to be throwing off some kind of vibe that, I don't notice that's scaring everyone away. I spent 10years in my home because I was attacked and sexually assaulted and I feel more alone now than I ever did then. 

I want to die, but I know I can never take my own life!  Although if some outside force would happen, that threatened me I would let it happen. I even have a note on me at all times that says do not Resuscitate that I have signed. I don't know if it works that way, but I have it on me. I should also say that I don't want to die. I just feel like it has already happened.

I didn't choose to be trans, but I did choose to go down that path. Maybe god is real and this is my punishment to never have a true friend or to know love.

I had a question but between crying and writing this I forgot what it was

I can't take any more 
Kyrie the outcast",asktransgender
I'm sorry if I offend/trigger anyone because of this!!,"Hi! I got a question for y'all that might help me identify myself better. I'm so confused at the moment about my gender identity and I hope I don't sound naive or obnoxious through my question (let me know if I do please!)

I was born a female and for a while I thought I was a transmale, but now I'm having second thoughts. I want to get rid of my chest and I really do want a deeper and masculine voice. But I'm scared to get sex rearrangement surgery, and I find myself not really caring if people call me a she/he after experimenting. My name sounds feminine, but it doesn't really bother me either.

I don't want to hurt anyone by identifying as the wrong label, so I need an answer to this question asap. What do you guys think?",asktransgender
A friend of mine (female) asked a question regarding relationships with other trans teenagers.,"Hi all, I am a teenaged male. This happened this summer, around 3 and half months ago. A few of us were at someone's house, and eventually we got onto the topic of some LGBT stuff.

One girl in the group asked me whether I'd kiss an mtf girl once they told me that they were trans (assuming we had some romantic feelings towards each other). A few of the guys put forward their viewpoints, and then wanted to know about mine. Needless to say, I was quite nervous in case people jumped to conclusions too quickly. I didn't want to go too deeply at the time, but I answered as much as I was comfortable with.

I said that I would accept her for who she is, but at the same time, this would be new to me, and feel slightly weird and awkward. But that's okay (assuming they understand why someone might feel a bit weird at first). As long as we can both move forward and work to get past this feeling of awkwardness and help me to see that she's like any other girl, then that's all that matters. I would still care about her just as much.

What do you think about this? Is this a good way to go about it? I'd genuinely like to hear other people's take on this question, and what might be the best way to handle situations like these.

(And, yes it is *only* a scenario and not real life but either way, if it was to happen sometime in the future it's just something to think about.)",asktransgender
How long does hair recovery go on?,"My diffuse hair loss, which got pretty serious in my mid 20s, was one reason I thought transitioning was impossible, but I eventually decided to live my life.

I started HRT seventeen months ago, at 38. Within the first few months, lots and lots of hairs that were barely noticeable tiny blonde hairs turned into much more serious fuzz. Over the last year, that fuzz has gotten longer, and some of the hairs have turned into thick, dark, terminal hairs. I keep noticing, even right on my hairline, new grown up hairs coming in.

But, there's a long way to go, because my hairline was pretty far gone. Most of the time I wear a wide headband. I actually like my shoulder length curly hair. 

I'm wondering when it will reach ""okay this is what you'll have, without a transplant"" thickness. 

I started minoxidil and 1mg finasteride about 24mo ago, and my trans care doctor put me on spiro/e and 5mg/day fin seventeen months ago. My T dropped to female range quickly. I still use minoxidil once a day, and a dermaroller every few days. 

I still have thousands of those vellous hairs. They're longer than they were when I first noticed them growing, but only a fraction have turned terminal. The top and back of my head is so much thicker than two years ago, but still too thin to have a normal hairstyle.

How long will this recovery process keep going? If those ""long fuzz"" hairs turn terminal, I could have a hairline again someday.

Have any of you been at this point, and continued seeing regrowth well past a year into HRT?",asktransgender
I went in for a consultation for laser and they said the price was going to be the same everywhere.,"I went in for a consultation for laser for my face, but they said it was going to be $8,400, but she got me a deal for $3,800. She said I wasn't going to be able to get a better price anywhere and that everybody charges this price.

What price did you pay?

Edit: ok, apparently ideal image is bullshit, I found places on Groupon here for $250 for 6 treatments. Thanks everyone!",asktransgender
dealing with narrow/high iliac crests and iliac furrows,"i have the classic male ideal apollo's belt/prominent iliac furrow due to narrow and high-set hips. it is extremely distressing most of the day and feels like i have them tied tightly with a binder. this is despite having been on hormones for several years (i was much too old to get any structural changes) and having done almost zero exercise for this time. it goes from bad early in the day to horrible later as my stomach fills up. 

do there exist any surgeries or medications (experimentalness or riskiness is no concern) that can alleviate this problem at least in appearance if not inherently? gaining or losing weight does nothing as there is no fat that grows over the offending area ([highlighted on this male model](https://i.imgur.com/urG2L2C.jpg). as far as i know fat transfer cannot make this area appear natural.

please don't tell me this is normal or looks fine, it is not and does not unless you are a man (yes i am aware that top tier female athletes may have something similar but it is not the same and i am not a top tier athlete). and please don't condescend if you started hrt young or had naturally wide hips

 ",asktransgender
I don't feel natural,"and I think it's held me back from embracing life, or myself, for years now. every since I began my transition, I have been in a process of accepting myself for what I need and who I want to be, even when I've felt like I was sure of things, I continue to re-think, explore, and learn about myself, which has been nice.

though today, I was looking through my old toys from childhood, some with my birth name on them. it reminds me of being care-free and okay with myself as I was. I was really into dinosaurs and monsters, my mom would build Zoids with me. I liked ""boy"" stuff and it was okay. It still is okay, but now it feels filtered through a different lens. the same with my name. it was simply that, my name, no other connotations.

I guess I just want to be ""me"". I don't think it's healthy or wise to give up everything I've learned about myself, my needs and my femininity, my identity. but I can't shake the feeling of wanting to be naturally female, whatever that means. I want to have a period, but I never will. my body feels out-of-sync and hormones only do so much. 

I don't feel depressed, I am just not sure where my life's journey is headed, and how I will remedy my identity with my body, and those with my life's experiences. I feel lost. 

what am I to do?",asktransgender
Anyone else start loving to eat way more after starting spiro?,"I'm a few months into Spiro (I've been on E for almost two years) and like suddenly eating is like, fucking amazing. Like almost brings me to tears sometimes. Especially chocolate. Anyone else experience this and if so do you know why?",asktransgender
searching for a particular webcomic w/trans characters,"hey all! 

a while back I started reading a really beautiful webcomic with several trans characters, but now I can't remember the title so I can't find it again. it was done in a really gorgeous watercolor style and had a non-linear, chapter-based story tied to various objects. the setting was either slightly futuristic or hinged on magical realism, and people could catch a degenerative condition where they'd lose all their memories and sort of fade away into ghosts of their former selves and be blank silhouettes. one of the main characters was a transfeminine nonbinary person searching for the owner of several mementos to, iirc, save her neighbor from that same fate. i have the worst memory for characters' names so i'm totally lost trying to find it! it's currently unfinished and i wanted to check up on it again. let me know if it rings a bell! ",asktransgender
Bigender....or something,"After puberty and throughout high school I knew I didn't want to be a girl and had dysphoria so I assumed I was a trans guy. Though I feel best looking masculine and dressing in men's clothes I don't really want to become a MAN, if that makes sense. I don't have much bottom dysphoria, I don't try to hide feminine aspects of myself, etc. I just feel so weird sometimes. I look butch but my mannerisms and really everything about me is 50% masc and 50% fem. I am encountering the same anxiety I felt thinking about becoming a girl, when I think about transitioning to a guy. I want to go on T and was on T briefly before. It helped a lot. But I don't want to just switch and become a normal guy. I'm bisexual, and I feel strange about that too

TLDR: I feel in the middle of the spectrum and I'm most comfortable there but I feel pressure from society and the stereotypical trans narrative to pick a side. So I've settled for being a guy but that doesn't feel right either. I just feel trapped by my gender identity and don't know how to move forward. I'm slowly coming out full time but it's hard because I can't just say I want to be a guy...It's more nuanced than that. ",asktransgender
Can I epilate my entire body?,Is that reasonable? Or would it be better to just wax? I just imagine waxing is way more expensive.,asktransgender
I’m so scared and I still have no idea what I should do,"I finally realized that I’m trans a few months ago and I really want to begin to transition but I have no idea what to do, like should I go to my doctor or do I need to see a therapist or something? Also when would it be a good time to tell my family and friends because I would really like to hold off for as long as possible but if I need to see a therapist I’d have to tell them why. Ugh I have no fucking idea of what I’m doing and I’m so scared of what’s to come

I’m sorry if this sounds whiney I’m just so lost",asktransgender
My 16 year child just came out as trans and I'm trying to understand.,"I want to say first that I am a proponent of trans rights and am bisexual myself, so I know something of what it is not be part of the accepted standard demographic. I've had a couple of trans friends in my life and heard their stories, but it's different when it's your own child, and I wasn't really prepared for that. I also want to say that my child and I have always had a really close relationship, even to this day.

It's hard for me to relate because even though I've had to struggle with things like my own sexuality, and even struggled with issues of gender and what it means, I never once wanted my body to be different. My question for trans people in this thread is in what ways did your parent or important adult in your life connect with you? Did you ever feel like they had an understanding of what was going on with you or could relate to your struggle? Or was that even necessary to have to relate, and loving you was enough? What do you wish they would have done more or less of to help you?

My son has always been my shining star in my life. I just love him so much, I'll do anything for him. So anything I can do to help this transition from male into female easier for him I want to do. I just really don't want to fall down on the mom job by not even being able to understand what's happening.",asktransgender
How can I not feel discouraged by the accomplishments of others?,"Hello,

I'm lurking here since a long time ago and have a question.

I'm on HRT since 8 months, but feel like I made no progress at all.

That is in part due to a mental Disability, Lazyness I guess, fear and the reason I made this post.

I'm subscribed to a Gaming youtuber, who is a Trans girl and she is everything I ever wanted to be.

Pretty, voice passes 100%, can Cosplay and just seems Happy with her life.

Now my Problem is, that I feel like I will never be able to reach this point, and now everything positive I see reminds me of that fact.

My Mother always says I'm going to be really pretty, especially after losing all this excess Weight I have ( I\`m around280 pounds), but I just can't see it. Is she just lying to make me feel better?

I am happy for all the People, who experience positive things in their Life, but I just can't help, but feel jealous, because I feel it's impossible for me.

&amp;#x200B;

Sorry for my ranting.",asktransgender
"Stumbled upon this video, thought it was worth sharing",https://youtu.be/yCxqdhZkxCo,asktransgender
Any Wardrobe Suggestions?,"Hoya!

&amp;#x200B;

I'm trying to kinda expand my wardrobe and I wanted to see if there's anything I should look at that might be cool to add to it. I'm a 17 MTF that hasn't come out publicly yet, so it's kinda just around the house stuff, but it makes me feel soooooo much better to be wearing female clothes rather than male clothes. So far I've got a black skirt, a pair of combat boots, a few pairs of skinny jeans, a pink flannel and a few shirts and such. I'm planning on getting a few pairs of boots and some nice sneakers, but other than that, I have no idea where I want to go next. Any help??

&amp;#x200B;

Thanks :D",asktransgender
My family says I'm transgendered,"So I've been questioning my Gender, haven't told my family, but apparently my mom thinks I'm trans. I dont want to be. But cis people never question their gender. And parents don't believe things like that without proof of some sort.  So I guess i'm trans now",asktransgender
What can I expect from my dosage?,I just recently started hrt with my doctor giving me 25mg spiro twice a day and 2mg of estriadol once a day. I’ve seen a lot of people starting at a lot higher dosages and I don’t know if I am to expect much from just this. ,asktransgender
Grammar discussion: transgenderism,"Based on an earlier post about using transgender as a noun or transgendered, it made me think about how to discuss the concept of people being trans. “Transgenderism” is usually how it comes up in discussions and makes the most grammatical sense. But every time I see it, it is always followed by transphobic garbage.
Tl;dr - What are alternative words or phrasing to use?",asktransgender
Is it easier to pass if you an asian?,"17,mtf, pre hrt. I'm kind of worry about how well im gonna pass as a female and one of my friend said, ""you have an Asian face, you gonna pass easily"" It's true that I am Asian and I do have some neoteny on my face but I'm just worry if I gonna have a hard time to pass or not",asktransgender
Mom offered laser hair removal and I don’t know what to do.,"To give some context I’m 16 years old, out to both my parents, they are not supportive but my mom tries to. 

Ok so basically my mom hasn’t really shown any support towards me. I feel this happens mostly because of my dad. That aside recently she’s been trying to show off her support i guess, she has sent me confusing images that support trans girls indirectly but hasn’t said anything about them. A few days ago i was having lunch with her, she knows I despise my leg hair fortunately she lets me shave it, and while we were having lunch out of nowhere she says I found an offer for $500 for 6-10 sessions of laser removal at this point i just froze, I didn’t know what to say or what to think, all that happened was that when being presented something that would be permanent i got scared and immediately began to doubt myself and i have been questioning myself since that happened and I’m very confused about my reaction... I should’ve been excited and should’ve said yes right? Like it just makes me feel like I’m making all this up for not accepting her offer and i don’t know what to do.",asktransgender
Tip! Just found out you can mark photos as hidden on iPhones!,"I found out recently that you can add photos on iPhones to a hidden folder that removes them from all other albums! One of the stressors for me as someone who’s not out is showing photos of myself dressed when scrolling through photos I want to show people on my phone. 


This has been super useful in ensuring that I don’t accidentally scroll through private photos of myself when showing other pictures to people.",asktransgender
Chronic illness and transition questions,"It's been pretty clear now for almost a year that I'm dealing with gender dysphoria. I currently live with my parents and so, when they are crashed out for the night, I put on a dress. I've read that anthology TO MY TRANS SISTERS and was really engaged by it, which says something considering how I usually won't make it past the first 50 pages of anything.

Ah, but here is the rub. I am chronically ill with neurological issues. I have either bipolar or anxiety disorder of some sort, depending on the diagnosing physician. I take a few different daily meds.

So my question is whether transition would cause further aggravation to those issues or alternatively alleviate them. Anyone have experience with this?",asktransgender
Came out to more of my family. My Identical twin has been making it really weird,"Ok long story short. Ive been coming out to more and more family this year. The family is mixed on reactions. I recently came out to my identical twin. I was fully expecting him to say he doesnt understand. I thought he would tell me he isnt this way. The first reply I got was him being unable to understand how we could be identical twins and both not be trans. Honestly, I liked that response. The last thing I ever wanted was for him to tell me he was the same. I wouldn't want anyone to go through what Ive been through, so I was relieved. However, I recently received a large letter from him explaining how hes been dealing with the same feelings his entire life. Honestly is strange how similar our life has been. Btw, it should be noted that we are not close, do different things, and have never really talked to each other our entire life. On the outside we look way different. So if anyone is questioning a biological component , this experience has been quite affirming. The problem is, he tells me he has coped and found a way to live with it. He doesnt feel like acting on those feelings is the right choice and is very critical of it. Its scary because this is where i was in my opinion years ago. I thought I had gotten over it. Now I fear that his coming out will invalidate me with on the fence family members, Because now all they have to say is, "" Your brother is dealing with it. why arent you?"" Its hard because I know I am far more on top of dealing with my problems. Therapy, doctors, and support groups are weekly activities and hes never seeked help from anyone. how to I deal with this. How do I defend myself, when I know for a fact I am much farther along in my acceptance but my mirror image feels like he is?",asktransgender
I came out to 70 people yesterday,"Yesterday I came out to a group of like 70 people. Granted they were mostly queer people so the pressure was lowered but still. I’ve probably only told 10 people before yesterday.
We were at a meeting regarding the new New York Times article that just came out and after the presentation a mic was passed around for people to say any thoughts they had. Initially we all had to go around the room and say our name and pronouns and I went with male ones but halfway through the passing around of the mic I decided to tell everyone while shaking and almost crying; “I’ve had a diagnosable anxiety disorder since 4th grade. I’ve been depressed since 6th grade. I’ve been dissociating for 5 years. This is what a closeted  trans woman looks like. I know I seem like a guy but I don’t feel like it. So yes it sucks what this administration is doing, but at least this is a sign there is some real progress is being because now I understand why I have felt awful my entire life. And I would not have figured it out if not for the recent increase in trans visibility. Just because you think you know someone doesn’t mean you necessarily do. If trans people weren’t so visible I would have just bottled everything up until 80 or ended up killing my self. This is why this stuff is important”.  And I made some people cry and like 10 people came up and asked to give me a hug afterwords.

Oh my god so many feelings. I’m still in complete disbelief I was able to say that to everybody. I’m still not completely out to myself; I still consistently say “I think I’m trans” rather than “I am a trans woman”,  but here I was saying it to a crowd of 70 strangers and classmates. Wow this is cool. I feel alive.",asktransgender
How bad is not drinking water?,"Hello!
So I've been in school since August and I've never used the bathroom. So they're separated by gender and not only are the male ones absolutely disgusting, haha, but also using bathrooms is just a real dysphoric experience. To pull this off, though, I hardly drink any water in school besides gym class, and when it's the weekend I realise just how much want I drink and how many times I go the the bathroom. My main question is: *is not drinking much water unhealthy for me?*",asktransgender
Daaaaamn,"I just proposed to my girlfriend, she said yes and im starting Hrt next monday. This is the best gig i ever played or best day if my life. 







P.S. im drunk. Please don't judge me. XD",asktransgender
"My doctor said that I should keep estrodial under my tongue for 30 min, it normally dissolves before then, is this okay or is there something I should do to make sure it dissolves slower?",,asktransgender
Where do you go to meet people?,I'm single and have been for a while and I have considered using apps and websites but being trans makes me very nervous about that. What do you all do to meet people? How can I ensure my safety in doing this?,asktransgender
"For Montrealers, Where did you train your voice to sound more feminine?","I live in the Montreal area and I don't know where I can find voice training to make my voice sound passable.

I'm going to be put on HRT very very soon and I want to work on my voice.
My voice at the moment is very very deep.

Example: https://i.imgur.com/D2UzA1w.png
Like very deep.

Does anyone also living in the Montreal area know where I can find proper voice training?",asktransgender
Feeling weird about 'male' mental fixations and habits?,"Hey, so I'm in the whole aaaaaa stage of questioning, and I've finally been admitting that there might well be good reason to believe I'm trans. One thing that still unsettles me, though, is how characteristically 'male' a lot of my insecurities and mental worries have been in the past (and even are now?). 

For example, after puberty, when my issues of depersonalisation, depression, anxiety etc hit, I found myself fixating a lot on, well, manliness (I'm AMAB) as a positive source of self-improvement, etc (I actually managed embody those manly traits pretty well as of late too, and even then it didn't really feel real). Men and male figures were who I largely aspired to, identified myself as wanting to be, and so on- all while horribly depressed, etc. Similarly, if I had a girlfriend who made out with another girl, I'd feel hurt, but not as hurt as if she made out with a guy. Another example's kinda subconsciously 'othering' women to some extent- whereas I intuitively see most guys for what they do and say, it's hard not to see girls as Being Female before anything else. 

It's just little, 'typically male' mental habits like that that really unsettle me, because they make me feel like maybe that's just what I am, and all of this possibly-dysphoria's just me, or some mental illness's symptoms misinterpreted. And they don't unsettle me just because they're toxic habits in themselves- although that plays a part- but specifically because they're so gendered toward the male end of the spectrum. But on the other hand, I guess it could be social conditioning- I've thought of myself as male without any alternative for a long time now, after all. I don't know.  And the fact that it does unsettle me doesn't seem like a hugely cis quality? Like, why would I care about that if I were a guy?

Does any of that make sense, and point towards like, possibly not being trans, or am I just being stupid and confusing learned emotional habits with essential traits? (I'm probably just being stupid, but I could really use some thoughts on this one).",asktransgender
Muffing (Not Muffins),"Okay so I (F 20) remember watching a vid on muffing years ago during the beginning of high school. Tucking seemed so so scary and made me incredibly uncomfortable. But once I got a year into college, tucking became hella easy.

Later on, after taking hormones for 1.5 yrs, I had to reinvent pleasure for myself since my body and mind are clearer and pleasure is now more complex. So I've started muffing just a week ago and... WOW! 

I've never felt pleasure, excitement, and the raw sexual energy it brings my body. I finish with a sensation of being cleansed and weighing nothing. But it also leaves me with slight pain.

So my question is: Can muffing cause a hernia or real damage if I'm being careful? If so, I can find other substitutes because I'm worried about causing real damage.",asktransgender
This is old but not clarify.,As a MTF transgender when should we be concern with covering breasts?,asktransgender
"Transgender Art Show Project, Pictures needed, Can anyone help a sister out?"," Hi, so I'm a trans-woman who is also a photographer and a digital artist, and in two months I'm presenting a piece in an art show, the theme for the show is ""Pictures that matter"". I didn't know what to make at first until the news of Trump trying to erase trans people like me broke last Sunday. I then knew what pictures mattered, I knew we mattered, and that we needed to show it. So I'm trying to collect and put together into a collage a collection of pictures representing the transgender experience. Any pictures, pre-transition pictures too as I would like to create a before and after image for the collage, pictures of loved ones who passed on due to societal injustice towards them which ended in tragedy, pictures with meaning, and of course pictures during and after transition. Also if possible and theirs a story behind the picture, PLEASE TELL IT! I know this is probably not the best thing to ask a bunch of strangers on the internet, but this is where our community lives, I want to create a piece that will move people and change people's minds about us, I WANT TO HELP END TRANSPHOBIA , so? Does anyone wanna help a sister out? ",asktransgender
ftm androgel dose question,"Hello everyone!  
So I've started on androgel pump 1.62% for transitioning but was only prescribed 1 pump per day (without any blood work taken or looked at). Before I started I was snooping around reddit because I had some apprehensions about doing gel instead of taking T-shots. I read somewhere that it was a really low dose and so when I started applying it I did 2 pumps everyday for the past month and been pretty happy with the results. But looking back at it now, maybe it was a bad idea to do that? I'm not sure if I should've made that decision on my own because there might have been a reason for me to start with one pump.. Does anyone else use androgel? How many pumps do you apply? I know it's different for everyone but I want to know about other's experiences with it.",asktransgender
So I came out on facebook,"I officially came out by informing everyone I'm trans, and changing my profile picture to me with makeup and a dress on. Is it normal that even though the response was overwhelmingly positive I'm still terrified people don't accept me? Literally the people that wouldn't accept me were blocked before I even made the announcement, yet I'm still terrified for some reason. Sorry for the long post ❤",asktransgender
"i cant live my life, being mid-transition is shit, being post-puberty is shit, everything is shit. how do i do things when i cant leave the house","how do you do it   


rant about my shitty situation thats really not any worse than most peoples:

my face is ugly and male. my voice is male. makeup wont fix bones (not sufficiently).  i need to get a job but i cant face even going to a restaurant with family without feeling like everyones staring at me.  i dont want to go back to wearing male clothes, and i dress androgynously because wearing female clothes while not passing doesnt work for me.  ive literally wasted 3 years of my life leeching off my parents and being a recluse (from 21 to 24 years old).  i cant face real life when i cant even face the reflection.   i guess i just dont want to try.   i seek constant external validation because i cant be confident in any of my own decisions--even outside of feeling trans.  im vegan yet i struggle to stay true to it, and i dont proudly order vegan food, i meekly ask for it as if to say ""do you accept me for being vegan?"" to the waiter (even when they have vegan options on the menu). its basically the same for my transness, meekly hoping people will accept me, or better yet, not notice my transness at all--meaning they'd see me as a girl and i'd pass, not that they'd see me as a guy and disregard any attempts to show them otherwise, cuz that feels shitty too.     


i need to get a job and yet even stepping in the shower is a struggle.  i have weekly general therapy and another therapy with my gender therapist. i need to bank sperm before i can go back on hormones (which they fricking gatekept me from but long story), which means i need to get a job first.   


why does everything have to be so out of order. literally everything would be fixed if i had come out prepuberty, and instead, i have to suffer MORE for staying closeted.   its like mandatory ""real life"" treatment without it being mandated.  i cant stand the thought of just living as a guy again till i make enough money for surgery, but then again, thats probably how people see me anyways, so i guess fuck it. ",asktransgender
I keep missing doses...,"I just recently got moved up to a higher dose of both estrogen and spiro. I’m really excited because I’ve seen quite a bit of progress in a relatively short time. However, I regularly miss one or two doses a week, and it’s so frustrating. I have alarms set, a friend with alarms set who reminds me, and I have a pill box to remind me as well. Despite that, there always seems to be something that happens that makes me forget. This morning, for example, I had to leave an hour early for work, and my friend had to leave 3 hours earlier than normal for work. I realized about halfway there (in a 30 minute commute) that I had forgotten to take it, and won’t be home until about 7pm tonight. How can I stop missing because of small variations in my schedule? I’ve been lax about my schedule of taking at 9am and 9pm, but should I scrap that altogether and just take immediately after I wake up and before I go to bed?",asktransgender
Friends in NYC needed!,Is anyone here from the NYC area?  I started my transition about a year ago and stopped.  Starting up again.  Trying to find my place in this world and having a very difficult time doing it.   Life would be a helluva lot easier with friends to hang out with and someone to talk to.  Is anyone out there?  :(  ,asktransgender
31 Days Until SRS (MTF) and Not at Target Weight: How Fucked Am I?,"Hi all,

&amp;#x200B;

Getting my SRS done very soon (hopefully) and I'm doing it under Loren Schecter. Im 6'2"" and 268, my target goal is 250. Don't drink, don't smoke cigarettes. (I'm not sure what other info I need to give)

&amp;#x200B;

Title? Thanks everyone ;;;

Edit: almost 26 if age is relevant",asktransgender
Looking for friends! HMU on kik,"Hiii lovelies.. looking for more friends going through the same experiences as me, to just chill or talk to online. My kik name is (doodlesmithe) feel free to ask me anything,  really open and looking to bond! ",asktransgender
It's hard to throw away some of my old clothes.,"Although I know I'll never wear most of my old clothes ever again, I still feel as if I'm throwing away a very important part of myself. Of who I were before! I feel like I'm mourning the loss of someone. I miss my old self and I wish I could get her back, but I'm not her anymore...

It's really not that long ago since I would buy anything hippie and bohemian like outfits I could find, and my closet were an explosiaon of colours. Flowers, rainbows and cute kittens. I were born in 84 but I feel very nostalgic for some reason towards the 60s, 70s and the hippie movement. So I've been really into clothes like that for many years. My whole life I've never felt uncomfortable with the clothes that I owned. And now, well not so long ago, I'm starting to feel uncomfortable in my tunics, skirts, shirts and tops with perls and beads on! Why now?!

I guess it comes with the dysphoria, but it really sucks!

I don't really have any memories of when it started. But I doubt that my discomfort with my body have been going on that long. All I have are something I wrote about feeling uncomfortable with my female body, ""mai 7, 2018."" But I know from the few memories I have that I did not like playing the role of the mother when we in the kindergarten played family. It felt really awkward and wrong sitting with a baby doll on my lap, pretending to breast feed it. So I never touched the doll. I always used to be the family dog or something. And in elementary school I rather be a male character when we played something. I remember when I played ""Power Rangers"" in the backyard with the neighbour boy we always fought over which of the male characters to be. I remember feeling so powerful when I did a flying kick through the air as one of the ""Power Ranger"" boys. And I of course always had to be ""Throttle"" the boy mouse from ""Biker Mice from Mars."" I'd be so upset if anybody else wanted to be him. Then came years and years of BJD boy character collectibles, creating male characters and in the sims games. And anime and manga (BL)  gay related series.

But I never ever felt anything wrong about the body I were born with. So you can only imagine how frustrating it is to feel like this now.

I don't know what to believe. And it's like the dysphoria I struggle with now does not make any sense to me, even though I have a couple of things I remember from when I were younger.  I just don't understand how it can come like that so late in life???

&amp;#x200B;

&amp;#x200B;",asktransgender
How do I differentiate between fear and not wanting to transition?,"I don't even know what I feel anymore. Before HRT (7 months in) I was so much sure that I'm trans, but here I'm and I'm doubting EVERY single day of my transition. 

At the beginning I was so excited about each and every change that my transition brought, but now I just kinda feel neutral about it. Oh and regarding my breasts, they grew up quite a lot and now I'm hyperconscious of them and feel even slightly negatively about their size.

On some days I rather look like a girl who's trying super hard to look like a man and I can't interpret how I feel about it. Yes I still look obviously look like 100% AMAB, but I believe that within a few months that won't be true.

Only thing that transition helped me realize is that I identify either with guys who are super femme or with tomboy girls who can kick ass.

Am I just scared that I'm losing my old male shell? I feel like trans girl would be super excited about these things and not question herself every single day.",asktransgender
Parent of newly out trans child(12),"Sorry if this isnt the right place,if not could you point me in the right direction?thanks.

I’m very new to all this, only found out less than a month ago so I’m still learning as I go. A few months ago my child (12) came out as trans to their mother (were not together but on good terms) and still hasn’t come out to me but I kind of put the pieces together... Today my child was beaten up by people they used to call their friends...I don’t really have a question or anything and to be honest I don’t even know why I’m posting this...maybe I just need to know things will get better for my child and it won’t be so hard",asktransgender
My husband of 2 years told me this week he thinks he is trans,"I've been trying to process this for the last few days, but I am struggling. I am trying to be supportive of my husband, but this is all so new and unexpected. I feel like it's happening so fast. I feel like I am grieving. I love him, and I dont want to throw away the last 5 years we have spent together, but I'm just scared right now. I am not gay or bi, and I'm terrified i wont find him attractive anymore once he starts making all of these changes. Hes already talking different and completely shaved off his facial hair. I want so very much to support him, but I'm scared I will be pushing my own feelings to the side. I feel so lost. ",asktransgender
Am I too obsessed with wanting to transition?,"Every day, every ""he"" I hear feels like a needle poking at me and it reminds me that I'll never be what I want to. I feel ashamed for wanting this. For wanting to be a girl. But all I hear is how lazy I am and how much I'm not doing from my family, but I just don't have the energy to keep pretending to be somebody that I'm not. Feeling like I'm a failure and my parents would have been happier without me. I wish I could've just been a cis girl and not have any problems with it. I feel guilty and too much like a special snowflake for wanting to be myself. Is it really too much to ask for or am I a selfish snowflake and delusional for wanting this?",asktransgender
How can I know what's real?,"So, to start off with, 29 year old male who's been experiencing gender dysphoria on and off for the past 6 years or so. 5 years ago, I started to hallucinate and experience delusions, leading to a diagnosis of schizoaffective.

I'll keep this short and simple: how do I know if what I'm experiencing are actual trans thoughts or simply part of my own delusions or invasive thoughts?",asktransgender
Mourning My Old Self,"I recently showed some pictures of when I had long hair to people who don't know I'm trans. And they were said things like ""wow you looked so pretty"" ""woah you look really different"" etc.

It kind of upset me. I was really pretty. I'm curvy. Lot's of guys liked me. 

I don't want to be that person anymore. I couldn't *stand* being that person. But I miss her. I miss who I used to be when I was desirable and feminine... and ugh. And at the same time I'm so, so dysphoric. I desperately want to be masculine.

&amp;#x200B;

How did you let go of who you used to be?",asktransgender
How many of you grow out your hair before transitioning?,I know that sounds like a weird question but I want to know. I grow my hair out went I was 17 and I didn’t realised I was trans earlier this year. I grow out my hair because I want to look like a rockstar but deep down I grow it out because I am a woman. So do you grow out your hair before transitioning or not. Btw I not transitioning yet because I want to transition when I got my own place.,asktransgender
Anyone here done porn to make ends meet? How has it affected your life?,"I'm in a bad place financially right now and have been thinking about trying out different forms of sex work to make ends meet. I sent in an application the other day to a very well-known trans porn production company and received a response back saying they would like to hire me for a production.  

It's kinda nerve racking but I need the money and I don't have anything morally against it. I'm just wondering if it could come back to haunt me in the future? I don't think it'll bother me when I'm older, and I'm not concerned about a future spouse being upset by it.  

But obviously these are all things I can't know for sure until they happen in the future. So my question is to anyone out there that has done professional porn - do you regret it? Was it worth it? Would you have done things differently?  

Also, I'm thinking of becoming a nurse and was wondering if that's a field in which it's bad to have a history in sex work?

Thanks in advance. ",asktransgender
Why won't people shake my hand anymore?,"Something I've noticed over the last year and a half of womanhood, people won't shake my hand with any effort.

For example,  I bought a used car with my daughter Monday. We did introductions and the guy stuck his hand out to shake.  When I put mine in his hand,  he gave me the dead fish shake.  Like he was either afraid to hurt me or he didn't really want to touch me.  This happens all the time when meeting new people.  

Is this a woman thing or am I gross and untouchable? ",asktransgender
"Okay, about to confirm FFS with Cardenas. Here's my quote and photo. Thoughts?","By thoughts, I want to get your thoughts on this. Should I add anything, remove anything, or request focus elsewhere at all? I just want to make sure I don't get something I don't actually need.   


 \- Upper FFS Category:Forehead Bone Contouring - Includes Hairline Advancement and/or Eyebrow Lift if indicated for the patient.+US $ 3,960.00  
\- Mid FFS Category:Rhinoplasty - Applies to patients who have not had Rhinoplasty before.+US $ 3,100.00  
\- Lower FFS Category:Chin Augmentation - Includes Implant.+US $ 1,760.00  
\- Jaw Contouring - Bone shaving method.+US $ 2,750.00  
\- Tracheal Shave - Price if done with another procedure.+US $ 1,550.00  
\- Required Pre-Op Testing:Pre-Op Testing - Includes required cardiological exam &amp; blood test.+US $ 150.00  
\- Post-Op RX Medications:Post-Op Medications Package - First prescription filled upon hospital discharge.+US $ 250.00  
\- Accommodations:10 night service package with meals +10 night service for extra room (50% discount)+US $ 1,875.00  


**Total:US $ 15,395.00** 

&amp;#x200B;

My photos are here.  
[https://i.imgur.com/Pl6vYpIr.jpg](https://i.imgur.com/Pl6vYpIr.jpg)

[https://i.imgur.com/ZqFGdiEr.jpg](https://i.imgur.com/ZqFGdiEr.jpg)

[https://i.imgur.com/ZqFGdiEr.jpg](https://i.imgur.com/ZqFGdiEr.jpg)

[https://i.imgur.com/p9Dwkyrr.jpg](https://i.imgur.com/p9Dwkyrr.jpg)

[https://i.imgur.com/TzMGeeLr.jpg](https://i.imgur.com/TzMGeeLr.jpg)

[https://i.imgur.com/hKbDAUxr.jpg](https://i.imgur.com/hKbDAUxr.jpg)

[https://i.imgur.com/MCIWKyEr.jpg](https://i.imgur.com/MCIWKyEr.jpg)

&amp;#x200B;

Thank you alllll.",asktransgender
FFS or VFS; which one first?,"Hello everyone, 

&amp;#x200B;

I'm planning out a surgical roadmap and I've run into a snag. Regarding FFS and VFS does one take priority over the other in terms of adherence? In other words I'm worried that whatever I get first will be impacted by the second. This is probably a dumb fear to have, but I'd love to hear some opinions. 

&amp;#x200B;

Thanks!

Ann",asktransgender
Is /r/transgendercirclejerk Transphobic?,"I asked this before but since then it's looking more and more like it is indeed transphobic or at the very least has a transphobic element to it. ""Edginess"" and ""satire"" are now inuendos for hatred. So many people hide behind ""it's a joke"" to be able to get away with spreading hate. What do y'all think? Thems a buncha haters?",asktransgender
Looking back at my pre transition pictures I realize I was really unattractive. I didn’t know that then though. So am I unattractive now? I’m not sure anymore. 🙁,,asktransgender
What can I do to help my transgender friend feel supported?,"A very good friend of mine is recently transgender and is a she now. She's gotten a lot of backlash from her family and friends about this. She emailed me about this and said she was nervous to tell me. Based on context, I think she might be expecting transphobia from me as well. 

The truth is, I'm honestly not transphobic, even though I admittedly don't fully understand it. But I think everyone deserves happiness, and if this is her path, that's fine by me. So if you are transgender or know someone who is, what's the best thing you'd want a good friend to say or do to be supportive? I don't want to feel like I need to prove that I'm okay with her change and process, but I am supportive of what she's done. How do I help her understand that?",asktransgender
Weight and GCS (MTF),"So at this point I have no other milestones to hit for GCS. I need letters, insurance approval, a surgeon, and a date. However I do have an issue. My weight.

At my last doctor's appointment I was at 285lb. My previous research had shown that some doctors want you to be at most 220lb. I guess this makes sense since there risks go up with weight. I'm pretty sure I've gained weight since that doctor's appointment.

The trouble is that I'm having a hard time doing what I need to do in order to lose weight. I don't have the spoons half the time to properly prep healthy food or go to the gym. And I'm stressed from work and the political hellscape that is the US currently. And work also doesn't help with having time to get to the gym.

Am I basically screwed until I lose all that weight again? (I was 175lb when I started HRT.)",asktransgender
"I'm sick and tired of not having a vagina. I live in the US, and I'm pretty poor. How to cope??","Title. How do I cope with this. I can't have sex without feeling awful, I can't stand looking myself in the mirror, I hate having to tuck every day. 

HOW DO I SERIOUSLY GET OVER THIS. ",asktransgender
My mom is insisting that I don't come out to my grandma right now.,"So I just came out as a trans woman (AMAB) to my close family about a month ago, and my mom is insisting that I don't tell my grandma anytime soon, because she is 100% sure that it will devastate her, and cause a lot of grief, in addition to a lot of stress she is already going through. My mom has also insisted that when the time comes, she should be the one to come out for me, to ""ease"" my grandma into it. 

For context: my grandma has had several close relatives get very sick this year, and she has been taking the brunt of the emotional toll, taking charge of getting two of them care. She is 80.

This insistence from my mom makes me incredibly angry, especially cause it feels like she is trying to take over part of my transition, but I feel like she may have a point. I am 21, so I know I don't have to do what my mom says, but I don't want to hurt her or my grandma.

I'm supposed to see my grandma and my mom over Thanksgiving, and I told my mom that I would be willing to go in boymode then to stop her from cancelling the holiday for the family, but I really don't want to hide who I am like that.

Any advice? 

",asktransgender
Can we get a secret handshake for IRL or something?,"So I'm not out in public or anything yet, but for the past two or three weeks i've noticed a couple of people that I was at least 80% sure they were also trans.

Now I get that having people clock you is no fun and all, but can we get a secret wink, nod, hand wave, dance move or something that us fellow trans people can use to say ""hey you and I are trans and thats awesome"" but without having to put people on the spot or attracting attention?

It could even like a spy code where one could ask a question and if you answered it with the expected response. 

Thoughts?",asktransgender
Voice training to be even lower with T?,"Hey, so, um, i was thinking if there is a way I could train my voice when i start T (on Monday) to be lower. Not like voice acting kind of lower, I mean naturally lower with the help of... testosterone and.. training. Yes, i dont know how reddit works.",asktransgender
pickles,"Anybody else feels sick and gross by pickles? It's one of my food phobias, anybody know any better trans foods?",asktransgender
Name ideas/is Luca feminine enough?,"Hey everyone, my given name is Lucas so i’ve been trying to find a feminine version of Lucas. I’ve decided i like the sound of Luca the most (and its also the closest to lucas) but does it sound feminine enough to you? After researching, it seems like most see it as more of a boy name, but i think it sounds very feminine and nice. Also any other name ideas? Thanks so much, i have no one in my family or friend circle i can talk to about this.",asktransgender
is it normal to feel like you're faking being trans to get attention or be cool to people?,"I don't know if im trans or not, I'm essentially going through a list of reasons why i'm not trans and asking them here. I don't know i feel like im just faking my feelings or im tricking myself into thinking im trans. like im psyching myself into being a girl or something",asktransgender
"Girlfriend had GCS Monday, recovery questions","My girlfriend (30 years old, 7 years HRT MTF) had her Vaginoplasty performed at University of Utah hospital on Monday, she's supposed to be released tomorrow, but I'm concerned about a few things that the hospital seems rather blase about.

For one, they required her to begin a purge 36 hours in advance of the surgery, meaning from midnight on the 20th to surgery she had nothing but liquids and an entire container of miralax. Her last solid movement was right after beginning the purge, and only liquid since until Tuesday, at which they stopped completely. In the three days since, even though she's been eating solid foods during this time, she hasn't had any bowel activity. Worse, she can't eat because it feels like there's nowhere left for any of it to go. We're a bit concerned that her vaginal canal(which is still packed full btw) might be blocking intestinal movement, or damaged nerves in that area.

Does anyone who has had GCS have any wisdom to share? No nice way to ask this, how long after your surgery did it take for your first bowel movement?

**Edit** - she's been on miralax and sennakot in the hopes of opening up the flow, but nothing as yet. I'm mostly worried because attempts at force feeding herself have resulted in severe nausea at even the scent of food. As for the doctors, the nurses know, but I haven't seen any of the surgeon's beyond the plastic surgeon checking in every morning. Nurse is checking to see if anyone from the surgery team will be here tonight.

**Edit 2 -** She's home now. Currently trying to block our dog from hopping in her lap to say hello, but she's much more comfortable, and happier. 😁",asktransgender
Props to you Best Buy! Great experience changing name.,"I called 1-888-BEST-BUY today to change the name on my account and it went really well! All I had to do was tell the call center employee that I am transgender and send him a picture of my photo ID with my deadname, since I haven't done all that legal jazz yet with making my name legal. Just got off the phone 2 minutes ago and the system already has my current name. Couldn't have been more painless :)",asktransgender
"Trying to find information about joining the Royal Navy as trans, however I can't find any info, can anyone point me in the right direction please?","Hi! 
So I am transgender MtF, unfortunately due to family circumstances I have no chance of transitioning however I do have references from my gender psychologist that I am of sound mind and no history of mental illness. 

Just want to check my eligibility to join the navy as trans however I can't find the relevant information, if anyone can point me in the right direction I would be grateful!

Thank you if you help &lt;3 ",asktransgender
2 weeks in and i feel amazing,"I'm a bit sick and exam period is like right now so I'm stressed but I've never felt better mentally, damn

My dysphoria is nearly gone and easily ignorable, the ""I'm getting more and more masculine by the second"" anxiety is literally obliterated

I got a compliment that i looked younger :3

Also smells are all over the place. I can smell things from afar and i experienced smells i had never experienced before.

I literally smell sweet and not musky. I honestly expected to just smell less but i literally just started smelling fantastic.

And my sex drive feels less pushed. I don't feel a 'need' and that's very very relaxing

And i nearly cried 4 times already and my emotions feel super liberating but all over the place haha

I'm smiling just thinking about it and knowing that its just the start 

:) ",asktransgender
Confused on how to Vote for Trans Rights,"Hey, firstly please tell me if this post doesn't belong.

Secondly, as a Trans Ally in North Carolina and a first-time voter, I want to make sure to vote for people who support Trans Rights and won't infringe on them.

Any information is helpful, because I want to make sure my trans friends IRL are safe.",asktransgender
Does anyone else find passing a whole new obstacle? Anyone have advice?,"I found out I was passing at work when I showed my coworker pics from before I realized I was trans and she was so confused and surprised. AND I've been playing a game with a guy coworker to pass the time where we ask each other more and more prying questions, and today he asked me ""at what point do two women getting intimate consider what they've done to be sex"". I successfully bullshitted around the question but in my head I was like ""I have noooo IDEA!😬"". (Hopefully I will answer this question one day.. you know... for science:p)

So, I've entered a phase in my transition where people I've recently met think I'm cis, its flattering buuuut I'm back to feeling like I have a BIG secret I'm hiding. It can be uncomfortable because I don't want people to know my gender history but I also don't want to be treated differently for being trans, AND it's scary to think that if people do find out they might think that I've been lying to them. I think it will be easier when I have more of a history as myself because right now it feels like when I'm sharing things from my past I have to leave out a bunch of information.

Has anyone else felt this? Did it get easier/better?",asktransgender
Why do I feel like being trans is a bad thing?,"I just feel shameful about it. And like asking my family to make any accommodations for me is way too much. I just feel like it's something bad I shouldn't try to invoke anyone in.

Has anyone else felt like this? What do I do?",asktransgender
Am I transgender? Dealing with some doubt,"This may or may not be a long story so fair warning coming into this.  I'm just looking for advice atm.

So I've been more or less questioning my gender identity since junior year of high school.  I can see signs that I might've been trans earlier than that, but I can't tell if this is genuine evidence or me grasping at straws.  I've hated my body for a while now and I know hating your body doesn't necessarily means dysphoria, but whenever I imagine how I want to look I don't want to look like a handsome man but a pretty woman.  I've been envious of cis girls since high school for various reasons and I've spent hours in the past looking at pretty girls on my computer, being envious of their looks, and wishing I looked like them.

I currently attend a religious college (for financial aid reasons) and my parents are very transphobic.  So I' decided that I'll wait until I graduate college and become financially independant before starting any medical transitioning.  I'll graduate, get a job, move out, visit a doctor, go on HRT, and continue with my transition.  I've done minor things like wear nail polish, experiment with makeup, wear girl clothes when I'm alone, tuck, and wear a sports bra...I'm even going as Harley Quinn for Halloween (it's Halloween so at worst people will think it's a joke).  Nothing permanent as of yet.  Since coming out to a very close friend, I've been slowly embracing my trans status within the confines of the closet.

But recently I met another MTF trans woman who is in a very similar position as I am.  We both attend the same school and we both haven't started medically transitioning as of yet.  She, however, has come out to her parents and the school faculty knows she's trans and on campus.  She is currently staying in the boys dorm (for now) but in her own room to herself.  She even plans on having a doctor visit in a few months and starting HRT while attending college.

After we had a conversation recently about our similar experiences, she told me that she doesn't know how I could handle experiencing dysphoria for a few more years without transitioning since she almost committed suicide in high school and is desperate for her HRT.  I was suicidal in high school too, but I don't even remember if dysphoria had anything to do with that.  And since coming to my college and making great friends through my campus's GSA (I am openly bisexual), I haven't had any suicidal thoughts.  I still think I experience dysphoria (not to mention depression and anxiety but that's unrelated...I think?...maybe?  idk...), at least I still wish I was a girl, but it almost seems as though her dysphoria is worse than mine or maybe I don't actually have dysphoria to begin with?  I don't know.  I honestly don't want to be a man anymore.  If I could trust my parents with this information, I would've started transitioning a long time ago.  I wouldn't call my current position ideal (not by a LONG shot), but if I feel safer (not necessarily more comfortable) waiting until I'm financially independant to transition rather than desperately going after HRT like my life depends on it, do I even have dysphoria?",asktransgender
How prevalent is (wanting) bottom surgery in trans men vs trans women?,"Since I'm a transgirl who is pretty content with her junk, I was trying to find out how common that is, but I found this statistic which just baffled me: ""About 14 percent of trans women and 72 percent of trans men said they don't ever want full genital construction surgery.""

Do these numbers seem right - is the difference really that stark? Is it because of how developed the different surgeries are? Or am I missing something?

The article: https://www.vox.com/cards/transgender-myths-fiction-facts/myth-4-all-trans-people-medically-transition

(btw I'm also interested in enby perspectives, just didn't know how to integrate that into the question)",asktransgender
Weekly Group Hug Thread 267,"~~Who’s got two thumbs, Vodka for days, and a T-90MS?~~

[Poll](https://linkto.run/p/WIL65ZQE)

How was everyone’s week?",asktransgender
"I really enjoy writing my own poetry. In light of this new memo from the U.S. Government, I'd like to share with you all the one I wrote this morning.","I won't be erased as I'm blowing away in dust

For me to be me it took so much trust

From hospital trips to skin and knife lust

I saw a man and spit on myself in disgust

&amp;#x200B;

I won't be erased but I'm feeling apprehensive

Gotta burn this beard off but its so damn expensive

Internalized transphobia leaving me hypertensive

As I try to unwind while on a permanent offensive

&amp;#x200B;

I won't be erased because you've made me so strong

We'll turn your latest agenda into your swan song

This is my country and it's where I belong

Fuck what you say, this has been my gender all along",asktransgender
Changes in penis size,Ok so I'm 22 days on HRT and it's way smaller when I'm soft and my dick bends to the left when I've got a semi. Is it supposed to change this early?,asktransgender
Egg Donation for Tran Men?,"I've been considering donating eggs for a bit. I mean, I don't want them, but since I'm trying to stay closeted at least a bit more I won't be ripping that shit out for a while, so I figure I might as well get something out of having them. I do know the process involves hormone injections. I'm not on hrt currently, but I'm worried that this might make things harder when I want t later. I guess what I'm getting at is what does this procedure look like from the pov of a trans man?

EDIT: Here's a list of medications used: [https://www.conceiveabilities.com/egg-donors/egg-donor-medications](https://www.conceiveabilities.com/egg-donors/egg-donor-medications)",asktransgender
"Some questions -warning, perhaps bit long","\-will probably be long, probably a TL;DR below.-Also I'm not natively English so sorry if I make some mistakes in my grammar here and there.

&amp;#x200B;

\-*Introduction*Hello,First of, an introduction. I'm 16yo AMAB, but lately I've been thinking about things. Things that someone maybe could help me find out. Now I know most will probably say something along the lines of ""It's your own journey to explore/Ponder on that yourself, it's about you after all"" but what i want is someone to think *along* with me, not to think *for* me. So now let me recite that one question that everyone has probably heard here ""Am i transgender?"".

&amp;#x200B;

\-*the basics*So let's try to start from the beginning of my ""journey"". It all started around 1.5 years ago, what started? Well, questioning myself of course. The reason what started it, I've got no clue. Due to the discussion of politics with my friend? Perhaps, but it made my everyday life have a different outlook on a lot of things. For example, I've become more liberal than i used to be, I am now trying to  grow my hair out, trying to look like a *girl.* Yeah, you all know by now ""oh, he wants to look like a girl"" and yes, I'd like that, more so than me being a manly man. but here is one of my major question **""the statement: ""you're a girl of you want to be one"" how does that work?""**

&amp;#x200B;

\-*reflection on my past self*

It's weird, Reflecting back on past moment, but i remember this one really vivid dream, It's where I was in my old room, and it wasn't like a dream where you get to walk around. It was just me, in my bed, comfortably covered in a blanket. But always in this dream (which I had multiple times when I was younger) there were girls? I don't know, but some people putting female clothes on me. Was this dream just a giant foreshadow of what is now the questioning of myself? So now for this question, **""Is being transgender neurologically wired into our being, and does it affect people on a subconscious level, even if they don't know they are trans?""** Now continuing on, my past self was bullied for most of my elementary school days, throughout grade 4 to mid-8 (this is in Dutch education so american equivalent would be 2nd grade to mid-6th) so for 4 years I've been bullied. Would this in any way, shape of form, leave a neurological ""scar"" that could amplify certain feelings? But also, have any of you just sat somewhere and just WISHED you wanted to be a girl, even praying to god although you're atheistic, and also trying different languages just to be safe, just me right. A bit nsfw here, but almost every (biological) guy has probably tried this at least once. Where you tuck your penis between your legs and look at yourself in a mirror and go like ""haha, I'm a girl"". Well when I did it when I was younger I would get \*cough\* ""excited"" looking at that reflection, that's probably not what everyone doing that feels like, do they now.

&amp;#x200B;

\-*Side note*

Now not so much about me, but about science and understanding, I've occasionally stumbled across some papers about transgenderism and I have of course heard about the term ""autogynephilia"". But I've heard a lot of people saying it's false, so could anyone provide me with an explanation/debunking the meaning of that word, or just provide some papers that I can read.

\-*Internet*While this may seems controversial in the eyes of some, my curiosity is peeked towards a certain topic. The effects of social mediums like Reddit, 4chan (yes, just let me be an edgelord over here), etc. For instance in a scenario where I wouldn't stumble upon websites like these. Where I was left pure and untouched by the horrors of the internet. Would I  have felt the way I do now? Or does browsing r/egg_irl and r/traa just make me feel stronger about these thoughts in my head. Just as what happens with political opinions, the feed of constant content makes one think about certain things with a radicalizing point of view after all. Has it ever been proven by research? Who knows, but I have a lot of experience in social media radicalizing people. After all my best friend, went from being ""immigrants are bad, okay"" to denying the statistics of the number of deaths in the holocaust. So I want to ask this question \*\*""What effect does social media have on people with certain thoughts, amplify them? make them more obvious? Which is it.""\*\**PS: Even though my friend and I differ on a political point of view, that does not mean that we can't be friends, even if he doesn't have the same moral values, that does not make his opinions worth less, even if he one day becomes a Nazi (although that isn't even possible as he isn't a socialist) he'll still be my friend. (although this will probably change once I break out of my half-broken eggshell and tell him that)*

&amp;#x200B;

\-*Present*As of today, I'm sitting at my desk, 4am, thinking about sleeping. But I have to finish this at least. I've half accepted I'm trans, half not. But one thing is obvious, I absolutely hate shaving, the body hair, but you have to shave if you don't want to look like a man. To me it's just a sisyphean task. but I hate on part more than anything, my adam's apple. I don't know but even though it's not swollen or anything like that, it still bugs me. Touching it absolutely disgusts me. Am I unique in that aspect or is that just something that every guy has?. Anyways, let's get back to the main focus,  I've been feeling this way for around  3/4th's of a year now. And I noticed that I'm becoming a bit jealous, not only of girls, but also some guys who manage to pass when they cosplay. Again with something a bit controversial, but traps, Not in the lewd way but the cosplay side of things. When I see someone pass flawlessly I become a bit jealous. Naturally that's not really normal. I know that it's obvious, yes I may perhaps be trans, it's something I perhaps just need to accept. But having someone's view on problems you've been dealing with can sometimes shed a light on things. Anyways, I'm going to sleep.

TLDR:16yo AMAB, questioning gender. got some questions that i'll put below.

1. **""the statement: ""you're a girl of you want to be one"" how does that work?""**
2. **""Is being transgender neurologically wired into our being, and does it affect people on a subconscious level, even if they don't know they are trans?""**
3. **anyone got something debunking autogynephilia, scientific papers or just an explanation will suffice**
4. **""What effect does social media have on people with certain thoughts, amplify them? make them more obvious? Which is it.""**

\-*Afterword*I know this has been kinda long, maybe a bit too personal for my own liking, but it was also part self-exploration for me. So I hope I can perhaps find some feedback or something when I wake up.

&amp;#x200B;

Thanks for reading this, I hope you have a nice day/night/whatever,ThrowAwayAccount\_134

PS:  What is dysphoria, what is the feeling. Is it just a slight inconvenience or does it make a bit sad. for an example is me being a little down after a co-worker of mine telling me her opinion of me as a ""Kind *boy*"" count as dysphoria? or the example I gave about my adam's apple.  
PPS:  Was it boring to read?",asktransgender
I came out today because politics,"(trigger warning for mention of suicide)

Other than voting, I have literally no idea what else I can do about this situation.  I'm 3 months on T and had planned a slow coming out to first secure financial security. 

No time for that now. All I can do is hope that by becoming visible, it puts the image of an everyday person into people's heads when they find out I'm trans, thereby normalizing and humanizing it... and ideally that may sway a few votes.

""Oh, but my stylist is trans! I love her/him/(whatever people call me is secondary to them making the connection that I'm just a human at this point)! I would never get a service from anyone else!"" And seriously, I care much more about the sentiment behind people's realizations than pronouns at this point.

I deeply regret staying closeted now because I see my clients on monthly rotations and I won't have an opportunity to come out to all of them before the midterms. Potential chances for change were wasted by my fear.

My fear of harm after coming out is warranted, but after all the shitty news this week, for me the stakes of staying closeted are even higher. If I'm forced off HRT, I WILL commit suicide. If legislation makes care impossible to obtain, we are all fucked. I'm willing to risk some sneers, stares, losing a few clients and to start carrying mace because fuck me I won't submit to this quietly.

I just want to feel normal and be happy living peacefully as I am. I've suffered three decades to find this peace, why should I give it up to someone who hates me?

Finally, I'm changing my gender markers NOW because I want the list of names erased to be as long as possible. I want the person doing the erasing to have to spend extra time wiping me out so they know just how many of us exist. 

That's all I've got for civil disobedience at the moment. 

And for the record, everyone I came out to, personally and professionally, was ultra supportive. Mind blowingly so.

I'm am praying the flip side of the current legal torment is increased visibility, and therefore normalization. We're not monsters or the butts of jokes in bad movies, we're normal people who contribute to society. 

Note: I'm not advocating coming out if it endangers your life. I have much more leeway than some in my personal situation. No shame if your situation is different, we all need to stay safe and alive, so my intention isn't to push or shame anyone who can't safely come out. Please don't misunderstand.",asktransgender
I am scared about SRS and I could really need some positive experiences,"I got some people in my life that are not that happy with their post SRS experience and while i know that studies show that most are, it is still dragging me down.

My surgery is scheduled for May (in 213 days) but I keep thinking about it almost it every day. On one day I can't wait until I finally have that fixed but the next day I am super scared again and questioning everything.

So I really could need some positive experiences especially from straight trans woman. Also were you scared and how did you handle that?",asktransgender
Feeling Acceptance Only After Coming Out (How does that acceptance feel?),"So if you have read any of my previous posts you'll know I've been struggling the last couple of weeks.  So I don't know what this is but it seems like acceptance.

I have been able to dress secretly in my siblings clothes and while there is still a sexual aspect that makes me nervous, it has felt okay, not euphoric or dysphoric just clothes.  I shaved my chest, again, not euphoria but nothing that was screaming no.  Makeup is the same way.  I came out to an old co-worker who was accepting and has even offered to take me shopping and help with makeup, even providing me a safe place while I get ready to move out, and for which I am grateful (and a little excited).  I recently came to the conclusion that if it weren't for the social and religious aspects I don't think I would be opposed to living as a woman.

I have talked to my therapist for the last couple of sessions about the questioning, and that I have always considered the doubts intrusive, alhough I'm fairly certain that is simply due to the fact that every part of my upbringing declared it as wrong.  She said that she thinks, but doesn't know, that I just like crossdressing and proceeded to wonder if OCD runs in the family, (it might but I'm only the second one in the family to ever see a therapist), and then put forth the option of taking antidepressants due to my belief that the thoughts were intrusive as a way to possibly control them again saying it hasn't been crippling or from a young age. (24 questioning for 7+ years)

**TLDR;** I don't know why but the answer that I always thought I wanted, that I am not trans made me a little sad and almost teary when she said that. I don't think anybody really wants to be trans, but I almost feel like I have convinced my self that I am and that I just need to take the next steps slowly, but take them all the same.

I haven't really thought about my identity for the last couple of days other than to lurk on these forums but I don't feel the anxiety or stress much still just a lingering thought that I can still tough it out and live as a man or that maybe I've some how convinced myself I am trans though I fairly certain nobody really wants to do that.

**Question;** So here is the question my parents will likely think I just deluded myself into finally accepting my gender, but did anyone feel sad when somebody told you they didn't think you were trans or the other gender even though that's the answer you were secretly hoping for, and did it solidify the conclusion, or what does acceptance feel like?

&amp;#x200B;",asktransgender
What do you all think about this. Trump admit. - recent attacks on LGBT,"In response to the arrest of an individual with ties to the bomb threats Trump said the following:

""The bottom line is that Americans must unify,"" Trump said. ""We must show the world that we are united together in peace and love and harmony as fellow American citizens. There is no country like our country.""

In light of his administrations efforts to erase us, does this mean we are not one of those fellow Americans?",asktransgender
ES-Animals for gender dysphoria?,"Have any of y'all heard of emotional support animals for gender dysphoria? I read this could also be criteria for a therapy animal. 

My school seems to be pretty good at handling this sort of thing and I've heard of housings for people that have animals. I'd love to adopt an older cat.",asktransgender
"I'm finally going to do more than just dream about it, I booked an appointment with a psychologist and see her today, lots of questions!","AMAB and I'm in my mid 30s, I'm finally taking the steps to get the process started.  It pains me to look at the age of this account and know where I could be right now instead of all those more years of testosterone doing things I can't undo, but better late than never right!  I just got out of rehab for heroin and while I was there I came to the realization with the help of a therapist that if I don't do something about my incongruent mind and body, that I would eventually purposely OD to spare my family of a blatant suicide.  I still don't know how I'm going to tell them about transitioning as my mom and brother as they're both extreme conservative and homophobic/transphobic, but depending on the dosing I could potentially go a long time without them being full aware, correct?  


I know everyone is different, but if I ask to go at a lower/slower dosing regime, how long might I be able to go without obvious breast growth?  Is there any combination of T blocking and some kind of E that reduces muscles and redistributes fat that doesn't promote as much breast growth?  Or should I plan to use sports bras and loser fitting shirts until I start presenting?


I know I not going to get any hip growth due to my age, but as fat redistributes, I should expect some to go to my hips, correct?  Anyone have before and after measurements or pictures of measuring straight across their hips(not all the way around).  I'm going to be starting a major weight loss regime, is there a certain amount of time I should be on E before I really go after it so when I do lose weight, that it comes off in the correct places?


Has anyone been in the job market while early in transition?  I'm a programmer(go figure right? lol), is the tech community as trans friendly as I've read about?


Lastly, I'm not sure how to even phrase this, but how do I girl?  I feel like a phony when I say this, but I'm not particularly feminine.  Is it possible that going on E will bring out my inner-girl so to speak?  Like maybe I'm so use to suppressing and hiding all those feelings that once I truly accept myself and start the journey that my femininity will surface?  Or is that a red flag to be questioning such a thing?  I'll definitely be working with my psych on that, but am curious if anyone has had similar feelings as such.  


Sorry for the wall of questions, I'm just so excited and scared right now, like today could be the first day of my life excited, but I know I gotta slow my roll and that today is just the first step and it's time to be completely honest with myself and the psychologist so I can find my true self whatever that may end up being.",asktransgender
How am I just feeling like this? Is this what happiness is like?,"I just noticed this while I was walking down the street to the pharmacy a few minutes ago. I just noticed that I was genuinely happy for no reason in particular, and it is a little weird, but I like it! 

My birthday is on Monday, and I am going to be turning 30. I remember last year at this time having an existential dread. I was depressed, anxious, and dreading turning 29. My hair was at it's worst point, and I had the same haircut as my grandfather, which did not help things at all. At that point I was starting to strongly consider starting HRT, because things kept getting progressively worse for me. I started in July, and I have not looked back. I know that the changes and everything are slow, but my hair is almost all the way back, my body is starting to show some of the changes, and things are starting to happen. I might still be in boymode almost every day, and I might not be out to everyone yet, but damn it, right now, I am just happy!",asktransgender
"Help me choose my name (27, MTF here)","Hello ladies and gentlemen,

I've narrowed down my list of potential names to a handful or so and -- although I'll ultimately have to decide what's right for me -- I was just wondering if you had any advice for what name might suit me best.

I've posted a pic (again, sorry) just so you can see what I look like in order to help match my name to my appearance... http://imgur.com/a/vQrLe9r


And here are the names I've narrowed it down to, in no particular order:

- Holly
- Molly
- Erika (what I've been going with so far)
- Julie
- May
- Lauren
- Leah
- Paige
- Melanie
- Rachel
- Colette
- Ella
- Rochelle
- April

If you have any other recommendations not included on the list, I'd LOVE to hear them. Thanks everyone!!

Sincerely,
Tbd",asktransgender
So like what’s the deal with injections? Is my leg going to hurt 2/5 days for the rest of my life?,,asktransgender
Should I Be Presenting for Informed Consent?,"Hi friends,

I'm 21 years old and MtF, and I'm planning on visiting the informed consent clinic on my university's campus to get some sweet, sweet lady pills. However, I'm not sure how big of an issue gate keeping will be - are there things I should do to make myself more likely to be taken seriously? Will they take me more seriously if I present female? I don't have much in the way of women's clothing yet, my hair isn't very long, and I have zero makeup experience...I'd rather not have to do all that quickly (and go out in public like that!!) if I don't have to, but I'd like to know if it's important that I do it anyway. What do y'all think?",asktransgender
Is there a site that lists potential trigger warnings for new movies?,"I'm thinking of watching the new movie ""Bad Times at the El Royale"" this weekend with some friends, one of whom is transitioning. But I don't want to find out partway through the movie that it's got something transphobic in it and inadvertently trigger my friend. Is there a way to find out about potential triggers in this movie, or new movies in general ahead of time?",asktransgender
Surgery Recommendations,"Hello!

I am interested in top, bottom, and possibly facial feminization surgery. My insurance currently covers the first two and I have Aetna. 

Does anyone have any recommendations? 

Some I have received are:

Dr. Kathy Rumer, Philadelphia
Mt. Sinai Center for Transgender Medicine and Surgery 
Dr. Rachel Bluebond-Langner at NYU

Thank you!",asktransgender
Can spironolactone cause breast development?,"So at the moment, I've been on spiro for a couple of months. I'm starting estradiol in about two weeks, but recently I've been noticing some soreness in my nipples. When I feel them, it feels like there is a small bump under them. Are these breast buds? Or is it something else? To the best of my knowledge, spiro isn't really supposed to cause breast growth, but some sources online say otherwise",asktransgender
Lactating from one breast?,"So.. 7 months hrt. Noticed i had lactated today on my right breast, it wasnt much but i decided to try and squeeze, there came 2 clear-brownish? drops and after that it was completely clear drops and no more of the brownish color. My clinic where i see my doctor etc is closed due to weekend so i guess i'll try here. Is it normal? I know my prolactine levels are high, they were high even pre HRT from my first blood test. And it's only one breast (Although the more develeoped of the two).

Appreciate any answer :o",asktransgender
Resources for DIY legal name change?,"I reached out to a low income lawyers office in my area (Western New York state) and they rejected me based on not making enough. So I guess I'll have to do this myself. I have the forms printed out and I am getting my certified birth certificate, but then what? Is there a guide out there anywhere? At best, I find vague or general websites.",asktransgender
Any recommendations for SRS / GRS surgeons that are experienced with Klinefelter's Syndrome?,"Title says it all. I've been eyeing wanting to see Dr. Brassard, Dr. Bowers, Dr. Garcia, and Dr. Satterwhite, but my doctor has told me to be looking for someone who specializes or has experience with patients with Klinefelter's Syndrome. Seeing as there's not a ton of literature on the case (in comparison with other genetic and intersex conditions), I was wondering if any of you nice people have any suggestions or know how to use Google better than I!

&amp;#x200B;

I do not plan at all to go to Thailand despite the amazing work they do there, as a late preface.",asktransgender
"I have questions about hrt, fsh and lh low, why?","I am currently on Spiro 200 mg per day and Estradiol 1 mg per day. My FSH and Lh levels are abnormally low (0.1 miU/ml) and I'm worried. Is this due to the meds? I know Estradiol has negative feedback on gnrh, causing decrease in FSH and Lh, but my Estradiol levels are just below female range and within male range (13 Pg/ml). Thoughts?",asktransgender
Is there a word to refer to trans and cis people (category)?,"Gender refers to the categories of gender (male, female, agender, and much more), sex refers to sex categories like male female intersex, race refers to racial categories, etc
Is there a word to refer to trans and cis (and people who aren’t really either)?
We can talk about gender and sex equality and equity (between categories) with those terms, but how do we talk about trans and cis equality and equity? I tend to say trans equality/ trans equity, but that leaves out who trans people need to be treated with (equality or) equity compared to, and I think that makes it not the greatest descriptor (though anyone who thinks trans equality and trans equity are ideal terms feel free to share why).",asktransgender
"[NSFW] Do you have sex dreams? If so, what are they like?","Hey everyone! I love this sub, and it’s been a lot of help recently. 

Ok, throwaway time. 

Background info: 27/amab, mtf/enby (still working it out), pre-everything, mostly gynephilic

Sex dreams are suuuuuuper rare for me. I think I can count them on one hand. The few I’ve had involved someone I know irl and included quasi-lesbian stuff, kissing, cuddling, lingerie, intensely romantic feelings, and my body feeling very “blurry” while hers appeared in vivid detail. But they’ve never included piv; and for as long as I can remember, the idea of penetrating someone else has never aroused me, even while masturbating. 

But last night, I had an extremely vivid dream about doin’ it with a friend of mine. It was fun, romantic, very heteronormative… and it left me feeling really shook. 

Part of it is that she’s very attractive and fun to be around, but I’ve always considered her “off limits” because she’s married. So it’s weird to feel this way about someone I’ve decided not to entertain feelings for. But the bigger part is the sex itself. 

I’ve always known that something about my gender/sexuality was “different”, but I’ve only recently accepted the possibility that I might be trans. And one of the aspects of my feminine side that I’ve easily embraced was my disinterest in topping. So experiencing that brain circuit suddenly close was kind of disassociative, like it wasn’t me doing it. 

Is this normal for mtf’s? I realize there are transwomen who enjoy topping, so I’m interested in other perspectives on this. If you have sex dreams, could you describe them? Are they enjoyable? Are they ever dysphoric? 

TL;DR: had my first sex dream about piv, not sure how to think about it",asktransgender
Reference for those who don't understand,What is the best representation or reference in film or tv for those who cannot understand dysphoria to help those people maybe- possibly- come close to understanding the dysphoric experience?,asktransgender
Is my brain male enough?,"Warning: It's a little rant, I'm sorry if I offense you.

So I've been seeing a lot of videos (from both cis and trans people) claiming that our brain are sexually different from our cis pals: trans women have female brain and trans men have male brain and blabla I'm sure you all know what I'm talking about. We often use that argument to prove trans people exist, I understand it completely. I believe there's some truth in it but....

The thing is, it doesn't sound convincing (at least, not completely). It even scares me. What if I decide to let scientists study my brain and they conclude my brain' structure is similar to a cis woman brain (I'm a trans guy)? This would totally invalidate my gender identity even though I've never felt like a girl. WHAT ABOUT NON-BINARY FOLKS? Isn't harmful to say that humans' brain follows the gender binary when NB individuals exist? What about intersex people? Are we now forgetting them? It just sounds too black and white for me. 

I'm not dismissing all the scientific studies on trans people. I believe there's a correlation and that's it. But some use those studies as the ultimate truth for our gender identity, and at this point, I'm just thinking ""Is my brain male enough then?"" I don't 100% identify as male (I feel like I'm 60% male, and 40% neutral/non-binary) so obviously this question haunts me and makes me feel uncomfortable/dysphoric. 

I wish we could just use our own sense of gender identity as the ""ultimate truth"" regardless of what biology says about us. ",asktransgender
Canadian looking for starting help with binders! NOT afab,"I think it's finally time to start looking into binders, I'm just not sure how they work for non-afab people... Or how they work in general at all.   
I'm about a 40B sports bra.    

Where do I start? What do I look for? Best brands for Canadians? How does sizing  work? I'm nervous my ribcage will be an issue if they are normally made for guys, unless they aren't...   
I'm just not sure.    

Thanks for the help!",asktransgender
Coming out to parents as an adult,"So this is a topic that's come up a bunch, but it almost always seems to be about teenagers or young adults. My situation is similar in some ways, but also kind of different.

Brief background, I'm a 34 year old cybersecurity professional. I have a good job, but also a mountain of debt, and a 10 year old child whose mother isn't really in the picture now. For these reasons, I live with my parents. I pay rent, I do my fair share of the housework and all, I'm not a moocher. But I just can't afford to live alone and support my child without severely dropping our standard of living. And for the most part, I love my parents and have a reasonably good relationship with them. So it's really important to me to do this right. 

I've come out to my brother, to most of my friends, and even to my ex-wife's mother, who is basically a second mother to me now and very active in my son's life. She's been super supportive, as has everyone else I've told. But coming out to my parents is a whole different thing. they've known me for 34 years as a male. Coming out to them.. is going to be hard, no matter what. I think they'll eventually be able to deal with it, but I really want to be as prepared as I can, and do it the right way. 

I've been trying to prepare for all the questions/objections they're likely to have. It's tempting to pull the whole ""I'm transgender. deal with it. look it up and educate yourself, it's not my job to educate you"" type of thing I see some people recommend.. but I don't think that'll go over very well, and its important to me to maintain a good relationship with them, for the sheer pragmatic reasons, but also because  I love them and want them to be happy too. and I don't MIND explaining it, if they're genuinely open to hearing what I have to say. 

I'm going to make it clear immediately that my gender is not up for debate, and there's nothing they can say that will change my mind about it, but I will answer their questions if they're asked from an honest attempt to understand. It's not a choice I'm making to be a woman, it's a choice I'm making to stop pretending to be a man. I'm going to tell them how much happier I've been since accepting myself, how much healthier, how much more I've been taking care of myself, losing weight, and so on.

But these are the kinds of questions/objectives I can imagine being raised, and the kind of answers I'd give. None of this is written in stone, I'm not going to read off a script, it's just the general approach I want to take, I think. 

*""Where did this come from, you never seemed to have these feelings before?"" ""Well, I always did, here some examples from my childhood that you might remember that seemed innocent but were actually part of a pattern of me trying to express my gender identity in subtle ways. Also here's some stories you wouldn't have known about, just to illustrate that this is something I've always ""struggled"" with.""

*""But don't you know how hard this is going to be?"" ""Much more than you do, believe me. I'm going to lose friends, alienate most of my relatives, get harassed a lot, and probably face a lot of discrimination in my every day life. But I can't go on living a lie, I just can't. ""

*""But what about your son? How is he going to understand this?"" ""we've already talked about gay people, about gender, and even about transgender people. He really didn't have a problem with any of it. He's a smart, empathic kid. He'll be fine. But to make sure, I'm going to have him see a therapist whenever I get around to telling him, to make sure he has someone he can talk to."" (it probably wouldn't hurt anyway just for any feelings he might be hiding about his mother leaving)

*""But what about your job?"" ""My company is a multi-million dollar corporation that claims to be an equal opportunity employer, and has specific policies against discimination towards transgender people. My coworkers are mostly pretty liberal anyway, I'm actually not that worried about it. ""

*""Are you really sure? what if you change your mind?"" ""I'm really sure. I mean, I have doubts sometimes, but I always doubt myself, I'm a very self-critical person. But I didn't struggle with this realization, I wasn't indecisive. The moment I really asked myself if I was trans, the answer was so obviously yes that I've never seriously doubted it. And if I change my mind.. well, nothing I'm going to be doing for the forseeable future is entirely permanent. If by some obscure chance I change my mind, I'll recover. But I won't.""

*""Why do you want to be a woman/transgender?"" ""Why do YOU want to be a woman? It's not a choice I made. It's just who I am, in my brain. I can't help it that my body doesn't match. And I don't know why. there are theories out there, but no one knows for sure. Only that it DOES happen, and often enough that it's not a fluke, and it's not a mental illness, it's a biological anomaly that results in the gender identity not matching the physical sex"" 

*""Oh no you aren't."" (just as a kneejerk reaction type response) ""This isn't a realization I came to lightly. It's something that's been inside me my whole life, and since realizing it, I've been seeing a therapist for &lt;however long&gt; now, just to make sure I was sure. I know it's difficult to accept and will be very difficult to adjust to, but that doesn't mean it isn't true.""

*""What about some other way to treat it?"" ""It's not a mental illness, therapy or drugs won't 'fix' my gender. The official, doctor-approved treatment for gender dysphoria is transitioning to live as the gender that feels correct.""


So, to get to my actual questions, after all that.. what am I missing? What could I explain better, or what other questions should I be ready for? Or any other advice y'all might have, or anyone whose been through a similar situation who just wants to share how it went for them. I'm also not sure if I want to tell them at the same time, or individually. I feel like my dad might be a little more receptive, so maybe I could talk to him first and then see if he has any insight in how to tell my mom. On the other hand, maybe it would be easiest just to do it all at once, and not have to repeat anything, and just get it out there. I welcome any thoughts on that, too. ",asktransgender
Generic Estradiol injection?,"So, awhile back, I was informed that the generic version of estradiol injection was unavailable. I've been switched to pills since, but I'd really like to go back to the injection for a number of reasons. Does anyone know If a generic is available again?",asktransgender
What was your tipping point regarding the decision to come out/transition?,"(TL;DR - What the title says.)

My egg has been cracking in slow motion for what feels like forever (actually more like 7 months), and with each cycle of dysphoria/denial I get closer to accepting that this is actually real. I'm still not all the way there yet though – I don't know if transitioning is right for me, and even if it is, I'm not sure it's worth blowing my life up for it. 

For those of you who questioned for a long time, what was the turning point? I'm especially interested to hear from people who did it at 25+, though any input is welcome. ",asktransgender
Got referred to the Gender clinic,"Hey I got referred to the Gender Clinic but no appointment yet as there's a waiting list, if anyone here is from Ireland is there anything I should know ahead of time? I don't wanna go and mess it up when the time comes. :/",asktransgender
"Looking for therapist in Austin, TX","I found out that the insurance at my new job will cover SRS. So now I am trying to get letters in order. My HRT doctor gave me a list of good choices, but all the therapists they recommended have a waiting list to see new patients. Does anyone have any recommendations in the Austin area, preferably ones that take insurance?

Btw my insurance is Highmark Blue Cross Blue Shield, if anyone's wondering.
",asktransgender
Laser hair removal vs Electrolysis,Hey can people with experience with removing facial hair tell me about their experiences. I'm looking to get rid of mine because shaving doesn't really help. I have dark hair and light skin. So it always looks like I have stubble. TYSM! 💜,asktransgender
So curious and worried 😟,"So I've been doing E  injections of 20mg for like 2-3 months now, and I understand that this process takes a while but I wander if my feminaztion hasnt come as far as I wanted because I use to smoke cigs but I cut a lot before going on E and even when going on E only smoked when I was drunk and out with my coworkers (which for a short time became offten) but anyway I was wandering have I fucked myself, will it take longer for me to feminanzie will I even feminanzie at all because I've seen trans YouTube's (Blaire White)  who were said ""they were on E for 4 months before starting YouTube) and she looked passing Af but good news from all of this is I'm no longer going out with co workers and have been nic free for 2 days... I Got this ",asktransgender
Mtf hormones bottom function,I’m a mtf currently thinking of going on hormones what’s the likelihood that I would lose function of my genitals? Would I be able to penetrate my wife after long use? ,asktransgender
HRT and bone density?,Someone told me that HRT will make my bones weaker and easy to break overtime? How much truth is there to that? Is it a serious issue? ,asktransgender
Potentially too eager? (MtF),"So recently after questioning for a few weeks, and upon hindsight seeing some signs dating back to Middle/High school and at this point I'm pretty sure that I'm not cis and likely MtF. 

However, I know that I myself have a tendency to find something out/find something that I enjoy and throw myself into it too much for like 2-4 weeks and then after that I like burn out, and while I have no evidence that this will be the case regarding this issue I just really dont want it to be the case that I continue to suppress these kinda of feelings just because I feel like I burnt out on them...

I guess what I am really asking is like what do yall do to like affirm yourselves that you are doing the right thing and not making some mistake when you are like pre-everything?

Thanks &lt;3",asktransgender
What to expect after 18 months on MTF HRT?,"Hi there! 

&amp;#x200B;

So i have completed about 18 months on MTF HRT. I'm quite happy with the changes. However, i would like to know from those who are ahead of me- what to expect now? Is 18 months the upper end of changes? Not too happy with body fat redistribution as of now. 

&amp;#x200B;

Thanks. ",asktransgender
Regarding Dr Stiller (some NSFW),"**I'm researching a backup plan.**

I care about function as much as I care about how things look. How do patient's of Dr Stiller feel about their post op sensation? Orgasms? ",asktransgender
Why do I keep having these thought?,"Hey everyone, sorry if it's a bit long, but I have to share my story with at least someone.

The past 4 months were the toughest months in my life. I won't reveal my age, but I'm in my late teens, and I'm struggling very hard with my sexual identity.

Well, I was born a boy. I grew up as a boy, and I'm writing this post as a boy. And the fun fact is, that I feel like a boy. My conscious is manly, I think like a man. I may be skinny, but In my mind I am very maculine. 

So really, why do I have these toxic thoughts inside my head?

So, to start from the start, I accepted myself as bisexual man. I remember the battles I had with myself a few years ago. Am I gay? Bi? Straight? I thought that it would disappear at the time, but I grew to love it and now it's a big part of me. Loving men and Women equally.

I heard the term transgender before. I knew what it was. I heard stories about transgenders. But I never really paid attention to it because it never bothered me TBH. 

Until 4 months ago. I just scrolled through some pictures in an instagram page. and then I saw a picture of a man. I entered his page, and saw that he's now a woman, and that he transitiond. And then, (I spend a lot of time alone, so I have a lot of thoughts in my head.) I asked myself if I'm transgender. At the start, it didn't really bothered me. So I stopped thinking about it. But a few weeks later, it came back and big time. I remember that I told myself that I hope it wouldn't become a 'thing' right now, but apperantly, it did. 

Since then, I'm struggling, so hard. I never experienced so much pain. I don't feel like I just realized what I am, no. But I got used to think about it, and I'm getting stressed everytime. It turned my life upside down. I just feel like there is no way back, and it makes me feel so sad.

Everything is so complicated. It also depends on how I feel. If i'm happy at one moment, I feel like the man I am, and If I'm sad, So I have all these million thoughts about questioning my gender.

So I went back to my childhood, Seeking for answers. All I remeber is several thoughts that show femininity. And a thousand more that show maculinity. I don't like to wear dresses or put makeup. Never occured to me. When my beard started growing, I became super exited.
Most of my friends were and are male. Now every femminin thing that I do, makes me feel bad. Like I do have some female friends, but if it turns to gossip, I completly avoid it. I don't want to fight myself. I just want to be a happy man, like I was before. 

I feel like the internet is kind of a bad place to look for answers but I really despreate. I just want it to go away.

But my only concern is, that when I really battled myself a few years ago, and now I accepted myself as what I didn't want to be, will happen once again. 

I have really no problem with the trans community, or anyone. Be and let be. I just want some advise from you guys. How do I make it stop? Is it really stoppable?",asktransgender
i think i may be trans but i don't understand it?,"so for quite some time (more like my whole life) i have had those ""traits"" that would make me identify as a man, like i have called myself man and describe my sexuality as a gay (man), i picked myself a male name and treat it as equally real as the name my parents gave me, when it comes to dysphoria im not diagnosed but i think i have it like never in my life i have been comfortable with my genitalia (mostly in sexually context, probably since am sure im a total top) which led me to first believe that im just scared virgin and broken woman that needs to be cured but then i came across bottom dysphoria and it seems about right because if i only had the right set of genitalia i would most likely have normal sex life and also it would be very comforting to have masculine body and voice (that also is very important to me to change it) so i started researching and what i came across was people with bad top dysphoria  and almost non existent bottom dysphoria and i came to the conclusion that im not trans in the end, which of course didn't happened and i continued my journey and i discovered transphobia and it startled me because i realized i may be a little transphobic despite considering myself trans, i think it is  mostly due to not understanding things like ""what is gender?"", ""what makes men a men and reverse?"" like everyone cis or trans have some kind of gender identify and some kind of definitions of what makes them well them but not me like i just feel like i would feel pretty comfortable in masculine body with masculine voice that have entire diffrent genitalia and i hope i can transition one day in a way i consider complete but does that make me a man? like i wouldn't care being still called a woman and stuff. sorry if it seems chaotic but i have never talked about it with anyone, i thought the only way to get out of this nightmare was to kill myself which i planned but for some reason i ""broke"" today and felt like i need help from someone ",asktransgender
I feel like I'm going insane,"I don't know what I want. I've been looking at this trans stuff for months. I don't want to be a man. I don't look at male spaces and yearn for that. I don't like female spaces and women have made me extremely uncomfortable with the assumption that I'm a woman.

I look in the mirror after binding and cutting my hair and I just think ""oh, third gender person, that's you,"" when I *know* that is absolutely not what anyone else sees. My brain is stuck there. It was always there. I was always thinking of myself as ""something else."" I go and do things dressed as what I think of as myself and I realize there is no one in the room that I can perceive as being ""like me"" and at the same time none of them perceive me as different. 

My brain functions totally differently than literally everyone else and it's scary and I am completely delusional. I look up breast reduction and I freak out when I see that the ""goal"" is to be ""proportional"", but at the same time I don't think I want top surgery (and also I'd need to lose like 40 lbs to even be considered, so what's the point of looking?). I have pictures of myself attempting to bind from six year ago, idle thoughts of how if I have breast cancer genes that then it'd be an easy choice to just get rid of them, and still I'm wondering, are these real thoughts? I mean I don't actually want anything, right? How could I?

I don't know what to do. I see a lot of people here wanting to radically change themselves physically and that makes sense. In my case some part of me is completely delusional and thinks that me not being a man or a woman is just totally self-evident and therefore nothing really has to be ""done"". And that part of my brain is why I would consider myself trans because all my life I have had to keep reminding myself that I was my gender assigned at birth and constantly force myself to do things that were really uncomfortable. When I finally decided to actually not do stuff that made me so uncomfortable because putting up with that just for other people's sake is stupid, I found this.

This has been going on literally my entire life. One of my earliest memories was my mother asking what to do with all these barbies I had gotten as a birthday gift because she knew I never touched them. I said the reason I had them was in case ""my friends wanted to play with them"". I was three years old and had already realized my preferences were weird and that I needed to cover them up. It literally goes back that far.

I don't know what to do. I mean a lot of research and people here, they say that being trans is something physical? This isn't physical. This isn't body parts being wrong. My brain just doesn't work and it constantly tells me I'm something I'm not. I think I'm just crazy. ",asktransgender
"hi, i'm back with my constant existential grief","after three weeks of trying very hard not to read anything related to my condition, trying to dedicate more time to my hobbies, looking for all sorts of distractions, thinking ""maybe i can live like this after all"" and feeling overall pretty okay despite still thinking about it 75% of the time, i fell back into the dysphoria-related stress again and, of course, into browsing this subreddit. 

the thing is, that my dysphoria while definitely going beyond all of that societal roles stuff, is always amplified when i get reminded how unconvenient living as the gender i was assigned at birth is. it hurts to think that i was born not only with the wrong body, but also as ""the oppressed one""

it's really not normal to just look at guys and think ""they're so lucky, not having to worry about all of that…""

so maybe all this gender identity confusion might mostly just be me wanting to escape from all of that? what am i running away from? is it really worth it? just what the hell do i want from life?

&amp;#x200B;",asktransgender
[PSA] Avoid Dubai &amp; Abu Dhabi (and Emirates and Etihad Airways),"posting what I posted on /r/lgbt

&amp;#x200B;

 

UAE government has a new regulation in place ([http://www.mohap.gov.ae/Files/MOH\_Service/361/Guidelines%20for%20carrying%20of%20personal%20medicines%20with%20travelers%20in%20to%20the%20UAE.pdf](http://www.mohap.gov.ae/Files/MOH_Service/361/Guidelines%20for%20carrying%20of%20personal%20medicines%20with%20travelers%20in%20to%20the%20UAE.pdf)) which governs **incoming passengers** and **transit passengers** transiting through UAE - most commonly Dubai (Emirates) and Abu Dhabi (Etihad Airways).

Under the new guideline most HRT medications have been listed under **Controlled Substances**:

1. Cyproterone
2. Estradiol
3. Oestradiol
4. Testosterone

As such, the new regulation requires you to

1. Notify the government of United Arab Emirates in advance if you are carrying those ([http://www.mohap.gov.ae/en/services/Pages/361.aspx](http://www.mohap.gov.ae/en/services/Pages/361.aspx))
2. Cannot carry more than 30 day supply if you are passing through there
3. Require you to present a written prescription and medication upon arrival
4. Declare that you are carrying those

So be mindful of that if you are traveling.",asktransgender
Insurance question BCBS Illinois,"Hi, just wondering if anyone out here had any experience with GCS and Blue Cross/Blue Shield of Illinois.  They've paid for HRT the past 18 months, no questions asked and the company literature states that transition surgeries are covered, but I have idea how to access any information.   Thanks in advance. ",asktransgender
Is 3 days too soon for spironolactone side effects?,"I've been on spiro since Tuesday. I also have a lot of health anxiety and have had panic attacks in the past. I'm very worried about hyperkalemia (high potassium) affecting my heart while I'm on this drug.

Sometimes I feel like I can feel my heart beating. I'm not sure if this is just me being hyper-aware of my heart beat because I'm worried or if I""m having palpitations.

I take 50 mg spiro twice a day (100 mg total).",asktransgender
Looking for an old television commercial about self esteem and image,"I know this isn’t exactly on point but does anybody remember a commercial that aired during the 90’s during weekday afternoon cartoons where a model was explaining all the things she had to do for a photo shoot? Like makeup and covering up flaws?

I remember that it was something that resonated with me a lot and wanted to share it with a friend of mine.",asktransgender
How to girl? - Specific situation,"So, a few days ago I got chatting to this guy - I just randomly just started chatting, which is unusual for me, and he seemed nice enough: intelligent, cute, friendly.

I have no idea if I was passing to him or not.  Seriously, I couldn't tell.  So either I was totally passing, totally not passing to the point he didn't think of it, or I wasn't passing and he was cool with it.

Lets assume he gendered me female for the rest of this.  If he gendered me male then it's a whole different thing, and I'm not so worried about it.

Anyways, conversation was winding down, and he asked me for my facebook.  Cue horror: ""I don't do facebook, but I'm sure we'll run into each other again.""  Running into each other again is a very realistic possibility - almost a certainty once I move back into the city, which I'm planning to do soon after Christmas.  So this wasn't a ""go away, I'm not interested"", at least from my end.

Did I just fuck up?  I'd love to spend more time with him once I move back into the city (and after I get my divorce finalised and surgeries done, I wouldn't be opposed to being more than friends, assuming that one conversation was representative).  But I have no clue how to convey ""I'm not being evasive, I actually do like you, but I'm not comfortable handing out contact details to anyone at the moment.  Seriously, when we run into each other again, we should hang out - I'm likely to be in a much better headspace then""",asktransgender
Trump administration wants to remove 'gender' from UN human rights documents,"From: https://www.theguardian.com/world/2018/oct/24/trump-administration-gender-transgender-united-nations

Exclusive: US diplomats have pushed for rewriting of collective statements to remove language inclusive of transgender people

Julian Borger in New York

Thu 25 Oct 2018 01.00 EDT Last modified on Thu 25 Oct 2018 01.02 EDT

The US mission to the United Nations is seeking to eliminate the word “gender” from UN human rights documents, most often replacing it with “woman”, apparently as part of the Trump administration’s campaign to define transgender people out of existence.

At recent meetings of the UN’s Third Committee, which is concerned with “social, humanitarian and cultural” rights, US diplomats have been pushing for the rewriting of general assembly policy statements to remove what the administration argues is vague and politically correct language, reflecting what it sees as an ‘ideology’ of treating gender as an individual choice rather than an unchangeable biological fact.

For example, in a draft paper on trafficking in women and girls introduced by Germany and Philippines earlier this month, the US wants to remove phrases like “gender-based violence” would be replaced by “violence against women”.

'It still scares me': panic simmers below Trump trans policy protests

“We are seeing this more and more coming up on the Third Committee, and this is going to be a battle in the coming weeks,” said a UN diplomat. The diplomat noted that US policy on the word is not entirely consistent.

While on a number of recent occasions, US diplomats have called for the removal of the word “gender”, at least once the same word has been added into a text on US insistence.

The diplomat, a European, speculated that the inconsistency might reflect a tussle between different members of the US mission.

To succeed in its campaign, the US will have to forge unusual alliances, with Russia and conservative Islamic states, against its western European partners.

“If you only say violence against women, it doesn’t really tell the whole story,” a senior diplomat at the UN said. “We shouldn’t be going along with encouraging their society to be regressive. And if that means a blazing row in the Third Committee, I would have a blazing row in committee because I think some things are worth cherishing and worth hanging on to.”

The US mission to the UN referred inquiries to the state department, which did not offer a comment before publication.

Last month, the state department quietly changed the name of a web page to address transgender issues on passports, from “gender designation change” to “change of sex marker”, in what appears to be a wider campaign against the word “gender”.

“It’s clear the administration is engaged in a broad strategy of erasing transgender people’s existence across the federal government,” Mara Keisling, the executive director of the National Center for Transgender Equality, said. “While it’s infuriating they would behave in such an extreme and volatile manner at the United Nations, we are confident their prejudice will lose out to science, reason, and the ongoing fight for human rights.”

The New York Times reported on Monday that the administration had drawn up a policy paper to define gender narrowly as restricted as male or female only, and immutable from birth, despite the American Medical Association (AMA) ruling last year that gender and sexual identities are not always binary.

The effort is aimed at reversing changes to federal programs made by the Obama administration. Those reforms made gender a matter of individual choice rather than the sex designated at birth. A leaked memo from the Department of Health and Human Services said government agencies should adopt a definition of gender determined “on a biological basis that is clear, grounded in science, objective and administrable.”

Roger Severino, the director of the office for civil rights in the department, was a fervent opponent of the Obama reforms. In July 2016, he said that the then defense secretary, Ash Carter, had dishonoured the sacrifices of “hundreds of thousands of veterans and current troops who were traumatized, wounded, or died fighting against Nazis, Communist aggressors, and terrorists, yet, believe that biological men should not be allowed into the same barracks and showers as women.”",asktransgender
Do trans man have to sign up for the US draft?,"I’m a 19 year old trans man and in the past year I changed me gender marker legally, because of this do I now need to sign up for the draft? Or would the whole trump banning trans people from the military make it so I don’t need to? 

Honestly I probably wouldn’t either way as I in no way support the US military, but I don’t want to get in legal trouble. ",asktransgender
What multivitamins do transgender people take?,"Ok so this is kind of a weird question, but I’m curious as to what multivitamins people who are transgender take. Some multivitamins are made specifically for men and women because of their different nutritional needs. I was curious if taking hormones will mean that a different vitamin will be better for you than the vitamin for your sex assigned at birth. Or do most transgender people just take the vitamins for everyone. 

Sorry about the random question, and sorry if I didn’t use the right terminology for anything, I’m just very concerned about vitamins right now. ",asktransgender
Moving to thailand need some help,So i need some help im moving to bangkok in few months from eu to come out and live my life as trans women and i need some help cause i couldnt really find anything how to begin there hrt where are some good therapists for trans or some website i can find it out it would be much help thanks.,asktransgender
Change in body smells on progesterone?,So I was seeing a guy that I play with on a regular basis this is one months after starting progesterone.  So we started playing.. and He said that he could smell me... like in a good way.  Reminding him of cis girls and really turning him on.  Weve been playing on and off for years and he is sure it was something new.  I'm just wondering does progesterone boost pheirmones?,asktransgender
Was My Boss In The Wrong?,"So, today at work after work my boss called me into her office, and said that she'd received a complaint from a coworker. I've only been at this job for about a month, so I was nervous, cause I was fairly certain I was getting along really well with everyone. She said that someone had complained about me using the women's washroom.  


Some background on me, I'm currently 3 months into mtf hormone therapy, I wear a bra, shave daily, but I don't wear makeup. My face is relatively feminine and when I'm working it's pretty much a 60/40 split if customers refer to me as sir or ma'am respectively.

&amp;#x200B;

I told my boss I'm trans, and just kinda stared. Didn't feel the need to elaborate. She then asked me if I was ""fully through the process,"" essentially dancing around asking me if I've got a dick or not. I stared at her for a second, because I was shocked she would even ask about that, and honestly wanted to give her an out to rephrase herself. She didn't, so I asked her what she meant by that. She didn't answer, just danced around it and gave a little speech about needing everyone to be comfortable at work. I told her I was 3 months into hrt. She says she ""wished I had told her sooner so we wouldn't have had to have this conversation,"" and I basically told her that I wanted to ease into things since I had just started working there, and you don't know how new employers are going to react to that sort of thing. I felt comfortable enough to come out to a few people, as the jobsite seemed quite friendly towards LGBT people making a pretty unmissable point about it during orientation. She's requested that, instead of using the employee bathrooms, I use the customer bathrooms that are outside of our employee area. Of course I said yes because I wanted the conversation to end quickly, as my hormone levels are super out of balance right now and it's making me really emotional and I didn't want to start crying.

&amp;#x200B;

I feel pretty hurt by this, since using women's washrooms is a pretty new thing for me and something that I consider a very big step towards self acceptance. It's not necessarily that I mind using the customer bathroom, it's about an extra 30 second walk away, but it makes me feel a bit outcast. My question is, is my boss in the right here? I feel, personally, like it would've made more sense to essentially tell the worker to ""suck it up, she's trans, she has a right to piss"" (albeit in a more HR-friendly way) than to exclude me, even if it is in a pretty minor way? 

&amp;#x200B;

&amp;#x200B;",asktransgender
"[NSFW] Do you have sex dreams? If so, what are they like?","Hey everyone! I love this sub, and I’ve found it really helpful. 

Ok, throwaway time. 

Background info: 27/amab, mtf/enby (still working it out), pre-everything, mostly gynephilic

Sex dreams are suuuuuuper rare for me. I think I can probably count them on 1 hand. The few I’ve had involved someone I know irl and included quasi-lesbian stuff, kissing, cuddling, lingerie, intensely romantic feelings, and my body feeling very “blurry” while hers appeared in vivid detail. But they’ve never included piv; and for as long as I can remember, the idea of penetrating someone else has never aroused me, even while masturbating. 

But last night, I had an extremely vivid dream about bumping uglies with a friend of mine. It was fun, romantic, very heteronormative… and it left me feeling really shook. 

Part of it is that she’s very attractive and fun to be around, but I’ve always considered her “off limits” because she’s married. So it’s weird to feel this way about someone I’ve decided not to entertain feelings for. But the bigger part is the sex itself. 

I’ve always known that something about my gender/sexuality was “different”, but I’ve only recently accepted the possibility that I might be trans. And one of the aspects of my femininity that I’ve easily embraced was my disinterest in topping. So experiencing that brain circuit suddenly close was kind of disassociative, like it wasn’t me doing it. 

Is this normal for mtf’s? I realize there are transwomen who enjoy topping, so I’m interested in other perspectives on this. If you have sex dreams, could you describe them? Are they enjoyable? Are they ever dysphoric? 

TL;DR: had my first sex dream about piv, mot sure how to think about it",asktransgender
When you came out at work did you tell everyone who mildly knew your face or just your team?,,asktransgender
Question from a cis person,"I was having a debate about the gender spectrum with my class and I think I misrepresented something. I can’t find a concrete answer on this online so I was wondering if you guys knew.

With the distinction between sex and gender, are transgender people who are born male and identify as a woman regardless of their genitalia or hormones or chromosomes female? Like, if someone were to ask a transgender person who transitioned what sex (not gender) they are, what is the right answer?

Also, with transsexual people, are they the line for being a genetic transition to male or female or are they still considered by the community as the sex they were assigned at birth?

Can someone be male and identify as a female without being transsexual?",asktransgender
"New Flavor, Same Great Taste!","I doubt you do, but I posted here a while back about how I wasn't trans, just an ally; Then a post about how I actually was; Then a post about dealing with coming out to my family; Then how to deal with my family disapproving of me being transgender.

I was so angry, embarassed, and frustrated by their disapproval that I went back in my egg/closet and deleted any evidence of me being who I actually was.

I kept going to my LGBT group at my mental health center as a 'genderqueer pansexual' to save face.

I also all but stopped talking to my birth mom's side of the family 

So I'm just back to tell all of you that I'm back (I doubt that any of you care)

I'm out again to close friends, partner, and my LGBT group

I also have new problems, like coming out to my birth father (I don't know how he'll react, but I'll burn that bridge when I get to it probably)

Also, I think I'll have problems with how slowly the wheels of medicine move (both getting hormones and then with how fast they'll work)

But, enough rambling, 

I'm back",asktransgender
"I'm literally terrified about what's going on in the US right now. I want to move to Canada before things get too much worse, are there any groups that can help?","I'm MTF, 4 months HRT.  I hadn't planned on going full time for a few more months, but I'm starting to worry that it won't be an option by then. I'm thinking of getting hair extensions and getting started on my name change process now so that I can get out of here in a few months.  I'm a mechanical engineer, so I'm hoping I'll be able to find work.  

I know I'm not the only one contemplating this, are there any trans groups in Canada who can help me get started? 

I feel like a coward for wanting to leave instead of  working to change the country I love, but I feel like I can see where this is going, and don't want to end up in a camp.  I also don't think I can ride this out in boymode while waiting for sanity to return to the country.  ",asktransgender
[MA / OR] Birth Certificate Gender Change - Physician's Affidavit Requirements,"Hi all,

I am a trans woman currently residing in Oregon, born in Massachusetts. I am in the process of updating my documentation to reflect my new gender and name, but am having a bit of trouble acquiring the documentation needed  to change my Passport and Birth Certificate.

The medical provider who supervises my transition is an ARNP; both the State Dept and Massachusett's Department of  Vital Records require that the affidavit of medical transition be  completed by an M.D. or D.O.

My  provider is telling me that it is not sufficient to have an MD/DO  review my history and sign off, but that I will have to switch my primary care to this physician as well. Because I have other conditions that are well managed by this NP and have a decent relationship established, I'd rather not have to do that.

This is the text of the MA affidavit:

&gt;I  am a licensed physician in good standing in the State or jurisdiction  listed above . I am a physician of the patient listed above, with whom I  have a doctor -patient relationship and whose medical history I have  reviewed and evaluated. I make this affidavit in support of my patient’s  request for a permanent amendment of the birth certificate registered  with the Massachusetts Registry of Vital Records and Statistics pursuant  to M.G.L. c.46 §13(e).  
&gt;  
&gt;  
I hereby certify that my patient, listed  above, has completed medical intervention, appropriate for the patient ,  for the purpose of permanent sex reassignment . In my medical opinion  the patient is not of the sex recorded at birth and the sex on their  amended birth certificate should be listed as

Looking at  both the State Department's and MA DVR's language, it should be  sufficient to have my history evaluated by a licensed physician – e.g.  the MA affidavit states ""I am **a** physician of …"", not ""**the**  physician"") while the State dept text includes the option of ""whose  medical history I have reviewed and evaluated"" as an alternative to  ""whom I have treated"".

Is there anything I could bring back to the NP's practice to convince them that it should be sufficient for an MD/DO to meet with me and review my history, or would it be best to find an LGBTQ Family Law lawyer in MA who can help me sort out the details?

So:

* Did anyone else have to change their PCP to successfully change their passport and BC?
  * If not, did you simply provide your history (time on HRT and regimen, supporting documentation from a qualified MHP, etc.) to a physician to get the appropriate statements? Was that sufficient?
* Does anyone have a referral to an LGBTQ-informed Family Law lawyer in the Boston area who might be able to speak to the specifics of MA's interpretation of ""doctor-patient relationships"" and speak with my current physician's office? I'm happy to pay to help get this sorted quickly.",asktransgender
"I am working on a speaking gig for TDOR about how allyship saves lives. To you, what makes an ally?",,asktransgender
Full makeup for the first time made me freak out. Is this normal?,"My amazing partner helped me do full makeup today, and it was fun, but when I finished the whole thing and actually took a step back to look at myself, the best way I can describe how I felt is putting my emotions in a taffy pulling machine, which is weird, because I'm usually a very even-keeled person.

I was mostly shocked, because I think that was the first time I looked in the mirror and saw someone recognizably approaching female, maybe. Then my stomach knotted up and I thought I just looked like Frankenfurter, and I got incredibly anxious because I realized neither me nor my partner saw a passing woman in the mirror. An anxiety attack for me is just wringing my hands and pacing a lot, but it still felt like a kind of existential crisis. It was a very mixed bag though, because from some angles and some of the selfies I took, I...actually kind of looked like a shadow of what I might *want* to look like. The panic settled down, and it got less jarring to look at myself in the mirror over the few hours I wore it around the house. Some of the smiles in my pictures are even genuine!

I'm kind of unsure whether I had that reaction because it felt *wrong* deep down, or if it was because I didn't pass in my own eyes and that made me feel unattractive and repulsed by myself. Do cis people have strong reactions like this to seeing themselves convincingly presenting the opposite gender? Is this just what it's like early on? I know this sounds like a weird thing to get wound up about, but it's really rare I have these kinds of emotional responses to things. I lowkey wanted to cry for a while, and I legitimately didn't know whether it was happy or sad cry.",asktransgender
Is it normal to feel worse dysphoria when you dress feminine when your MTF,"I have recently been experimenting with wearing feminine clothing, and i always feel really really ugly when i wear it, but also kinda nice. I usually feel neutral in masculine clothing, so i have really no idea what this means. pls halp",asktransgender
Seeking Understanding. Respectfully.,"I grew up outside of a small Texas town. Like half hour drive to get to the small town. Hopefully that will smooth over the inevitable faux pas. 

I’m gonna start out with an apology.  I’m sorry. I don’t know the proper terms or usage. Under no circumstances do I mean even the slightest offense, even slightly. So, please, hear what I’m trying to say, gently enlighten me, and help me understand. ‘Cause I want to understand. I’m stumbling around and could use a kind helping hand.

The question for me is this... is F2M who are interested in males common? 
I’ve only met one  and we dated for a short period. They were very fluid with their gender, mainly because they were both both benders than either gender at one time.  Sorry, can’t explain it well. They (I use that because she didn’t care which pronoun I used and it depended one the day which he identified with. Either way they dressed the same) It was more than my country boy mind could wrap my head around in a couple months. 

",asktransgender
Am i transgender?,"I am gay 17 year old male. I  have posted into r/LGBTeens and got the advise to come ask here so here i am. I am male but would like people to refer to me as Nathalie and use female pronouns. Now this isn't the problem but i doubt i would ever actually change my gender does this still make me transgender or is there a different better term to refer to myself as?

&amp;#x200B;

Thank you for the comments/help and advise in advance. Have a nice day",asktransgender
BA too early?,"Hey, I'm from Sweden and we're following a program to get hormones, SRS, BA for free within our health care system, I've been on hormones now for 7 Months. When we started I was informed that BA would be around 1½ Year mark to not go ahead too early, but I've got a time to choose implants on 6th Of November and talking to the girl working there it sounded like I might be undergoing the surgery already in December. Im just wondering, Isnt 9 Months pretty early for BA? Could there be complications? Should I ask some questions wether it's too early or not while im there picking implants? Also I'm still not out to everyone so kinda freaking out alittle bit. I'm out to most and living full time at home, but still going out in rather androgynous mode and ''boymode'' to select friends. I thought I had more time to come out, but I guess it's not impossible to hide breasts either if I'm not ready to come out yet. I know binding isnt that good for your health, but just a baggy hoodie might do? Appreciate any answer!",asktransgender
Electrologist Reccomendations in KC?,"So, I'm moving from the Bay Area back to KC in January, after SRS (Read: I'm just crazy enough to move from California to KC in January, six weeks post-surgery), and looking for electrologist recommendations to clean up the few straggling hairs leftover after nearly three years of laser zapping. 

&amp;#x200B;

Any of y'all know anyone who can take care of the handful of stragglers? ",asktransgender
Is what I am transgender?,"I’m physically a guy, age 22. But mentally, I’m not sure. It’s been around a year since the last time I really dug deep into transgender issues, and again I find myself asking where exactly I stand and what can be done. As before, I feel I can confidently say a part of me is surely feminine, and repressed both to others and myself. But it also occurred to me that I don’t necessarily want to be a woman- or, maybe I do, but only if it meant not giving up the things I like about being a man.

The truth is, I like being a man. I like having a penis and muscles and a deep voice, watching sports and hanging out with male friends. I present naturally as a male, whether due to inherent nature or years of growing accustomed to the personality and attending an all-male school. (Frankly, I still wonder how much of who I am today is a direct result of being a social outcast in elementary/middle school and aggressively attempting to codify and embody “normality” as a response- but I digress.) 

Despite this realization, I would absolutely “press the button” - as long as I got the chance to change back if I so desired. And, if the button were pressed for me, or if I woke up one day as a girl, I would not only be thrilled but would likely not be bothered if an option to go back was not possible. But when it comes to realistically thinking “would I want to become a woman”... I have serious doubts. Completely getting rid of my penis for a vagina, and gambling away a reasonably attractive body in the hopes it transitions well? Adapting to all the social pressures that women face, in addition to having to deal with questions of why I made such a drastic change when I was not wholly unsatisfied with my previous life? I don’t think I could do it, even if I chose to present more tomboyishly.

This also comes on the heels of two major realizations, the first of which being that I am bisexual and not entirely straight. Earlier this year I gave into curiosity and dated a guy, and found it a ton of fun, both socially and sexually. There was still a lot I felt uneasy with, though, whether because it was genuinely not for me or because I was suppressing it for fear of being “too gay”. I am still 80-90% straight, but I am now at relative peace with being 10-20% attracted to men.

The second is that I’m deeply attracted to androgyny. This might be attached to the prior realization, but it also goes both ways; while stereotypically feminine women and stereotypically masculine men are plenty attractive, androgynous women and men are what really catch my eye- women with short hair and boyish presentation and men with more feminine figures and facial features. 

This leads me to wonder if perhaps that’s where I belong, somewhere in between. But I also have many doubts- I’m essentially wanting the best of both worlds, to be able to act either way, without committing to either “role”. I’m more comfortable trying to assume one or the other, rather than trying to combine them, knowing that the combination of the two is seen as weird and does not come across to others as it does to me. To have angled jaw and broad shoulders but sashaying hips, male genitalia but female clothing, muscular form but lithe mannerisms... it feels like I’m just trying to jam everything I individually find attractive into one image, and it doesn’t work... I don’t see it as me. But I can’t deny that so many individual parts of it are things I would enjoy seeing in myself.

What is there to do, really? It seems so unattainable to reconcile all the different pieces of me into something that still feels like... “me”. As I’ve figured before, it’s like I have a male and female side, both I identify with but which rarely co-exist. If I “pick a side”, both feel natural, and the more I do either the more I feel drawn to considering that side dominant. Perhaps in the end I’ll have to choose one to put it all under, since I find it difficult to imagine myself living a truly non-binary lifestyle in the same way that others have chosen to do.",asktransgender
On and Off hrt,"The decision to take hormones is not easy. 
There are some posts that report that they start repeatedly with the hrt and stop again. They are considering or not yet ready for the physical changes. After some time they start to listen again because the same feelings come back as before. That can not be healthy.

Which physical or mental changes have happened? Are there permanent changes as well? Due to the constantly changing hormones, does the body lose the ability to produce enough hormones? Did you notice anything in the phases without hrt over time?

Maybe a permanent low-dose hrt would be better. Ultimately, you want the changes, otherwise you would not always start again.",asktransgender
"My [17F] boyfriend [24M] is getting angry at me for my interests and for participating in trans communities, and is, in general, sending me mixed signals.","Hi everybody, last night I made a post to /r/relationships about my boyfriend, I’ve gotten a few DMs that told me to seek further advice in a trans subreddit for more trans-specific responses that might be helpful. I’m really sorry if this type of post isn’t welcome here, it just seems like if there were a trans sub to accept it, this would be the one.     

&gt;Hi everybody, I'd like to preface this with some information about myself, first and foremost, I am trans (MtF), however, I've always had very feminine facial features, and am blessed with good genes that have treated me well in my limited time on HRT so that I pass pretty well. My parents have pretty much given up on me since I came out to them, they ignore everything I do that doesn't affect them and very very rarely interact with me. I've always been a *very* shy and quiet person despite the fact that I love people, and as a result, I haven't really had any friends since the 3rd grade.  
I've been in a relationship with my boyfriend Mike for a little over a year now, we met at a local anime convention where I had been cosplaying as a femme character. He came up to me and asked for my number, I was completely shocked and gave it to him, and after that, we started texting daily. He was really surprised when I told him that I was 16, and told me I was very mature for my age and was fine when I told him I was trans. After a month or two he asked me out on a date, and we've been in a relationship since.   
I want to start out by saying how amazing he is, he's been very supportive of me, he's very fun, he can make me laugh, he always tells me how pretty and cute I am, he defended me from his friends (whom I don't really care for), he even let me stay at his place when my parents kicked me out when I first came out to them. Above all else though, he has been providing me with HRT since my parents won't.   
Anyway, recently I've been very interested in a bunch of complex topics that I've started reading about, broad things like philosophy, morality, etc... And since I mostly talk to him, I tried talking about some of these things with him. When I did, he seemed pretty disinterested (as I was kind of expecting), so I stuck to discussing and learning about it in this trans Discord I was loosely apart of. One day, while I was at his place he overheard me debating with somebody on the Discord and he intervened. He got mad and told me online trans communities are toxic and not to use the Discord anymore (which I really didn't mind, because I didn't use it much in the first place) and then started yelling at me about how I sound pretentious and sound like a snob, and that it's making me a pseudo-intellectual, which I understand, but it still kind of irked me. Since then he threw out a couple of the books I was reading, and when I got mad at him for it he said he didn't want me to waste my time on things that don't matter and that I should spend more time with him.   
It's been a day, and I haven't responded to his many texts, the most recent of which are him saying he's sorry and that he'll make it up to me"".
Is there a better way I could be approaching him about my interests? How can I pursue this interest without coming off as pretentious? How should I let him know that I feel strongly about all of this?    
tl;dr my boyfriend is getting mad at me for my interest in philosophy. how can I fix it?  
Edit: I just want to let everyone know that I’m reading everything, and taking it to heart. I’m very sad, angry, and confused right now, so sorry if I don’t reply to everyone.",asktransgender
"[PSA] Make yourself heard, How to Volunteer","It's great to register to vote and cast your ballot (do that asap if you can). 

But if you want to maximize your impact then volunteering is a great way of doing so. If every trans person voted we shift the election by 1% (big), if every trans person got 4 friends to vote it would be 4% (ridiculously massive)




Here's a few methods of doing so

Phone banking:

With this you will be phoneing or texting voters. 

As a bit of knowledge from experience:

- For the most part you are phoning people who are supporters, so bad calls are very rare.

- most conversations are about how and where and when to vote, people might ask for some information on one policy.

My experience with this has been quite rewarding, it's also very valuable as a lot of people just need to be reminded to vote / register.

This one is also really useful because it can be done from anywhere to anywhere, so even if you live in Idaho or Hawaii you can help move swing districts.

Also, for mtfs this can be a great way to practice your voice.


Door knocking:
You go from house to house in a neighborhood asking people if they plan to vote and if they have any questions.


As a bit of knowledge from experience

- You won't be alone, it's standard practice to pair up with somebody else.

- Most people are friendly in person, opponents are likely to just close door.

- Talking with supporters can be very rewarding

This once again is a very rewarding experience, it also can significantly boost turnout and is very important for contacting irregular voters.



Driving voters to the polls:

As a bit of knowledge from friends experience (don't have a driver's license).

- very relaxed experience generally.

- generally ""non partisan"" but you will likely be picking up identified supporters.

- Conversations are very relaxed, you might be asked a few questions by some voters.


With any of these methods you will have the experience of meeting other volunteers which tends to be great. Most volunteeting sessions are 1-4 hours depending on method.


Some Resources: 

A local cadidates office, look up your local candidates office and just drop in. They'll be eager to have you volunteer in any way you are comfortable. (Also often free food and coffee)

Also, don't feel you have already missed out, the last 2 weeks are the most important time of all.

https://multiplyyourvote2018.paperform.co

https://swingleft.org/p/call-voters

https://my.democrats.org/page/s/help-elect-democrats",asktransgender
"Is it just me, or do people not care? (on Facebook)","/rant

Bigots will be bigots, I don't care to try and change their minds. 

&amp;#x200B;

But regular people, ""friends"" on Facebook. You'd think after a week of posting about the crap in the US right now that most would at least ""like"" articles about it. Comment. Anything. But no. Silence, save for a few people I already expect to care.

That hurts more than anything else, because I can see they're posting their happy-go-lucky pictures of their pets and outings. And they respond to my ""happy"" posts consistently. I mean, it's possible FB is just filtering stuff out...but I don't know.  

It's more painful and concerning to me that the people I thought were at the very least colleagues don't seem to give a s\*\*t, no matter how imminent and crazy things are nor no-matter the fact they've met me in person and know that am not some imaginary person on the internet. Maybe they're terrified too, but it doesn't excuse being silent in this kind of a situation.

&amp;#x200B;

At least I live away from the US now. But I keep wondering if what the people that fled from Germany, or the Middle East, or any refugee in-general thought like I did. Grieving the loss of the people they loved, and grappling with utter disbelief in how little people who I thought cared about me really don't care at all.

&amp;#x200B;

Is it just me that feels this way? ",asktransgender
Are radfems only opposed one way?,"Do radfems that you have experience with believe that FTM people should also not be allowed to identify as their correct gender or do they just hate trans women?

Edit: TERFs to be specific u/GhostyMost informed me there is a distinction",asktransgender
"Just realized my sibling is trans, how can I help?","They have not come out yet but I put two and two together. They were/are suicidal, have depression, and are slowly trying to transition (at least in appearance). They're attending therapy (therapist wants them to take some tests to check their hormone levels).

I think it will divide my family quite a bit. Most likely, it'll shock my mother but my father and grandparents won't accept them. Extended family is a mixed bag. 

I can support them with housing and finance (I rent my own apartment and have a job). They are legally an adult so my parents don't know what they discuss with the therapist.

How can I prepare them for what might happen? So far I'm hoping the therapist isn't transphobic and tries to ""correct"" them and they will probably reject any therapy that will go against them transitioning. 

",asktransgender
Is there a sub (or another web forum) just for casual trans chat?,"I'm aware of r/traa, r/transgendercirclejerk and r/transpositive but I'm wondering more about subs where casual discussion is encouraged, e.g. about media with trans characters, maybe news on trans issues, and just general day-to-day stuff. Is there anything like that?",asktransgender
"I need links to studies to smack down my ""gEnDeR iS yOuR cHrOmOsOmEs FaCtS aNd LoGiC sCiEnCe"" friend","Basically he says your gender is your chromosomes, so trans people are mentally ill. He says they should be able to transition and use whatever bathroom they want, and use their correct pronouns and all that shit, but also says they're still their AGAB and nothing can change that. I need some good scientifically rigid studies to smack him down with.",asktransgender
Anger issues?,"I'm pre.. everything. Just started going to therapy and just making a lot of realizations about myself. Changed the way I dress a little bit, cut my hair, and have some friends calling me by a male name just to try it out. That's all. But I'm getting increasingly angry. I'm having a hard time controlling or managing my anger and this isn't normal for me at all. I'm 22 years old and was in a really strict religion up until about a year ago, which prevented me from understanding my true self, which is why things are just now unfolding- rapidly. Is this why I'm angry? Is this normal? Am I okay? xD ",asktransgender
Some uplifting and positive videos to show that there are people who care.,"ABC's *What Would You Do* has released another episode regarding transgender harassment. For those that don't know how the show works, it's a hidden camera show where actors perform different scenarios in public, and we're able to see how normal everyday people react or handle it. They've tackled big and controversial issues before, including abortion, homophobia, public breastfeeding, Islamophobia, interracial marriage and adoption, elder abuse, illegal immigration, homeless discrimination and domestic violence. 

The list goes on. Basically, it's a really interesting show. And it can be incredibly uplifting to see the acts of kindness, selflessness, and the good come out in people when they think they aren't being watched.

**And all the trans people are actually played by trans actors. Also be warned about the language and rhetoric being used by the antagonists, if you're triggered by that.**

[Here](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=2RHvCdb9Wa8) is he most recent one, with a transgender man out on a date with a girl and being harassed by former classmates. 

[Here](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=-r42_UzbGWU) is the one from last year, with a transgender woman shopping for clothes and being harassed by a saleswoman. 

[Here](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=USdy_BiMbRA) is a much older episode, with a transgender waitress (Carmen Carrera from RPDR) and being harassed by a customer.

I don't know, I really just wanted to share these with you guys to counteract some recent news out there.",asktransgender
Extreme fear of going under general anasthesia....,"Realistically I'll never get any gender confirming surgeries and I've accepted this. However, sometimes when I think about it, my intense fear of general anasthesia stops me from even wanting to go through with it if it were a possibility. People downplay the dangers of it like it's miniscule but many people die from going under every year so what's stopping that from happening to me? Whenever I mention this in trans circles, I get told to man up but I can't get over this. Am I alone in this?",asktransgender
underwear that compresses my dick?,anybody have any suggestions on what i can wear if i dont have to full on tuck for an outfit but my dick still sticks out just a lil? ,asktransgender
When do you start having the female orgasm?,,asktransgender
I dont feel comfortable calling myself or considering myself female. Is that internalized transphobia?,"This is a throwaway. I have a main I use but I'm starting to shy away from using it for stuff like this 

I am post op mtf. To female. I live my life as a woman but I've come to a weird place in my transition where others consider me female now more than I do myself. Whether it's my family or doctor. I feel like I am lying to others having the F beside my name. Straight men are very interested in me and I feel defensive. Like the other girls are female but I am mtf. Am I simply deluding myself out of what I am or recognizing where I came from and feel that outweighs any right to call myself that? 

If I put F on things. If people see me as female, do I have any reason to defend myself for it?

I feel almost this sense of obligation to be mtf over F because of how I assume cis women are different from me. ",asktransgender
Gendered terminology confusion,"Since I started transition, I've had real trouble with mixing up gendered terms for other people; pronouns, titles etc. I accidentally call cis guys she, and cis girls he, pretty much every day now.

It's interesting! I never did it before, though I imagine it'll pass once I'm comfortable using my preferred pronouns everywhere.

Not seen any mention of this happening, has anyone had a similar experience?   
  ",asktransgender
Looking for advice on handling this situation,"Hey all, first time posting here and to Reddit so apologies for any formatting issues or ugliness.

So a bit of quick backstory: I'm currently 17 (MtF) and have been on HRT for ~1.5 months and have a supportive family so no issues there.

Now onto the main issue. Right now I'm attending a school which is only for boys which is all levels of discomfort so I'm moving to another school, nearby but not so close, next year. The only problem is that someone I knew in primary school for all of a year or so is also at this new school. I wasn't particularly close with him but we knew each other decently. Though since he left early I've only seen him once which was about two years ago (which was well before I came out, I only did so this year).

Right now I'm not presenting as how I want to be seen primarily because of my current school situation which is definitely not accepting towards anything that isn't heavy masculine. Recently this guy I knew messaged me (we haven't talked in over a year) and asked if I was coming to his school because he said he saw my name (my current legal but far from preferred name) on the class lists for next year :/

I'm wondering what I should do. Should I talk to him directly about myself and my situation in person next year? Otherwise I'm somewhat fearful of being forced to live as someone I'm not because of a preconceived image someone has created about me. I wanted to be going by my new name and in a different uniform but it seems the only way to do that is to talk to this guy or directly out myself to the entire year group whom I don't know and isn't particularly desirable.

Thanks in advance. Take care all &lt;3",asktransgender
Why closet gay men hate transgender women so much?,"In the years I have been out as trans I have been noticing that among friends, family and coworkers. Do you have similar experiences with men that clearly have a issue with being suppresing their real sexual preferences and reflecting it as pure hate against transgender persons specially MTFs?

&amp;#x200B;

Edit: Title should be 'Why some closet gay men hate transgender women so much?' , Im not trying to make a prejudice. I just want to know if you had similar experiences and how you were dealing with them. ",asktransgender
Need some help figuring myself out.,"So lately I've realised I would prefer to be a women. If I could become one easily I wouldn't hesitate, I even picked out a name, Emily. However I don't particularly hate being male and given how much work and stress it would be I doubt I'll transition any time soon. I just have no idea how I feel at the moment or how to identify myself and I figured this would be the place to maybe find some answers. Sorry about my rambling, maybe I just needed to get this off my chest. 


",asktransgender
"Only able to start laser hair removal for my face, but not for my body- other recommendations?","What do you girls do? Parents are only able to help me with laser for my face, and for my body I'll have to look for other options of removal. Pretty hairy all around, dark coarse black hair. Mixed white and Ethiopian. What do you girls do for body hair removal? I hate shaving and want some sort of long term hair removal substitution that will leave me feeling better about my body. I just came out as trans and have not started HRT yet. Waxing, epilating, etc. I'm just clueless about what road I should take. Thanks.",asktransgender
"Help, im starting to look like a boy","So puberty is really starting take its toll on me and I hate it but I can't get any medical stuff yet, is there anyway to stop testosterone that I can do at home?",asktransgender
How to deal with friends and loved ones outing you intentionally?,"For the third time in as many weeks, I’ve had a loved one out me, this time I found it’s my partner’s 8-year-old son who has gone and told all his classmates that I’m transgender. 

I found this out because, as I was getting coffee at our local convenience store, I heard “that’s the one my daughter was talking about” whispered from one clerk to another - women that had unequivocally thought I was just another woman before then, and dealt with the snickers and “thank you...SIR” as I was walking out the door. 

Prior to this, a trans friend made mention that I’m post-op to another person of indeterminate gender when she thought I wasn’t paying attention. As well as my family making special mention of me being transgender while I was applying for a car loan. 

When does this shit end? I told my partner’s kid, in no uncertain terms, that what he did could get me killed (we live in a conservative part of Texas), and he just shrugged, and my partner got angry at me. 

I’m lost at this juncture, and don’t know what to do. ",asktransgender
"Self-lubricating method (GCS, SRS, whatever you wanna call it)","I live in Canada (Toronto) and spoke to my therapist recently regarding my preferences for GCS. 

I've been trying to take a deep dive into research regarding the self lubricating method (Dr. Suporn, Thai doctors) and she brought up that she's heard some bad things about this method, particularly that - because it uses a piece of intestine, that it can create a smell that some people would associate with, well....intensities. 

Anyone have any more details? Personal experience?",asktransgender
"Sometimes, the thought of me transitioning is the only thing keeping me going.",Which is pretty ironic considering it would probably mess me up even more.,asktransgender
"[advice] Eating disorders, medications, and HRT","Hello,

I'm u/crushthatbit, and I'm about to start the process for getting HRT. I have a few questions that may be better answered by doctors, however some of these experiences are things you might share.

First, I have an eating disorder that has been persistent since my childhood. See r/ARFID for more of what it's like. Basically severe selection of foods, so much so, that I must supplement my body with vitamins to function normally.

Second, I've also been on Risperdal since I was 15, and apparently there's only one thread on this sub that talks about Risperdal, and one commenter on that thread did mention it lowers T levels.

So not so much medical advice, but your experiences with EDs and medications that lower T levels will be helpful as to what my next steps are, and whether I might even be able to start HRT.

Thank you. 🤗",asktransgender
Can you get marriage certificates reissued after name changes in YOUR state? California is a NO.,"Has anyone dealt with marriage certificate changes after your legal name change?

I was married in California nearly 30 years ago. My spouse and I are both changing our names to our chosen names, and I just learned that while I CAN get my California birth certificate reissued with my chosen name (not an amendment), marriage certificates can not be reissued. They offered, instead, an amendment to our marriage certificate stating we are ""now known as.""

In order to have both of our chosen names (not our birth names) on a marriage certificate within California we must divorce and remarry.

Seriously, how did the activists spearheading the California documents issue miss this one? This totally outs anyone who transitions after marriage.

However, in our current state, Washington, the marriage application legal statement verbiage is ""*... I do not currently have a spouse or registered domestic partner other than the other party to this marriage.*"" Thus, I interpret it as: if we get married again in Washington, we do NOT have to divorce first, because LOOPHOLE.",asktransgender
How many of yall have had issues with low testosterone after an orchie or similar procedure?,"I'm mainly asking because I'd hate to take testosterone after getting something like that done, but I just wanna know if thats a thing. I'm talking so low it endangers your health low.",asktransgender
Finding top surgeons [FTM],"I'm trying to find a top surgeon in/near New York, and while I found a couple names, its really hard to find before/after pictures, people's expierences, and that kind of ancedotal stuff to help me pick which one would be best for me. Does anyone know any surgeons/resources to find good ones?

&amp;#x200B;

(this is my first surgery in general and im trying not to freak out, but whups, im freaking out, aahhhhh!!!)",asktransgender
"PSA to all trans communists, now is NOT the time to skip voting","I am not communist or socialist but I know some trans people are, but now is not the time to do a litmus test. Democrats will pass an amendment to the Civil Rights Act if they win the house, so it is in your best interest to vote for them or else be erased by the trump administration",asktransgender
Justice Department files brief with the Supreme Court asking that businesses be allowed to discriminate against workers based on sexual orientation and gender identity.,"DOJ says transgender discrimination is lawful. Stay vigilant friends, rough times ahead. If you're American, make sure you are [registered to vote](http://www.vote.gov) and turn out in November.

https://news.bloomberglaw.com/daily-labor-report/justice-department-says-transgender-discrimination-is-lawful?utm_source=twitter&amp;utm_medium=lawdesk&amp;utm_campaign=4pm",asktransgender
(MtF) is it possible my face masculinized while on HRT?,"I am having a breakdown. I can't tell if I'm just become disillusioned with my face over time, or if my face really has gotten more masculine. I never thought my jawline was as bad as it is.

multiple times my dose was going up and down and I had a lot of small amounts of days or weeks without estrogen. just recently I was out for 4-5 days, I started 3.5mg of injections every 4-5 days yesterday. 

I feel like giving up, this is so hard",asktransgender
Anybody else homeless?,"My life is a fucking nightmare! This is the fucking best, so wonderful.",asktransgender
Could it be a phase???,"I'm 17 and have been questioning since 16.
I've always been worried that my dysphoria is fake and that i only want to transition because i feel like i would look better not as a man. I kinda want it to be a phase but if my body cant change i will be sad. 
So, what's the chance it's a phase?",asktransgender
I need some help with this,"I tried making a list to help me sort my thoughts and work through this cause lists usually do help me, but I’m literally stumped on this one. If any of you on here would be able to read through what I’ve put and give me your thoughts/advice I would really appreciate it. I’m starting to hit a point where I don’t know what to do and it’s messing with me more and more every day. I’m 17 now, but the idea that I might be trans came to me when I was around 13. Ever since I’ve been really confused and have looked for help, but I don’t know anyone who is experienced with this kind of thing 

Anyways, here’s my list of thoughts 

Reasons I think I’m trans

- I want primary and secondary female sex traits 
- I want to wear makeup and female clothing
- I want to present as female in my everyday life
- I still have a desire to be female even if it doesn’t change much (as in how I live my life)
- If I were to push a button to make me female permanently, I’m 99% sure I wouldn’t regret it 
- I’ve considered and been fine with delaying college and a career in favor of a transition
- I prefer to play as a female character in any games I play, video games or tabletop

Reasons I’m not transgender 
- I’m don’t completely hate being a boy
- I don’t act very feminine 
- I hide my emotion 
- I’d be super ugly anyways
- I tried coming out to my parents and my mom thinks I’m sick in the head and confused
- It would cause more problems than I already have (expenses, family and friends leaving me, social ostracism)
- If I’m not 100% sure, I might regret transitioning and hate my life even more
- Potential (degenerate) fetishism that I’m not aware I have
- Religious upbringing that only confused me more about my sexuality and gender
- Putting off other life decisions to transition 
- I don’t know if I have dysphoria 
- Being refused housing or a job because of my state being “red”
- I could get murdered if I don’t pass
",asktransgender
Anybody know of protest for DJTs bullshit to erase us in DFW?,"Hey, anybody from the Dallas Fort-Worth area know of any protest for Donald’s latest anti trans bigotry?",asktransgender
how do you know your trans?,"I'm sorry if the title seems insensitive, im asking for myself because i don't know if im trans or not. i really hate my face and body and i play as girls in games i want to seriously roleplay in. I briefly entertained the idea that i was genderfluid a few years ago, but i forgot about it because i felt like i was a fraud wearing the mask of trans people for attention. I don't really care about typically female things, but i don't care about typically male things either. do trans people feel like this? am i just confused?",asktransgender
Does anyone know what the sub name is for the MtF breast timeline sub?,"Yep, awkward question. But I'm just under 2 weeks away from my intake appointment and hoooly shit am I excited, ready to go through the whole process where I unhealthily get myself overexcited for my transition by looking at others' progress. As one does.",asktransgender
How to get a close shave daily with very sensitive skin?,"In order to pass, I need to do some degree of shaving everyday based on how fast my facial hair grows in. However, my face is incredibly sensitive and I only manage to get a clean shave every couple days - with every other shave either missing a lot of stubble or giving me razor burn. Both of these leave me very dysphoric, and I think it's the primary thing preventing me from passing. I've tried different shaving creams &amp; razors and continually struggle with this.  

  

What can I do to better my physical and emotional comfort?",asktransgender
FTMs: hip and knee pain?,"Since starting T I notice sometimes I get sore knees and hips. No matter how I sit or stand, my knees hurt! And I know it's not the cold weather because it was a problem for me in the summer too. Am I sitting too much? Or is this a T thing?",asktransgender
Is it possible to have a neo-vagina constructed while keeping the penis intact?,"I know there is a new technique where they use the peritoneum lining to make the vaginal canal now limiting the need to use scrotal skin other than to form labia. Would it possible to construct the vagina but instead of fashioning the penis into a clitoris just to keep it as is? 

I am starting to think I’m eventually going to want to have an orchiectomy so I no longer have to take anti-androgens. I love my penis and so does my fiancé so I wouldn’t want to get rid of it. But it would be cool if this were an option. ",asktransgender
Im done.,"Im think Im done. I can't do this anymore. At least for the time being.

I can't help but feel it's a dirty little secret.

People say do what makes me happy - but that's just it - I don't know what will. I wish I could push a whole reset button on my life never mind just gender. I've wondered whether my indecisiveness is just because I don't care. I don't care about sex. I don't care about gender. I don't care about anything. Life is what it is. It sucks being a man. But it sucks being a woman. Do I really want to hang around people  who ostracise me for my current gender?

The thought of myself as a sexual woman makes me feel horrible. And I hate my current sexual identity. 

I don't know. I can't think. I've packed everything away. Im just going to try to be happy in myself.",asktransgender
I don't know what to do any more... Help sisters and brothers!,"Hello everyone, 

&amp;#x200B;

How to begin? 

&amp;#x200B;

For almost six months we have been together, grown close and love one another more than we have with anyone else, per our own accounts. He doesn't mind me being trans or if I detransitioned. However, he is no fan of neo-vaginas. He says they're not real vaginas, tech for trans people is in it's ""bronze age"", they typically do not look good compared to some real ones (from what he has seen and he says he has seen a lot) and that he's just opposed to it because of it. He is also opposed to marriage and involving the state, hating traditions and so on, expressing vehement dislike of it.

&amp;#x200B;

He said that in a relationship, compromise is necessary and that he is willing to compromise for some but not for everything, to go against all he believes in and that if I picked to have bottom surgery, which he sees as the body treating it like a wound, pleasure is severely reduced and that it's not a natural vagina, as well as he believes it does harm by the doctor and does not believe that is morally OK, to have me pick between getting bottom surgery or marriage, but not both.

&amp;#x200B;

I love him so much, but I want both, desperately and I don't know what to do. He said I could get the surgery, but that I shouldn't marry him then, but he'd stay with me, just not deal with the legality of marriage. I want the white dress, I want the ceremony, but I also want surgery. The balls get in the way, the dick is thick (I have a rather thick one according to him, above average) so it just gets in the way and I feel in order to transitions I have to go the full mile, and I want to. I want to feel more authentic and organic as much as I can.

&amp;#x200B;

What should I do? I don't hate him, but he thinks I'm mad. Truth be told, I simply don't know what to do. It's basically an ultimatum in my eyes. I fear if I get the surgery he will love me less, despite saying he wouldn't (he wouldn't want to screw me there nor would he like the appearance of it).

&amp;#x200B;

How do I handle this situation? I've spoke to him multiple times about it but I'm left with the two options. To me, it seems asinine and illogical since there are hundreds of things he disagrees with that I might agree with, so why treat it like a false dichotomy and compromise on those but nothing else? Please help me sisters and brothers. I truly need guidance on this. I don't want to lose him.

&amp;#x200B;

Sincerely,

&amp;#x200B;

Autumn",asktransgender
Thailand vs Home County(Netherlands) for GRS,"Hello everyone,

I already posted a facebook post in a local transgender group, but I'd figure I'd ask here as well.

  
So I got off the phone today with my insurance provider who said that as of 2018(so it can decrease on increase) that for my current naturapolis(insurance plan) I will only get covered € 10712.23 currently. If I were to change that however I could increase that up to € 14282,79(as of 2018) with a restitutiepolis(another insurance plan) in 2019. 

&amp;#x200B;

Now I considered going to Dr. Bank in Suporn's clinic in Thailand, but feared the difficulties it might bring.

&amp;#x200B;

On the other hand I also take into consideration the issues I may have in the Netherlands. That issue mainly being that a rapport shows that the need for a second recovering surgery is at a rate of 81%(21 out of 26 patients in their rapport).

I currently have about €5200,- in savings so I am not sure if I can afford to even go with Dr. Bank.

  
As for where I live there are three surgeons I can go to. Özer, Buncamper and Boumann in rough order of overall experience. I'd get a regular penile inversion with extra skin likely from my testes due to me lacking material.

&amp;#x200B;

One thing that also drives me crazy is the waiting list that I am currently in. Personally myself I don't deal well with not having exact information about when and where something will happen(probably because of my autism).  
Which also brings me to my point that there are very few examples of sugeries done over hear, which makes me distrustful of the whole affair over here

  
The pro's for me sticking to my home country are:

* Lower costs
* Closer to home for possible recovery surgeries
* A familiar environment.

The pro's for me going to Thailand would be:

* A *potentially* better surgery
* Clear dates
* Clear rough estimates of end result.

Thanks in advance",asktransgender
Have you experienced negative health outcomes as a result of chest binding?," Your moderators have given me approval to share my research questionnaire with you:

[https://lboro.onlinesurveys.ac.uk/an-investigation-of-the-negative-health-outcomes-of-bindin](https://lboro.onlinesurveys.ac.uk/an-investigation-of-the-negative-health-outcomes-of-bindin)

If you're over 18 years old and have had experience with chest binding, we would really appreciate seeing your response to the survey. 

&amp;#x200B;

The survey has been designed to build on the findings from existing research and hopes to discover:

\-What causes negative health outcomes associated with chest binding?

\-What are the community perceptions of safe and unsafe practices?

\-Does user behaviour have a connection to negative health outcomes?

&amp;#x200B;

We will be using this data and information gathered from other research procedures to develop methods of making chest binding safer. You can keep track of the progress of the project by viewing the project blog:

[https://saferbindingupdateblogmk.tumblr.com/](https://saferbindingupdateblogmk.tumblr.com/)

&amp;#x200B;

We want to make sure that the research is informed by the experiences and views of a wide range of people. Thank you for contributing to the project.

&amp;#x200B;

Kind Regards,

M. Kilburn, Loughborough University",asktransgender
Career Advice,"Hey Y'all,

I am a 20 something trans woman that is graduating in college this spring with a degree in Art History and a minor in Business Communications in the USA. I wanted to be able to travel after I graduate and might try to get a job somewhere in Europe. I am early in my transition and I was wondering what advice people could give a person that is about to start their professional career and also is in transition. 

It is stressful to be in transition and just be entering my adult life and balancing supporting my self while being able to transition fully is a bitch. 

Well, I would love to hear your thoughts! 

Thank you!
Ella ",asktransgender
My parents decided to try and interrupt my life again,"There is not much I can do about this, I am mainly venting.

On top of all of the troubling news lately Tuesday night I got a txt from my dad. After a childhood full of gaslighting, emotional abuse, some physical abuse, constant denial of who I am, and almost 5 years of not speaking to me after I came out them I don't want to talk. They will never be my parents again, I am not looking to mend fences with my abusers. But why does everything have to pile on at once? I didn't want to deal with them right now, or ever again for that matter. I guess when it rains, it pours...",asktransgender
"As a cis ally, what can I do right now to help fight for Trans rights?",,asktransgender
"first time buying girl clothes, help with measurements","Im not on HRT or anything I just want to explore my gender identity for now.

I'm a little lost my measurements are all over the place compared to that chart.

Height: 5'7''

Bust: \~40

Shoulders: \~19

Sleeve: \~23

Clothe sizing: [https://imgur.com/a/8tVou3x](https://imgur.com/a/8tVou3x)

Bust is right in the middle, sleeves are lower than medium size and my shoulders are larger than the largest size :O. I dont get it im so tiny... :3 Anyway which size should I pick? If you have any general tips on how to pick the right women size with a man body, that'd be amazing

Also I had 50pounds to lose, now ive 40 pounds to go to be where I want to be but only 20 to go to be considered of an ''healthy weight'' so keep that in mind if that matters.",asktransgender
Sooo my housemate saw my painted nails...,"Should I just come out? I’m still questioning and I have about a week until my first appointment with a gender therapist. Are there any excuses I could make as to why I have painted toe nails??? Fuck. 

Ive known the guy a long time, but I don’t want to make things awkward because i live with him and all my questioning could amount to nothing. 

Fuuuck, what do I doooo 😰",asktransgender
Switching from pills to injections -- no/low dose AA?,"Hey all. I've been on HRT for four years now. The last three, I've been on 4mg oral Estradiol and 200mg Spiro daily. I've recently been made aware that apparently oral Estradiol puts you at higher risk for clots. Which is wonderful, seeing as I've had driving jobs since I started and my original Endo \*knew\* I drove for a living. And, I've heard bits about how spiro is bad in the past, but I've been learning more about it -- and I really want to drop my dose and/or get off it ASAP. Injections and low/no spiro can work, right? My T level is nuked. I have an appointment with PP next week to discus this, just figured I'd ask the hivemind.  


I'm constantly tired, I have literally no energy most days. I have the dreaded ""brain fog"" and some short term memory issues. Like, I can function, but I forget a lot. I'm dehydrated a hell of a lot -- I try to hydrate as best as I can, but I get sick from the dehydration and the constant Florida heat super easy. I've got the ""Spiro Gut"" as well. I also probably should get checked for Osteoperosis/arthritis, because my joints snap, crackle, pop and ache like nobody's business. They didn't before HRT and they've progressively gotten worse, but I'm poor.",asktransgender
location for patches,"hey girls, quick question; I'm supposed to be moving from 1 vivelle-dot patch at a time to two.  Is it OK to put them next to each other, or do they have to be in separate areas of the body?",asktransgender
(MO) Is it really that easy to change legal gender?,"I'm a minor living in boone county, Missouri, however I was born in Indiana. I'm planning to get my birth certificate amended to represent my gender and by the time this will matter I would have already gotten a name change, both in Missouri and on my Indiana birth certificate.

All I can find for a Missouri gender marker change is to fill out a small form with the DOR that states what I want my gender to be and a physician's reference that they agree with it. I figured it would be linked with my birth certificate but I can't find that as a requirement for it. Am I right in assuming that I the DOR form only changes it for my license and not for anything else? Do I also need to go to court in Indiana with the appropriate forms?",asktransgender
Is anyone else's name one you've previously said you'd name a future child?,Just wondering how many of us there are lol,asktransgender
picking up my first perscription of estrogen later what should i expect,,asktransgender
Am I a transgender?,"In short: Can I be a trans male if I was girly as a kid?

Lomg version:
Hello, and thank you for giving attention to my post. I'm someone who thinks oneself is a trans male. But for some reasons I wrote below, I simply can't be so sure.
When I was a kid, I was just like a normal girl. Played with both my dolls, and sometimes with cars. Usually wanted to be a princess or something, but also ran around saying ""I am the Lightning McQueen!"" and repaired the car with my father.

I remember, when I was like 4(it may be 3 or 5, I don't remember), we were going to park with my father, he was taking his shirt off and I wanted to do the same. He let me, so I did the same. When we go back to home, I told what we did to my mom happily, her expression changed. I asked if I did something wrong, she said no, hesitatingly. Of course, me as a kid had no idea why she act like that.

It was much before I knew what gender is, so not going to say that it was because I was a boy in soul. That's just a possibility.

I had long hair my entire life, and always liked it. I still like long hair, prefering to cut it short tho.
But when I cut it short when I was 3, I loved it too.

I was like that until I start going to school, doing what I feel like doing. But after I start going to school and see girls have to wear pink shirts and males has to wear blue, girls are being friends with girls and boys are with boys, and stuff like that, I started to fear being like a boy. Like, I was scared of wearing boy clothes or doing something boys do without knowing the reason. Only thing I know about gender was if someone says I'm alike with a boy, that can be my father, firend or a cartoon character, this is something bad and I should avoid this.
Now thinking about it, I was kinda jealous of boys. Like, I wanted to get treated like them but didn't know that(or maybe it's just me that making this up), wanted to play with the toys they do, but my best friend didn't want when I ask, so I didn't buy them.

Always forced and made myself believe that I like some boys, because all the Disney princesses had a prince, however I was just lying to myself.
At 3rd grade, our friendship with my old best friend died and we became friends with a boy. At 4th grade, we were sitting at the same desk, but even though we both were the smart students, we stopped to listening the lesson and begun to talk with each other all the day. Teacher thought we were dating and made me sit with another boy. Again with this boy, we were talking to each other all the day. As my other friend said, we were making too much noise.
Even after starting to middle school, we remained as good friends with the boy I started to talk at 3rd grade.

At that times my body started to change. My chest was no longer flat. I always hated the things that were growing there, always thought that was because I was growing faster than other girls but now I doubt that was the reason. I once squeezed them, asking 'why do you have to grow, can't you just go back in?' and since that day, they had something like scar on them.
I many times cried because I had them. Like, everytime I notice them. It was so rare that I was fine with my body.
Also until 5th grade, I was thinking if a girl and a boy spend so much time together, the girl with get pregnant, and my best friend was a boy. I told that fear of mine to my mother and she told me girls can't have a baby begore getting 'period', and even after that, you should have 'sex' to get pregnant. I was thinking it is something only dirty and bad people do until that day.
That was the day my fear of getting period has started. I always asked my mom ""I will not get it soon, right?"" and begun to pray for not getting it. I was thinking it would happen after years, and I would be ready for it when it happens. Tho I got it much sooner than I expect.

My mother was watching a movie and I wanted to join, it was about a girl who has a penis inside her body, and had to translation into a man to survive after she gaves birth to a baby. It put one more fear in my mind ""what if I'm like her?""

My mind was fighting with itself at that point. I didn't exactly know what a lesbian is, nor have feelings torwards a girl. But I was praying for being completely girl and not being a lesbian, and never getting period. Also was praying for my body to be normal and not over-grown. I didn't want to be a women, I was just a kid and wanted to stay as one. The idea of being something between a girl and a boy was just scaring me, I have a homophobic dad and for some reasons, thought LGBT was disgusting.

After a few months, I got it. It was going to be a long holiday, my father was coming home, I was playing with my new toys and nothing could be better. I was just happy. Then, I saw it as I go to toilet. There it was. I was just not believing. This wasn't happening, right? It was a dream, there was years for it to happen, or maybe wouldn't ever happen to me. I forced myself to cry, because it was something bad and shouldn't happen. Wanted to get my mom's attention so maybe she could do something. Maybe I could take hormones to stop it..
But in fact, I wasn't feeling sadness, I was just shocked. Like, I know, it's foolish that being so sad about it. But when I was 11, I couldn't believe it. It was end of the world for me. I was now a women, no return, everything has ended.

I forced my mom to go to doctor, but in the end I had to live with it. I was sad because of my body shape, but that one was unbelievable..


My childhood passed like that. And, I never feel completed. I always wanted to have lots of loys, dresses, extremely long hair, more than one of everything I have... I was always wanting more and wasn't feeling completed.

At the end of 6th grade, when I was still 11 years old and the perios wasn't regular, I met with a girl. She is even now my friend. She asked me to watch anime(Jaoanese cartoon), the series named Fullmetal Alchemist. It was when I understand being male is not a bad thing. Both females and males are human. Both have likes and dislikes, bith have personalities. Males weren't disgusting creatures. I had male friends. Were they disgusting? No. Were actors in Star Wars disgusting? No. Were, even though they are cartoon, this anime characters were disgusting
? No. 
I, to be honest, didn't ever see my classmates as males and females. Yes, they were girl or boy but all were just kids to me. I don't know why I thought being male is a bad thing.
My friend begun to say I am alike with a character. I liked the character so it wasn't bad to hear. However, I was a real human and he was just a cartoon character. I shouldn't be similar with something which doesn't exists.
I asked to my mom if I'm alike with that character. (Yes, I made her watch too.) she said ""No. You are a girl and he is a boy, you can't be alike even if you want."" that sentence of her was killing me. I didn't know why, just, it was making me extremely uncomfortable and even angry...

After a few months, I started to watch another anime. One character was saying ""She is talking like a boy."" for another. That made me extremely jealous, being alike with a male. Since then, I'm deepening my voice.

 I met with a trans boy(, at leats last time I see him, he was like that. Not sure if it was temporary). He wasn't disgusting from any angle. He was my friend and was a nice person. That way, I stopped to think LGBT is disgusting and became able to see how foolish I was thinking.

Meanwhile I was getting more tomboyish everyday. I was no longer able to stand wearing girl clothes. It was making me feel like sh*t. My hair was long but I was hiding it in my clothes.

Still remembering the first day I wear a male pyjama. I was feeling.. I don't know, maybe more completed? Just, that feeling was awesome.
It was not long before my 13th birthday, that I noticed that I was no longer able to myself as a girl. I was a boy, I was seeing myself as one. But I still didn't know how far translation can go, so my plan was getting the top surgery and there were some ways to stop getting period, doing one if them.
I was so happy and was feeling more like a boy everyday. I brought a binder, cut my hair short and people was now thinking I'm a boy. It was like a dream to come true..
I was still sometimes feeling bad for my body shape, and mostly for the thing that has the happen every single month. But when I don't have it, and had my binder on, I was most likely happy. I was no longer a girl in people's eyes.
Then I learned more about translation.

After a while, I made a social media account as a cis male. I was roleplaying.
However, after a few months of being happy, I saw a pitcure on my timeline, then the rest. It was anime porn, which we call hentai. It was also the first time I saw porn. Like, I basically knew how to do it but didn't ever see.

It made a depression begun. I was someone who rarely cries until that day, but since then, I got much more sensitive, about that gender subjects mostly.

When I see a flat person, a male, it makes me want to end everything. Not that I will, it just makes me feel like it. 

(By the way,I was thinking that depression is about to end but now seeing I'm much worse than before seeing it.)

Also, after seeing porn, I'm now doubting from my gender identity. I can't feel. Before it,I was seeing myself as a male but now I see it's too good to be real. Yes, even when I was happy, I wanted to be a cis boy and bit a transgender but now, I'm scared of these feelings of mine to be temporary, not being a transgender and have to live in that body of mine forever.

About a month ago,I got misgendered. I didn't understand that if I felt bad, but tears begun to flow down a while after and then I went to cut my hair, I wasn't cutting it in a while.


Sorry if that's confusing, I'm writing that for hours and most likely I didn't use proper English and made many typos.

Also thank you very much for reading until here. I would really be happy if someone can help. Ask me if there is anything that you can't understand. I'm now 14 years old and using male pronouns and stuff. Planning to start T and get surgery when I grow up, yet also not wanting to regret. So please comment,do you think can I really be a trans male?",asktransgender
How can I help my brother from abroad?,"My brother (FTM, 15,) recently came out to our parents. They haven't been outright cruel things to him, but they do things like calling him female pronouns and his dead names. He already has documented depression, and with the recent declaration from the Trump administration, I want to help him. However, I live about an hour away from him because of college, and as such I only see him for about a day a month. He isn't very open about his emotions unless you directly  ask him, so I'm afraid he'll be having a crisis and I won't even know it's happening. If you were in his position, what would you want from your older brother?",asktransgender
How's my face? (Brutal honesty welcome),"I'm really dysphoric about my face. My friends tell me it's pretty feminine for a ""guy"", but I'm having a hard time believing that. Pre-everything by the way.

How's the internet gonna help? Well, you guys are pretty unbiased since you don't know me. Be brutal if you need to.

http://imgur.com/a/Ih61Oxp",asktransgender
"Came out to my dad, and it didn't end well. Advice?","So, last night I (16F) decided to suck it up and come out to my dad, knowing that he's fairly right wing politically (he's openly racist, and says awful things about his LGBT coworkers). 

He called me a monster and said that I ruined his life and he'll never have a ""proper son"", and then left me in the house alone. I haven't talked to him since, but he hasn't told anyone else and he'll likely be coming home from work today. 

How can I fix this? He might have awful beliefs, but he's my dad and I don't want my own selfish desires to get in the way of that..",asktransgender
Top Surgery with Dr. Kitzmiller?,"Has anyone ever gotten top surgery done by Dr. Kitzmiller in Cincinnati, OH or heard anyone else getting their's done with this surgeon?",asktransgender
"Having even more gender confusion (surprising, right)","(FtM)

This boy is asking me to go to a dance with him- that requires wearing a dress. I really, really don't want to wear a dress, but I want to go for him. I value him as a friend, and he's been asking me to go for the last 30 minutes. I don't think my parents would let me get a tuxedo last minute, either. 

I'm seriously questioning if I'm *actually* a boy right now because I was, well, feeling confident with a female body just earlier today. I'm seriously so confused right now. Sometimes I'm completely okay with being female, and I even *want* to be female, but other times, like the past few months, I've debated killing myself because I don't have a male body. 

And, no, I can't talk to a gender therapist because my parents won't let me. 

Should I just *try* to be female? I want to be a boy- I really do. I've been trying to convince everyone around me - friends, family, etc - that for the past 6 months. And then boom- suddenly today, after my therapist appointment, I start playing with the breast things and think I look cute. 

Maybe I'm just a masculine girl? But I want a penis. I don't want breasts. Usually. Sometimes I do want to look like a girl and be 'cute', but I usually want to be masculine looking, and be a boy. 

I need some advice for both things. Going to this dance and gender shit. ",asktransgender
Pretty sure I’m trans (mtf) but where to start?,"I’m 20 and have all the common “symptoms” if you will. I’m in college and still live with my fairly conservative parents. I love wearing women’s cloths and being more feminine and I hate most of my body hair especially on my face. Over the last year or so I’ve had more and more thoughts of wishing I was born a girl. 

The problem is that my parents who are giving me a place to stay for free and helping pay my way through college are kind of conservative. I remember asking my dad about gay people a while back and asked him what he would do if I was gay and he responded “I’d punch your boyfriend in the face.” He’s since said he loves me for who I am no matter what but that’s stuck with me. Similarly my mom is racist and more conservative but I’ve never talked to her about LGBT issues so I don’t know where she stands.

But I feel like coming out as trans would be too much for my parents. I can’t see it going well at first. So I don’t know where to start. I don’t think I can see a gender therapist or get any prescription without them knowing (on there health insurance plan in the US.) 

Does anyone have any advice on where to start or any stories of coming out as trans to a similar family situation? ",asktransgender
Does hrt worsen mental health?,"Hello I am a little over 3 months on estrogen. I suffer from borderline personality disorder and i have found that since i started hormones, every now and then i have had anxious episodes that are worse than most that ive had prior to starting hrt. Does this happen to anyone else, is this normal? I ask because its driving me crazy, id like to know why this stuff is happening to me, i feel like im going crazy sometimes! ",asktransgender
Should I change my legal name and gender ASAP? &amp; How do I prepare to leave the US if it comes to that?,"Depressed and struggling to figure these questions out on my own... so any help is appreciated. &lt;3   
(CA, USA) I'm nonbinary but have been on T for several months and pass as ""male"", so I would change my legal sex to M for safety reasons. My name I'm not 100% sure on because I picked it only about 6 months ago but... I'm scared of the situation deteriorating further and it getting harder and harder to get my documents changed.   


I think I qualify for the fee waiver, so is it better to just get everything changed now even if I might need to change my name again later? Or are there any reasons you'd want to avoid changing your legal name repeatedly?   


also... what else can/should I do to prepare? I have my passport so will be trying to get that updated along with everything else... but IDK, I just. don't know what to do if/when things keep getting worse. ",asktransgender
How long did fat redistribution take for you guys?,"Long story short, stressed from everything woke up feeling more bleh. I know more laser may help simply due to hair but I’m still paranoid and wondering how long it took you guys for changes",asktransgender
I'm scared to make my life worse than it already is,"So basically, I wanna be a girl. But my life is already quite hard and I feel like starting this now will only add more to the struggle, also I'm very socially anxious and wouldn't even have a clue of how to come out. I really need some help ",asktransgender
Questions about what I've read FTM,"I've been doing a bit of research on phalloplasty, and I still haven't found the answers to a few questions I have, so I thought I should ask.

I've read that there can be complications when it comes to peeing from this surgery when trying to redirect everything and even complications that can arise afterward. How common is this? What's the best option to do when it comes to this operation?",asktransgender
Laser hair removal and epilation for a hairy trans woman,"Hi. I came out to my parents recently, mom a few months ago and dad a few weeks ago. They said they're willing to help me pay for my treatments, which I told them includes laser hair removal since I have a hairy body and face. I'm apparently a good candidate for laser, as told to me by the laser technician who I had a consultation with today. Once I got to see the prices, it was apparent to me that we would not be able to do the full body laser treatment. Traditionally, I'd always shave my face and body. However, I just got tired of doing it and wanted something more permanent, to make me feel like a woman does, with less prickly and coarse hairs that a man has, especially for the face. 

My dad and mom said they're willing to pay for my face, which is $165 dollars per single treatment, using a Quanta laser. 

My questions:

1) Is a Quanta laser really the 'authentic' laser? My technician told me that IPL isn't actually a laser and that their laser they use at their clinic is the only one that can actually be called 'laser'.. I'd love to hear if this is true or not. They claim it yields better results.

2) is there a problem with doing laser for face right now, while using an epilator for my body, and having some similar results to laser for my body? The price for a single full body hair removal treatment is $2,100 or $9,200 for a package of eight treatments, and since we can't do that right now, I wanted to know if epilating my body would provide similar short term or long term results to laser.

3) Is starting laser at one place, then resuming treatments at a different place going to be okay? My family is considering moving soon and since I don't have a job yet (just graduated college) I would like to move with them, but it would suck if that harmed my laser treatments in some way.

4) I have heard that laser can be less effective once starting HRT because it thins and lightens the hairs. Should I put off HRT for this?

I'm hoping my body is receptive to HRT and that HRT can remove most of my body hairs, at least reducing them to that of which a biological lady has. Hopefully epilating and hrt will do the trick, but just curious on what you guys' take is on my approach. To me, my face is the most important aspect of my self confidence, and if I can get my facial hair removed permanently, I can deal with the rest via epilating or waxing or hrt. 

&amp;#x200B;

Thanks! Just needed to get these ideas out of my head, would love some advice or input based on your experiences with HRT, laser, and/or epilating. 

&amp;#x200B;

P.S. does epilation hurt super bad near the buttocks or genitals as it is made out to be? Kind of makes me nervous, but hell i'm willing to do anything to get rid of these hairs in some way that is better than shaving.. just seeing the prickly hairs poking out of my stomach/chest/legs makes me sick to my stomach.",asktransgender
"NYTimes - Intersex, and Erased Again","From: [https://www.nytimes.com/2018/10/23/opinion/trump-transgender-memo-intersex.html](https://www.nytimes.com/2018/10/23/opinion/trump-transgender-memo-intersex.html)

&amp;#x200B;

Where does the Trump administration’s broadside against transgender rights leave people like me?

Imagine knowing that every aspect of your physiology, from your height to your cup size, was chosen off a menu — not by nature but by doctors and family members.

From the second I was born, decisions were made by medical professionals about which of two gender categories my body should fit into. For me, surgery to remove my gonads as an infant was the first stop on the track to female — but the train didn’t stop there. My family was consulted about how 5 feet 8 inches seemed like an optimal height, and informed on how hormone levels and sequences could be measured to achieve just that. The ideal breast size for my frame was also discussed; I can still remember the male doctor nodding approvingly. I was also given a dilator before even hitting my teens, so my vagina would be ready for penetrative sex.

“Disconcerting” would be one — euphemistic — way to put it.

I was born intersex, with XY chromosomes but Complete Androgen Insensitivity. If you’re not sure what that means, I don’t blame you. By some estimates, [almost 2 percent of the world’s population](https://interactadvocates.org/wp-content/uploads/2017/03/INTERSEX101.pdf) is intersex like me but is still living in the shadows because of societal stigma and shame. Stigma knows no borders, and neither did my body, apparently: I didn’t respond to androgen hormones in the womb, and thus stopped developing at a certain point — a point between what we consider to be the binary sexes, hence “intersex.” I was ultimately born with female anatomy on the outside but with internal testes instead of ovaries. As a result, doctors, alongside my parents, decided when I was still a baby that I would be raised as a girl. This decision has shaped the course of my entire life but was made without my consent.

Where would such a change leave me? My body would throw this Trumpian test for a loop — my naturally occurring genitalia don’t match the “correct” genetic code in this forced-binary paradigm that seeks to override biology.

Here’s another curveball: What Mr. Trump’s memo defines as “unchangeable” is anything but. I know this because the process of realizing a gender via hormones and surgeries, analogous to the process the administration is seeking to marginalize and discourage among trans people, is one imposed on intersex children all the time — but in our case, it’s done before we can understand or agree. It’s not just the government that is forcing an unnatural gender binary; medicine has been doing so for ages.

The gonadectomy surgery performed on my body was internal but opened the floodgates for a sequence of physical alterations that would affect my appearance and identity. Any subsequent decisions made about my body that involved me, at an age of informed consent, were constrained by this first choice: to render me traditionally female. Regardless of my liminal genetic code — or rather, regarding it as a threat to societal norms — the train to my idealized gender presentation had already left the station. Why were all these decisions fast-tracked onto my body? Not because they were medically necessary — I would have been perfectly healthy just living and growing as little old me — but because they were vital to “normalize” me.

The desire to force-fit people into societally conditioned boxes has led to sterilizing children and enacting medically unnecessary surgeries on them. These surgeries are irreversible, lead to physical and emotional scarring, and their subjects are un-consenting. They are, to put it bluntly, the coercive application of Western cultural ideals to everyday human bodies.

Now the Trump administration wants to make these ideals the official preferences of the state.

I’ve experienced firsthand the consequences of the gender binary in what’s often a non-binary world. It isn’t good for anyone. Certainly not trans people, but also not for a population that’s larger than many think — and that has spent years trying to convince people that our bodies are good enough as they are.

Even though the administration is calling for clearer lines, we can use this as an opportunity to explore the beauty of the blur. And while our current administration proactively works to enshrine a false binary in our laws, [we too can take action](http://4intersex.org/#_legislators) and give agency to those whose bodies don’t adhere to it. Until this point, we’ve lived in a state of defense — fielding constant assaults on our existence. This is our opportunity to mount a strong and overdue offense, rooted in love and understanding. One day, maybe soon, they will give up the game of trying to erase us.

&amp;#x200B;

Alicia Roth Weigel ([@xoxy\_alicia](https://twitter.com/xoxy_alicia)) is a Texas-based policy, advocacy and[ campaign strategist](https://www.forbes.com/sites/traceywelsonrossman/2018/09/24/politics-in-the-age-of-technology-enabled-campaigning/#5e73b37825ec).",asktransgender
I am confused,"Backstory

Since I was a kid I loved doing girly things and it made me and still makes me soooo happy to have this image of myself physically being a woman in my head. I don't know if I am trans or if I just am a feminine man, when I was 13 I attempted to try and tell my mom I was bi and she went behind me and told my dad so the next day I was lectured about how I am just too sensitive and its just me being a kid and it will change. My earliest memory of doing something feminine instead of just imagining it was painting my nails at age 10 (Which got me made fun of by my father when he found out) and I remember how happy that made me but again I don't know if its just me being a sensitive kid. I debated if I was trans at age 14 when I learned what transgender was because I live in Texas and in a very conservative area at that so I was never exposed to any of these things. Since then I have questioned it and always have the thought in the back of my mind and now that I'm 18 I still have this image of me being a woman in my head and it still just makes me feel amazing then I feel crushed when I open my eyes and see me as a male.

I am 6 foot 4 and wear a size 15 or 16 shoe I feel like even if I do end up seeing myself as trans that I would be held back by this.

I honestly don't know what my point of this post is I just want to end this confusion I have felt for so long it just keeps feeling worse at this point.

Also I went to a therapist at age 14 for some issues I was having and when I brought it up to her she supported it so much and was so happy for me telling her but since then she moved and I quit seeing any other therapists after the scolding I got from another one I tried after the original moved and since she moved I just haven't had any form of support at all on the subject.",asktransgender
"Is there a truscum/TERF alliance? What do Tru-Scum and TERFs agree on, if anything?",Secret alliance or otherwise? I see truscum trying to kiss up to TERFs by getting them to say they're better or something (won't get into details here but I have seen this tonnes.),asktransgender
Insurance canceling on my GRS Doctor (need help researching new insurance),"\*\*I need to do some rapid fire insurance research, and need your help!\*\*  


I just got word that my insurance is pulling out of their deal with my GRS surgeons office, Marci Bowers, at the end of this year. My surgery date is/was in 2021, but I've already been in line for some time now. Marci's office has offered to hold my place in line if I can A) put down the deposit that they require (my expiring insurance covered it), B) Find a replacement insurance that can cover the surgery.   


I live in Seattle; Marci Bowers is in California.  


Has anyone gone through Marci that lives in Seattle/WA? And if so, what insurance plans do you have? I am to understand the insurance needs to have some great out of network perks if Marci isn't already covered. I don't reaaally know what that means (only sorta know). What sorta plans would be good to have in this case?",asktransgender
Is it normal for your injection site to be sore two days after?,Got my first estradiol injection two days ago. My thigh is still very sore. Is this normal?,asktransgender
TERFs and anti-LGBT+ legislation in America,"So it turns out that the main person behind the memo the NYT wrote about over the weekend is Roger Severino. 

[https://www.advocate.com/politics/2018/10/22/meet-roger-severino-trump-bigot-working-erase-trans-people](https://www.advocate.com/politics/2018/10/22/meet-roger-severino-trump-bigot-working-erase-trans-people)

GLAAD has a roundup of him as well. 

[https://www.glaad.org/tap/roger-severino](https://www.glaad.org/tap/roger-severino)

He has a long history of opposing marriage equality, defending conversion therapy, working for the Heritage Foundation, and opposing trans soldiers in the military...or anywhere else for that matter. 

I know this won't help, but I can't imagine a better signal that maybe TERFs or anti-trans queer people should maybe, I dunno, find something better to do than try to erase us because these fuckers are coming for every cis non-hetero person next.",asktransgender
Is it possible to transition with only a bit of dysphoria,"Just BTW I live in Australia but please don't let that stop you from answering.   


I only experience a very small amount of dysphoria, but so much more euphoria. I want to transition SO FUCKING BAD and I was just wondering if it was possible in my case.",asktransgender
"Dating, dysphoria and depression (NSFW-ish)","idk where to begin or if this is the right space to post.   I really don't know how to introduce this issue either. 

I'm in my 40s, haven't dated over a decade, and am losing all hope of ever finding someone for me.   Every trans person I know has a partner (if not several) and apart from the anxiety and depression many of us live with day to day they are doing ok for themselves with relationships.   Seeing that and knowing how difficult dating is for me is just killing me.  

My reluctance to dating I guess has a lot to do with body image/status.  I had orchy a long time ago but didn't have funds to do anything more.   Started HRT in my early 30s and don't have femme fat distribution, and like many of us have tiny titties.   The electrologist I used worked super aggressively and left me with noticeable pocking on parts of my face.   I used to have beautiful smooth facial skin.   I'm not ugly really, and am I guess relatively fit.   But like I am uncomfortable with how I look. 

I haven't had a nice time with another lady since before I fully transitioned.  I want to date again, but I can't bear the thought of being misgendered or being treated anything other than a lady when being intimate.   My existing nibbly bits still work, and I mean I guess I could enjoy having a nice time with the right person even down there.   Even tho I want the rest of the surgery, I can't afford it (even with insurance covering some of it).   

So I am stuck in dating purgatory.  I'm lesbian in that I don't like dudes, and am attracted to other women.   But then, like.. my body doesn't match what pretty much every lesbian (including many post-op lesbian trans women) expect or want.   If I date a lesbian then its gonna be a one-way thing with sexy time.   One acquaintance just flippantly said oh just get surgery then you'll feel better!     

Dating cis women is even riskier with being misgendered or treated in a not good way.   

On top of all that there just aren't as many gen x trans women.  I wouldn't date a boomer so I don't expect any mills to want to date me. 

Should I just accept that I'll never date again ever?  Why do I have to continue hurting inside like this?  ",asktransgender
"If, overnight, technology for lab-grown fully-functional genitalia became available (and corresponding surgery became affordable), would women with penises and men with vaginas choose to stay that way? Why?","As a role-player, it has occured to me that common experiences of many, many transgender people that come with your genitals not matching your gender, like:

- having to tuck in your penis in your, err, secret tunnel,
- wearing a packer (or a sock),
- genital dysphoria impeding your ability to deal with your constant horniness due to second puberty,
- constant fear of being rejected by a romantic partner because of what's in your pants,

are due to a peculiar confluence of several factors:

1. ability to mass produce affordable hormones,
2. *juuuust* enough social acceptance that you can live in some parts of the world,
3. inability to grow body parts in lab (although the research was going strong a couple of years ago).

In other words, if we were slower on points 1. or 2., or faster on points 3., problems relating to having such a particular body type wouldn't exist, because nobody would have such a body type...

...or would they?

I know currently, in the real world, there a lot of transwomen/transmen that won't go with bottom surgery, because a neovagina/neopenis is not fully functional, and getting one carries a risk of nerve damage.  
But my question is - if there was no such risk, and the resulting organs would be indistinguishable from the ones people are born with, would there be ***anyone*** who wouldn't get one? Why?",asktransgender
Protests in SF Bay Area?,Are there any protests of the latest Trump bullshit planned for the SF Bay Area? And what would be the best place to find out about such events? Thanks.,asktransgender
"I started HRT on October 1, is it too late to preserve my semen?","Due to gatekeeping laws in my country I’ve been forced to go the DIY route, making it harder for me to get proper healthcare. I’m finally making some leeway though and should be able to leave my sperm soon, but is it too late? Am I likely already steril?

Thank you for your insight 😊",asktransgender
I'm going to need explanation on all the commonly used terms because I'm really lost in these subreddits tbh,,asktransgender
[MtF] Let's talk about dosage!,"Hello hello, this message is aimed at every sisters on this reddit mainly (or anyone who's top notch about MtF hormonal dosage :d)

Anyway I started HRT 3 month ago , the first two month my endoc' prescribed me 200mg of progesterone/day and a patch of Vivelledot 50µg/24hours every monday and thursday, now for almost one month we've upgraded from 50µg/24hours patch to 100µg/24hours (and still kept the 200mg progesterone daily)

&amp;#x200B;

My question is : isn't that a bit... low actually? I saw a lot of peeps talking about their dosage being around 2mg of E so we're far above mine if I understood correctly, or maybe the administration method is taking into account and therefore need a stronger dosage or w/e?

tbh I'm kinda lost since I'm not an expert in this domain so I could use any comparaison or info

Thanks &amp; love !",asktransgender
How is everyone else handling all the current stress?,"Right now, I'm barely holding it together throughout the day, managing to keep a smile on, managing to keep it all under wraps since I""m not out at work or anywhere yet, but with all the recent BS in politics? I've been crying in some form almost every night I""m getting home. I don't know how anyone else is able to handle all of this stress and it's seriously getting to me.",asktransgender
How did you know that you were trans? What feelings and or thoughts did you experience?,,asktransgender
A realistic but hopeful assessment of current politics,"tl/dr; Trump is powerful but incompetent. Major policy changes are hard, and parts of the federal government are pushing back against the proposed changes affecting trans people. Trans people are running for office in larger numbers. People are becoming more accepting of trans people, and it is possible to persuade anti-trans people to become more accepting.

Trump controls the executive branch of the federal government. In theory, he doesn't make law, but in the process of implementing laws passed by Congress, the executive branch creates a lot of regulations that in effect are themselves laws. If Trump doesn't like a law, he can just fail to implement it in any effective way. If he doesn't think a law goes far enough, he can create regulations that push the law as far as it will go in the direction he wants. For the entire LGBTQ spectrum, having Trump as president is a problem.

However, the executive branch is huge, with a lot of different people who want different things and have different ideologies and loyalties. Trying to force the government's massive bureaucracies to make a major policy change is like trying to push a dead whale down the beach. That worked against trans people when Obama was creating more inclusive policies, but it benefits trans people as Trump tries to create more exclusionary policies.

Trump is basically incompetent. In order to implement policy changes, a president has to get his people into the high level policy positions in the federal government. We're two years into Trump's administration and hundreds of these positions still haven't been filled. He's terrible at negotiation; he's had several opportunities to make deals to get funding for his wall, and he hasn't done it. His administration completely botched hurricane recovery in Puerto Rico. The law and the courts give the president wide discretion in regulating immigration, but it took Trump three tries to get his immigration regulations past the courts.

My read on Trump is that he's pragmatically anti-trans. He doesn't personally care about trans people one way or the other, but he's happy to be anti-trans if it gives him some political advantage. Unlike the wall, which he is personally committed to, I don't think he's going to keep pushing hard on anti-trans regulations if he gets a lot of push back.

And there is push back, even inside his administration. The proposed regulations originated inside the Dept. of HHS, which was hoping for support from other departments. The DOJ deferred, which means they neither opposed nor supported them. The Sec of Education, Betsy DeVos, is mostly supportive of LGBTQ rights, and in this case is reportedly opposing the changes. There is also opposition within HHS. In reference to the proposed regulations, the head of the CDC said ""stigmatizing individuals is not in the interest of public health,"" and also said that he wasn't involved in creating the new policy. While he didn't directly criticize the regulations, to come out publicly against a policy supported by his bosses in HHS indicates strongly felt opposition.

Danica Roem is currently the only trans woman elected to a state legislature in the US. This election, there are ten trans people (both male and female) running at the state level. Not all of them will be elected, but several have a good shot. This may not seem like a lot of people, but it's a big change from just a few years ago when trans people didn't run for major political office. If trans people don't run, they can't get elected. Having trans people running is a big step forward.

According to a new BuzzFeed poll, half of millennials don't care about a political candidate's LGBTQ identity. That may seem kind of wishy-washy, but it's a lot of progress from a time not so long ago when being LGBTQ defined a candidate in voters' minds. On the question of whether trans rights are human rights, 45% of millennials said yes. That's a minority, which sucks, but it's progress. A few years ago many of these people wouldn't have known what trans rights are, much less been supportive. A small minority of women and Democrats in the millennial age group believed that trans rights are human rights, as opposed to only 34% of men. That suggests that as more women replace men in political office, there will be more support for trans rights. Similarly for Democrats replacing Republicans.

[A study released in 2016](http://science.sciencemag.org/content/352/6282/220) showed that it is possible to counter transphobia. Quoting from the abstract:

&gt; Here, we show that a single approximately 10-minute conversation encouraging actively taking the perspective of others can markedly reduce prejudice for at least 3 months.

From an article in Vox describing the research, here's a description of one of the ten minute conversations:

&gt; ""I'm from South America, and in South America we don't like fags,"" he tells her.

&gt; This next moment is crucial: Virginia doesn't jump on Gustavo for the slur, and instead says, ""I'm gay,"" in a friendly manner. Gustavo doesn't recoil. Actually, he becomes more interested.

&gt; Gustavo and Virginia go on to discuss how much they love their partners, and how that love helps them overcome adversity. Gustavo tells Virginia that his wife is a disabled person. ""God gave me the ability to love a disabled person,"" he says, and that taking care of one another is why love matters.

&gt; ""That resonate a lots with me,"" Virginia responds. ""For me, these laws, and including transgender people are about that. They're about how we treat one another.""

&gt; Now that Gustavo is in a place where he's more open, Virginia asks him to imagine what the worst thing could happen if he used a bathroom with a transgender person. He admits he wouldn't be scared. Then comes the breakthrough.

&gt; ""Listen, probably I was mistaken,"" he says of his original position on trans rights.

This effect persists even when people are exposed to arguments opposed to trans rights. One of the researchers said it was as if the people in the experiment had been vaccinated against prejudice.

This technique is difficult to do. I don't believe there's any chance of an army of canvassers knocking on doors all across the USA and changing people's minds. But this offers something we all can do, trans and cis, to help promote trans rights. Listen to people, let them express their concerns and fears, then ask them to describe their own experience of discrimination, tell them about your own experience with discrimination, and then explain why you think trans people need laws and policies protecting them from this sort of discrimination.",asktransgender
About the recent political incidents against us... Thoughts on this?,"Preface edit: Trigger warning

  
A friend who I care for posted this, to protect their identity I'm simply copy-pasting this.

\-------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------

\&gt;

\* I called out RuPaul and Drag Queen Story Hour.

\* I called out early (and even non!) transitioners demanding access to women's spaces.

\* I called out the trans centers and clinics for rushing kids into treatment.

\* I called out the thin-air manifestation of 150+ genders.

\* I called out 'safe spaces' on college campuses.

\* I called out trans women competing in women's sports without a specialized physician's assessment of their hormonal and muscular condition.

\* I called out self-identification.

\* I even called out the sissy crossdresser takeover of FetLife.

\* I called out SO many questionable claims and moves by Gay, Inc. and Trans, Inc. and their followers that might alienate the entire rest of the population.

\* I said there'd be consequences if you didn't listen. Now you're looking at them. You've antagonized the right so badly for so long that they've gone nuclear.

&amp;#x200B;

\&gt; This gender fuckery, to which those of us with gender dysphoria largely do not even subscribe, will impact us disproportionately as only we require the very identity documentation and medical care coming under fire.

&amp;#x200B;

\&gt; Thank you NBs and other 'gender' warriors for bringing the house down on binary trans women who just want to blend and be left in peace.

&amp;#x200B;

\&gt; You're selfish. You demand that everyone come to your defense, but you are NOBODY'S allies. You don't even see or seem to care how your actions affect others.

YOU caused this. Trump is only the harbinger. 😑🙄""

\-------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------

&amp;#x200B;

Thoughts?

&amp;#x200B;

EDIT: I want to clarify that I did NOT write this. I saw it on my FB timeline and found it curious.",asktransgender
I got outed at work,"This is not the first time but the second time a gay guy who I trusted  outs me.. he’s openly gay at work everyone knows he’s gay. I told him one night after work that I am trans, I found out today he literally told everyone at work. He’s a supervisor at work, I have a strong feeling  the manager doesn’t like me anymore, they treat me different...everyone was talking me about me for the past few days/ weeks and my transness. Until another colleague told me this today. I I’ll never trust anybody enough to tell I am trans again, lgbt or not... as trans people we have not ally’s, and this small city i live words get around fast😒 I am just going to cry for the rest of the night. It shouldn’t be like this.",asktransgender
Seeking workout routing for mtf,"Hello 20 y/o transwoman, pre hrt here looking for a workout routine that can be done inside during the cold months to help with fat loss along side calorie deficit. ",asktransgender
[possibly triggering] Transitioning and genitalia for FTM,"This isn't a troll post, I would really like to ask this question and get honest replies. I think maybe this question might be triggering/harmful to some who are currently experiencing dysphoria. So please be aware and I am not trying to cause trouble or harm. 

I am AFAB. I am not trans (i don't think), although I was told something once that really restructured my perception about trans identity-- she said, transgender should be viewed as a train with multiple stops. Not everyone is going to get off at the same stop (surgery, full transition, etc). Some people are completely fine getting off at the stop that they are supposed to get off at. She said this because I was talking about some potentially gender dysphoric things and she said that it sounded like I was trans. I don't identify this way and I said that I don't think the label applies because it would basically be me stealing a label from people who are actually trans and actually struggling, but maybe what I feel does fall under the general umbrella. When I was young (around when ellen came out, so pre-mainstream-lgbt-acceptance), the term used was ""gender fucking"". I don't know if gender fucking is the same as trans identity though.

Anyway, my question is ultimately about penis. To put it quite bluntly, you can make an outie an innie, but you can't really make an innie an outie. I have felt ""right"" when I jokingly put fake dicks in my pants to see the bulge in the mirror, and it genuinely unsettled me enough where I haven't done it again. I don't know how much of how I felt growing up was because of absorbing misogyny. I like women (and men), wanted to be a boy, realized I couldn't ever have a dick that could penetrate. I also came to terms with my female form, more or less. The best way to describe where I am is that I wish I had both forms. I guess this ties into my bisexuality, a lot of men I am interested in, I sort of just want to take over their bodies and life. ""I am interested in you because I want your life"" sort of thing. Like stepping into a Gundam and piloting it, only it's my soul/brain. Like the movie Being John Malkovich. (but is it because of potential aspergers, ie: mimicking behavior) 

I don't necessarily feel like either, but is that simply because I do not necessarily fit into the standards of female gender roles? Then again, what the fuck are gender roles and why the fuck do we need them. I absolutely support demolishing gender expectations because what the literal fuck, gender expectations is arbitrarily assigned in the end and a human's brain and soul goes way beyond their outward appearance/physical form. Pronouns, again, completely arbitrary use of language. Physical form is fucking arbitrary. I would love to upload my consciousness into The Interwebs and live like that. (although this might have more to do with my probably being on the spectrum and seeing things a little differently/broadly/objectively/weirdly/whatever)

So I go back and forth. However because of having to defend against a lot of shitty asshole sexists (traditional, old-world sexism is just SO. KEWL.), I held harder onto my female form. Abandoning it would feel like giving in and ultimately declaring that being male is superior. Potentially though, this is what TERFs think? (I am assuming)

Sorry, my question here is how do you come to terms with the lack of penis? I guess I have internalized a lot of society's messages about sex and whatnot, so there are times that I feel incredibly inadequate or just .. lacking, less-than, etc .. because I cannot actually penetrate a woman. Is this simply toxic masculinity rearing it's head? The idea about penis size being a measure of a man's worth.

Then again, my inability to fully understand probably just means I am not really trans. But just because I can't fully understand doesn't mean I don't support those who are. Those who truly know who they are despite outward appearances absolutely should do what they must. But I think I have a lot of questions, and I do want to learn. I probably still have some toxicity inside of me but it's hard to suss out what is what, so I am posting on this subreddit. 

I apologize if anyone is super offended after reading this. That wasn't my intention. Also I think this post is kind of all over the place. Thank you.",asktransgender
How did you emotionally change when you transitioned?,"I'd like to have just been born a boy. I know I'd really love it if I look masculine, had a deeper voice, and was addressed as ""he"". Just a regular guy who acted like a guy. But  the whole coming out and transitioning process just seems like too much stuff to do. My mom would have a mental breakdown, my friends wouldn't look at me the same, not to mention surgery is expensive.

I just want all of this stuff to be worth it. I think about what I want to look like and how I wish people acted like I was a guy. I think, what if I do all this stuff but I still feel bad about how I am? What if I won't be satisfied with how I look still? So I wondered how other people who transitioned, if they felt better when they actually took the plunge. It'd be nice to here your guys's experiences, so I could know.",asktransgender
"To all my brothers and sisters who feel hopeless, please read my story. [Part 2]"," Heya, everyone!

This will be my second progress post since I began HRT back in mid 2016 \[[Here is the first](https://www.reddit.com/r/asktransgender/comments/5w2x9r/to_all_my_brothers_and_sisters_who_feel_hopeless/)\], and I just want to remind you all… yes, you can do it.

TL;DR of the first post: I’m 193cm (6’4”) and 159kg (350 lbs), large build, large feet. Gave up on the idea of passing when I was 18 years old, but now that I’m 35 I’m -somewhat- passing and I can’t believe it!

I’ve been on HRT for 2.5 years, and height and weight be damned, I’m blending 100% of the time now. I literally can not believe it. 2 years ago this was a pie in the sky dream, an impossibility, but it’s real… It’s still very hard for me to accept, but I’m getting there. 

At first, I just chalked it up to people being polite because they see me dressed in feminine clothing, but I don’t think it would happen as often as it does if people were just being polite. There are -not- that many polite people in this world.

The three most recent slap to the face, ‘You’re a woman, damn it! Accept it!’ moments were:

First: I was in the restroom with a female coworker, a manager, and I mentioned something about being on HRT. She got a very confused look on her face for a moment, so I said “‘Cause I’m trans.” She said “Oh, yeah! That’s right. I completely forgot.”

Second: Three new people got hired into my department at work, and it was my job to train them. I talk very openly about being trans because I just assume everyone can tell by looking at me, so once again, I mention something about being trans to the one young guy we hired. He said “You’re transgender?” I said something like “You can’t tell by looking at me?” and he replied “I would have never thought so if you didn’t say anything.”

Last, and this just happened today: I was at a doctor to get some bloodwork done… We were going over my medical history and current medications… He asks “What’s the Spironolactone for? To lower your blood pressure?” I replied with “Oh… uhm no… I’m trans” And I don’t think it clicked at first because he says “Ohh, okay. And the Estradiol? To boost your estrogen?” and I said “Also because I’m trans. To give me estrogen period.”

I think that’s when it clicked, lol. He was like “Oh!” and started asking me a bunch of questions related to that. He asked me if I was FtM, which was confusing and annoying, but at least he assumed I was AFAB?

The most validating thing for me was when he asked about my voice, because my voice is my biggest insecurity… He said it was very feminine and asked what I had done to work on it, which was nothing more than just trying to emulate other women in my day to day life.

I dunno. It was all pretty validating in the end though. Gave me a big boost that I desperately needed after a shitty week!

But, like the title says… Even when you feel like there’s no hope, don’t give up. Don’t say “I’ll never pass!” because you don’t know unless you do it.

TL;DR: Don’t give up. I gave up hope on passing/blending years ago, but it’s actually happening now. It can happen for you too!",asktransgender
A Brief Interaction," It's really hard to be an obviously transgender woman out in public. There are so many things that hurt: the stares, the whispering,  the misgendering. 

There's something else though, that really hurts me down to the core, but is so hard to explain. 

Monday night, some stranger (at a restaurant that I was picking up DoorDash for) pulls me aside to talk about how they don't understand why anyone has a problem with it (referring of course to my obviously trans self). People should be able to live their life, and they heard about the news and it terribly upset them. The host then comes up and hands the person their food and they say to the host, ""He was actually here first,"" pointing at me.

I don't even know. It makes me feel like I was just a box being checked off by this person. Like ""Showed I was an ally today"" or something. I would have liked an attempt at real human connection, but they reduced me to being transgender. And then still got it wrong. Like, sure they acknowledged me, but then they misgendered me in one breath. Also, I don't see you talking to anybody else, but because I fit your hot media fix for the week you can fake care and unload shit on me. Scenarios similar to this have popped up from time to time. Does anyone else get upset by it?",asktransgender
Here is something that might help restore your faith in humanity a little.,"I was doing a report for school and came across the ACLU's website, specifically the trans rights section. They have great links, infographics and other resources that I think you all might find useful or interesting. Here is a quick little quote taken from their site. 

&amp;#x200B;

""The ACLU champions transgender people’s right to be themselves. We’re fighting discrimination in employment, housing, and public places, including restrooms. We’re working to make sure trans people get the health care they need and we're challenging obstacles to changing the gender marker on identification documents and obtaining legal name changes. We’re fighting to protect the rights and safety of transgender people in prison, jail, and detention facilities as well as the right of trans and gender nonconforming students to be treated with respect at school. Finally, we’re working to secure the rights of transgender parents.""

&amp;#x200B;

Here's the link: [https://www.aclu.org/issues/lgbt-rights/transgender-rights](https://www.aclu.org/issues/lgbt-rights/transgender-rights?redirect=trans-rights)

&amp;#x200B;",asktransgender
Do I really look that much different in selfies than pictures others take and real life?,"I have an obsession that I’m trying to fix for myself. I take a lot of selfies and generally like them. I’m fortunate I pass irl, but when I see a picture of myself in a non selfie I get extremely unconfident, I see a huge jaw, weird eyes, and pretty much male. But in selfies I think I look good.

I’m not understanding this. I pass but I don’t see how if what I look like in non selfies is what people see. So much dysphoria and I feel like the hormones haven’t done squat when I think about this...

Should I obsess over this? If people say I’m attractive and feminine should I believe them or torture myself by flipping selfies horizontally so see what I would look like In someone else’s eyes.
And knit picking everything about myself

Just gets me down and I’m tired of feeling that way. I cry every time  

Is it all in my head?",asktransgender
Has any body else has issues getting blood tests? (UK),"I’m currently with the Gender GP until I can get in to a GIC.

This morning after taking my blood tests to monitor my testosterone and oestrogen levels I received a phone call from someone at the doctors saying that they aren’t able to do the tests because the Gender GP is a private clinic!

I’m currently trying to work out why or how this is an issue. As far as I was aware the Gender GP worked with the NHS and GP’s.

Has anybody else has these issues?",asktransgender
First time shaving legs recommendations?,"So I am going to be shaving my legs for the first time, but don’t know exactly if some razors are better than others and that sort of thing. I have kinda thick leg hair at the moment so that is something I have to take into account. Thank you for recommendations! ",asktransgender
Can I ice-skate and bind?,"Due to my school renovating our gym we gotta do something and apparently ice-skating is the right answer. I've never done it in my entire life, so I'm wondering whether I'll suffocate if I do this while wearing my binder or something. Anyone?",asktransgender
Would like some advice on whether a premise for my book series is problematic.,"Hi siblings!  I have long been a writer but haven't yet been published unless you count free stories uploaded to websites.  But I had a new idea and would like to see if this would be the one that gets sold.

The issue? is I want my main character to be a Transwoman like me.  I already am on guard for mary-sue issues, but the other tough to navigate part is that she is a sort of secret police / investigator / spy / judge for the emperor.  As a result there are occasionally themes of sneaking and duplicity.  Also, she has a hidden terrible past that is not a result of her transness, but until she uncovers all the plot, she thinks it does.  As a result she lives under a pseudonym.  

Basically I am asking what pitfalls I should guard for, and/or whether I should attempt it at all; is it too problematic?

Open to providing more information if you need it to judge the situation.

Thanks in advance.",asktransgender
Suicidal at 11 months?,"So basically I'm MtF 11 months and tackled most of my suicidal tendencies a few months back but it's back again.

I found an incredible transgirl who I've fallen madly in love with and who I spend most of my time with but after a few weeks my ideation of dying is back. I don't know if its a combination of getting into a car accident/getting fired, hormone related, stress, financial problems, or maybe all of it but no matter how happy she makes me I'm getting bouts of wanting to die again. I can't lose this person. They're basically my clone and I'd never forgive myself if my shit outlook drives them away. What if transition wasn't my cure-all? What if I'm gonna be this way forever? Is this a normal thing to feel happy again and then have it leave so abruptly? So many swirling thoughts and uncertainty right now I feel like I'm losing it. Everything is happening at once and I dont know how to fix it.. Im afraid Ill snap.. thoughts? Sorry for the rant I'm not very grounded at this point. ",asktransgender
So how would you respond to a (cis) wife who says this:,"""I knew this was going to happen.  I never should have let you transition.  Now you're going to get shot or stabbed and it's going to be totally your fault.

I told you like 3 years ago, that you were going to get beat up, that you're probably going to get stabbed, but you wouldn't be able to like do normal stuff like go to the grocery store or go to the post office or anything like that. I told you this, I also told you that you would be miserable about how you look and that you would cry about how you look, and be incredibly self-loathing about how you look. And you said ""It'll be fiiiiiiiiiiiine"" But you know what? I need a fresh start as a single adult anyway. Nothing I ever do is up to me, and I fucking hate you.""",asktransgender
Hair removal without the razor?,"I tried a recipe for hair removal with turmeric and chickpea flour but it didn't remove my hair where I tested it on my leg. 

Has anyone had a successful experience using an 'alternative' hair removal method and could you fill me in on what I'm missing? ",asktransgender
"Coming Out, but I'm anxious. Can you guys/gals read this and tell me what you think?","I haven't really come out to my family and friends. I'm considering it in light of recent events... But I'm also very scared. I wanted to see if I could post it in other places - kind of like a test, a warmup? Let me know what you think.

(if this isn't the right place for this, I'm sorry)

~~~

I'm Transgender. I've only very recently come to terms with this. I've been uncomfortable in my body since before puberty, and I've made lots of excuses. 

I'm just a crossdresser. I just like the female characters in games. I prefer female company to male I feel like my body isn't right. I am jealous of my female friends. I experience dysphoria. Oh.. I'm trans. I'm transgender. It feels so stupid to say (and that's what I told my therapist..) 

I feel like right now is kind of the worst time to come out  But in other ways, it's one of the best times. Us trans folks need all the support we can get right now. Our very existence is under attack. Right now is the best time to come out. I'm Transgender. Thank you for reading

~~~",asktransgender
"My crush at high school transitioned, looking for advice","I've been mulling over this for a while and figured I'd directly ask the community instead of making wild guesses.

For some more context, she transitioned to male a few months ago. Although they may not know it, this person has indirectly helped me out of deep depression (leading to my infatuation). I'm uninformed on how to handle this case and interact with trans people in general and would love some help understanding their current situation. Finding a method of staunching my feelings for their previous female identity is also something I've tussled with. Thanks for any and all answers",asktransgender
"MTF 22 year old homeless in NYC, tips and tricks?","I was born and raised in New York so like most young New York adults, we have to rely on our parents for housing, of course we contribute. Anyways, I started transitioning a year ago and my family found out back in April and they have been anything other than supportive. Everything kept escalating since then. I’m not sure what the last straw was, but my parents are kicking me out citing that I’m old enough to be on my own and that I have to choose between being a woman or staying at home and stop transitioning. Of course I chose the latter. 

I’m writing this as I’m heading to the airport, figured I’ll look like a traveler and sleep there. I just bought a planet fitness membership to use for showers and workouts and getting ready in the morning. I’m not worried too much about food cause I’m 5’8 and 180 pounds so I can afford to skip a few meals. I’m signed up with several temp agencies in the city as it’s been really hard for me to get a job directly with any employer. I feel like it’s because of my trans status and although I think I pass really well, my name and gender marker are still male. Luckily I have a job for about 3 weeks, I’m a junior in college but i haven’t been able to attend this semester because I wasn’t eligible for aid. I’m just so new and scared to this life. In hindsight, I expected something like this to happen, it’s not uncommon for trans people in New York. Just didn’t want it to happen to me, ya know? 

Anyways, I don’t even know what I’m saying at this point lol I just wanted to vent because I know I’m not the only one going through this. I have no friends, or any other social support, so I just turn to strangers on Reddit and Tumblr to make me feel less lonely lmao.

To anyone going through the same, what do you do to get by? What has helped you? What can I do to stay safe? Again, I pass pretty well so I don’t think I will be targeted specifically of my trans status. Thanks for reading &lt;3 even if it’s just one person :) I’ve felt very alone this past year, but I’ve alway been a half class full girl so I know thing will get better, I turn 22 tomorrow on the 25th so that’s something to look forward to u guess lol",asktransgender
Am I being underdosed? Is there anything I can do?,"I started full HRT (mtf) on boxing day of last year (Dec. 26 2017) so I've been on full HRT for about 10 months now, coming up on a year. At the start, I was on 200mg Spiro twice daily, and 4mg lupin estradiol once daily (This was supposed to be the final dose). I became rather annoyed at how cumbersome it was to carry around 2 seperate pill bottles, so I switched to patches in july of this year, and have been on 2 patches of 100 µg estradot changed twice a week (on sunday afternoons and thursday mornings) since then. I also have 100mg Teva-Progesterone capsules but I haven't been using them at all because I don't quite understand how to use it or what ""Cycling"" progesterone is.

&amp;#x200B;

I've heard of other people's HRT regimens and at full HRT they all range from 6mg-8mg estradiol once daily and 200mg spiro once daily, which seems completely different to mine. Am I being underdosed? Is this an abnormal regimen that my GP's given me?

As a side note, my breast development has basically completely stopped (This was the case before switching to patches) and I've noticed absolutely zero changes in my facial fat or fat anywhere else on my body (this might be because I'm malnourished and underweight though), my body hair growth is basically at the same rate as always, and my skin isn't that much smoother really. I hardly feel happy or feminine anymore despite feeling that way for the first 4 months of HRT. So that's not so great.

Also, how do I cycle progesterone and what difference does it make besides taking it with estrogen?

&amp;#x200B;

EDIT: My breasts began to develop almost immediately after beginning full HRT, with pronounced breast buds at around the end of january mark.",asktransgender
[New England Folks] Transgender Rights Rally on Boston Common 10/28,"If you live in New England, there is going to be a rally for transgender rights on Boston common this weekend (10/28). Lets get out there and have our voices heard!

https://www.facebook.com/events/619790831826542/",asktransgender
"What are your thoughts on Gender Dysphoria ""tests""?","Hey everyone.  I came across a blog about testing gender dysphoria, whether someone very likely has it VS less likely they have it.  I'd like to know your thoughts on these questions?  And for those who have interacted with a therapist, did they give you anything similar to this?  


Source: [https://thomasingenderland.com/2016/11/08/gender-dysphoria-diagnosis-part-5-gidyq-aa-full-text/](https://thomasingenderland.com/2016/11/08/gender-dysphoria-diagnosis-part-5-gidyq-aa-full-text/)",asktransgender
"There were protests in Washington over the Trump memo, how can I find out when that's happening near me?","I live north of Chicago and would like to participate in any forms of activism happening within a hundred miles of me. I'm between jobs at the moment and am willing to give quite a lot of time to protect and defend our community. I'd also like this post to help anyone else looking for things they can do to help the cause, wherever they are. Any advice is appreciated!",asktransgender
Is it normal to want to change your personality/way you speak?,"Hi! I'm MTF, just started transitioning a few months ago. I live in a super liberal area so it's been going pretty well, I've gotten new clothes, most people gender me correctly, ect. However, I have noticed one thing about what I kind of want out of my transition that seems, well, odd when compared to my other trans friends (who are trans guys). I really want to try to act and talk more traditionally feminine, because when I do I feel really euphoric. However, every time I mention this everyone around me says I don't need to do that and I just need to ""be true to myself."" I'm really kind of confused, because I think I want to make this change for myself but maybe I'm just trying to make other people see me as more fem? Has anyone else felt the same way I do about changing this kind of thing?",asktransgender
Any case of negative side effects when starting progesterone right at the beginning of hrt?,I don't mean progesterone in monotherapy. I mean e + progesterone + aa optionally.,asktransgender
SRS/piercing question,"I am hoping to get my SRS completed within a year.  A concern I have, is that I have a Prince Albert (PA) piercing.  I would really like to know if anyone else, who has already had their SRS completed, previously had a PA (or similar) piercing, and what, if any complications it posed to the procedure.  Many thanks,

\-Mica",asktransgender
How much does hrt reduce penis size?,I’ve been on hrt for about 14 months and have noticed zero reduction in size. It’s the phrase “use it or lose it” true? Can anyone share their experience? Thanks!,asktransgender
"What does the symbol on Estradiol mean, anyway?","I've been curious about my pills for a couple weeks now, and I'm just wondering what the [hexagonal symbol](https://i.imgur.com/c1ZQErp.png) means.  ",asktransgender
finally becoming who I've meant to be,"last three years have been hell for me but I've kept positive attitude about it all. started with surgeon messing up hernia operation by damaging nerves to the point I became disabled and no longer able to work , broke my ankle to the point I've had nine operations on it and now doctor says they have to operate on it again buy disconnecting ankle and starting all over to make it right. (which I need because I can't walk in heels , that part I didn't tell him)                The reason I'm here is to let it out that I have thought long and hard about where I am now and I have finally realized I don't have to hide who I am and want to be anymore . I am going ahead with MtF transitioning. I went to a psychologist just for backup in case my primary was to give me a hard time when I tell him I want to start hormones . I don't understand why people are so afraid to see a psychologist if you want to transition. She was great and just let me explain how I feel and how sure I am about my decision. She didn't disagree with me or try to talk me out of anything , she even gave me some references on who to see to make my transition so much easier than just trying to find out information on the internet. I hope this post isn't to long or boring to all of you out there. It just feels so liberating to finally do this and to make it public. Let people think what they want about me , I'm not going to worry about someone thinking I'm weird or anything like that . I'm just going to be who I should have been for all my life. I know the road ahead is a long hard one ,but I'm ready for any curve that comes my way. Thank you for reading and good luck to anyone thinking about transitioning , If it's what you really want than don't wait like I did. Just go ahead and be you!                                      ",asktransgender
Maybe I should just kill myself?,"Being black is hard enough but add being trans and gay to it, idk how people will react but it probably won’t be positive. Would anyone like a black gay trans man? I want to be comfortable with myself but I also want to find love.",asktransgender
He really likes feminine men,"My girlfriend......who calls me she and always validates my gender in various ways said something to me today that fucked me up.

We were talking about her gay friend and the type of man he likes.  And she said...
""He likes really feminine men....kinda like you""

I hid my emotions I felt in that moment and didn't outwardly show her that what she said bothered me.  But that really killed me

Is it wrong for me to feel like that comment was slightly fucked up?  And should I tell her how much it bothered me?

Or are cis people just basically kinda blissfully unaware of our issues, and should I let it slide.  Because like.....in the biological sense shes not wrong and kinda just stated a truth....has into feminine men and biologically I am a Male bodied person that dresses feminine.  So is that what she meant???",asktransgender
Ideas on how to explore just how far this rainbow goes?,"Hey, um, this is my third attempt to write a post on this without it turning into a really lengthy rant. So, I've been out-to-myself-but-no-one-else for a few months, and started to see a therapist about ""all this junk"" and everything. My therapist thinks I'm funny, but I also told her I wanted to take things really slowly. 'We'll see,' she says, grinning. 

But, something has kind of been on my mind:

&amp;#x200B;

**How do you explore your gender? Or, more specifically, once you've decided you are 100% not cis, how do you secure yourself in either big box of ""binary"" or ""nonbinary?"" How do you decide where to settle down in the endless gender expanse?**

  
I feel like I cast off from shore, and as exciting as it is to get out of port, I've got no clue where I'm... going? 

Cute statements like ""if you think you're trans, you are"" only gets you so far. Plenty of people seem to have fairly specific ideas of who they are. That seems nice.

I don't have much privacy to explore ""womanness"" or how how well it suits me. And I'm perfectly willing to have an entirely unnecessary debate about how gender is a simultaneously meaningless and quintessential cultural concept; that being one gender or another honestly has nothing to do with clothes, or biology, or genitals, or personality, or tastes, or sex, or anything. And that *or anything* really gets me. Is it worth mentioning I did philosophy in college?

  
I'm in this massive pit of post-egg gender nihilism and I'm not sure how to climb out. It might be worse because I'm in that crowd of ""older and had a long life of being not blatantly dysphoric, except constantly anxious/depressed for no discernible reason."" All I know is... I'm really done with being a cis-dude. Whatever that even means.",asktransgender
I'm not a chaser but now everyone at work thinks I am.,"I work in a large, metropolitan city for an IT company. In my department, for those of us who are employed by the company and not contractors, we have significantly less turn over. Most contractors are only in on a project for a few weeks and then rotated out to work on other things. They're calling it ""Itemized Organic Growth""; how to maximize the efficiency of your work force by keeping things constantly fresh with new talent and utilizing them for their strongest suits in order to optimize performance.

Basically, ""let's fit these corporate buzzwords together and screw up everyone's project so no one can be held accountable for one thing.""

This is important because I recently became head of a 6 person team. A new contractor was rotated into our group. She is a transwoman, who we'll call Rhiannon, who recently transitioned. Unbeknownst to me, there were people in my group who knew Rhiannon as ""Ryan"" a few months earlier.

For whatever reason, Rhiannon was having a hard time adjusting to the groups dynamic. No one ever said anything transphobic or hurtful. Rhiannon just isn't interested in the hobbies and lives and others, which is totally OK. Despite a few bumps socially in the road, everyone got along. 

Her work is impressive and she knows more than me. I do not hesitate to commend her on her work and ask for her opinion when it comes to efficiency of coding, reworking code or deleting bloatcode from other programmers work.

So, one day before work starts, I walk into the break room and Rhiannon is pouring herself a cup of coffee. I say ""Good morning"" like any normal person does and she just sort of mumbles ""hey."" She's normally very assertive and smiles and carries a conversation, so I assume that maybe she's having a rough morning and try not to push it. Grabbing an orange juice from the fridge, I say, ""You look great. I hope you have a good day!""

She gives me the deepest stinkeye look you could possibly imagine.

""What do you mean I look great? Am I not supposed to look good because I'm a woman?!""

Wait, *what the fuck?*

I turn to her, totally caught off guard. ""I was just trying to brighten your day. I was being nice is all.""

She seethed, ""I don't *need* you or any other chaser to tell me I look great or have a good day.""

I was speechless. I didn't even think of her in any other way as a co-worker and I also didn't think it was appropriate as her co-worker and superior that I should discuss my sexual preferences in defense of not being a ""chaser."" So I simply said, ""I'm sorry"" and walked away before she could yell at me for apologizing. Somehow I felt that is where the conversation was going. I turn around and standing there are like 4 other people, not knowing what was happening and just staring at us. I was mortified and excused myself to my cubicle.

I couldn't concentrate for the rest of the day. I kept wondering what I did. Did she resent me? Did it come off like I was trying to hit on her? Should I not take a personal interest in my employees?

I've never said a bad word about her. I've never discussed her ""passing"" or done anything inappropriate and now there's rumors going around saying I was trying to come on to her and corner her when she was alone.

Granted, I rarely have dated anyone from work and I date all sorts. Men, Women, Tall, Short, Fat, Thin, All Races, whatever; basically if you have a great personality and your interesting, then I want to get to know you because I believe that personal interaction with people helps to grow one's world and mindset. I don't ""chase"" any one or fetishize their existence. It hurt me deeply to think that someone could think that of me.

I am afraid this is going to poison my reputation at the company. I don't want to talk to her alone and I don't know how to fix this awkwardness. Someone please help me understand, what did I do wrong?

tl;dr: New transwoman at work thinks I hit on her, yelled at me in front of others and is now trying to label *me* as some sort of malicious chaser and I have no idea how to handle it.

Edit: Thank you for the honest responses. I really appreciate the candid answers. I will email her and apologize.

Also, TIL, I shouldn't try to connect with or make people feel better if I sense something is wrong because no matter the intent, I will trigger their insecurities. I won't reach out in anyway because I'll fuck it up.",asktransgender
I want a FTM top surgery but I’m cis female,"So I don’t know much about the inter workings of the trans community and I have questions regarding my desire to have a top surgery even though I’m not trying to transition ftm. 

BACKGROUND INFO:
To start, I don’t want kids so having breasts is basically pointless. They just get in the way, bring me pain, and I want them gone. I’ve considered breast reductions but again, why even keep them around at all when I don’t want them at all? For a while I thought what I wanted was a double mastectomy but then I saw what the results of that procedure look like and I was like “heck no!” Double mastectomies make your chest look like a hack job. So that’s when I realized that what I wanted was pretty much a ftm top surgery. 

QUESTIONS:
•Does this mean I have dysphoria? I’m pretty sure I’m not gender dysphoric cause I love being female. I just kinda think of my reasonings for wanting top surgery are much like the reasons someone would get braces on their teeth or laser eye surgery. Is it like, body dysphoria or something? Or do I just not know basically anything about dysphoria? It’s all confusing and I feel like I should have an answer for these questions if I want to get the surgery because…

•…I know alot of top surgery doctors will require a letter of recommendation for the surgery from a therapist regarding feelings of dysphoria or one’s feelings towards being binary male. If I’m not trans male or dysphoric like I think I am, what am I supposed to do if I want to get this surgery? Are there well trained doctors who will do the surgery without a letter from a therapist? If so, please send me some recommendations. Preferably for doctors in the southeastern United States area.

•how do I approach the topic of telling my parents that I want this surgery? I know I’ve mentioned to my mom that I may want a breast reduction but we only talked about it once and that was 9 months ago. She wasn’t wholeheartedly opposed to the procedure, but she did say she wanted me to wait a while and try other methods before I paid thousands of dollars for surgery. Totally understandable. It’s just that now I’ve upped the ante and want to get my breasts completely removed and I don’t know how to tell her. She and my dad aren’t super pumped with me, as they put it, “trying to be different.” They’ve gotten a bit better recently but still. This isn’t like dying my hair or putting a slit in my eyebrow or dressing emo. This is a big surgery and I just feel like they’re not going to even give the thought a chance

CONCLUSION:
Someone pls help this very confused lil bean. If you have questions and/or need clarification on anything about my situation, I’d be happy to clear things up.",asktransgender
intense questioning phase with no strong conviction,"Heads up this is just a brain dump with a tldr on the bottom. 

Hey all I’ve been going through a period of intense thought about gender and sexuality. I’ve been seeing a therapist to talk about my life and when I lay out my thoughts it’s shocking to me how egg like I seem. I used to cross dress and have sex with people but now I sometimes wear women’s outfits and hang out in my home. I routinely wear women’s shoes, shirts, and hoodies since they fit me better (i’m short and skinny). I spend a lot of time imagining life as a woman but i’m not sure if this is just a phase or some manifestation of a kink. 

I’ve put in a huge amount of effort into improving my life and i’m very happy with where i am. I’m successful in my career, have a good social life, and am in a happy relationship with a cis female. Sometimes i feel like something is missing but i might just be guilty of experiencing grass is greener syndrome. 

My gf knows i used to cross dress, and I have shown her pictures. We were playing around in bed recently and she said “you’re a good girl” i was confused and repeated it back to her and the said it again. I wasn’t sure what that was meant to be so I ignored it. That thought really scared me though since my gf is straight and our romantic relationship would probably end if i were to transition. 

When i was a teen i went through something similar and researched transitioning but i got busy and then stopped giving it much thought. I never was comfortable enough to explore gender and sexuality until about a year ago. 

tldr: been going through a long period of questioning. signs seem to indicate i’m not cis but i’m not strongly convinced. ",asktransgender
Alarming increase in promoting violence.,"News of the government's policies towards us are terrible, and must be met strongly with our voices and our votes.  

What isn't acceptable is the idea that this should be a war fought with fists and firearms.  This strategy is absolutely impractical, as the imbalance of power means losing every single time.

Worse, it plays into the hands of those we oppose.  They want a fight.  They want to make us look bad.  They would love nothing more than a reason to kill us in self defense. 

Everyone should be keenly aware of how much manipulation is coming from overseas.  They want to spread discord and chaos.  We are smarter than this, why fall for it?

We are the voices of love and acceptance.  Do not turn the anger we feel into hateful actions that would do nothing but give the enemy what they want.  Stand together proud and show them and the whole world that we are better than that.",asktransgender
Dealing with the inability to become pregnant,"Before I started hrt, I felt vaguely sad that I didnt have the possibility of becoming pregnant, but I was ok with being the mom of my partners child, assuming they have a womb. I just kinda thought, in a lesbian relationship, theres usually one that gets pregnant and one who doesnt, and ill just be the one that doesnt.

Since ive started hrt, that really changed. I feel so much more intensely and clearly that I really wish I could be pregnant. Because its practically an impossibility, I try to just not think about it too much. The fact that I considered the matter 'solved' pre-hrt helped me pretend nothing had changed.

But things have changed. And I have no idea how to really deal with this. With all my other important sources of dysforia I can fix it, but its unlikely ill ever be able to get pregnant myself.

How do you become ok with something you so desperately want but can never have?",asktransgender
Regret of not coming out earlier,"I think I made a big mistake to not contact HR earlier. I’m at a point where anyone I meet for the first time read me as female whereas those who know me from before say I’m male. It makes it so uncomfortable and awkward sometimes, specially when I walk into business meetings and other social events/settings. Everyone’s situation is different, but my general advise is to at least talk to HR and manager early so that you can plan for a smooth transition at work. ",asktransgender
Not really sure what I am,"Damn I can't even figure out how to write this. I don't know what is important information and what would just be me babbling. I am concerned that this will just end up me rambling so TLDR down below. However I also do really want some advice so I want to explain the situation. Shuting up now.

Essentially I was assigned male at birth and that has been fine for the most part. I have always had some internal problems with myself and being a man, long before I ever really knew about any of this. I always wondered what it was supposed to be like to feel like a man, and never felt like I did, like I missed the memo. People talk about things like ""manly pride"" and all that crap and it just has never made sense to me. Just always wrote most of that off as just, the general uncertainty of life I guess? Like oh well I am just over thinking this so stop worrying about it. 

Skip forward to the recent past and essentially i started learning more about all of this. I became friends with a trans girl and wanted to educate myself more on the subject so I started looking into things. That and just hearing parts of her life, well it resonated with me and I began questioning. Insert egg cracking sound effects. I looked back and started rembering how I have sort of been wondering about this subject all my life. I remember times when the same friend had talked with me, asked for my opinion and advice on something as a ""man."" Well I did not really feel comfortable speaking for men. Biggest thing that came up from all this questioning was something that I did as I kid which I had forgotten about until now. I recall dressing up in my sisters clothes when no one was around and feeling this strange wonderful energy, but I was so afraid that anyone would find out. Eventually I stopped and forgot all about it.

So here I am now and just don't know shit. I have been thinking on the subject, wondering what do I think I am or what would be most comfortable being. But I don't know. Am I a man and I am just over thinking it? Am I woman but have some ingrained societal whatever so I can't get comfortable with the concept? Something in between? Agender and that is why I can't really get comfortable with identifying as anything? I just don't know. I feel uncomfortable no matter what situation I imagine or what I imagine being. So I guess to finally get to what this is all about, what should I do to move forward and figure shit out? Any and all advice would be appreciated. I have been wondering about simply looking for a gender therapist to talk to about this all with, but was not sure if that was right or premature or what have you. Thanks in advance!

TLDR: I don't know what gender I am. What would you recommend I do to investigate and figure this out?",asktransgender
Do you like getting random support messages from friends?,"I've seen a couple things shared saying you should text your trans friends and say you love them and are glad they're here and glad they are who they are, because of all the shitty stuff in the news. 

I have a good trans friend, and saying that sounds kind of awkward, and I think he knows that I feel that way. But if y'all mostly think it is good and you appreciate it, I can get over feeling awkward.",asktransgender
Questions about gender dysphoria diagnosis and HRT,"When would it be possible to start HRT without parental consent? 

If I get diagnosed with gender dysphoria, is it possible to start HRT without parental consent? 

Can a doctor explain gender dysphoria (the causes, how it works, why you should fucking trust your kid)? 

How do I even get a diagnosis? 

Would going to a regular doctor at a clinic be suitable to get a diagnosis? 

How much does it cost to get a diagnosis (if it costs anything)? 

Thanks!",asktransgender
"Came Out to Date, He Reacted Poorly, Now Wants to Talk","Hi, everyone! The other day, I disclosed that I am trans to a guy I’ve been on a few dates with over the past couple of weeks. It was clear he really liked me, and that’s why I chose to come out to him. His response was not stellar: he was in no way violent, but he literally sobbed, pouted, and threw a fit because he was so stressed out by this news. (Watching a 35-year-old man have a meltdown like this was not particularly alluring for me.) During that conversation, he said that he knows it’s “not fair” to me, but that he just can’t be with me because of this. He also said that “sucked for him” because he really liked me. I left as graciously as possible after a couple minutes of his crying because it was clear this conversation was going nowhere. 

Last night, he texted me asking if he could call me today. I haven’t answered yet because I don’t know if I want to talk to him or not. Thoughts? How have dates reacted when you disclosed? Have things worked out with someone who initially reacted poorly, or is that a sign that it’s not going to work? Any advise, experiences, or thoughts would be appreciated! Thanks!",asktransgender
Birth Certificate South Carolina,"Hello everyone,

&amp;#x200B;

Could anyone share their experience with me about changing their birth certificate for the state of South Carolina? I received my gender marker change letter (currently live in arizona) today from my MD. I have not had bottom surgery. My letter says the following:

&amp;#x200B;

*I, (Dr. Name), (license #), licensed in the state of Arizona, (DEA #). Am the physician of (Dead name), with whom I have a doctor/patient relationship and whom I have treated.*

&amp;#x200B;

*(dead name) has had appropriate treatment for gender transition to the new gender of female and is irrevocably committed to this change.*

&amp;#x200B;

*I declare under penalty of perjury under the laws of the United States that the forgoing is true and correct.*

I can find no specific requests from South Carolina about what's required. [Transequality.org](https://Transequality.org) suggests:

&amp;#x200B;

 *“This statement is a medical certification of a change of sex of PATIENT. PATIENT has completed medical treatment resulting in physical changes related to sex. PATIENT is a different sex from their biological sex at birth, and is not merely in the process of transitioning, although additional procedures or treatment may still be continuing and life-long. PATIENT’s change is permanent in nature and their change in sex is made with the intent to change permanently and for all purposes. PATIENT's identification documents should be updated accordingly.”* 

&amp;#x200B;

Which my doctor didn't use. Could anyone else who has dealt with SC be able to share? Your response is appreciated.

&amp;#x200B;

\~Taylor\~",asktransgender
Will HRT still change bone structure at 15?,"Hello, I am a 14 year old mtf. I will turn 15 in 4 months. I already have really broad shoulders, a wide chin and protruding brows. Is it still possible to change the bone structure with HRT at 15? Is it possible to get a wide pelvis? Can I go onto blockers and start HRT at 18 and still get good results? Thank you.",asktransgender
"What can I do, as a Cis Guy, to Help the Trans Community Right Now?","Today I get a discord link to the transgender reddit community from my girlfriend. She’s visibly upset, and I begin reading. It’s of course about this memo bull.

I love my country, I consider myself a patriot despite everything because of our contributions to mankind, but this type of shit cannot stand. I cannot live in a country where my girlfriend’s wellbeing is actively and inactivity threatened by a childish orange ape. At the same time I’ve watched my father run away from this country because he fears to fight for what is right. I don’t.

Voting has already taken place for me, I already checked lgbT sites and voting guides for my state (NC) for myself. I voted accordingly. Some of my family knows about my girlfriend and are 100% accepting, I sent them the same guide. Some don’t know, but I know are accepting, they also have the guide. I have sent everyone I know the guide, pleading those that don’t agree or fully understand to vote by the guide.

What more can I do? How can I make this country truly great again? Or greater than it was before?
I want to help, this is personal for me. Give me the resources, the data, anything I can use to convince friends of friends and so on. 

Thank you, I can think of nothing more American than to fight for freedom. Stay safe everyone.

Edit:
I am not new to most transgender issues. I guess I was too subtle for some people who PM’d me asking why a Cis couple was so invested. I’m Cis, my girlfriend is not.

I was looking for advice and I got some good stuff.

Today I’m making a collection for the next Trans Clothing Drive, and I’m calling my representatives.",asktransgender
Macronutrients/Calorie Requirements for HRT?,"I'm going to be starting HRT in January. I weigh about 160 lbs now, and I'd like to get down to 140ish lbs by January, because that's apparently the recommended weight for a woman my height (5'9""). I've been eating about 1900 calories a day down from the \~4000 I used to eat when I was bulking, so I'm losing weight at a pretty steady pace. Once I start HRT, should I try to plan my diet so I maintain the same weight, or should I have a calorie surplus to help gain a little bit of weight? Will the growth of breasts, thighs, etc. require extra calories, or will the hormones do their thing regardless of diet?",asktransgender
"Slightly awkward question about surgery, circumcision, and 'bend'.","[lots of anatomy stuff incoming]

So I'm 17, coming out of my egg slowly but surely. And basically, I won't beat around the bush: I've got a problem with my dick called a chordee- makes it bend downwards. Too much to be useful. Now, I'm scheduled to consult on surgery for it soon (the surgery itself hasn't been scheduled, though). The planned surgery involves a circumcision, and then sorta placing a 'stitch' that pinches the tissue and corrects the bend.

My question is- since I originally consulted on this long before my egg started to crack- how exactly might this affect the possibility of future SRS? I know that having the foreskin tissue is supposed to be useful, especially since I'm kinda small when not erect. Is it worth having this brief surgery anyway, or holding off? (Or should I ask a surgeon about this, perhaps?)

It gets slightly more complicated. I have not, to my knowledge, ever really experienced significant genital dysphoria. However, I'm completely pre-everything, and I understand that this can increase over time as transition continues. So I don't wanna botch my chances now if it becomes a desperate need. On the other hand, though- I'd really like to *use* this thing at least once if I'm possibly gonna get rid of it one day. Already had one partner where penetration was sadly not an option because of this, and since SRS/developing the desire for SRS can take a looooong time to happen, I don't wanna keep doing that for another few years or so.

Anyone got any advice/similar scenarios they've been through? Sorry for the rant, lol.",asktransgender
So lost (need advice),"I'm a nonbinary AMAB person who weighs the pros and cons of estrogen in my head multiple times a day and have been for over a year. I know that almost all the emotional and some of the physical changes I would love, as I absolutely hate being automatically seen as a man and especially hate being called sir (never had an issue with ""he"" though?). I already have a decently round and soft looking face and I have long hair so I honestly wouldn't be too worried about passing (even though I'm enby I'm sure someone would wanna fight me in Idaho if I'm walking down the street in women's clothes as the only non-cis looking thing about me are my sometimes shaved legs and painted nails, and the pride bracelet I wear every day). Societal pressures aside, the things keeping me on the fence about HRT are erectile dysfunction and muscle atrophy. I'm dating an incredible AFAB nonbinary person and we both enjoy penetrative sex (I don't have bottom dysphoria and honestly love both sex and my partner a lot) so this is an issue for me. Is there any known way of going about HRT that doesn't involve extreme loss of libido and muscle loss?

TL;DR: AMAB enby who is very interested in HRT. Love the idea of soft skin, boobs, emotional changes, and erogenous changes. Hate the idea of loss of libido, erectile dysfunction, and muscle atrophy. What do?",asktransgender
Cis white male. Curious to hear peoples interpretations of gender.,"I'll be honest, I haven't spent much time at all thinking about gender throughout my life. However, I've been hearing more and more about it the last few years, and I'm a bit confused. This question is for anyone. What is gender to you? Is it simply identification with different cultures, such as male culture and female culture? If that's the case, theoretically what happens if male and female cultures fuse and become indistinguishable? Does gender disappear? If it's not culture based what would people be identifying with? What would define gender? 

&amp;#x200B;",asktransgender
"Meanwhile, life goes on","So, this has been a really discouraging week, news-wise. And a lot of us are justifiably upset. For a little perspective, I'd like to just share my own little bit of news. I started a new job on Monday! I had been considering how to go about coming out at work when I was laid off a month ago. So I just took it as a chance to be me. Full time. I get gendered female most of the time by strangers. Not because I pass, which I don't. But I think I come off as ""AMAB woman"", as opposed to ""man in a dress"". None of my IDs have been updated, but only HR knows that. I interviewed at a lot of places over the phone, via video, and in-person. There was a somewhat different balance of questions than I'm used to, but I was never treated badly by anyone. I had 2nd and 3rd interviews at several places. I can confidently say that being trans and presenting female didn't make my job search any harder. And since I started at work everyone has been nice, everyone is gendering me correctly, and no one has tried to tell me I'm using the wrong bathroom. This is all happening in the Dallas area.

I'm sharing this story because it's a big deal for me and you all will understand that. But I'm also doing it to offer some perspective on things. I'm angry and scared about Trump just as much as everyone, but I'm not letting it interfere with my life. I'm immeasurably happier than I was before transition. My only regret is *still* that I didn't start sooner. But the reason I waited was fear. 10 months ago this situation would have pressed every button I had to keep me too afraid to even consider transition. And that would have been a tragedy. Even if all the doomsday scenarios actually do come to pass, I'm still better off than I was. And we're all better off than we were even just a few years ago. So go vote, go protest, volunteer, donate, or run for office. Those are all excellent responses to the politics of the moment. But don't let it keep you from doing everything you can to be comfortable in your own body.",asktransgender
What does dysphoria actually feel like,,asktransgender
Anyone have experience with fake IDs?,"I don't plan on using a fake id for alcohol or anything. But as a US citizen (for now), I'm pretty concerned about not one day being able to change my legal gender.  
Should the law pass, I'm considering a fake ID with my actual gender on it, so I can at least do most things safely.  
I'm sorry if this violates the rules, but I was wondering if anybody has experience with this. How hard are they to get? How bad are the legal repercussions if caught?",asktransgender
I’m not sure if this is the right place to ask but I thought I would try.,"I live in Manchester, NH and I am currently in a bad living situation. I am just looking for someone that is transgender or transgender friendly to be a roommate with me in a new apartment. Can’t afford a place on my own because it is too expensive in this state. I am pre-everything right now but plan on starting transitioning next year once my new insurance kicks in. ",asktransgender
Dysphoria cycle?,"Anyone else cycle in and out of dysphoria/obsessing over trans stuff? Is there a predictable pattern to it?

I was super busy and distracted last week and managed to not think too much about gender stuff for the first time in months. The whole trans thing started to feel like an embarrassing memory, like, ""Did I seriously manage to convince myself I was trans? The fuck??"". 

Then my binder came in the mail. I like it. I can finally kind of picture myself as an androgynous guy. 

I also randomly discovered a new singer who's kind of transition goals for me. Seeing guys I envy is probably my biggest trigger. It makes me feel a weird mix of euphoria and dysphoria.

Now I'm feeling the most intense dysphoria of my life, less than a week after feeling like I'd made it all up. My dysphoria's always been pretty mild up until now, so I'm freaking out a bit.

Anyone else cycle like this? Any advice?",asktransgender
why dont i see hetero trans people hooking up with each other ?,personally i would love a ftm bf because you wox understand each other perfectly. but i normally only see transgender women with other cis men and women or other trans women. howcome not trans men? ,asktransgender
IM Injections: injecting quickly but worried about hitting bone,"So I do IM injections in my thigh, and I was of course trained to use the quick, firm motion. But on occasion, I’ve hit what *feels* like it’s be bone (stops the needle in its tracks, area hurts way more than usual and leaves a bruise. I’m skinny af, so it seems likely that the needle could reach the bone).

I’m kinda paranoid about jamming the needle in now and started slowing down, but now it gets stuck at what I *think* is the muscle and it gets hard to push it in after having stopped at the edge.

So two questions:
1. Any other skinny people have bone trouble (assuming that’s what it really is)? Any advice for extra measures to make sure I can’t hit it?
2. If I stop at the edge of the muscle ‘cause I’m going too slow, is it ok to pull the needle back just a touch and then press it back in? Or do I need to start over at that point?

Thanks in advance!",asktransgender
I haven't had surgery but how do I tell my dad I'm not actually Trans*.,"So I'm 14 year old female, I use to think I was female to male. This happened when I was 11-13, I thought that because like male clothes, like short hair, me being uncomfortable in my body, and being all around masculine meant I was Trans\* (I still cringe thinking about this). I came out to my Dad and Mom (My mom isn't part of life anymore, not because I came out) about a year ago. They we're understanding and my dad knew but really didn't like talking about it (I am the youngest, I was the ""daddy's girl"") he never really said ""she"" then he just sorta called me by name (I was born with a gender neutral name). I never came out to anyone else mostly because after I came out to my parents I had doubts if I was actually Trans\*. Everyone just assumed I was a lesbian (which I now know I am) I went along with it.

After Starting High School I finally came to the point where I want to continue to live as a girl and I now know I'm not Trans\*. I want to regrow my hair out and get some more feminine clothes, but I still have to tell my Dad and Therapist I'm not Trans\*. I don't know how to word it, I feel like a failure and that I dis-credit actual Transgender people. I hate myself for coming out and I don't know how to fix this,",asktransgender
I think my mom has tried to supress my transness my entire life.,"So I came out to my mom 4 months ago, and she has only been unsupportive and directly deny it and not wanting to use my new name or pronouns. I do own a lot of girls clothing witch I really want to wear all the time. But my mom has guilt tripped me hardcore telling me what if the neighbours see it (I live in a small area, and know them) and tell everyone? How would you be treated? And many other degogotary things while always misgendering me even when I try to correct her, she denies it saying im a “man” now.

But I recently got thinking together with a friend about how she must have reacted eariler in life about this, and I realize she might have activly and deliberatly tried to shame me out of it all my life. It was so early as when I was 4 or 5 years old, I had taken her lipstick and used it on myself. I dont remember anything from that age, but I have a picture of it on the big harddrive of all the pictures they took of me as young. She has never talked about it to me. Later date when I was in primary school I was bullied but she did not want me to move school, it was so bad. If I knew what suicide was, id fucking done it. But my mom did not belive me, she never does. She always thinks she knows whats better for me. So she didnt belive me when I said I cried on school and in class. Untill my dad came to school and saw I wasnt joking. But they did not change anything at home, life continued as usual even after that. Not even allowed to change school.

My mom also always told me what clothes I could buy and couldnt buy, and often guilted me for picking out girly clothes, which has now made me extremely anxious about even going by womens stores (I have cry at the mall its that bad). And it often ended with her picking out clothing for me and me saying yes even though I didnt like them.

At 14/15 I wanted to shave my legs as it had begun to grow and I hated it so much. But then my mom did a full on lecture on how wrong of me as a man it was to do that. And how everyone would begin to bully me again for it if they found out if I even wanted to do it. So I kept my mouth shut in panic never saying it again, living in pain seeing myself grow body hair. Dreaming of litterly getting a knife and cutting all my skin off, but my mom didnt listen to me.

Trough all of the middle school I always loved looking at the girls, but when boys commented how sexy their boobs and ass was I was so dumbfounded they were looking at that? I was always so fasinated by the clothes and hair. I broke completely down one day realizing I would never ever be able to wear thoose nice clothes (I did not know that trans was a thing). And my mom told me she owned a thights and that (as I loved the look). So then started a cycle where I would wear her tights at home alone day in and out. Every day was go home wear tights before others came home. This lasted for a solid year, every day was wearing thights day.

She has done a lot more, but theese are the first ones I can think of, but there is one more thing iwe always dreamed of was to run away. Every single day on primary, middle and now high school I litterly dream of jumping out my window and running away. I dont want to be here, and realize now that im 18 I can accualy do it. But as im apparently helpless I get so undecisive about doing any decicions as I always go to my mom first and ask her if its okay or tell her about it before I do it to see how she reacts. I have never thought about myself for my entire life, and im only now just beginning to realize how bad that is. I have never been myself, nor tried to. Iwe suppressed it extremely hard. Just to give you an idea, I only realized I had favorite colors only 2 months ago. Before I always just said I didnt have any. Its really depressing everything and I dont really know what to do forwards as HRT in Norway is espessaly hard to get and my body is just getting worse and worse.

My mom is also very controlling to this day, constantly sending me SMS if iwe eaten breakfast, lunch. If I have done homework, that I need to sleep or not sleep, and much much more. Everything I do HAS to go trough her, if I do something without her knowledge she gets super panicy and tells me how bad it is and how if I got in trouble she wouldnt know how to help me and such. Its such a fucking horrible mess and I hate my mom for all of this. I just want to get away but I dont know if I should. When I told my mom I wanted to move out she said no, and how it was a bad idea and a waste of money. And all of the sudden wanted me to redesign my room. And she would pay for everything, so I can get anything I want for my room as long as it is not like 1000$ of dollars. But I dont think she is doing it to be kind, as its very out of her doing and I am really dumbfounded of why she all of the sudden just lets me do so much for free. I have to pay for my own subscriptions online such as Spotify and other services, my own phone and computer and all other utilities similar to this. And I do not have a job, so I got a shitty half broken Oneplus phone now and spendt all my money on building a computer against my parrents will, they were so against it and I postponed it for many years. Its shitty. This is getting rather venty but im just so pissed at them how they are, and now that I have told them they are trying to be all nice and such. I feel like they are trying to build up something to guilt me into staying with them as I really feel like they would be angry at me moving when they just renovated my room and how mean I was to them for doing it and such. And as im helpless it will seriously mess with me if they did that. I would prob break down and end up staying home. 

Also I am suicidal, and have contacted every possible suicide hotline, without any results. Been to my doctors and told her, she didnt do much but send me out again. And my therapist didnt belive me to be “a person who would end my own life”. My therapist also doesnt belive me about anything, and I have stopped going to him. He was so bad for me. And still trying to recover from that mess. And my mom litterly doesnt belive me when I say I want to end my own life, she just says to me to not say things like that. Every time. She doesnt reassure me or say anything. Just tells me to not say it. So I have kept silent about it for a long time, so long I dont know how long other than id say most my life.

Any ideas how to solve or better my situation would be great. Im 18, live in Norway .",asktransgender
Dressy women's shoes?,"What it sounds like. I am not at all comfortable in heels and flats seem like they expose my feet too much? what else is there for a trans girl tryna get a job? black neutralish shoe types, like what are they called any keywords? (and cheap i don't have much money) its really overwhelming so any thoughts are appreciated ",asktransgender
When you run into your old coach but now you're transitioned,"So for my electrolysis for GCS, I have to travel. On my way home sometimes I stop at a restaurant in the town I grew up in to grab a bite to eat.

Tonight I had to wait for what I ordered. There was only one other person sitting there. It was my basketball coach from when I was in Grammar School. (I'm 45 now)

There were skeletons setup where he was sitting. I broke the ice and made a joke about the ""lousy service"".

Then I said - hey you're ""John Smith"" aren't you? (I knew damn well it was him).  He said yes. I said - you coached my brother's basketball team (my ""brother"" being me, of course). He said maybe what's your brother's name? I gave him my deadname. He knew exactly who I was talking about and got excited - saying how great that team was (we were undefeated). We chatted for a bit - and then my food was ready. As I was leaving he said - Do you still talk to your brother?  I said - yes we're very close (hard to keep a straight face at this point). He said - please tell him I said hello. I said - of course, I'm sure he'd say the same to you.

I wasn't sure if I should say hello but I am glad I did. I wish in could have been honest because he was such a nice guy - then and now - but that would have been an entirely different conversation.

Life sure can be interesting sometimes!",asktransgender
"I promise I’m asking this in good faith: How, in your mind, is being trans different from identifying with gender stereotypes of the opposite sex?","As a cis(mostly)het man, I always assumed this was just something I wouldn’t ever understand. And maybe that’s the answer? 

What differentiates between, for example, a man that likes stereotypically female things like wearing dresses, makeup, pink, etc, and a man that wants to transition into being a woman because they like the same things?

Is this just something that I’m not really meant to get? I feel like the only reason I feel like I’m a man IS my sex, and if I were born with female genitalia I would probably also be comfortable being a woman (although maybe that’s just me and probably isn’t universal, I’m pretty feminine in a lot of respects). 

I understand gender is a social construct, but I guess I’m struggling to understand why trans people are distinct from people who fight gender norms within their assigned sex. ",asktransgender
I don't know how to approach my student,"I do have a new student that I assume is transgender. Our official university mail adresses have to match the name in their ID, which seems to be a foreign female one. But the student goes by another name, signs Mails with it etc. This name is neither clearly male nor female. I don't want to go straight to the student asking for the appropriate pronoun because I imagine this to be rather rude (since it indicates it would be clearly visible the student is currently transitioning). Am I overthinking?
Thank you! ",asktransgender
"A very, very scary result from a question given to a Trump group, showing motivation behind the memo","CW/TW: If you are not emotionally in a very solid place, especially depressed/suicidal, do not read this.

From here: https://www.facebook.com/photo.php?fbid=2188821688063933&amp;set=a.1530642677215174&amp;type=3

By: George Godwyn

Something happened on Facebook awhile ago that I’ve never written about and only shared with a few people. I kept it to myself, mostly, because I didn’t want to upset the people in question, but I guess it’s time. (And for probably the first time I am going to put a content warning on a post, because this post probably requires one. So, here's a CW for violence against trans people.)

For a long time, I wondered about the understanding of gender on the far right, the Trump right. The bathroom controversy, in particular I thought bizarre. I can understand the basic conservatism and fear of new ideas, but the bathroom conflict seemed odd to me. It was extremely important in the minds of Trump supporters, even though it can’t possibly be a common problem in most of the areas these people live. The position on the right seemed precisely the opposite of what it should be. Why do you want someone presenting as a woman in every respect using the damn men’s room, or vice versa? Isn’t that going to be more socially outrageous, in most situations? I didn’t get it. So I decided to ask the Trump supporters.

I posted a picture of Buck Angel, a transgender adult film actor, in a few of large, sometimes huge, Trump groups. The picture showed a very buff, ripped Mr. Angel from the waist up, shirtless, with a shaved head and sporting a Fu Manchu mustache. He is an extremely masculine looking guy. With the picture I included the question “This person has a vagina. Which bathroom should they use?”

I thought at least some of these people will realize how silly it would be to want this man to use the ladies room. How socially awkward and alarming that would be, in so many situations. Putting aside how dangerous it would be for the man, simply on the basis of the the immediate, practical effect on the other diners in the given Applebee’s or wherever it was happening.

The post got hundreds of comments, finally thousands. Immediately. The Trump supporters had a very clear answer and they were adamant about it. Almost no answered with “the men’s room”. A few said things like “if they’ve got a vagina, they use a woman’s room, if they have a penis, they use the men’s room.” But the majority of the of the commenters had an answer I hadn’t considered at all. These people had worked out a very simple solution to the problem of transgender people and the norms revolving public restrooms.

They wanted transgender people to die.

They were quite explicit about it, very blunt. “They should die.” That simple. That concise. “They should die.”

Let me be entirely clear about this – they knew what they were saying, they knew exactly what they wanted. They didn't want a trans man in the men's room and they didn't want a trans man in the woman's room. They wanted the trans man to be dead.

Of course some of them were more loquacious than that. They had reasons they should die, preferred methods, they expressed their feelings about the fantasized the deaths, but death or something similar was the most common answer. ""Stop being"", essentially. A lot of other people answered “they should stay home”, maintaining the status quo without having to deal with the problem while still allowing transgender people to, you know, live, but mostly death or some sort of violence was the preferred option. Comment after comment, they should die, fuck them, stay-at-home, don’t use the bathroom, I’ll kill them if I catch them in the bathroom with my daughter, they should die, they should die, they should die.

Oh, and in case That's not plain enough, it wasn’t just death they were threatening. They were threatening anything they could think of. Torture, castration, humiliation, at adults and children alike. Any brutal, vicious insult or threat imaginable. I’ve watched these groups for years, dozens of them. Anyone who watches the news, who’s seen our president make a speech, knows how mean, how grotesque, how petty and ugly these people can be. The things they say about Mexicans, Muslims, about women, gay people, immigrant children. Even if you haven’t been in one of these groups, it’s not hard to imagine. Jesus, our president publicly mocked a disabled man. But I still wasn’t prepared for the comments in this thread. Just sheer, stark, gut level hatred, unencumbered by the slightest empathy. Loathing. Disgust. Raw hate.

As much time as I’ve spent in these groups, examining these people, I didn’t think anything could shock me. I was wrong. Maybe it shouldn’t have, but it did.

There is not one single issue that brings the evil out in Trump supporters the way trans-people do, there is no class of people more loathed. More than anything else, gender self-determination symbolizes precisely the social progress that animates the Trump right. They despise it and the people who embody it. Understand this. This issue is central to these people on the right, there is nothing they feel more deeply about. The Trump right does not want a solution to the social problem of trans people and restroom use. They simply do not want trans people to exist. That is what they want. What they demand. Nonexistence.

Today the New York Times reported that the Trump administration is now in the process of redefining the administrative understanding of gender as simply a matter of biology and nothing more. Gender would be determined solely and entirely by birth assignment – as male or female, immutable and unchangeable, a fact. They are already rolling back numerous civil rights guarantees instantiated in the Obama years, policies that allowed a significant portion of our nation to live their lives with some basic dignity and safety. Essentially the Department of Health and Human Services intends to define transgender people out of existence.

This is happening now. Right now.

Like I said at the beginning, I never really talked about that little test I did in the Trump groups with Buck Angel’s picture much before this. I know so many trans people and I know how difficult it can be for them, sometimes, just to live their lives, what a scary place the world can be. I felt like it was all too awful, I didn’t want to scare people even more. I guess it probably wouldn’t come as a shock to most of my trans friends, it’s a reality they live every day, but I just didn’t want to pile on. But it's too late for all that now.

I haven’t heard people talking about the Health and Human Services attack on trans rights all that much, so far, and I’m a little surprised, because we should all be clear about something. The changes they are making don’t mean a little inconvenience for a few trans people.

They mean death. It’s that simple. It’s going to mean withdrawal, seclusion, humiliation, violence and death.

Think about the Trump supporters I described, think about the thousands of comments I just told you about. Now think about the reinforcement this sort of decision makes for their worst instincts, think about a trans man, presenting as a man, being forced to use the ladies room in some Podunk, red state, Trump voting shithole.

Now how do you suppose that goes down with the rest of the folks in the having dinner? And how do you suppose the teenage trans boy using the ladies room goes down with the parents of the teenage girls at the high school? And how does that make the teenage trans boy feel? Or the teenage trans girl having to share a bathroom with the testosterone jacked 17-year-old jocks at the high school? And what do you suppose happens to the trans girl forced to onto a man’s prison block?

Humiliation, violence, rape, suicide, and murder. Death. Trans rights are a matter of life and death, in a very real, very palpable way. The definitions change, and people die. The rules change, and people die. The laws change, and people die. Immediately.

This is happening because the people in the White House get it. They know their base, and they know exactly what their base wants. They got it 100% right this time. They are defining transgender people out of existence because they know their base wants transgender people to be dead.

Trans rights, opposition to gender self-determination, hatred for trans people, as I’ve already described, are at the heart of the Trump phenomena. There is nothing that evokes the hatred and fear and violence on the right the way the simple existence of trans people does. It is stomach turning to see, horrible in its blind ferocity, and I don’t know how the fuck my trans friends have the strength and poise to live every day in the face of that horror, that hatred, but they do. I suppose they have to, and that’s where the fight is now.

I don’t care who you are, I don’t care where you are in the political spectrum, I don’t care how fucking liberal or leftist you are, I don’t care how feminist you are, if you don’t support trans-rights, you are not on my fucking side. I don’t give a fuck about your bio–essentialist arguments, I don’t give a fuck about your history with men, I don't care about your pissing eight year old or your bigot grandmother. Frankly, I don’t give a fuck about your traumatic sexual assault if it means you’re going to take it out on some fucking teenage girl who doesn’t want to have to use a bathroom with a bunch of frat boys and have the same fucking thing happen to her. Fuck you.

If you want to know where the battle lines are drawn most clearly and unmistakably, between decency and the dark, right now, in the United States, in 2018, it’s here. Trans rights are the battlefield and trans people, like it or not, are in the vanguard of that battle. They are the front-line in a fight they never asked for, every fucking day, every hour, every time they leave the fucking house.

There is no fight more important as this, now, today. There are no people so vulnerable, so marginalized and there should be no fucking doubt among anyone on the left, any liberal, any libertarian, about this.

The fight is here now, it’s happening. An entire marginalized community, federally defined out of existence and set up to be victimized by a segment of the population too fucking backwards and just plain, willfully dumb to bother to try and understand what the hell is going on in the world, or empathize with another fucking human being.

If we don’t stop this, people are going to die, killed for something they can’t change, for who they are in the deepest part of themselves. Not somewhere down the road, not in five years, but now. They’re going to start dying now.

We can’t let that happen. Those of us who still live in the modern world still own this culture and we need to do what we can to make sure it doesn't. We cannot go back to the 1950s, we cannot watch more people die simply for being born a woman or a man. We cannot let that happen. We can't lose this battle.

This isn't temporary, this isn't going to go away tomorrow, the last two years is only the beginning. Gender self-determination will be the civil rights battle of the 21st century. If we have to fight this for the rest of our lives, we cannot allow these fuckers, this raw hate, to win.

So be shocked for a second, cry about it for a minute, and while you're at it, maybe today is a good day to hug your trans friends, tell them you got their back. Because we do, a lot of us. America isn’t just Trump supporters. Remember that, guys and gals. For what it’s worth, some of us got your back.

Then get over it and get ready, because this is a fight and you're in it. We all are, all of us, left, liberal, libertarian, right, if you're a decent human being and you care about basic human rights, you're in it up to your ass and the water is rising fast.

Hatred is a powerful emotion and it is temporarily ascendant, but hate can't beat the future, and that future is an America, a world, where every single trans person lives their life safely and with the same dignity any other man or woman enjoys, because ultimately, as badly as they want to, they just can't turn back the clock. Not when so many of us stand in their way, not with so many lives on the line. They just can't.

And that really is immutable, unchangeable. That really is a fact.

WontBeErased",asktransgender
How do I get my parents to stop holding on to the last visible bits of the gender I was assigned at birth,"I (17 FTM) cracked my egg about 6 years ago and have been presenting in an increasingly masculine way ever since. Currently I am generally passable, though whenever I do something even remotely feminine, my parents make an extraordinarily big deal about it. For example, when I got my senior photos taken for school, the only one my mom ordered was where I looked more androgynous. They have been aware of my gender nonconformity for a long time so I find it especially surprising that they still have this habit even after directly told them I plan on fully transitioning months ago. I have had conversations with my mom about avoiding referring to me in feminine ways (since she wont use my correct name and pronouns) and she seemed like she got the theory but then told me I needed to try and understand her reluctance since ""I was her daughter for almost 18 years"". Both I and my gender therapist have tried to tell them how stressful it is to be socialized as female and i'm just not sure what to do at this point.",asktransgender
I think I have a 'crush',"I'm in serious shit. 

I've never actually had a 'crush' before. Sure, I've thought some people were cute, sure, but I don't think it's been like this. If you haven't seen my spam posts, let me get you up to date. I'm bisexual and questioning my gender. I refer to myself fully as male right now, though I prefer to say I'm just questioning. 

Like I said before, I'm in some shit here. There's this boy, and I know he's had a crush on me before, as I've known him for like 3 years, but I don't know about now. I haven't come out to him (or to any of my friends outside of my bff). The reason I'm so stressed out about this is, well, because he's cis, straight(I think), and probably transphobic. A large part of me really - *really* \- wants to try a relationship with him, but my dumb ass gender issues are fucking it up, as usual.  Another part of me suggests that maybe I could stay female for him, but would it be worth it? 

I know this sub isn't for me to ask for relationship advice, but please, I really need it. 

&amp;#x200B;",asktransgender
Stress reactions after transition,"Hi,

&amp;#x200B;

I have noticed that the way my body reacted to stress has changed over the course of my medical and social transition.  My methods of coping did not help me anymore the way they used to. The limits of my physical and mental performance have changed as well.  Extensive stress now causes physical symptoms like being constantly short of breath, dizziness , nausea and even fever.

&amp;#x200B;

I want to raise awareness that your health is important and that you should look out for new ways of dealing with your body during the transition. Allow yourself some time to accomodate for changes and adapt to new limits. Overdoing can cause real lasting harm like damaging your memory and focus, making your immune system weaker and so on. ",asktransgender
Insurance is denying coverage of my estrogen (estradiol valerate). Is there any way to fight this?,"For some reason they covered the whole cost of my spironolactone, though (about $91 USD).

Update: called insurance company. As it turns out the pharmacy used old insurance information. It's covered.",asktransgender
Hormone results come back today :),So i did my hormone test yesterday for the first time after being on hrt for 3 months :) and I got my results back today idk if it's good or not but my estrogen was 107pg/ml and my testosterone was 185.5ng/dl my doseage has been 2mg estradiol 2x a day and 50mg spironolactone 2x a day. Oh I also switch to depo cypionate injections yesterday :) hehe ,asktransgender
Best recommendations for Positive (or informative) Trans Media,"I'm a librarian who wants to create a display for Transgender Day of Remembrance in a month. I've done this previously, but for obvious reasons (in US) I want to go above and beyond this time. I've also been wanting to purchase and donate new LGTBQ material to my library. Unfortunately, it can be hard to know what transmedia is good. Sometimes the trans books that get mentioned on lists are actually filled negative stereotypes, or they are cis individuals overtaking the trans narrative.   


So, I figured I'd reach out and see if anyone can recommend their favorite affirming trans media. I have a decent start of books by going off of a PFLAG list, but I would also love CD or Movie recommendations.  


I'm starting off with:

* Redefining Realness, Janet Mock
* Tranny, Laura Jane Grace
* Transgender Dysphoria Blues (CD), Against Me!
* Being Jazz, Jazz Jennings
* I Am Jazz, Jazz Jennings
* She's Not There, Jennifer Boylan
* Gender Outlaw, Kate Bornstein
* Beyond Magenta, Susan Kuklin
* Transgender History, Susan Stryker
* Assigned Male Comics, Sophie Labelle
* Super Late Bloomer, Julia Kaye
* The Bride was a Boy, Chii",asktransgender
Looking for friends in Greece,"I know this might come off as weird (or maybe it's only me who thinks that, who knows).

It's just that i think it'd be somehow easier if I were to attempt to express my feelings in Greek rather than English, but then again I'm rather hopeless with that sort of thing. At this point I don't have anyone with whom I can talk freely (I'd probably get immediately disowned if I came out to them - and my brother just doesn't give a shit) and I guess that's what I'm trying to do. 

I guess where I'm trying to take this... post is that, I'm pretty lonely. Online ""friends"" on Discrod and whatnot living miles away from me don't really do *it* (whatever *it* may be) for me, apparently. Real-life ""friends"" from whom I have to constantly hide only get tiresome and I feel I'm not making any kind of progress. 

Finding some community of (mostly) trans people in Greece would be ideal. But then again I'm not exactly interested in meeting anyone face-to-face, but having somebody to talk to would be great. I guess I'm essentially looking for a Greek-centric community for trans people in discord or somewhere.

I know it's a bit ironic to be looking for *that* through an America-centric website, but what can you do...",asktransgender
Non- Passing Voice?,"I am 90% certain that I would be able to pass and life stealth if it wasn't my voice.  I get clocked the second i open my mouth, and look.  People are generally confused when they hear me.  Ive gone to voice therapy, practice at home and with my partner.  But for some reason I just freeze up when I have speak in public and use my guy voice, along with all my guy phrasing and such.  I just want to sound different!  Anyone else struggle with this? Any recommendations? ",asktransgender
Cost of a Planned Parenthood appointment + labwork?,"On my 18th bday, I plan on my gift to myself as starting HRT. However, I currently don't have much money, and I can't use my insurance (I'm on my dad's insurance). I really, really want this (in fact, I pretty much need it if I ever want to be happy). I want to do a lot on my 18th birthday, as I want it to be the day my life turns around and starts to be good again (include getting a tattoo similar to [this](http://yeahtattoos.com/wp-content/uploads/2015/03/Butterfly-Tattoos-eWd2.jpg)). I'm not sure if I'll have money to do it all. My hormones will supersede all else, as they are the main thing I need to be happy (although I am super anxious, I am not currently employed because I moved in with my mother and had to quit my job, and this is the first big medical decision I will make). Also, I am afraid that in the future my dad will find out that I am on HRT and take me off his insurance. Can I even make the appointment if I am not 18 yet as long as it falls on or after my 18th birthday? How much will it total for the appointment, labwork, the hormones (basically everything I need to pay in order for me to have my first dose of hormones) be? If it helps, I want to go to a VA location. ",asktransgender
Getting Trans Services?,"Hi everyone. This is my third post here and hopefully will be one of the last as I'm really close to entering the beginning steps of my physical transition. I've found a place in the Los Angeles that offers trans services and know what I'm looking for in terms of my identity. However, with there being so many facets to transitioning, I find myself struggling to verbalize what I need help with. I've been staring at a phone number to a clinic for what seems like a lifetime, unsure of what to tell and what not to tell whoever answers that phone at the front desk. My current goal in my transition is to start HRT and get my head together. I've been looking to start forever but an incredibly strong force has been seemingly stopping me at every turn. 

I feel as if I'm asking a dumb question, but how do I tell this clinic that I need their help and what information is relevant to them when I call for their  services? What do I need to bring? I would appreciate if people tell me their experiences with the medical side of transitioning and how they got into appointments. I guess I'm asking this out of fear that I won't go through the process correctly and then get denied or something. Anything you can tell me to make this process easier will be greatly appreciated. ",asktransgender
Question about Scarlett Johansson and Rub &amp; Tug?,"So after reading the comments here:

https://www.reddit.com/r/movies/comments/9r40ty/scarlett_johansson_turned_down_film_funding_from/?sort=top

I do have a few questions about it. Even though most of the comments were a shit show, some people did bring up the argument that the film won't be made and if it did it would get less exposure?

I saw someone bring up the counter argument that at the very least it should have being played by a man, and forgive me for paraphrasing cause I can't find the exact quote, but the argument would arise it would just be seen as someone wearing a dress instead of the actual cause. But I think the argument was made for the Danish Girl, sorry don't know the plot of either films.

I saw other arguments applying this more broadly, like daniel day lewis playing someone with Cerebral palsy
 in My Left Foot, although that's a problematic example.

Any articles explaining my questions would be fine and greatly appreciated!

Thank You

",asktransgender
Should I start on natural estrogen before moving onto prescribed Estrogen?,"I bought a bottle of Estrogen online (Estrolibrium) and I want to start taking it now.
However I have a meeting with my Endocrinologist in December to be prescribed but I don't want to wait that long to start my transition.

I know natural estrogen doesn't have much of an impact has prescription estrogen but I'd say it's a start.

Should I wait for Decembers meeting or should I start taking these natural estrogen to get my body ready?",asktransgender
Recently upped to 6mg and feel way off,"So yeah, I feel off and even look off. I felt way more feminine on 4mg and felt that I even looked more feminine as well right now a month after upping I definitely notice that the fat in my face has almost went back to what it was pre transition. This just feels off and wrong and I’m just so confused. I wanna feel calm and girly again like I felt before. Is it possible more E is not always better?? My levels on 100mg sport and 4 mg estrogen are 72estro and 85test",asktransgender
US Passport - Can the doctor letter be printed from an online health portal?,"Assuming it hits all the requirements in the State Dept template, is signed, on letterhead, etc?

My doctor's office uploaded the letter to the online health portal that they use, and I'm not sure if it matters if I print that versus ask for an original copy.",asktransgender
I'm finally opening up.,"Alright, this is going to be a long post. I just wanted to get people's opinion on this before going to a professional about anything.

I was born a female.
Ever since I can remember, I've always wanted to be a boy. As a child I was often confused for being a boy as well. I disliked most things ""girly"" and stuck to my naturally boyish interests (I don't know if this is important or not, but I found it easier to befriend boys than girls as well).

However, I was a very quiet child when it came to this, I didn't tell anyone about it.
I didn't explore why I may feel this way, I just internalized the feeling without thinking about it.

Just to give you an idea of the situation, both my parents are and were emotionally and mentally abusive. Sometimes it would turn into physical abuse. Especially with my mother when I was young.

Both of my parents were both strict on ideals and what life they wanted me to lead, so as I grew up, I wanted to be that to please them. Anything that maybe didn't fit what they wanted that I was feeling, I quickly dismissed.

Through my preteen/teen years I still felt the same desire to be a male. As I grew up, I wondered if this could me possibly having signs of gender dysphoria, but I quickly dismissed any further thoughts and pushed my feelings further away. In my mind, I was going to marry a boy, have a family, and do everything else to keep them happy.

In this time (and anytime, really), when needing to dress up, I always wanted to dress more masculine than I did. I was very uncomfortable with my forming female parts, and still am uncomfortable with them.

A lot in my life changed when I met the woman I'm with now. We've both helped each other a great amount. We've been together for three years, and while watching some heavy gender topic videos, I fully opened up to her about what I feel deep down. I want to be male. I'm very uncomfortable with my body for a number of reasons, and I believe the gender issue is a part of that. When I imagine myself becoming a male, it makes me feel genuinely happy. Since opening up to her about this, it feels like a weight has been lifted off my shoulders. 

I have depression, and since explaining all this to her and my desires, it has seemed to improve it a little bit. I feel like a major part of my life that I have been neglecting is now able to be fully explored. This being said, I'm feeling a lot of confusion and frustration as this is all being let out. This is where my question comes in.

If I haven't explained enough above, or with what I'm going to say yet, please ask any questions you have.

My body is biologically female, therefore when people ask, I tell them I am a girl. But in my mind, I feel like a boy. I can cope with the way things are now, but it's still nagging. Late at night I stay up deeply wishing I could just wake up as a boy. I want there to be a day where I can be kne, and called one as well. I wish I could be more open with my feelings beyond my girlfriend, but I don't think the others in our life would understand. I have researched a bit the process of transitioning too, just for the record...

Now, here is the conclusion and question.

I'm not a professional.

I am not going to claim what I am feeling is definitely a form of gender dysphoria.

My question to you is, based on what I've said, do you think it is or could possibly be that? If not, what do you think it is, and what steps should I take next as I try to embrace this side of my life that I have been trying to suppress for so many years?

Also, if I have said anything offensive or phrased something wrong, I apologize. Please let me know and I will fix it. Otherwise thank you for your time, your thoughts will be much appreciated if you decide to comment.",asktransgender
What are the cons of transitioning at 22 compared to younger ages? (MtF),"I want to start my transition next year. I will be turning 22. I'm really worried that I am too late and will miss out on a lot of things. For example, your pelvis begins to fuse in your early 20's so HRT won't make my hips as wide compared to if I started before I was in my 20's. Are there any other similar disadvantages? Thanks :) ",asktransgender
DAE think if you are on the verge of changing your legal documents ( &lt; 12 months) that you should do it sooner rather than later.,"Hoping I could just get some advice. I am m2f but this would apply to anyone. I haven't changed any of my legal documents yet but have been on HRT since 7/2017. I honestly don't have a ""date"" to go full-time I am kind of just going with the flow; whenever it happens it happens.

I live in Virginia so updating my DL and BC ""should be"" pretty easy.

I can't see many cons of going ahead and changing it, any thoughts on this?",asktransgender
Struggle finding large enough shoes.,"So I’m mtf and still pre-everything (hormone appointment in 2 weeks. Yay!), as well both tall and big, and am having an issue finding women’s shoes in a size that would fit. I generally wear a men’s 11.5-13 depending on the shoe which I Understand would be about a women’s 13-15, but can’t find many places that sell them, so just wondering if anyone who has larger feet has any suggestions on where to look. Also, crossing my fingers that hormones and losing weight will help shrink my feet. Lol.",asktransgender
What are your most memorable “I can’t believe I just passed” moments?,"Went to the market in men’s clothing, without makeup and with my hair hidden. Was about to use a masc-of-center voice with the cashier when “ma’am” came out of his mouth and I used my femme voice instead. When I expressed my disbelief to my sister, she said “Well yeah, you just look like a lesbian.”

Today the girl I’ve been sitting next to in class since August started asking me for advice about boys, birth control and period blood. Didn’t see that one coming. Guess I must not look *that* much like a lesbian then. 

 ",asktransgender
I'm forever caught in the androgynous limbo,"I'm 7 months into HRT but I'm still really stressed. I wish I felt that peace of mind that so many people in here talk about. But I feel doomed because of my features. I have a very long face and a prominent brow bossing that make it impossible for me to consistently pass. But at the same time, it seems that fat redistribution and the glow of my skin makes my face too feminine to at least stay in boymode. Whatever I wear I still get harsh stares. 

&amp;#x200B;

I'll never be able to afford FFS. Sometimes I feel like I should just quit HRT and go back to male. Life made me feel like a woman but didn't grant me the features to look like one.",asktransgender
How to make dysphoria go away without transitioning?,"It’s very likely that transition would cost me my girlfriend of 10+ years. I love her too much to risk losing her. But I’m terrified that I’m a ticking time bomb, and these feelings are just going to get worse, ultimately causing even more heartbreak in the future.

There must be people out there who have found ways of coping without transitioning? How do you do that? Is it better to try to completely avoid all things trans, or is it better to find some outlets for it? Can I make myself feel happy as a non-binary person instead of a binary trans person?

Edit: I am ‘out’ to my girlfriend, she knows transition is something I am considering.",asktransgender
Just came out to my doctor whose referring me to a therapist/endocrinologist! What will hrt be like...?,"I took a huge step and finally came out to my life long doctor who took it very professionally!  He wasn't all gung-ho about it but he just said it wasn't his place to judge and he gave me a referral to a endo/therapist office that handles transgender stuff!  

I'm nervous but excited to see the therapist and talk about well, my plans going forward, but anyways I'm really scared to actually start hrt, what will it be like?  What will the first day, week, month, year feel like?  I know the long term results after years will be my skin looking softer, my fat redistributing more femininely, and growing breasts, but what will the first few days and weeks feel like?  Will I ""feel it"" right away that in my brain is swimming around in new hormones or is it slower and more subtle?  I'm 22 so while I regret not figuring it out sooner and being able to start before going through puberty; I'm still young and have plenty of opportunity for it to still ""work"" well right?",asktransgender
I came out recently [mtf] and I wanted to know what I could do to help feminize my lower body [pre hrt],,asktransgender
Good place to chat with other trans people?,"I like coming to this forum, but it's for asking questions and I don't always have questions, sometimes I just want to talk to someone else who might understand.",asktransgender
Transition on brazil,How do i get hrt in brazil? I need help.,asktransgender
What is wrong with being a fetish?,"I know that a lot of women hate being a fetish. Such as transwomen, fat women and asian women. But why is it a bad thing? I am a short man. I would love being adored by a woman for being short? It would make me feel like a prize.",asktransgender
I'm scared I've convinced myself I have dysphoria when I actually don't,"I'm a 17 year old AMAB person, and I've been struggling with the whole gender thing for almost a year now. It started off with a gender tf fetish and some idle fantasies about sex as a girl... but now it's basically the only thing I think about, and I'm scared that I've somehow weirdly tricked myself into having dysphoria when I didn't because I just *never* felt like I do right now. Is that even possible?",asktransgender
Could the common understanding that ‘(untreated) gender dysphoria never goes away’ be skewed by a bad self-selecting sample group?,"I see it said very frequently that,

1. Gender dysphoria never truly goes away
2. (Untreated) Gender dysphoria generally gets worse with age.

But I wonder if we just think that because as a group, we’re a self-selecting sample that engage in these discussions. If your dysphoria goes away, you’ll stop posting on trans forums and so never share the feedback of ‘actually, my dysphoria went away, and I’m fine now.’

Does anyone know if there are good, reliable studies that show whether dysphoria can go away/improve over time?

Is anyone here actually that missing person whose dysphoria actually went away?",asktransgender
Transfem Breast Augmentation resources?,"Hi! I'm trying to put together some resources for trans women and transfem nonbinary people who want to get top surgery but I can't find very much. I have found some informative youtube vlogs and a couple of pages from genderconfirmation, but that's about it. Does anyone know where I can find more good info on this kind of top surgery? Like what you need to do to prep for it, how the recovery process is, etc.",asktransgender
Starting HRT with no Spiro?,"I just got my prescription from Planned Parenthood yesterday, and they prescribed me 0.5 mg of Estrogen twice a day for 6 weeks before my follow up appointment. No Spiro. Is that normal? I’ve never heard of anyone else ever starting without Spiro. ",asktransgender
"Out of the loop: Trump, Transgender in the news",What exactly does all of this mean.  How will this effect us on a singular basis? As a community? ,asktransgender
Diary?,"Since the day that I came out and accepted myself, I've created a video diary of my personal thoughts, feelings, changes and events. Eventually I would like others who are just starting out maybe those that are supporting to have a personal glimpse into our lives.

Are there others out there who have done something similar from the start that is available out there somewhere?",asktransgender
Are the upper thighs a good spot for patches?,"I've tried my inner thighs before but they're extremely flabby and flex a lot which causes the patch to wrinkle and peel very quickly. I've also tried my butt but I have the same problem due to all the fat there.

My upper thighs are less flabby (albeit still fat so should absorb fine) and the skin doesn't move nearly as much so I'm thinking they'd be a decent spot.

Does anyone else place their patches on the top/upper thigh area? How have your results been?",asktransgender
"Extremely worried, is this something I can go to the ER for?","I admit that I've always been a bit of a hypochondriac, and this might sound like I'm crazy or jumping to extreme conclusions about an extremely rare condition that I might not have. But too many coincidences are adding up for me to ignore them as just my imagination.

In May I started getting shortness of breath, along with excessive sweating. I have no idea if it's related to HRT or not, but anyway, I've been to the ER 3 times already this year for this and they did a bunch of tests. It wasn't a heart issue, or a blood clot, or any of those typical major things they test for. So we never found out what it was. Some people including my parents tell me it could be anxiety, but I know for a fact it's not - it's something physical, because 1. it gets worse when I lay down and, immediately better if I get up and 2. It happens immediately on any kind of exertion, but even just walking at a slow pace. I used to walk upwards of 10 miles at a brisk pace before May without this problem. Also, I sweat even in cooler places when no one else is, especially right after eating, but it can happen anytime.

I could deal with this and just learn to live with it. But I've been noticing a huge amount of other, and for me far more worrying symptoms, that kind of made me realize this past week what it \*could\* have been this whole time: acromegaly. I really hope I'm wrong because this is probably one of the worst possible (outside of very life-threatening) conditions to get as a trans woman - enlarged brow/jaw, loss of roundness in face, deeper voice, thick/oily skin, increased hair growth. It's caused by too much GH (Growth Hormone) and not T. I don't think it's a T issue anyway, since every time I've had it tested my T has been almost zero, and I haven't changed my doses around at all.

What really hinted me towards this is the rapid masculinization I seem to be having, most noticeable the past two months. It's especially noticeable since I've never had any of these things before up until now:

\- Ridge starting to form on eyebrows. Or what I assume is a ridge. It feels like bone and they're two bumps a tiny bit above where each of my eyebrows are. My forehead feels like it's sticking out a bit more in general.

\- I can't tell from much whether my jaw has changed, but I noticed starting the past couple days that I suddenly have jaw pain, which just adds to my worry and confirmation on this...

\- Face looks really square now rather than oval/round like I've always had. After looking at pictures, especially from May when the shortness of breath started happening, I realize my face and neck are way thinner, which is odd since my weight is exactly the same as then.

\- This one really worries me the most: starting about a week ago I am just not able to use my female voice at all without it sounding hoarse and messy. Prior to this I had (at least what I thought) was a relatively natural female voice, with minimal effort. I don't have this problem when I use my ""male"" voice, which is not really deep, but I worry that this is the start of that.

\- Related to that I guess is that my adam's apple (and whatever that bone is below it) are actually sticking out now. It's not too noticeable but I can't ever remember a time when I could actually feel/see them. It's especially noticeable when shaving - my neck is a bumpy/bony mess now.

\- My shoes are getting harder and harder to get on.

\- This one isn't really masculinization, but I realized just how much I'm eating when I really count calories, and it's upwards of 4,000-5,000 calories a day. I don't exercise at all since the shortness of breath started and I've been exactly the same weight (within a pound or two) these past 5-6 months. I know that sweating and body heat in general are related to metabolism, and this + increased appetite happen to be other symptoms of acromegaly.

\- It's hard to tell if it's thicker, but my skin is definitely oily to the point where if I touch it with my hand it's greasy all over, unlike being extremely dry like before this all started.

\- Shortness of breath, and especially excessive sweating are both common symptoms in acromegaly and I feel like this makes sense as to why they didn't find it, as they generally don't do these tests at an ER (and I didn't mention or realize the other bone etc. changes then.)

So I'm not sure what to do because I can't see any of my doctors until at least the end of November, but possibly not until January next year (I'm in college currently with no transportation.) And I doubt that I can just go to the ER and tell them I'm having these symptoms of a really rare condition that I might or might not have, added to the fact that I've been there 3 times already this year.

I feel like if I wait any longer this is going to progress into more and more permanent changes. I had such a good start transition-wise with puberty not doing much damage, and I don't know why this is happening to me \*now\* at 27... but it's really destroying any motivation and positiveness I had. Especially due to the fact that I just started living full-time in July and started my first semester of college this year, this is practically the worst possible timing for all of this to start happening. I actually felt like I passed a few months ago when I started, but I'm getting more and more stares it seems like, especially this past month. The changes have not been too severe yet, but I feel less and less like a woman every day. I literally can't keep my mind on anything else, and I WANT to think that these all either have other explanations or that it's just my anxiety. But adding up everything that's happening it seems more and more obvious to me that this isn't just a nightmare that I'm imagining.",asktransgender
Any trans friendly hair salons in the North Atlanta area?,"I still present as a male, but I do have long hair and want to start getting it styled in a more feminine style.

Thanks in advance.",asktransgender
I bought women's clothing in public for the first time today!,"I can't believe I went and shopped in the women's section in boy mode.

 Sure it might of been in a random thrift shop a ways away from where I live. Maybe I went to multiple shops to find one I was somewhat comfortable at. And spent an 1.5 hours of time at these shops being too nervous to leave the men's section. In the end I only left with one pair of jeans and didn't even get what I needed for a Halloween ""party"". 

*But*, I did end up over coming my fear.",asktransgender
I want to vote because I’m able to but I don’t even know what “midterms” are for.,All the info online is confusing and I don’t even know what candidates for New Jersey (My state) there are. Does anyone have resources and links I could follow to get more information? The recent news has pissed me off sorry if this isn’t the place to post this but politics are just so confusing to me.,asktransgender
NYC recs for electrolysis,"Hi there,

Looking for reputable, trans friendly places for hair removal in NYC.",asktransgender
I can't get the courage up to call a therapist,"This is not really a question, sry, but I really need to vent right now. I've been pretty good at ignoring my problems, even when I started questioning a year ago, but last weekend I felt so shitty, I decided to finally visit a therapist and I would've probably made the call on the spot. Unfortunately the only therapist I could find where I live that supposedly has experience with trans folks can only be called between 1 &amp; 2 pm on wednesday ... which is in not even an hour from now. But my courage is running away from me, rn I don't even know what to say if I'd call. I already have trouble to call people I don't know, it doesn't help at all that it's scary and unfortunately also a bit shameful to me at the moment to admit to someone who might see me irl that I am or might be trans. But if I don't call I'll waste another week.. Argh.",asktransgender
Trump Cannot Erase Me and My Transgender Community,"The drama surrounding my post in r/fitgirls, and the locker room stuff prior to that, has only emboldened me to push harder for my community. I'm doing what I can to make sure that we are treated fairly in this world, and part of that has been through my writing at Arianna Huffington's company, Thrive Global. Here is my response to the events of the past week and to the recent memo from the Department of Health and Human Services regarding redefining gender: [https://www.thriveglobal.com/stories/47935-trump-cannot-erase-me-and-my-transgender-community](https://www.thriveglobal.com/stories/47935-trump-cannot-erase-me-and-my-transgender-community)",asktransgender
"In light of recent events, does anybody know how best to vote during the upcoming elections?",,asktransgender
"Feel like I'm at a tipping point, where masc-presenting may soon be impossible. Is this it?","I'm not sure if I'm becoming visibly trans, or if I'm at the tipping point between M-default and F-default, MtF. I never thought it would happen, and I still don't believe it - but I want to hear from people who have been lucky enough to hit this tipping point. Note: I haven't really been trying to present feminine, for reasons of personal safety. 

Just to list a few: 

 - Met a new neighbor (F) who works in a similar place as me. She immediately struck up a conversation about gender balance in the workplace, and seemed a little put-off when I gave her my deadname. 
 - Had a queer friend tell me they initially thought I was FtM. 
 - Spotted a dude at the gym watching me work out, from the floor above, leaned over the railings. I saw him, did a double take, and stared at him. He gave me an embarrassed half-wave, and backed off from the railing. I kept staring - he gave another small half-wave and ducked out the door. 

Vaguer thoughts: 

 - Small talk in the elevator is getting more stilted with men and more personal with women. This might just be my own shifting demeanor. 
 - People treating me a little differently at work, lately. Not a specific experience, difficult to put a finger on. 
 - A friend found a near perfect voice match for me with a cis woman. Like, we sound dead ass identical. It's uncanny. (I've also been told I sound like Cecil from Nightvale, so you never know.)
 - No one as of yet has explicitly called me a woman, in person, but I also live in a liberal state where I don't really expect to be sirred/ma'amed in my day to day life. 

Other context:

 - Last few weeks, switched to injections over oral, and the pace of changes fucking octupled overnight. 

I feel like I'm getting close to the line, but I also feel like this could be wishful thinking. Have people who've been across that cusp before had similar experiences? What, really, is the litmus test?",asktransgender
Depressed about progress. What were your experiences after a few years of HRT?,"I am 31 at this point and I am MtF. I've been on HRT now for about 18 months. I've seen a lot of changes - amazing even if my friends are to believed. Thing is, I still don't really pass in public. Sure, I look like 10 years younger and have much softer features, but something is still...missing. I don't know what it is. My voice is definitely in the masc range, but people often misgender me even when I have my mouth shut. I dress more androgynously, which probably doesn't help.

&amp;#x200B;

How long before you stopped seeing results on HRT? I am still hoping I'll see some more changes at 2-3 years, but I feel like things are slowing down. I am considering FFS, but it's so expensive and even though I have a good job, I have a lot of bills to pay. The only way I could pay for it is to borrow from my 401k. Even then, I don't know if I would get the results I want...",asktransgender
Moving in Pittsburgh,"So, my wife, me and her girlfriend are moving soon, out to Plum, PA. We are all transgender. We have lived in Robinson for 8 years and only have come out last year, I still feel pretty safe around here though. It was kind of a fast decision and what not so I feel like I didn't really have much time to think about these things. I now find myself asking is Plum going to be safe for us?",asktransgender
looking for Information on moving.,"We plan to move to the Dallas Fort Worth area of Texas. Does anyone know which towns would be more accepting? Yes, I know it is Texas but, we have family in Mansfield and Dallas. ",asktransgender
What changes can I expect only being on spiro?,"I started taking spiro yesterday. I'm taking 50 mg daily from yesterday until tomorrow, then 100 mg a day for a week, then 200 mg a day from then on. I haven't noticed any changes that didn't turn out to be placebo besides the diuretic effect and briefly feeling weakened after taking my first 25 mg. I'm starting estrogen in 6 weeks.

I know taking an AA won't do too much without E, but what can I expect from it?",asktransgender
I have a problem conveying emotion,"According to friends and family i dont show any negative emotions. This would be fine exept i cant talk about how i feel to my doctor which im worried he might think im faking being trans or something. 

Im asking if there is something i can do or say to help convince him i am trans?",asktransgender
I shaved my legs for the first time,"I use to read about how people felt after shaving their legs and omg I can finally relate

I FEEL SO GOD DAMN SILKY SMOOTH🤯🤯🤯",asktransgender
Where's a good place to get Neko ears?,"Tagged as humor but im genuinely asking. 

Sorry if this is the wrong sub but im looking for recommendations for quality Neko ears at a decent price. Are there any name brands, sites, or products ny'all can reccomend? 
Any help would be greatly appreciated! 

Thank you!!",asktransgender
How to get over forced fem/rape fetish as ftm?,"I’ve always been very masochistic but after I was fucked without my permission this summer I’ve developed a “fetish” where I pretend to be a girl and force myself to use my female parts. Honestly before last year I was genital dysphoric and had penetrated myself like twice ever and didn’t like it. I absolutely hate this fetish and feel so ashamed and disgusted by it. I think it’s making me more depressed and I feel like I just get in daily cycles of being dysphoric over something then getting horny and making myself dysphoric then masturbating, then getting horny whenever I think about it next. I really don’t know what to do. 

Also I have a therapist but there’s NO way at all I could bring this up to anyone irl. If they didn’t already not take me seriously as a guy, then they certainly won’t take me seriously after I said that.",asktransgender
How do you deal with parents not accepting you being trans?,"I'm a 28y old trans guy pre-HRT. Since I got my first GIC appointment, I finally decided to tell my parents about it. I called them (I live in a different country) told them how I felt and asked them to use my preferred pronouns and my chosen name. They responded with things like 'you're not a guy' 'you were born a girl so you're a girl' 'there's nothing masculine in you' 'if you feel like a guy it means you're a girl, because feelings are for girls' and so on. On top of that they said that they fully accept it, they just don't think I'm a guy.

Fuck logic, eh?

I gave them a week or so to digest the information and made another call yesterday. My Mother used exclusively female pronouns and kept on repeating my deadname (which is weird, because my entire life my family called me by my nickname - Junior. Since I told them I'm trans, they suddenly stopped calling me that and use my deadname exclusively). When I politely asked her to at least try to use male pronouns she got aggressive and told me she knows perfectly well what pronouns she should use.  

They keep on saying that they accept me, but I just don't see it. They don't even try to make me feel accepted and seem to believe that if they say they accept it, it's the truth. I feel pretty bummed out, because I just don't know how to cope with this. I'm making my last stand in writing them a letter on how I feel. I've always had problems with expressing my feeling to them, because I'm afraid of them. Every serious conversation ends with me feeling cornered by them, what makes me lose my point. That's why I've decided to put what I feel on paper. 

I know I can just stop talking to them, since I'm not dependent on them at all. But it feels wrong to just turn my back on my parents. Do you guys have any advice on what should I do?",asktransgender
The fact that the recent news has been fairly quiet on Reddit scares me,"From what I could find, the recent news about trans erasure has only gained traction on r/politics, r/the_donald, and the various trans and LGBT subreddits. In fact, on the day it happened, the only post regarding transgender people on r/news was outrage over a trans woman winning a women's cycling tournament (with a link to Fox news, no less).

The fact that so many Americans might not even be aware of this scares me.",asktransgender
what do you think about the situation of trans people in russia?,"life here is ""pretty good until you start thinking about it"", and i've come to understand that i always underestimate the challenges of day-to-day mordor life

fyi, i think the ""post-soviet trans*coalition"" and ""coming out spb"" activist groups have some nice news stories/statistics about trans people in russia and such. i like the public opinion polls with ridiculous un-acceptance rates

i guess just leave your thoughts in the comments? cheers",asktransgender
List of companies Covering FFS,"Hi! I'm looking to find companies that cover FFS to include in my job search and decided to post here after not being able to find a good list anywhere. I'm including my list and would like for others to include theres as well!

\*Morning Star Investments

\*Boeing

\*Dell

\*Tmobile

\*Verizon

\*Google

\*Apple

\*Amazon

\*Northern Trust

\*Starbucks

\*Wellsfargo?

\*Oracle

\*Microsoft

\----------------

Summary of Comments:

\*Target

Anyone else?",asktransgender
Why isn't gender dysphoria considered a mental illness?,"I know that being transgender is not a mental illness, but what about dysphoria by itself? From what I've read and heard (I've never met or talked to a trans person so I may be ignorant), dysphoria can make people feel immensely uncomfortable in their own bodies. unchecked it can lead to things like depression, drug addiction and even suicide. So my question is, why isn't dysphoria considered a mental illness? Is it a matter of stigma?",asktransgender
Changing Name? UK,"Hey, how do I go about changing my name? (UK) i've been reading up on it and I've seen sources say that you have to do a certain way other another to be more concrete / ""legit"" as some places such as banks wont accept one method over the other?

Which way is the most ""concrete""? Want to try and get this done asap. Thanks!",asktransgender
I feel like I'm wasting away.,"Day in, day out. Day in, day out. They kinda just.. blur together. I can't tell you what I was doing last week. I can't even tell you what I ate last night. You know how they say your brain snuffs out the bad memories? I suppose that might be the case for me. Only, every memory is an unwanted one.

I'm winded. Mentally and physically. I wake up, force myself through the painful trepidation of the day to come (sometimes by laughing, most times by crying), go through my classes, come home, and sleep. I really, really like sleep. It lets me forget. 

I don't deserve personhood. Sure, I live and breathe - but I don't really exist. I stick to the sidelines. It's easier. No one has to look at me, or speak with me, or judge me. I don't have to have a personality. When I'm a girl, I tell myself, I'll get one. In the meantime, I don't want it. But the chances are slim.

I'm feeling down.

/rant",asktransgender
What's the best way to remove facial hair?,&amp;#x200B;,asktransgender
To the point of detransition or suicide,"Sorry for my long post, but if I don't go through the entire story, it'll be out of context.

I've been dealing with dysphoria my entire life. I started coming out when I was 16, but then I was out one night with friends when I was 18 and got raped and beaten. I crossdressed at home, with the help of a supportive wife, until I was 30. At that point, I couldn't take it anymore and I transitioned. I started taking Estrogen and Spironolactone at 31. We had two daughters and everything seemed like it was okay. But at 34, I got very suicidal for other reasons (marriage was falling apart, my business failed, I was in a shitty job). Eventually my wife left me and over the last three years, we have been actively engaged in custody/visitation. I'm still under psychiatric care and recently been doing better - but not great.

But over the last seven years, I haven't had \*any\* body changes. I don't feel like I fit in with any other trans people. Okay, to be honest, I don't feel like I fit in with any group of people - never really have my entire life. I have lots of acquaintances, but only a few people I would consider friends. I also have borderline personality disorder, which factors into the loneliness factor.

I can't even look at selfies from trans people any more because it just depresses me. I suck at makeup, and as a software engineer who works at home, really don't see much point in doing it daily. I like the thought of wearing dresses and skirts, but then feel stupid when I wear them. I feel like a fraud if I call myself a woman.

All the fighting with my ex, being lonely as hell, being broke, and the dysphoria just makes me want to give up entirely. Of course, I can't really talk to anyone I know about this, they just kind of blow me off. I've even been yelled at for sharing my feelings on my personal Facebook feed - ""people don't want to hear about your suicidal thoughts"" someone said.

I'm thinking I just stand in front of a train and let it take care of me.",asktransgender
Ochiectomy vs SRS,"Hello everyone, this is my first post here and currently I'm really torn on the decision between SRS and the orchiectomy. I was wondering if you guys could maybe give some pros and cons for each, I personally only have cons for SRS right now

SRSCons

\-The surgery is pretty much a gamble- Dilating (lifelong)- hairy vagina- A lot of nasty complications- Loss of libido

Orchiectomy

Pros- My dysphoria would disappear since its mainly caused by the testicles- No longer T blockers- Overall feeling better

Cons- Bulge might still be visible when wearing tight clothes (really unwanted)- Loss of libido (potentially)  


Edit: Also what I'm interested in is if the hair follicles get removed with orchiectomy as well.",asktransgender
Advice on writing a trans character?,"Hello, I wanted to write a trans character but I'm not sure if I should or not. I am a cis female and I was just looking for advice on this topic, and any relevant links or things I can research before I get too into it. I wasn't sure if this is something I should attempt or not, and if there are any things to avoid.

Basically I wanted to do a comic, it's sort of about childhood friends reconnecting. I wanted to have a transguy, and I have been looking up different things and other people's experiences and trying to understand it all, so I can make an actual realistic character. I've only really done some rough sketches so far and a basic outline, but I don't know. I've never met a trans person in real life, and I'm not certain if I can portray one realistically. I have a bunch of different questions I've been trying to look up. I'm also not sure how in depth I should go into things, because I am cis maybe I can't do something totally authentic, but I still want to try?

Do any of you have any kind of advice for this type of thing? I hope I am not being offensive in any way, and I would like to create something respectful, I just want to know how to do it, and in your opinion whether I should or not?

I hope this is the right place for posting this",asktransgender
It's hopeless [CW: suicidal ideation],"Donald Trump wasn't supposed to win the 2016 election, but he did. Brett Kavanaugh wasn't supposed to get confirmed for the Supreme Court, but he did. Trans people weren't supposed to be literally written out of existence through a fucking MEMO, but we were.  
  
Canada still won't grant asylum or refugee status to LGBT+ Americans because they consider the US a ""safe country"" and by the time they change that policy it'll be too late for many of us.

My fiancee and I are at the point where we both just want to die. Probably better that we end our lives on our own terms, rather than wait until our own government marches of off to camps and tortures us to death.",asktransgender
Could I be transgender?,"Hi all, for a while now, one way or another, I've asked myself this question. Ever since I first saw mention of genderswapping in fiction I latched onto the idea. I often fantasize about being a girl and all that could bring. I've even created an alternate girl me that I like to write through sometimes. In games it's hard for me to play a male character (not really comfortable with it unless I design a copy of myself) but even then it's difficult to play as such for long and actually get into it. I also do a bit of hobby writing in my spare time and it's the same deal for my protagonists. 

If I had the choice now to just suddenly switch I know I'd do it without hesitation, but despite that I feel fairly content with how I am. There was a time that I shaved (and shave I had to being primarily of French, Italian, and Hungarian descent) but gave that up as I knew it was as futile as trying to shovel a driveway in a snowstorm. I have been growing my head hair out (which I'm proud of how long and soft it is when treated right!) and if I worked out I could be handsome enough, but it just doesn't seem worth it. 

I don't have a problem with my…“equipment” and don't really feel that they're wrong, but I also know that I'd be perfectly okay without them. I figure that no matter what physical gender I am I'd be fine, but I also wish I had the frame and looks to even attempt to pull off trying a cute skirt or wear a pair of pumps. 

I know I should probably talk to a professional about all this, but I was also hoping that those that actually have definitive experience with these kinds of things may be able to help me sort out wether I might actually be transgendered or if I'm just fantasizing. 

I appreciate any and all input that may help me with this. Thank you!",asktransgender
Nonpassing Advice,So how do y'all who are nonpassing cope with that.  I basically just keep getting drunk and venting to my wife.   But that is not sustainable.   So is there any hacks y'all can give me.  ,asktransgender
How should I approach changing my wardrobe?,"I’m a 17 year old trans girl, and I’ve decided it’s time for things to change. I want to change the way I dress, but I’m not too sure how to approach it. As much as I would love to just wear a skirt to school tomorrow, I don’t believe it would be the best idea. Should I start subtle and move on or just go all in?",asktransgender
What is the importance of Rhetoric vs. Unity of voice in our community?,"This is a somewhat meta discussion that I'd like to address, if the mods are willing of course.  

So I have noticed a significant portion of the argument and tension in this sub and other trans spaces in reddit be be derived from a difference in opinion regarding delivery of message. 

As a single example, but keeping in mind there are plenty more: This issue with the federal government potentially trying to redefine  'gender' and the affect of that decision being very bad for our community. The idea that such a change would be damaging to the civil rights of trans persons in America is fairly ubiquitous however, _how_ an argument/action against that notion is presented or taken seems to generate tension, despite our general unity. Some people have responded with a sense of urgency, in some cases drastic urgency. They have pointed out a trend that they feel, or that they view is growing more and more volatile and in their opinion will lead to significant increased violence against trans people. Meanwhile others have stuck to a message of preserverance and what I call 'quiet defiance'. These people propose that the numbers of people who are violently against trans people is disingenuous, and is artificially swollen due to the loudness of their toxicity and how it is represented online. I personally believe that both of these approaches are valid, and each has a place at the table. Each method can aid the movement in the right circumstances and either can generate a positive reaction from both trans and cis people. I don't think that one is right and the other wrong. 

And yet: many people in one camp choose to attack the methods of those in the other camp. For example on a recent post the OP was advocating for drastic measures for self preservation in response to a rising tide of violent extremists in America that creates an unsafe environment for us. OP was accosted for fearmongering and inciting panic. 

I have a concern about that; here we observe two individuals who both seek the same goal: to spread knowledge and information about Trans people, ensure that trans people are afforded with the same human rights as a cis gendered person, and to generally dissuade hate speech and discrimination while ensuring the safety of trans people during the process of change. 

They have different methods of getting there, and instead of focusing on accomplishing their shared goal through the different methods that they have, they take to bickering with one another in an attempt to 'correct' each other. 

I propose that we as a community agree to disagree on methods in most cases, and push forward in accomplishment of our goals.

Understand, Different messages are going to reach different people, and to suggest that only one style of rhetoric will be effective is lunacy. The end goal is the same, and we should focus on rallying around that unified voice, and allow different methods their chance to put their contributions into the bucket, sort of like departments in a vast organization. ",asktransgender
Got my first taste of harassment today. I feel like shit.,"So I have been going regularly to this gym for a few years now, and am pretty friendly with the staff and a few of the regulars. I have been on feminizing hrt for 4 months, but still present as male when I go there.

I usually go during the afternoon when it's practically empty, but ended up going in the evening since I was having a stressful night and needed to vent. After doing my usual workout for 30 mins, I go to use one of the weight machines, next to which two women are standing. I hear them mutter something while looking at me and giggle, then one of them looks at me directly and yells 'FAG!', and they both burst out laughing. Being the spineless person I am, I ignored them, finished my set, left the gym and cried in my car.

This has made me reevaluate transitioning because I know this is basically nothing compared to the abuse other transpeople get on a daily basis. In all honesty I'm not sure I have the mental strength to put up with this kinda stuff. Does it ever get easier to deal with? I think it upset me most because I thought I wasn't visibly transfemme in boy mode...",asktransgender
Examples of short and sweet coming out letters?,A lot of the templates I find online seem super long. Does anybody have any templates that get to the point? Asking because I am not very good with words. ,asktransgender
Accidentally outed myself to my parents,"A couple of days ago I bought Dara Hoffman-Fox's Gender Identity book to work through, but my parents opened the package when it came and found it. They seemed ""supportive"" on the surface but want me to go to a therapist ""without an agenda"" to talk this through. Since I'm in the Southern US, that's not a good sign. Later in the evening my mom came to my room and told me that she thinks ""God doesn't make any mistakes."" How fucked am I? ",asktransgender
injection question,"I'm going to preface this with, I think I'm going to talk to my doctor about it too.
So, about 2 months ago, I was injecting estradiol valerate, the way I was told to, how I was told to, where I was told to and using the specific amount I was told to. I ended up calling 911 because when I was injecting, I found more than usual pain, I pulled out the needle slowly and blood squirted across the room. I managed to stop the bleeding, but since then I've been absolutely terrified of injecting, and attempts tonight ended with bleeding a larger than usual, but not overly worrying amount, which does not help my fear. I managed to inject .05ml before needing to take it out for fear that even though I asparated, the pain was getting worse, so I had to take it out. Does anyone have any suggestions on this? How can I get over this? is my body trying to tell me to go back on pills? Please let me know your thoughts. Thank you.

I had no problem with it for over a year and a half before I had this happen.
I ended up taking some older pills that I have still for just incase measures, and I'll probably take those for a couple days while my leg heals up from the injection attempts, and call my doctor tomorrow.

edit 2: modifying post.
Edit 3: modifying post again",asktransgender
How the heck do you keep thigh highs up?,"So I ordered some thigh highs from sockdreams which someone here recommended. They actually fit my buff man legs which is really nice, and omg they're so comfortable, but I constantly have to pull them up or they slowly roll down to my ankles no matter what. How am I supposed to keep them up?",asktransgender
How bad does it have to get?,"While the leaked memo is very scary, many of us have already survived before federal protections were in place. The real major concern on my mind is what is the beginning of? How do we know when the situation is at its worst?

Myself and many other people I've talked to have plans (no matter how well developed they are) to flee the United States if being trans here becomes too dangerous. But what is that point? I'd hate to wait until after my passport is revoked and I can't legally leave to find out. I suppose my question is: how bad do folks think this situation is going to become? And what should be our trigger point for trying to escape?",asktransgender
"Um a litle help, please... Trying to explain to someone that it's not a choice to be transgender. Went badly...","I were just trying to explain to someone in the YouTube comment section why being transgender is not a choice. But I have learning disabilities, ADHD and Aspergers. I may sometimes use a poor word choice, or say things in a way that other find disrespectful. I don't mean any disrespect or harm though. But I guess in some cases I have difficulties with knowing when I say inappropriate things. But after many years with my ""Chronic fatigue syndrome"" diagnosis, I also have big problems with forming sentences and I often lose words. I feel like a person who have had a stroke and no longer am able to express, convey what they feel or want to say. And sometimes it just turns out badly because I don't know how to explain myself. This conversation with ""that person"" just made me confused 😨 

 Is it I who struggle to understand something here, or is this person just blinded by their opinion of transgender people, and am simply just unable to understand me?!

(Sorry, I did get a little bit frustrated when I tried to explain it to ""that person"". Maybe I should have said things in a better way.)

&amp;#x200B;

**That person:** ""First...Trans is a choice. When you decide to live in the role of a different gender...that is a choice. NOW, I find it crazy that this President included this group when he started running for office,and now doing everything to disenfranchise them. YOU can now make the CHOICE to put someone in that will include you.  CHOOSE.﻿""

**Me:** ""Being transgender is not a choice! I wish everyday I didn't have to deal with the dysphoria. Do you really think that dysphoria is something that you choose?! If you're perfectly happy and feel 100% comfortable with the gender assigned to you at birth and about the body you were born with, would you choose to live as the opposite sex? Does that make any sense to you?? 

 If it were you, could you choose right now to feel physically and psychologically uncomfortable with the gender assigned to you, and your biological body? Could you switch on a dysphoria switch? Would you be able to go on hormones and have a sex reassignment surgery even though you're perfectly fine with how you were born? If being transgender is a choice, then that means that everyone including you should be able to choose to be transgender, and to medically and surgically transition like it were no big deal. If YOU, can't choose to be transgender, then how on earth would it be a choice for someone who is transgender...  Transgender people who do choose to transition only do that because there's no other choice for them. There's either having to live a life in pure misery with the body you were born with, or transition!﻿""

**That person:**  ""You cant blame folks for your choices.  I don’t. My choice is to refuse to believe that I was created to be a black Male. That’s what I have to LEARN to accept and live that truth. God designs us for purpose. I choose to support those who decide to live alternative lives. Doesn’t mean I agree. Whatever promotes peace and harmony. I’m for that.﻿""

**Me:** ""  What I'm trying to say is that being transgender is not a choice. I didn't choose to have dysphoria. When the dysphoria came, there was nothing I could have done to prevent it. It's like when someone for example get cancer, the cancer can come whether you want it to or not. Not trying to compare cancer to gender dysphoria, just using it as an example on how it's not a choice.  

Gender related dysphoria is the feeling that something is wrong. When your biological body become alien to you. That you do not have the gender and body you were meant to have. My whole body feels alien to me, like it's not my body. Do you understand???   

 Dysphoria, the feeling that you are born with the wrong body can give you stress related symptoms. Like a feeling of dissatisfaction, anxiety, and restlessness and discomfort.   

My breasts make me dysphoric because I know what they're for. Feeding babies ugh... But they also make me dysphoric because they feel so alien to me that I have to cover them up. It makes me dysphoric that I have a womb, ovaries, eggs and bleed once a month. A fetus to me is like an alien, foreign object that do not belong inside of my body. It just does not feel right to me. It's uncomfortable for me to have to touch down there when I wash in the shower or change tampons. I don't feel comfortable in a female body or to have female body functions. Does dysphoria sound to you like a choice?!   

The only way you'd be able to understand that it's not a choice is to go through it your self. You let your religion stand in the way of understanding what it means to be transgender.  You seem incapable of understanding that it's not a choice. Are you like, somehow able to go inside people's minds and know how they feel and experience their bodies?! Do you know how I feel right now?!! The answer is, you don't!!! So how can you say it's a choice when you have no clue what I go through, what transgender people go through?!  

When it comes to choice however, you are half right! Being transgender is not a choice though, but choosing to do something about it is, like transitioning. Going on hormones and surgically change your outer appearance to match how you feel on the inside is of course a choice. I have done a choice to not transition myself, to not go through HRT and SRS despite of my dysphoria. Not all people even though they struggle with dysphoria have the possibility, or are able to go through with something like that. Transitioning is a really serious matter, not everybody can!﻿""

**That person:** "" Sorry about your experience, but sounds like they won. You let them determine who you were going to be. All good. STILL...YOU made the choice. Not gonna disrespect you or your community, just in your heart of hearts, except the fact that it was still a Choice you made. Live your best life""

**Me:** "" No I made the choice to not transition because I would not be comfortable or satisfied with the result, neither would it have done anything to help me with the dysphoria. I did not choose to not transition because I let people define who I am. There are people who have transitioned, and feeling that their dysphoria became worse 2-3 years after the transition. Transitioning does not necessarily help for everyone.   

Yes I made the choice not to transition because I'm in the middle of questioning. I'm struggeling with dysphoria, but at the same time I also do not feel any more comfortable with transitioning. It just wouldn't do anything for me, the dysphoria would still be there same as it is now. Probably worse if I had transitioned. If I had transitioned it would only have reminded me that I'm not biologically how I wish I could have been. It would have reminded me that my genitals are really just a skin graft from my arm and partly my own biological genitals. That on the outside I appear to look like a male, but on the inside there are female internal organs. I wouldn't have been able to live with that as it would only have made me feel even more like a broken person. That is how I personally experience it any way.  

I'm not sure you quite understand what I'm trying to say. You think of being transgender as a choice when it's not. Being transgender and suffering from dysphoria is not a choice! But transitioning however is a choice that many choose to do in order to help with their dysphoria. You are still transgender even though you do not transition. It's a myth that all transgender people transition. We don't all experience things the exact same way. Transgender meaning: ""Someone who do not identify with the gender assigned to them at birth."" Think of transgender people who have a condition that would make them bleed to death if they were to surgically transition. Idk what that condition is called but anyway, they will have to live their life with the body they were born with even though their dysphoria are crippling. They are still transgender, but they have their own reason why they can't or do not wish to transition.﻿""  
 

**That person:**  Why is it so important to you to put the ""you chose this""?You are being very disrespectful.Like I said before ignorance is a choice.""

&amp;#x200B;

(After that I did not know how to respond anymore!)",asktransgender
How to dress more masc for a short enby with curvy hips? :(,"I'm genderqueer and like to present as androgynous as possible. I feel like the main thing holding me back is my height and my very curvy hips, which give me terrible dysphoria. 
I love skinny jeans, I dress very goth/trad goth and I really hate how I look in any type of baggy or wide legged pants. I feel they make me look shorter and fatter. 
But I hate that my jeans are accentuating my more feminine curves. 

Any tips on simple ways to create a more masc/androgynous shape? ",asktransgender
"My mom wants ""definite proof"" that I am trans before starting my transition. What do I do?`","Heya. I just had the difficult conversation of coming out to my pretty religious mom. She was.. kinda accepting? She accepts that there are trans people, but doesn't think that I am one.

She wants me to somehow have definite concrete proof that I am trans. I am going to be talking to my therapist (not a gender therapist, just a normal one) about this on Thursday, but I don't know how I can _prove_ that I am trans. 

I talked about how I have known for almost two years and that it really made a lot of my anxiety make sense. My GP has recommended me to a clinic, but she says its ""too far left, and focuses more on acceptance than proof."" I am legally an adult but still on their healthcare as I am a student, so I really do need her go ahead.

Does anyone have any suggestions or help?",asktransgender
"How ""transitioned"" should I be when I go to get my name change?","I'm (mtf) full time for the most part right now with some minor exceptions. My wardrobe is fully transitioned; I present female 100% of the time. I'm out to family, friends, work, etc. Most people in my life are using my name and pronouns. The exceptions being my father-in-law and my workplace/coworkers. I'm still working kn my last bit if electrolysis, but its been 5 weeks since my last apptmnt (I havent shaved since december) and my facial hair is only visible at certain angles even 5 weeks in.  I get gendered correctly the vast majority of the time.  That is, until i open my mouth. My voice is an utter, utter tragedy. Im working on it, and start voice lessons soon, but i dont have anything remotely passable voice wise yet.

I want to get my name changed. My county's probate judge is very, very vocally antilgbt. Im in the deep south. Should i go dressed as i normally do to work - completely femmed up, but with a voice far too masculine for my appearance? Or would I have better luck going back dude mode just for this? Or should i wait until my voice matches my appearance? 

Im terribly afraid of being denied. I do have a misdemeanor drug paraphanilia charge from 4 years ago, but besides that can not think of a single negative mark on my record. I want to get this done asap, but im debating if its wiser to wait. ",asktransgender
How do/did you guys handle wanting to repress your gender identity?,"I started questioning my gender about a year ago, but I remember from the time I was little I wanted to be seen as a boy and would insist that I was one until everyone around me told me I could never be one. I avoided questioning my gender for as long as possible by just shoving it down, but once I got to college I couldn't ignore it anymore. I am very confident that I am trans and am more comfortable when presenting as a man. I also bind as often as I can, I own one packer and am looking into getting an STP, and I can't wait to start hormones as soon as possible. But even knowing and doing all of that I still can't help but want to shove it back down and ignore it and I hate that.

I grew up in Alabama to a very Catholic family and went to Catholic school until college so I have pretty much been told all my life that being gay or trans is disgusting and a crime against nature and God. When I came out as gay my family supposedly did a 180 and ""supports"" gay people now but they continue to vote for the most conservative candidates possible so that's a lie. I told my mom recently that I was trans and she became very hostile for about a week and now just seems to be ignoring that I ever said anything. 

I suppose most of me wanting to repress the fact that I'm trans comes from all the negative things that come with it. It's hard for me to be proud of my identity or want to go forward with transition when it means that my family would disown me or ban me from family gatherings. I carry pepper spray with me everywhere just in case. I don't use public bathrooms under any circumstance. Transition is extremely expensive and my family doesn't seem to have any intention of helping but I don't have my own insurance. Also once I start hormones my ID picture will eventually look like an entirely different person and will have my dead name on it and I will be outed every time I use it which could be dangerous, especially in Alabama. And with the memo that went out on Sunday from the Trump Admin. who knows what's gonna happen to trans people in the next couple years.

I just feel like I'm constantly fighting with myself because I know that transition would be the best thing for me because it would make me more comfortable in my body and with myself, but it's potentially dangerous just living in America as a trans person and sometimes I can't help but think sometimes ""this wouldn't have happened if you just stayed a cis girl"" or ""you wouldn't have to deal with this if you don't transition"". 

Basically, I am not trying to repress the fact that I am trans, but I struggle with constantly thinking about repressing it and I was wondering how you guys fought those thoughts.",asktransgender
It's a rough realization realizing that my face will pass but my body likely will never.,"It's like, even being pre hrt, I can sometimes make my face pass. However, my shoulders are massive, and I have no hips whatsoever. And obviously hrt won't just shrink my shoulders down. So I'm worried I'll be instantly clocked my my overly masculine body, despite a face that when I go on hrt, will easily pass.",asktransgender
Anyone know about /u/ButINeedThatUsername?,"He felt attacked in his most recent post and then delisted himself as mod and went back to posting frantically about suicide. He hasn't posted anything since then, three days go. Anyone know if he's okay?

edit: THanks yall glad to hear he's relatively okay",asktransgender
It went well today :),"[https://www.reddit.com/r/asktransgender/comments/9oo4kv/i\_told\_my\_doctor\_does\_he\_feel\_uncomfortable/](https://www.reddit.com/r/asktransgender/comments/9oo4kv/i_told_my_doctor_does_he_feel_uncomfortable/)

Looks like I was just worrying unnecessarily. Because of all the bullying and trauma, and having been treated like I'm not a human being by others for so long, In my mind I often fear the worst. In this case I worried that the doctor I have had for years now would be uncomfortable with me or judgemental after I told him about my dysphoria and possibly being transgender.

But he were so kind, and wondered how I were doing. And then wished me the best on my way home. Now I feel a bit bad that I would worry about such a ting when he's the best doctor you could ever have!

&amp;#x200B;",asktransgender
Phalloplasty as a trans woman?,,asktransgender
Im a little lost but....,"I think I'm a trans but I feel somewhat okay with my birth gender, but do prefer being treated as the opposite, would I be trans then or am I something else altogether? I have dressed like a girl and it did make me feel better about myself and the insecurities and such, but I don't ""feel"" like a girl mentally, but my mannerisms have portrayed me as a girl altogether, I've used the words like transvestite and such similar words but my trans friend did tell me that I would fit better as a trans woman then what I am now due to how I feel about myself and such,  is this a phase or is it who I really am? Can I have some opinions on this please?",asktransgender
Is there a subreddit like rant that ISN'T transphobic?,"Not off my chest, though.

The subreddit rant is probably one of the most transphobic subreddits on Reddit. When ranting about Transgender issues, I don't want to be told I'm mentally ill, I'm just a girl, or anything like that. Though I'm not sure this is a place to rant, either, because it's an ask subreddit. ",asktransgender
To the trans Haitians of reddit how did your parents react to you being trans,,asktransgender
Acne during transition? MTF.,"So, I haven’t gotten a pimple since I was 17 years old. And, mind you I’m 28 now. And, I got a pimple today. Weirdest thing ever! Anyone know what this might be about? Is it normal during transition to have this happen? ",asktransgender
"[nsfw] Really struggling to not be disgusted by someone I saw online (about AGP, crossdressing, all the interesting stuff)","(Content-warnings: possibly internalised transphobia, kink-shaming??)

Hello everyone. I'm a trans woman and a regular contributor to this and other trans subs. I'm honestly a pretty stereotypical trans-feminine type, minus the anime and the wanting to be a cat thing. I mean, I *love* cats. But I don't want to be one. And right now, I'm struggling. I don't even know if this is right place to post about this but I figured it probably wasn't as much the wrong place as other subs I'm part of, so...

So basically I have a profile on *one of those sites* (you know the one) and I saw a group post where someone had written ""You can talk to me if you want, I'm a CD with real tits"". Well, I was intrigued. I've always been intrigued by the overlap between trans- (usually -feminine) people and cross-dressing because although it's something I've never experienced I do of course know that there are a lot of people who came to realise their trans identities through cross-dressing and the idea is so prevalent that at first I didn't think I even *could* be trans because I'd never crossdressed (!!) So I posted about this one some cross-dressing subs and was amazed to learn something which I think probably most people know; that lots of people cross-dress for lots of different reasons, some people are gay and do it for the performativeness of drag, some are quite happy and content straight men for whom its a fetish, and some of closeted trans women unable or unwilling to transition for societal or personal reasons. And for a lot of people, there's an overlap. I found that really interesting to learn and of course anyone whose followed the Rupaul controversy will know that trans women practically invented drag and in times gone-by when being trans was even less acceptable than it is now, that drag was an important part of the acceptance of trans-feminine identity historically.

Okay, sorry for rambling. Anyway, for those reasons I was intrigued and I clicked on this person's profile. So, first of all, this person goes by male pronouns and a male name. Okay, that's fine and valid. And, yep, has ""real"" tits. They had, as they proudly stated on their profile, recently flown to Thailand to have them done. And they were ""saving for the Big-O"". Judging from their profile and photos they were not now, and had never been, on HRT.  The rest of their listed kinks were... kind of as you'd expect. A lot of forced feminization and sissification fantasies. A lot of humiliation and degredation fetishes. Based on their profile it... kind of seemed like their life revolved around these fetishes and that they didn't really identify as a person outside of their kinks.

Now, again, forced feminization and sissification are a whole family of interesting kinks that I just don't understand. Of course growing up in the 'wrong body' is a kind of horrific experience and that trauma can manifest in a huge variety of ways, not least in a kink family which is fairly obviously an expression of an unconscious desire to be your true self in the face of a society which mostly disapproves of us. Don't get me wrong, I have my kinks (or rather my addictions have me, as Scroobius Pip wrote) but they're a lot more.. ah, 'vanilla', in comparison.

Still though. SO MANY QUESTIONS! Such as, 1, if you want tits, why save to get them implanted when HRT is less dangerous, cheaper, and will help you pass better? When you can get it free, eventually, on the NHS. I mean sure a lot of trans women do get implants eventually but its usually hormones first. (I do know a trans woman who says she only transitioned because she wanted tits but I'm pretty sure that's self-deprecating humour, heh, I never asked.) And why ""save"" for ""the big O""? Again, that's eventually free on the NHS. I'm guessing they were saving to have it done in Thailand because no health care professional in the UK would refer them in their current psycho-sexual identity. (Okay but why not at least *pretend* to be trans?) The only way I could make sense of this wealth of seemingly contradictory information was also written clearly in the ""Gender"" and ""Role"" boxes on their profile, where it said: ""Crossdressing/Transvestite MALE"". Not one of the innumerable options to denote a feminine or even trans identity. So... I guess... that's what they are, and how they see themselves. But honestly this is not something I understand at all. Honestly I'm too dysphoric to even put ""MTF"" for myself because I don't feel like I'm ""MTF transsexual"". I feel like a woman.

And of course I don't want to kink-shame anyone but this is a pretty huge thing, no? Most sexual desire is driven hormonally. It's dangerous to take anti-birth-sex hormones with no E or T supplement. Your bones atrophy. And it's very bad for mental health too. A lot of people who post to this sub are trans-questioning in a pattern which is fairly easy to recognize (""I'm AMAB but I always wanted to be a woman--AM I TRANS??!"" Yep, been there.) but every so often we get someone posting for whom it's harder to offer advice. Like, what would you say to someone who says they're going off HRT because they've decided they're not really trans, because they never really wanted to be a woman socially, only during sex, and they found that when their sex-drive disappeared because of the AAs they lost the desire to transition because that desire had been sexual, not social. Or that they didn't like the eventual appearance of a ""feminine"" sexuality under E. I mean a lot of this stuff is hard to unpack, at least at first. But that's one of the great things about HRT. For a lot of us, you suddenly *know*, one way or the other. At this point I wouldn't really care if I never had sex again because the way I'm treated as a woman is so much more important to me. But I didn't know it would be like that until I started identifying, and being identified as, a woman. And I just think that, if this person has ""the big O"", isn't that going to basically nuke most of their sexual desires? Have they thought about the consequences of this thoroughly? For someone who seems to base so much of their current identity around a fetish, that seems like an incredibly... rash.. decision.

At this point, a word came to mind. It's an ugly word which describes a history of terrible science, flawed research and an awful transphobic and phallocentric bias. [A word to describe a phenomenon that most of us, including myself, don't think exists](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=6czRFLs5JQo&amp;feature=youtu.be) But it's hard to argue that wanting to be a woman as a sexual fetish *never exists* when you meet people like this. And every so often on this sub I'm tempted to think that the OP might be AGP. Now to be clear I do *not* believe that any trans people are AGP. I think that AGP, if it exists, must be solely a cis thing. I think although trans people want to and do enjoy having sex as our identified gender, obviously for nearly all of us sex-dysphoria a fairly small part of why we make the huge decision to socially transition. But in the case of the person who only wanted to transition in order to have sex as a woman like the above posters who sometimes come to this sub, it's hard not to think ""AGP"".

Another thing which really kind of creeped me out about this person is that they're basically a living embodiment of what TERFs think trans women both *are* and yet also *should be*. I lurk *a lot* on TERF reddit--it's probably a self-harm thing--and I see this *a lot*. First of all, they're not ""appropriating"" female anything by using a male name and pronouns. Nor are they trying to ""trick anybody"" like the TERFs think people like me are trying to do. They probably don't even use female toilets when out and about--that must be an, ah, ""interesting"" experience for them. Exactly what TERFs want. And of course the roots of their personal and physical identity seem pretty strongly tied to extreme sexual fetishism, which again is exactly why TERFs *think* people like *me* transition.

So I guess as problematic as it is, a lot of my discomfort is also related to Justine and even Tiffany's arguments from Contrapoints. Is the world ready for people like this? Is the world ready for people like this when I can almost guarantee that most people meeting this person will assume that they are trans, even though they are possibly/probably definitely not? Will assume that people who *are* trans are like that. I know it's extremely problematic to worry about being judged by cis people on the basis of someone else's identity but in a cis-supremecist society, that's also an extremely difficult trap to escape from. I mean for comparison I knew someone in school who was an extremely homophobic and transphobic bully. They were so transphobic that they pushed me into the closet for nearly a decade at least. Today? They are ""Scotland's leading transgender poet"". This person disgusts me too. I'm disgusted that I share a gender identity with them. Even today I find it hard to persuade myself to use their correct pronouns and not misgender them.

So, like, I'm trying really hard not to kinkshame here. I don't want to be *that person*. I don't want to be Tiffany Tumbles. I'm so curious as to what would cause someone to assume this kind of identity, so seemingly similar to my own in terms, presumably, of dysphoria, and a desire to change our bodies to be more similar to how we feel inside, and yet so... incredibly... *different* as well. What do you lovely people think? Have you ever met people who are similar? What did you think/how did you react? Have I drunk the TERF kool-aid? Do I need to do a lot of work on myself to overcome internalized shame and transphobia and kinkshaming? If so, how?? Overcoming deeply entrenched biases is hard, especially when we deal with so much prejudice against people like us. I'm looking forward to an interesting discussion in the comments. :-)",asktransgender
Something about our haters just occurred to me,"I was browsing the comments from the peanut gallery on a major news website that had something about the recent memo regarding the legal definition of gender for Title IX, or whatever it's supposed to be.

Something just occurred to me.

You know how our critics like to say that we will be forever defined by our sex chromosomes?

There's a reason for that.  We can change our hormones.  We can change the appearance of our bodies drastically.  Some of us are fortunate to ""pass"" as our identified gender nearly 100% of the time.  But right now, science doesn't give us a way to change the sex hormones that are only visible upon examination of a specialist.

Why on earth would anyone want to define a person by something that can only be examined under a microscope?

If we had no medical technology to modify our hormones, our critics would gleefully demand that we would be forever defined by our hormones.

If we had no SRS, our critics would gleefully demand that we would be forever defined by our genitals.

You know what?  It doesn't matter.  No matter what happens, **they will gleefully demand that we be defined by something we can't change.**  They have hate in their hearts, and haters are going to hate!

So go out, be happy, and enjoy your life, and don't worry about sex chromosomes, because the moment that we find a way to change our sex chromosomes, they will move the goal posts.",asktransgender
Am I Just Trolling Myself At This Point?,,asktransgender
Drunkenly come out? LONG,"Long story:

2 years ago I told myself ""Your next (24th) birthday you'll start hormones."" I didn't. A year later I said, ""Your 25th birthday you'll start hormones."" I didn't believe me at the time. I spent an good part of the year talking myself out of it.

This summer, after a fight with my dad, I decided to start hormones in secret. Just a few friends know. Cut to now (3 months HRT): I look like a guy, sound like a guy, but have boobs.

I've been drinking a lot lately due to stress. Because of this I've been sharing a ton of trans memes on Facebook (where my dad and stepmom are active).

Now part of me is thinking about getting so drunk on my birthday in 2 days that I drunkenly text my dad that I'm trans.

What makes it awkward for me is that though I live thousands of miles apart, I still dont make a move without his input. (So me doing hormones without consulting him will be a whole other issue).

(My stepsister has previously made it a point to remind me of her observation that my family is unique:  they're devout Catholics and conservative but would never let that come in the way of family)",asktransgender
Euphoria and Disphoria,"Still trying to accept myself and come to terms with it.

So, I was thinking about euphoria vs disphoria.

I don’t remember ever ever really feeling true euphoria about being a guy.

I also never experienced extreme disphoria about being a guy. I just accepted it as it is.

However, almost everything about being a girl gives me EUPHORIA. 

Lipstick... EUPHORIA

Mascara.... EUPHORIA

EYELINER... EUPHORIA!

Makeup in general... EUPHORIA

Skirts... EUPHORIA

Dresses.... EUPHORIA!

HRT... EUPHORIA!

Less body hair... EUPHORIA

Softer skin... EUPHORIA

Long hair... EUPHORIA

Long manicured nails... EUPHORIA 

Feeling Feelings... EUPHORIA

Crying easily... EUPHORIA

No longer being ultra agressive... EUPHORIA

Having healthier sexual desires... EUPHORIA

Waking up in the morning and seeing less of a guy because of HRT... EUPHORIA

The list can go on and on.......

When en femme, I feel disphoria that varies from little to extreme, mostly due to noticing masculine characteristics.

Am I really trans then?

Does anyone else has a similar euphoria/disphoria relationship?



",asktransgender
Confused and scared,"I've always felt like a girl stuck in a boy's body, but for my entire life I buried those feelings as far down as I possibly could out of fear and a sense of shame, as I suspect many people do. A few months ago, however, I had a crisis that led to an epiphany of sorts about my identity, and I made the decision to start seeing a therapist at a trans-friendly health clinic. Since starting therapy I've done a lot of reflecting on myself, what I want out of life, and what a change in my gender expression would mean for me and my career, but I'm just as confused and scared as ever.

I keep going back and forth between feeling mostly happy and like I'll be okay if I don't make some sort of transition, and feeling completely depressed at the prospect of being seen as a cisgender man for the rest of my life. Just typing this out and seeing the word 'man' on the screen feels alien and strange - but so does the idea of people seeing me as something other than the quiet, awkward looking guy that I present as. For those who have transitioned or are transitioning, do these feelings start to go away once you start HRT? Are you ever less scared or confused?

I'm also curious how it has affected your careers, as I have a very public job and can't simply switch employers or careers. This has been feeding into my confusion and depression about transitioning, so any advice would be appreciated. Thank you!",asktransgender
Finally Got my surgery date!!!,so after a long wait (even the staffed admitted it was much longer than normal) i finally have a Surgery Date and its 50 days from today Dec 12th!!!!,asktransgender
Question regarding discrimination by pharmacist in NJ,"I am an FTM transman locates in NJ who was denied needles at a local Walgreens pharmacy on the basis of my trans status. I have been using these needles for over a year with no problems from any other pharmacy and under counsel of the Mazzoni Center in Philadelphia, who prescribed my hormones. 

Two months ago, my fiancé (a cisgender man) went into the same pharmacy with the same pharmacist working, told him exactly what they were for just as I had, and they were sold to him without a problem. The prescription needles I initially was prescribed are not covered under my insurance and so I have been using over the counter insulin needles to administer a my injection subcutaneously (rather than IM). I have been injecting subq for nearly 3 years as I was advised to do by my trans specialist doctor. The insulin needles are the only affordable option for me and have been just as effective as the ones I was initially prescribed. 

The pharmacist flat out refused to sell them to me, telling me it’s “not gonna happen. End of story.” I called corporate and the woman on the phone immediately switched from saying “sir” to “ma’am” upon me revealing my FTM status. When I pointed it out that I was a man she said “I’m sorry, I have gay friends”. I spoke with the manager and assistant manager of the location who continuously blew me off, even hung up on me prematurely. 

The pharmacist initially tried to tell me that they weren’t the right size and “wouldn’t work”, then told the manager after I called that they were “out of stock”—they never said they were out of stock the day I was in there (Friday 10/19, I called management today, Tuesday 10/23). 

Do I have any legal rights on this issue? It would be extremely helpful just to hear advice on the issue or even accounts of similar issues happening. If possible, I would like to take legal action. I am beyond infuriated, especially with corporate and management’s handling of the situation (or lack thereof). 

Any advice or words of wisdom would be greatly appreciated. ",asktransgender
"Transgender or Crossdresser, do I have to pick?","Simply put I like girls clothes and looking female, most of my friends have been girls. I'm out as transgender and been presenting as female 24/7 for the past year. I do however get sexual attraction when I wear very typical  hegemonically feminine clothes but when I am doing other things I don't think about it. The back and forth feeling of wether I am transgender or a crossdress causes confusion. Either way If I feel masculine I still feel dsyphoria so either way presenting as feminine makes me happy. Do I need to figure out which I am or can I just leave it at I wanna wear girls clothes all the time and get on with my life without worrying about labels? 

Worth noting I am not on hormones, I am very worried about how it'll affect my energy and productivity but other than those effects I'd like to start hormones at some stage. ",asktransgender
"""If the Justice Department decides that the change is legal, the new definition can be approved and enforced in Title IX statutes, and across government agencies.”",State Department included. So I believe getting your passports updated has to happen NOW if you haven't done so already.,asktransgender
HRT induced depression/mood swings? (MTF 1 week HRT),"Hi all! I was wondering if anyone had any similar experiences with HRT and a sudden wave of negative emotions/really really dark thoughts. It's only been a week since I started HRT and I didn't notice anything for the first few days but the last two or so have been noticeably.. unpleasant. It comes in waves, and usually without any provocation. I'll be at work in a generally decent mood and then BAM, I'm stuck and want to scream/sleep/cry.. and I can't get anything done.

&amp;#x200B;

My starting doses are 2mg estradiol sublingual and 100mg spiro oral (50mg twice a day, 12h apart). What I suspect is that my T has probably dropped down pretty low but my E dosage isn't high enough to compensate for my very low testosterone. Thoughts?",asktransgender
Is it normal to hate your birthday?,"So today is my birthday, i'm turning 22, i have been on hormones for about 6 months and i felt miserable from the moment i woke up today. All i can think of today is how another year passed where i wasn't myself. How i lost another year of my youth without being the girl i feel i am inside. It might be my biggest regret and the biggest source of my dysphoria that i didn't come out 14 years ago where i was still as sure of everything as i am today. I missed my childhood, my teenage years and there is nothing i can do about it and my birthday is just a painful reminder of it. I hate this. I honestly don't know what to do its just too painful sometimes and today is just so fucking bad. I am so far away from passing i am so far away from actually transitioning socially, i don't even know if i even have any hope for either of those. I hate being trans i hate that i have to deal with these feelings i just want everything to stop.",asktransgender
Experience with Bicalitamide(Casodex) as an anti-androgen?,"I recently went to my doctor and asked about this as an alternative to spironolactone... since I’ve been on HRT for 6+ years and I’ve had my fair share of issue with it.. I naturally have low blood pressure and I’m slightly anemic so on a high dose of spiro I was fainting and having other issues.

Anyways I guess I’m his first patient that he’s prescribing this too.. I think it’s a fairly new thing in the U.S at least.

Does anybody have any experience with this? I know that it doesn’t actively reduce T levels.. just blocks them. So what kind of side effects should I experience ? ",asktransgender
I finally started seeing a gender therapist.,"This is just the best thing that has happened to me in a long time, and I needed to share it somewhere. 

FINALLY

After years of wishful thinking and hoping that one day I’d just sort of have everything click into place, I decided I was spending too much time letting myself live this miserable life. I called my university’s counseling offices and asked if they had anyone there who had experience in trans issues, and they did!

Not only did my first appointment go great, but I’m probably going to get to meet someone who is currently transitioning during our next session and talk to them and get advice and stuff. 

I’ve known my whole life, but I came out to my best friend almost four years ago. Four! I thought I would at least start sorting through my feelings then but I started seeing a counselor who had no prior experience dealing with issues concerning my gender. 

I brought it up to him in our last session and told him that it was the one issue where I really had made no progress in my life, and that I still had some very bad tendencies surrounding it. 

“I don’t care if you’re gay, straight, or bi, you’re still you to me.”  

That’s all he had to say. 

I appreciated the sentiment, but that’s no in the same ballpark of what I’m talking about. It’s not even the same sport. As much as he helped me sort through most of my depression, he just can’t help here. And I feel bad for seeing a new therapist without telling him, because again I’ve seen him for almost four years. But I can’t throw away anymore years of my life because of sentimentality. 

I hope that the next chapter of my life has started. I hope it’s a happy one. ",asktransgender
How screwed am I with trumps memo?,"Recently I've been ready to transition and talk to my doctor about gender dysphoria to start hormones but with the trump memo news, I kinda want to go back inside my shell..  honestly I need some motivation.. does any of this really affect the start of my transition? Does it make anything harder, such as hormones?

Is there any true chance of this passing?

I just feel hopeless with all of the trump talk",asktransgender
"Going back on E, patches or injections?","I was on E for a about 6 weeks, off four about 5 now after I had a septoplasty/rhinoplasty.  Doctor is meeting with me next week to adjust meds and restart my E.  I have been on injections, but I really dislike giving myself shots.  Are there any major comparable differences between the two in terms of health effects and effectiveness?  Essentially, I want to do patches, but not if shots are safer health wise and will give me better results.",asktransgender
FFS Referral Letter - Summary and AMA,"Hey  all! A few weeks ago I had a meeting with a head therapist at Kaiser in  SoCal to get a recommendation letter for FFS. When I was preparing for the  appointment, I tried to find out what to expect and couldn't find any  information. I promised a couple friends that I'd take notes for them so  they could plan for their own appointments, and I thought y'all might  be interested as well. Here's my notes from the appointment. Feel free  to ask me any other questions you might have.

&amp;#x200B;

""The  therapist was very nice. She said that her primary goal would be to  have “a new pair of eyes” on my case. As such, she asked a lot of the  same questions that I’d already heard from my regular therapist. She  asked for my name and preferred pronouns, asked “how did you know,”  “what does transition mean to you,” etc. Basically just building a rough  case history from scratch. After that we reviewed the ongoing pysch  evaluation – the questionnaire I fill out at the beginning of every  appointment. It’s basically a “how are you feeling today” kind of thing.  She showed me the graph they generate, and how my mental health has  trended upward over time. My progress exceeded their expectations, so  she congratulated me for that. She then asked if I had any documented  intersex conditions and how long I had been living “full time” as my  gender.

After that we moved on to a  discussion specific to surgical evaluation. She told me that I would  need to have a recent physical exam to ensure that I am healthy enough  for surgery and should schedule one as soon as possible. She asked how  my “journey” so far has affected my physical health. She asked how the  treatments I’ve received so far have impacted my dysphoria.

The  most surprising thing (to me) was that she asked if I wanted to be  “stealth.” That led into a long discussion about passing, stealth, and  whether these are productive concepts and healthy goals to have – I  maintain that they are not, in an ideal world. She responded that  there’s no “right way to be trans” and that passing and stealth are  perfectly reasonable objectives. So that was interesting.

Then  she asked about any prior procedures I’ve had, whether on or off the  books, so to speak. She asked about substance abuse and self-harm,  reminding me that 1 year with no self-harm incidents is a requirement  for surgery through Kaiser. She asked about my education, employment,  and living situation, establishing that I won’t be put at risk by  accepting the surgery. She asked about my social support structures,  hobbies and interests, legal concerns, and any other things in my life  that might be impacted by having major surgery – in effect making sure  that I am in as stable a life situation as possible.

After  that we moved on to informed consent, where she made sure I understood  what the procedure entails and what the risks are, as well as the  financial costs. (Which for me are basically zero.) She told me that the  wait time from that meeting to surgery is usually about one year. (I  later found out that I have access to another location in the network  that may have much shorter wait times.) At the end she said that she thought I was doing great, and would be writing me my recommendation right away.""",asktransgender
Talking about a sexual relationship,"I want to talk to my partner about a sexual relationship , but I’m not sure how to approach it without making him uncomfortable or uneasy. For context I’m a cis male and he’s ftm. I care deeply about the way he feels about things, and I don’t want to cause him any distress or upset him. Can anyone offer any tips or ways I should start the conversation? ",asktransgender
Schools asking for pronouns...,"Look, I get my school and the clubs I'm in are trying to be inclusive when they have everyone go around the room and say their name and pronouns. But I personally don't like it? I don't like either having to a) out myself in front of my peers or b) lie and say I'm a cis woman. And now most people think I'm cis because I was too shy to announce I was trans in front of a whole group. 

Am I the only one who feels this way? ",asktransgender
Does queer mean anything literally?,"I am sure this type of question is asked all the time but I figured here is a good place to ask. I want to be a good ally of this community and having accurate knowledge is step 1.

My understanding is that queer is used as an umbrella term for other minority identities along the sexual gender spectrums.

But can someone without any minority identity claim queerness as an identity? 

Could I, a cis straight Male, be queer?

Is it a matter of motive? What motives are acceptable and what are not? Is there a line or principle that governs this?

I appreciate your time and effort explaining this :)",asktransgender
NSFW: How do I (18) have sex with my boyfriend?,"Me and my boyfriend have been together for nearly a year now. Our relationship is great and we have intimate time but I can never get over the final hill. Ive tried playing with toys but I cant get closer to reaching orgasm with them alone. I have tried doing anal but I keep pushing him away, no matter how much high grade anal lube is in me. How do I make these feelings that stop me from doing it go away.",asktransgender
Sleep and Feelings,"This first part will be about sleep and a few questions I have regarding it.  The second will be about depression and other feelings so here’s your warning.

I feel tired a lot more now that I am on hrt (3 months now).  I can barely stay up past 11:00 and I usually go to bed around 10:00-10:30.  I can list two times in the past few months that I have stayed up past 12 lol.  That’s not it.  When I do stay up past 11 I get extremely tired during the day.  I used to be able to sleep from 2-7 and not have an issue with staying awake but now it’s so hard.  The issue is that I have a gf now who stays up really late and I feel bad for leaving her because I have to go to sleep.  Is this normal on HRT? Cypro and Estrogen 2mg. 


Now I’m gonna start getting ranty about feelings and depression so like if it triggers you please don’t read.  
On a scale of 0-10 my gender dysphoria used to be around a 2.  Now it has gone up to 8.  This has just been fuckin up my world lately.  I find myself nearly slipping into my old coping habits of binge watching YouTube 24/7 and I would just skip into the background, nothingness, because I didn’t feel like doing anything.  It has not gotten that bad yet or at the least I refuse to let myself do that again.  It’s hard though.  I sit here in my bed and I’m just so alone.  Everyone I know is just another puppet it feels like.  It feels like I am unable to actually connect and just be with other people.  It’s like there’s a whole web of people and friends out there and my lines have been severed.  I do have a few lights shining into this darkness which would be a couple of online friends and more specifically my gf (gosh she’s so cute and amazing).  But sometimes they aren’t around and I am left yet again with my thoughts which are like wasps.  I am actually keeping my room clean (hoarding is an issue in my family...this shit has fucked me up beyond belief), I am taking better care of myself like washing my hair everyday, using lotion on my skin, actually doing my laundry every week lol, HRT, a diet so I have been losing weight (or, At least, I haven’t gained anything back from what I’ve lost).  Yet I can’t find anything to fill this gaping void.  Maybe I should see a therapist.  I should see a therapist.  But my anxiety is too bad for me to seek one out (haha I love my life).  Besides talking to friends and browsing reddit I don’t really have any escapes.  I’m not asking anything honestly in this second part I’m just venting because all of my friends are tired of hearing it every night lol.  I love writing and it would/should be a coping mechanism for me but I don’t have enough motivation to do anything.

I love you all.  Thanks xD 

Alyssa.


",asktransgender
Stressed,"I really don’t know if I’m trans. I’ve been asking a few questions on this sub already, and for the most part I’ve gotten support, but I still really don’t know. My whole life up until a year ago has been perfectly cis female. I was girly too. I’m in my high school years and I’m so fucking confused. I can’t live if I can’t be a man, but I’m scared what I’m feeling is a faze that’s gonna pass in a few months or years. I can’t live with myself if I turn out to be okay with being a woman. I hate the idea of continuing life as a woman. I wouldn’t kill myself over it, but I’m not the type to hurt myself. I don’t even know how sad I would really be. I dunno if I sound high or whatever, there’s just something about your future self doing things you yourself don’t approve of is scary as fuck. Man, I hate it. This is super spur of the moment, if this sounds like a goddamn mess (which it probably does). I’m happy right now, but I’m scared what I’m feeling isn’t real. I’ve never had a brain scan (since dysphoria comes from the brain disconnecting from the body gender wise) and Ive lived my life as the epitome of a cis girl. Again sorry, and thanks in advance",asktransgender
Have you changed your name and gender with your local registrar of voters?,"I legally changed my name and gender over a year ago. I mistakenly assumed since it was done in the same building under the same municipality that the voter rolls would be updated as well.

Not so.

But it was a simple process of calling them this morning and explaining that I need to change the name and gender on the voter registration rolls so that when I am asked for my ID on November 6th, everything lines up. She already dropped the form in the mail with return Postage and assured me I would be fine for November 6th.

So it's just kind of a PSA for those of you that have updated your name and gender but maybe not with your Registrar of Voters. 

Do it ASAP!!

Nov 6 is only 2 weeks away!!",asktransgender
CAN SOMEONE PLEASE HELP ME?,"(first post on reddit btw)

I'm a 17 year old guy and for about 4 months now I've been dying to become a girl.  i just want to be free, feminine, and rebellious. The weird thing is I never felt this way as a kid and i'm not gay. All my friends are guys and my girlfriend dumped me.  My dad grounded me for the entire month of August for crossdressing.  i bought some estrogen online, but it was the wrong kind. Lately I been having the urge to crossdress so badly, but I can't.  I also have been having thoughts where if i'm gonna be a girl I should starting like boys and i want to kiss a guy and suck his D\*\*\* but I dont find them attractive. I just want to be someone's girl. I don't like talking about this to people cuz they already think i'm crazy but I want someone to help me. I'd like a gender therapist or something. Please leave a comment if you'd like to talk and hear my story. I'd also like to hear yours. Thx. :)",asktransgender
Question: How often do you face harassment or transphobia?,,asktransgender
Putting off documentation change in light of recent news?,"I'll cut right to the chase. Is it better for me to put off changing my documentation in hopes that eventually political conditions may improve? Or should I attempt to go through with it anyway? I live in a relatively LGBT friendly part of a very LGBT unfriendly US state, so I'll need a court order for name and gender marker change. How would not getting this change affect my ability to get permanent residency in another country if worst comes to worst? (Luckily I have reason to believe that I have options in this regard.)",asktransgender
Is /r/transgendercirclejerk Transphobic?,"So whenever i make a new reddit it auto subs me to a bunch of trans related reddits, one of which consistently has been /r/transgendercirclejerk but all the posts on there seem depressing at the least and bigotted at worst. Tell me i'm wrong? Is this some new \*edgy\* super reverse sarcasm post-irony bullshit or are these people assholes? Please forgive the language, i'm from Boston",asktransgender
What pronouns do I use for my ex?,I was talking to a coworker about an ex the other day.  My ex transitioned to male after we broke up but I was unsure how to describe them.  Opinions?,asktransgender
First Therapy Session,"It’s done. I just talked about my past the whole time.  It was important to me for him to know. Then he said, timed up, and he said, it’s important for me to guide you so you aren’t just talking about the people around you, but how you feel about them. I feel like he’s saying i said something wrong, or everything. I know it’s in my head.",asktransgender
What can people from other countries do to help our American siblings?,"We've all been seeing the threat being posed to the existence of trans people at the hands of Trump's administration and the dept. of Health &amp; Human Services. It's horrifying. It's scary. But, as an Australian, I can't help but feel quite removed from the issue.

So a question to Americans: what can we Australians, and those from any country, do to really make an impact and stop this from happening? Who do we call? Where do we protest? How do we STOP THIS FROM HAPPENING?

And to Australians and anyone else who feels they aren't impacted by this: you are. It doesn't seem like it yet, but this is everyone's fight. This potential change of definition sets a precedent on how ""the free world"" treats its people. So whether you identify as trans or not; whether you identify as GSRM or not; whether you're the most comfortable cis, white, hetero male in town: THIS. IS. YOUR. FIGHT! ",asktransgender
Is there an online list of safe spaces/places for US and Canada?,,asktransgender
417 HRT,"Looking in the Springfield MO area for a doctor or someone who can prescribe HRT. I haven't been able to get in touch with anyone from my local support center after multiple tries, for multiple months.",asktransgender
Did you have bad anxiety before you transitioned?,,asktransgender
Please go vote if you're in the US,"It's not too late to register in some states. If you're afraid of discrimination for having your assigned at birth name not match your appearance you may still be able to sign up for a mail in ballot (im not sure how other states do this, my state does this by default). What ever your excuse is to not go vote, please set it aside for one day and go vote! I don't care what your political affiliations are (I'm independent). If you think your vote isn't important because enough people who side with your viewpoint are already voting, you're wrong, they're probably actually not voting.",asktransgender
Choosing a surgeon for SRS,"Hey all, next year February i'll be going to the GIC to talk about Bottom surgery and i was wondering where i could find information about each different Surgeon and Clinic i could go to?  


I was told that at the GIC one of the doctors will basically ask me what i'm expecting from the surgery or something like that?",asktransgender
Am I trans (ftm)?,"Okay, I need some answers here. Like real bad. I first started questioning my gender identity about 2-3 years ago, and I'm now 17. I told my sister, and she said it was probably just a phase. So I ignored it. But it hasn't gone away. 

As a kid, being a twin, I'd still play with dolls with my sister, but I preferred playing with male dolls as my main character in games. In video games, I'd pretty much always play as a male character, and same in role-playing games as a child with family and friends. I had a huge tomboy phase, but I didn't like sports, so it was less a tomboy in doing stereotypically male things and rather that I just wanted to be a guy. I've always felt detached from my name, too, as well as my middle name. 

On TV and in books, my favourite characters would always be guys and I'd struggle to relate to female characters. That's still the case today. I enjoy creative writing in my free time, and struggle to write from a woman's perspective. 

These days, my chest makes me uncomfortable and I try to wear the baggiest clothing I can. For the past few years I've shopped in the mens section or unisex sections online, but when I have to go shopping with my parents, and I point out something, they're like, 'honey that's men's'. I'm also struggling with my sexuality, because I'm attracted to girls exclusively, but calling myself gay/lesbian/sapphic/wlw, it all feels wrong, and I'd feel more comfortable expressing my sexuality from a male perspective. 

I dream of an ideal life in the future or an alternate universe and I'm always a guy. 

The problem is I don't necessarily like stereotypically masculine things. Most of my interests are rooted in film, games, and literature, although I suppose slashers are my favourite, if gore/violence count as non-feminine. But, as I said, I never liked sports, and most of my friends growing up were girls. 

I just need some advice to be honest. Please help if you can. ",asktransgender
did you ever have your inspirations become toxic?,"i probably need to tell this embarrassing story that's happening to me, because otherwise i don't know how to phrase any of this. this is long.

so i was at the psychologist's (really pleasant man) with mom, and he asked me to describe the ideal ""female me"". after some racing thoughts, i remembered about my chosen name, which i use as a ""carrot on a stick"" for myself pretty happily

&gt;""uh, tough question. i um, i chose the name emma after emma watson, i liked it since childhood. i always really related to hermione as a kid, despite not knowing anything about anything. anyway,""

and then i don't quite remember anything. the appointment came to its logical conclusion, and i went home.

i looked at reddit, i did the usual nothing i spend time doing, i found a gif of young hermione from the movie, my reaction to which was like an ""aw fuck"" of being jealous, like with a lot of cis girls, and then i started to realize that

this inspiration i mentioned was not only true and all i want ever, for everything, post-ironically so, but also really unreachable. and that devolved into something that wouldn't get out of my head - i compare myself with the character, i am disappointed, i am upset, repeat. this is really stupid.

and i don't know what i want to do with it

edit: your responses are lovely, thank you!",asktransgender
i dont like being refered to as trans or transgirl,like I seriously hate being called trans and being trans in general I just wish I was a normal girl sometimes but I don't want to get called transphobe again I'd rather be called girl ,asktransgender
Am I allowed to wear my pride pins at work (taco bell)?,,asktransgender
Am I dysphoric?,"I fantasize about having a whole life/alter ego as a male since puberty 

I hate dressing up and looking “pretty” and shaving 

I hate when people treat me like a female 

I don’t hate my secondary sex characteristics 

I’m attracted to men

I’m scared I might be wrong about this and if I transition i might regret it 

My boobs are too big for me to dress manly without looking like a lesbian so I might as well dress like a girl 

I’m settling as a weird ugly girl but what if I transition and I’m just a weird ugly boy?

I only feel comfortable when I think of myself as a man and forget the way everyone else sees me",asktransgender
"Any FTMs have experience with ""hormone seizures?""","Six months after starting T, I began having increasingly frequent seizure-like episodes. I noticed two trends regarding when the episodes would happen: I would often have one four days after each T shot, and I tended to get a bunch around the beginning of my period cycle. I switched from shots to gel, but was still having episodes around the beginning of my cycle. I then stopped gel, and the frequency and intensity of the episodes has decreased since then.

My PCP doesn't think hormones could be causing these symptoms, but I've spoken to other health professionals who said that hormones affect the body in many ways, not all of which are understood. Personally, since the correlation has been so spot-on, I'm inclined to suspect causation.

(Note: I got an EEG and it came back normal, so these episodes may not be actual seizures. My body switches between limp and spasming, but I'm conscious for most of it. It might be syncope, but I've been seeing a cardiologist and we haven't found anything that would cause fainting spells.)

Does anyone have any experience with hormone levels causing symptoms like these? I want to see an endocrinologist; will it be hard to get an appointment if all I have is a suspicion?",asktransgender
To Those Trying To Tell Me To Not Fight If Things Get Bad In The US,"I'll let this playlist express what I have to say:

&amp;#x200B;

[https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=qWRI4py5z-0](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=qWRI4py5z-0) 

[https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=1AF7npmdHas](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=1AF7npmdHas)

&amp;#x200B;

'nuff said",asktransgender
Am I really transgender?,What if it's just transvestism? ,asktransgender
I need help allowing myself to be feminine,"I, well. I think I'm a girl...I'm having a rough time allowing myself to be feminine though. I've had being a man's man drilled into my head all my life and every time I do girl things or allow myself to do girly things like giggling or buying myself nail polish I kinda have these real nasty bouts of guilt and end up feeling like I'm doing something wrong...

I need help to work past it how do I stop feeling like I'm a failure for being feminine? I feel happy but then feel like I stole something or hid drugs or something every time, tense and panic. I need some kind of advice on how to...I don't know...allow myself to be a girl...without having that feeling of ridicule and fear of emasculation bs bullying some men do and sinking fear... ",asktransgender
What's the difference between transexual and transgender?,,asktransgender
Why does referencing myself with correct pronouns feel wrong?,"I love it when others refer to me using my preferred pronouns.  And Im giddy everytime someone in public genders me correctly (which doesnt happen often).

&amp;#x200B;

But howcome if Im telling a story about myself in 3rd person, or like referencing myself in a way that I have to say, ""well she doesnt like this"", or ""Im not that type of girl"" etc.

I get this feeling like its both wrong, and like Im lying.  Shouldn't it feel right to refer to myself as a girl???

People say it takes time.  But it never seems to change.  It always feels wrong, and has felt wrong since the day I started doing it about 7 months ago.  Does it mean Im not really trans and Im really just an extremely feminine man?",asktransgender
Gender therapy?,"As a transitioning trans-female, should I seek out a gender therapist?

I currently see a great therapist and a psychiatrist, but do I need to specialize due to transitioning? I'm planning on freezing sperm soon and then as soon as I can, begin HRT. Would it be possible for my psychiatrist to prescribe me E?

Thanks,
Dae / Daisy 🙂",asktransgender
Porn/erotica recommendations?,"My interest in the porn i normally watch dropped dramatically a few days ago due to HRT, and now I'm horny in a weird way where nothing that usually turns me on does that anymore but i wanna masturbate. Help? ",asktransgender
Post-SRS unexpected changes?,"Hey everyone so I've been getting some strong bottom dysphoria lately.

&amp;#x200B;

I'm on the waiting list but the NHS is loooooong. I was wondering about things post-SRS which could be unforeseen though so if anybody who has had SRS would like to share any unexpected things they happened after getting surgery, I'd really appreciate it. What little things did you notice about your new genitals that you didn't think about before?

&amp;#x200B;

Thanks for sharing!",asktransgender
Not sure if this is dysphoria or I’m “faking” it,"Hi,

So a bit of context, I have a very transphobic and homophobic family which doesn’t make things easy. Since I was very young (I’m now 16) I’ve always wanted to be a girl and to have a girls body, even before I had any idea that was possible. When I discovered surgery I was really interested by the idea of it and felt like I should get it when I could, but I knew my parents would never be ok with it. The thoughts that I’d much rather have a girls body came and went in intensity but were pretty much always there. I don’t absolutely detest my body - and Ive met trans people who do which is why I’m scared that the feelings I have aren’t “really” me being trans - but I don’t like it either, I don’t like facial hair or body hair or being shirtless as it just, makes me uncomfortable. However, until recently I never felt pressured to try on girls’ clothes, but now I really want to just to see how it feels. I never played with “feminine” toys either like dolls or anything and my parents raised me to be extremely masculine (typical conservative family) and to be honest, I still somewhat enjoy many such activities with my dad.

But socially, I struggle to get on with boys my age and much prefer the company of girls and often I want to be seen as one of them, not just some guy who hangs around with girls. I go to an all boys school and I’ve started struggling to keep up my friendships because I just feel, different I guess. I imagined being called she/her pronouns and it makes me somewhat happy, but at the same time I don’t feel pain every time someone calls me he/him and I know many trans people really hate their old pronouns, so I don’t know whether my feelings add up to gender dysphoria or just me wishing for something I can’t have.

Any advice? ",asktransgender
Relationships,Would you tell someone your interested in dating that you're trans?,asktransgender
"Trans people from Tennessee (and elsewhere), can you share your experiences?","First off, apologies for yet another U.S.-centric post in a row. But in light of recent moves by the Trump administration, trans people in the U.S. could experience much greater difficult in obtaining documents reflecting their correct gender/sex.

From my knowledge, Tennessee is the only state in the union that forbids changes being made to birth certificates due to transition.

I was hoping some of you from Tennessee could share your experiences in obtaining (or not obtaining) correct documentation so the rest of your trans sisters and brothers in the U.S. can get a realistic idea of living in a land with such restrictive laws. (Also, this is something we should be very aware of *regardless* of any proposed current changes!)

People living outside the U.S. in places with similarly restrictive laws—I’d love to hear from you as well!",asktransgender
many people think concept of being transgender and medical transition is new,"Transgender people have been around forever, as everyone in this sub knows, but a lot of people believe that being transgender in the modern context we have today is a new one, even being something that is only a few years old.

We can give examples of some cultures with third genders, but these are often dismissed as not being the same thing. It is legit to say that it's not the same thing as modern transgender people with medical transition, it's actually much closer to modern non-binary people in many ways. (the enbies were first, y0!)

We can even give examples people who were ""women living as men"" as being transgender men. People sometimes dismiss these accounts due to the fact that women were forced into bad situations based on gender roles at the time.  Essentially that women pretended to be men to escape gender oppression - not that they were trans guys. 

So ignoring these common refutations - we still have rock solid examples as technology progressed.  At the turn of last century we see more and more things that look like we have today.  The modern idea of transgender people publicly changing their info legally and having medical transition is a century or more old.  

Here's a ""Transvestite License"" from 1928 Germany

https://i.imgur.com/4cWDVHw.png

This was early days.  The term transgender did not exist, the term ""transsexual"" would be coined very soon.  

The person in question is Katharina T. We don't have many records (they were burned), but for all intents and purposes this person was a transgender man.  I'll use the terms he/him.  He went to the Institut für Sexualwissenschaft (institute for sexual studies) in Berlin and saw Dr. Magnus Hirschfeld.  We know he was denied a petition have his name changed to a male name.

This is early-early-days trans pioneering complete with getting gatekeept.  Ninety years ago.  It was still progress.

Here's another couple of people:
1922, 1928, 1931 MTF SRS - https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Dora_Richter

She had orcheictomy, penectomy, and early vaginoplasty.  

She had permission from the police to live as a woman, and of course she fled Germany because of the Nazis.

1931 MTF SRS. Lili Elbe https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Lili_Elbe

She had her name legally changed along with her sex.   

She had three surgeries, and was going to have a fourth.   
She died due to infection and limitations in medical technologies at the time.  

A lot of this happened in Germany and surrounding areas, but as I said, the nazis happened.

This photo is of the nazis burning the archives of the Institut für Sexualwissenschaft, this is LGBT history being burned.

https://upload.wikimedia.org/wikipedia/commons/2/2b/1933-may-10-berlin-book-burning.JPG

That brought so much progress to a screeching halt, but slow progress happened elsewhere.

Dr. Benjamin began work with HRT in the 1940s - over half a century ago.   
https://www.ncbi.nlm.nih.gov/pubmed/7733806

Including prescribing Premarin to a child, we've lost track of the child after she was referred to Germany for surgery.  

Nope, medical transition is not new.  And the modern concept of being transgender with medical transition is over one hundred years old.   

Also, Nazis trying to erase us from existence is not new either.",asktransgender
"""Gender Assigned at Birth""","I've seen this phrase and many more worded differently but essentially the same idea, what is the main reasoning behind it? It makes no sense to me seeing as how male/female are words to describe how a person grows before birth. Am I missing something?",asktransgender
What is the trans healthcare coverage like at Target or Starbucks?,"I can't seem to find any actual coverage lists or anything, before I accept a job at Target or one at Starbucks. I want to see what the coverage is like first, so I can make an informed decision.",asktransgender
Crazy Buddhist explanation for Transgenderism,"This is just a light spiritual debate, not meant to be taken seriously.

So I can't remember where I read this but supposedly you are transgender to teach your parents to be open minded because they may have uttered or or harbored transphobia.

What's crazy is the story that my mom told me when i came out to her.

so she was pregnant with me in phillipines and accidently walked into a hair salon run by trans folks and she freaked out and said she considers them as 'beasts'. she said that if i ever transitioned she doesnt want me in her life anymore. 

It used to hurt a lot but reading/pondering about spiritual ideas about karma and buddhism gives me some solace, that its not my fault that I'm transgender

....its obviously plastic water bottles...all that BPA 

so ultimately its THEIR PROBLEM lol. I'm OKAY with being a transwoman, so what the hell am I supposed to do for them? This also hurts me in a way because I can't help them and I am causing them pain....like my existence is painful for them as trans.

I'm really afraid for my family....my transitioning will break them apart but i tried myriad times to explain my condition....but i have a fucking right to live an authentic life, trying to deny me this is just fucked up.

anyways like Buddha says this one ain't on me homie its yo family and it makes me feel good. pray for this atheist.",asktransgender
So I just got back from visiting with my family and I'm pissed off and mildly suicidal. (Post-Trump Trans Announcement),"I'm out to my parents, and they're supportive, which is fantastic. I'm covering all my bases in college three states away from them (America), so they weren't here for this.

My family is split down the middle on politics, and whenever they gather they wind up arguing about it. As someone who generally likes peace, I don't care for it, but being trans has fundamentally screwed with this balance. 

My grandparents are traditional conservative. My grandfather has a personality very similar to Trump- multiple famliy members have commented that behind his back.  But my real concern is with my uncle, who is alt-right (if you asked him, he probably wouldn't say so, but he's a lot more set in his ways than he thinks). I wanted to talk about sports and jokes and normal family stuff, but instead I got a smattering of NPC memes, defenses of Kavanaugh and scoffs regarding all 86 genders. He also listens to Sargon of Akkad, PragerU and Black Pigeon Speaks- I don't know if you all know who these guys are (I used to listen to them a lot when I was still repressing). 

He's definitely gotten more unhinged in recent years, but the longer he is allowed to debate the rest of my family, the worse it'll get for me when he inevitably gets revolted when: 1. He finds out I'm a girl, and 2. When his conspiracy mindset concludes that it's the faults of my parents, my college, and basically everyone.

Here's the thing: I'm very much uninterested in fighting my family members; I would rather get into a nasty car accident, and that's exactly what I thought when I was driving down the highway late at night coming back home from all that. I've already attempted once (and my uncle knows about it) and I'm aware of the severity of those thoughts. But I couldn't stop fantasizing about swerving my car into each oncoming tree which emerged from the shadows on my right. 

I can't exactly cut communications, as it's my family and this uncle's wife, my aunt, cares deeply about me. I would be out to her if I knew it wouldn't create tension in their already-fragile marriage. As for my grandparents, they'll likely disown me, but from a strategic perspective, they're far less important. I have other family members who would be supportive, or at least have a stiff drink before coming to terms with it. I'm not a bad person, and my family likes and respects me, so that helps. 

So what do? There's no convincing these people, and I can't just ignore them. This has the potential to rip my family apart, and I'm legitimately scared...",asktransgender
Info For Family?,"Background: My child is 3 years old and since they could  talk have been insistent they are a girl(born male). Even now that they are familiar with boy/girl body parts and what they mean. If I ask ""What kind of body do you have?"" They will tell me they have a penis, so they have a boy body. But will follow that with ""I don't want a boy body. I'm a girl"". They're advanced verbally, fully conversational and cognitively on track so it's not a matter of the message getting lost in translation from toddler nonsense. They also have an older sister and brother and I do home daycare so they are around a variety of boys and girls of all types. It's been a full year of this being their answer and we're trying to prepare for the possibility that it's not ""just a phase"". We were surprised when talking to extended family that not only do they fully agree that Riv is possibly trans, they are completely supportive. My mother in law asked me to help her learn more and I said I would find some websites for her. What would be some good ones to direct her to?",asktransgender
Ways to make myself more feminine when I'm in the closet?,,asktransgender
How do I tell my boyfriend I am trans?,"I am a 19 year old stealth transwoman, and I have never dated before. I just got my first boyfriend (~2weeks ago) and I feel that I should tell him that I am transgender. 

I don't know how he will react to this, especially since I havent had bottom surgery (will be in February next year). I can't imagine it will be violent, but I don't want to be outed to anyone else. 

I should add that I've never really interacted with lgbt or trans communities so I apologise if I break any rules.

I should also say that we've been friends already for about a year.",asktransgender
Advice on coming out to children,"Hi all, I've been coming to terms with myself and that I need to be comfortable with myself, however not sure how I should eventually come forward with my children. I have three ranging in age 11 to 6. They're all pretty laid back, open minded and tolerant, but I don't know how to approach this without them feeling like they're lossing their father. Any advice from those of you've who've been here before?",asktransgender
"No matter what way you transition and in what way and to what extend you transition, you are valid! Don’t let anyone tell you otherwise please :)","Whether you need HRT, SRS, FFS, BA, phalloplasty, metaidioplasty, mastectomy, hysterectomy, oophorectomy or laser hair removal , VFS, FMS or other surgeries and hormonal products to transition or just a social transition, remember this : YOU ARE VALID.

FtM
MtF
Non-binary

You are valid and so is your dysphoria.

Transition doesn’t look the same for everyone and whatever solution is suitable to reduce your dysphoria IS VALID.

Sometimes I see trans individuals call other trans individuals fetishists or tenders for not doing this or that to transition. Remember : this is transition according to your view, not according to someone else’s.

No matter if you need SRS and HRT and want to go the whole 9 yards or whether you only want some portion of available treatments and not others : you are valid and so is your gender.

Let’s not make the same mistakes Trump made. Let’s not erase each other. The rest of the world sees us as one bunch of creeps. We only have each other and a few precious allies and partners. We need to stick tightly together.

I love each and everyone of you.

Hugs,
an anonymous trans woman.

",asktransgender
"MTF, Pain when having an erection?","I am 19 months on HRT and this just started to be a problem about 2 months ago. But last weekend it got so bad that I had to stop before the orgasm. 

My libido is low and I am not in the mood more than every two weeks.

Is there anything I except masturbating more often?",asktransgender
"“Oh My God, He’s Into Me”: One Trans Gal’s Experience with a Man of the Straight Persuasion, or “How I Discovered I Am Also Very Into Men”","This month, I eclipsed 4 years of HRT, and am dating a man for the first time in my life. In hindsight, I always knew that I was attracted to men, but a combination of things always kept me from acknowledging those feelings. Bisexuality was seen as “just someone kidding themselves” when I was growing up, and since I was attracted to women, I was convinced that I could not also be attracted to men. 

In spite of feeling this way, there were times when I *knew*, and just simply refused to acknowledge it. I remember my heart skipping a beat every time I saw the face of the quarterback of my football team. I remember blushing when my male friends would hug me and confide their emotions and feelings in me that they didn’t feel comfortable sharing with the world, because men have to be strong, right? I remember thinking “I can see why the girls are so into him, if I was a girl I would love to be his girlfriend. Too bad I’m not a girl ha ha ha...”. I remember being a young boy watching Disney movies when I was home alone, and wishing so badly I could go out as Cinderella for Halloween, and wanting to be some guy’s “princess”.

I recently found myself once again single and in a position to explore my sexuality more, and began casually dating men. I realize I am quite lucky because it has been pretty easy for me - I don’t know if it’s just that times are changing a bit and men are more open, or if lots of men are just willing to make an exception for me. I was enjoying just having casual sex with guys while figuring myself out and what I want and need out of life, until he came along.

Not even in my wildest dreams could I have come up with a man like him. He is so tall and handsome and talented, and he’s into *me*. The trans woman. This beautiful straight man is into *me*. Like, what? From the first time we hooked up, we both agreed that there was something undeniably special between us. The sex was pretty great but didn’t enter uncharted territory - I’m semi-comfortable with my situation down there but don’t ever ask guys to do anything with it, I guess out of subconscious fear that it will scare them off. But he wanted to learn how to make me feel good and we got there over the next few times we met up. For the first time in my life, I fantasized about a man going down on me, and it was some of the most intimate romantic sex I’ve ever had when it actually happened. There was so much laughing and smiling and then moaning...omg.

He’s not ashamed to be out in public with me and loves having me on his arm. He loves hearing about everything that makes me who I am, and I don’t feel like I need to hide old pictures or old stories about my former self. He’s always excited to learn more things about “my world” and the LGBT community in general. He tells me that he truly feels like he can be himself around me and for the first time doesn’t need to compromise who he is either. We are both into the same dorky hobbies and get to enjoy them together, also a first for me, and I think for him as well.

I never thought that I would find myself in this situation. I never thought that I would even so much as pass. I never thought that I would transition at all to be honest, let alone be 4 years in and dating such a wonderful man.. Hopefully this is a message of hope for anyone else just stumbling upon this community like I did almost 7 years ago. There will be people out there who like and accept you for who you are ❤️


Edit; also for reference I’m 26 now",asktransgender
New Friend,"So I have a new friend that is trans and I get on with them really well, I just don't want to get anything wrong. I use the right pronoun and I have had friends before that were trans, but I can feel like we're going to be close friends and I don't want to ruin this, any tips on this?",asktransgender
Good brand of sports bras?,"Hey everyone, is there any good brand of sports bras that have slightly wider straps? I use Calvin Klein at the moment but you can always see one strap protruding from the neck hole? It's not good when you are trying to hide it. Thanks :) ",asktransgender
"Not a question, just need positive vibes","I just found out a little while ago that my mother passed away today from a massive heart attack. She was the only family member to support me when I came out. She helped me get my first binder, start T, see therapists, all of it. She had no life insurance, and I have no way for me to get to my younger siblings right now, I can't afford to travel home and it's killing me. I'm at a loss, my siblings need me, and I can't be with them. I just don't know what to do.",asktransgender
A Short Letter,"  

**A short letter to a Tran-Gendered** 

**Hi person,**

**I say person because that is what I see you as. You’re not some lost confused soul; you’re not some mistake or freak of nature. I see what this governmental climate is trying to do to you and my heart aches, it aches because those in that White House don’t see you for who you are, they don’t understand that you are strong, that you are intelligent and more than anything else you are 100% sure of who you are, and in most cases more-so than those who are in power, you know, the ones trying to change the rules. I also want you to know that you are not alone, and there are quite a few of us that understand your plight, me personally I have voted for people that get and understand this too, I just hope that this round of the ‘political election game’ will put even more players into power that get it. I say again that, you are not alone, and we will fight along with you for every right you should be afforded as an American. Don’t despair, don’t lose hope, we got you.**

**Signed;**

**A Strait Guy that loves women… but loves Human Rights even more.**",asktransgender
How many months/years were you on HRT before your chest stoped aching?,"I’m personally at 1.5 years and it still feels pretty much like it did in the first month, a mild ache but not too bad. Honestly I check it every day because if it ever stops hurting then I assume that means it’s no longer growing!

When did it stop for you?",asktransgender
How does estrogen or testosterone affects the capacity of trans athletes?,"Title pretty straightforward, I guess.

I am asking this based in some questions I got from a post on r/news about a polemic involving a trans woman that won some competition. Can't remember the details exactly.

Well, from the experience of users in this sub, I can say that being in estrogen reduces muscle mass in a heavy way. But does it affects the heart?  And in the same way as other muscles? And more, is it affected in a way that can be unhealthy for health?

Also, about lungs. A normal male's lungs have more capacity than a woman's. And does it maintains it's capacity?

And about the skeletal structure? Does it affects in sports at all or not?

And does the other way around happens to trans men? Does being in testosterone for enough time brings the person to a male level competition?

Finally, since it takes time, does competition sports require the person to be in hormones for some time? A trans woman that started E yesterday isn't the same as one who started E 1 year ago, so the first one could enter in the competition?",asktransgender
What signs of heart attack should a post-transition person watch for? I hear the symptoms are different for men and women.,"Saw this image and got thinking. https://www.premierhealth.com/Your-Wellness/Live-Well-Stay-Well/Managing-a-Health-Condition/Heart-Disease/Heart-Attack-Warning-Signs/

Is it hormonally-based? Eg: a transgender woman should watch out for the female symptoms?

Is it something else-based? Eg: a transgender woman should watch out for the male symptoms?

Edit: spelling",asktransgender
"I have an urge to come out, but I probably shouldnt?","I'm out and open to all my friends and family and on social media, but I live 500 miles away from home with my partner. My job, that I've been at for 4 months now is full of  conservative people so I have just been in the closet the whole time. But this week I've just been dying to tell one of my coworkers who is a cool person I comment well with, even though i dont have a reason. Like, I have literally no reason to want to except other than that I want to be me, even if to just one person. Does anyone else ever feel this way?",asktransgender
Trying to overcome denial. Please help?,"I'm sorry for the long post...

For the past few months, I've been in an awful cycle of what I think is dysphoria, denial, acceptance, and disassociation.. I can't focus on anything.. even my college work because all my mind can do is think about whether or not I'm trans.

I really feel like I want to be... but when I feel doubtful I lose all of my sense of identity. I have no idea who I am at this point. I'm 20 years old, assigned male at birth and I believe I'm female.

In support groups or other places.. I feel both strangely complimented when called a girl, refers to me with female pronouns, or uses the name I've been trying.. Raelynn. But at the same time it feels very odd and strange. Not bad but different, and I'm not used to it.

I feel that if I transition, I want to go all the way with SRS eventually and everything. But I have these doubts that I can't put a reason to. I can only put reasons to why I feel good being female. I know I have a bit of dysphoria and have had signs of being female, whether I knew it or not since I was 5.

I still consider if this is a phase.. and I really hope it isn't. I've even come out to several people and still doubt myself.. I just want to overcome it already.. I know I have dysphoria to some degree.. For example, I felt way better after shaving my arms and legs for the first time last week, but feel awful today because I didn't have time to shave my face this morning.

I've also wondered if I'm just attached to the idea of being trans because I spend so much time alone and I fight through everything myself, but since this community is so supportive.. I feel loved in a way I haven't before, and I feel like I'm not alone anymore.. 

Is it possible I just want to be trans for the sake of being trans? Has it ever been a phase to anyone? How did some of you know you had dysphoria? ... and how did you overcome your denial?

",asktransgender
Is HRT covered in Alberta?,"Hey, so I'm just wondering if anyone happens to know if HRT is covered by the Alberta government? And if not, if post secondary student insurance would?",asktransgender
Estradot (Oestradiol),"Has anyone used or heard anything posititve or negative about Estradot (Oestradiol) 50mcg Patches?

If so what do you think about the dosage 50mcg? Too much too little?

",asktransgender
My existence isn't up for debate,"I'm so fucking sick of people saying transphobia is ""just a different opinion"" and I'm trying to suppress their free speech by telling them to fuck off. I agree to disagree when discussing tax policy and the 2nd amendment. I refuse to accept ""different opinions"" on whether I have rights as a human fucking being. There's no such thing as a ""transgender debate"", either you're a disgusting piece of shit or you're not and that's that.",asktransgender
"I am totally, 1000% cis.","At least that's what I tell myself, despite knowing by now that it's not really true. I recently turned 28. At this point in my life, I've changed my (feminine) birth name to a gender-neutral name, I've had surgery to end my fertility mostly due to gender dysphoria around the ability to get pregnant (I'm asexual so I don't need it for the birth control), I don't like having breasts and I semi-regularly use a binder, and some other things. But I still tell myself I'm totally, 100%, without-a-doubt cis. I have literally had surgery and gone through a legal process to change my name due to gender dysphoria but I am still totally 1000% cis, apparently. It is a weird double-think/denial thing. But at least I am finally relatively happy and at peace with my life.",asktransgender
"As an adult, talking to a parent about surgery","Hi! I am a trans person and I would like some advice on how I can discuss my transition better with one of my parents, or try to see things from her perspective more. I'm really sorry this is super long and rant-y but I want her to feel okay about me and at the same time I don't want to feel like I betraying her and these various feelings are plaguing me daily. I posted this to /r/transparents but it hasn't seemed to get attention.

For some background, we live far away from each other (about a 4-hour plane ride) and she hasn't seen me in person since I came out. We have video called a lot though. She accepts me and tries to support me. She uses my new name and pronouns as much as she can but I think she is still struggling.

Before I started social transition, I didn't know if I wanted surgery. Now I know I want surgery and am actively researching ways to do it with insurance..I have found one surgeon who would do the surgery with insurance and we have set a tentative date. The surgeon has honours and decades of experience in reconstructive surgery. and regarding the location, quality, my schedule, tentative healing time, the severity of my dysphoria, and the type of surgery I would be getting, I am sure it's the right choice for me. However, this time isn't convenient for my mom, I can't wait until my next available vacation, which would not be long enough to heal well. and I can't take extra time off work. when I told my mom about my plan she got extremely upset and basically forbade me to get surgery if she wasn't there. I find this ridiculous because... a) it's a surgery I could recover from without 24/7 aid--I will have two weeks off work to recover from the surgery so I would not be exerting myself unnecessarily. And I'm sure if I really needed another week or few days off to heal up completely, my boss would let me. b) I have other options for care. There are friends I could call if I had an emergency, and I could get them to check up on me every day. There is also a service for trans people getting surgery where you can hire a caretaker for a few days while recovering in a hotel. On the other hand it's possible I could ask my dad to come take care of me. Why does it have to be my mom? Why do *I* have to do my transition on *her* terms and *her* schedule? c) I am a financially independent adult with my own rpartment, have had a full time job for years, out of university for a decade, and I can pay for the surgery myself. I want to get this done when I still have a stable, full-time job so I won't have to worry about healing while job hunting because I am considering quitting. I have thought about the surgery a lot, and it excites me/makes me feel relieved and yet every day I am plagued with the growing disgust I have with this part of my body. These are not new feelings, I have felt them since puberty. But ever since discovering I was trans and learning about this surgery the feelings have intensified. For the record, if my insurance goes through and I am able to get the surgery at a price I can afford, I'm going through with it whether she's there or not. I just need to decide what to communicate to my mom. Should pretend like I'm not getting the surgery? Would that hurt her more than telling her the truth?

Right now I am dealing with my dysphoria every day, I feel like I am functioning well, but I feel like that is because I have the optimism in the back of my mind that I will be able to get surgery soon and start physically feeling better/""normal"". But sometimes when I talk to my mom she asks me about my feelings/dysphoria or asks me lots of question. This makes me nervous, upset, and dysphoric after. When I told her i wanted to get the surgery and she forbade me, after I felt extremely dysphoric and depressed, I cried for half an hour, I felt extreme despair and almost felt like it would not be worth living if I couldn't have surgery for a stupid reason like this. I don't want to tell my mom about these feelings. I plan on seeing a therapist to help me deal with the mental burden and stress of starting my medical transition, but I don't want to talk about it with my mom anymore because I feel like she judges me too much... Also she has told me multiple times that I need to start living as my identified gender for a year and go through counselling, THEN start hormones, THEN get surgery. Who is she to tell me how to live my life and what to do with my body? I know what's best for myself. And when it comes to decisions about my body and my life, this is not the first time I've defied her wishes and my decision turned out to be the right decision for me.",asktransgender
Where to go from here? (MTF),"Okay, so I’m  to the point were I’d like to try transitioning, there’s doubts, but I’m pretty sure I’m trans. What steps should I take to start transitioning? Should I talk to my therapist about at least trying HRT? I just want to know where I should go from here, anything’s appreciated! ",asktransgender
"This might sound contrary to what's wanted here, but my question makes sense if you get the whole story.","So I need to know of any studies that would imply that trans people should *not* be permitted into restrooms. I don't care if the study is totally unpalatable, or if it's easily disproven. Those are probably better truth be told. 

Reason being that in an English class of mine, we are writing a paper on a topic of our choosing, and I chose to do it on whether transgender people should be permitted in restrooms in accordance with their identity. Before we do the full paper, however, we have to make a small paper both for and against said topic.

It's really easy to find studies that would say we should be permitted. It's extremely difficult to find ones that say we shouldn't, that are also peer reviewed and published in a respectable source. Thus far I've only found one, and that wasn't an attack on us so much as it was saying that we might be more likely to be attacked in the restroom of our choosing... But I would want at least three, and I'm floundering here.

I'm *this close* to using some crap compilations done by the Family Research Council, then tearing them apart later, but that just seems lazy seeing as they really aren't up to academic standard",asktransgender
I'm so anxious about hormones,Title. I've been spending hours trying to figure out how i want to take my medication. My doctor tells me to take my estrogen orally but it's estrace so I've been taking it sublingually. But I've heard that oral helps with estrone levels which can help along with tanner stage 2 &amp; 3. I keep looking back at that one chart and i keep thinking about taking .5 mg twice a day sublingually and taking 1 mg once a day (i was prescribed 2mg). I started 2 weeks ago and i just haven't noticed any changes about the things I'm dysphoric about and I'm worried that i might waste time/medication. Does anyone have any advice?,asktransgender
Dysphoria: being put down by myself and by others. How can I empower myself?,"I look into the mirror and I find it hard to see a woman. Rarely, I find myself a little cute, but most often an abomination. When I'm walking down the street, I feel inferior to everyone around me, particularly women. Sometimes I blend in and pass — as long as no one looks for long enough. Often I don't pass. It is then when I get the stares, the smirks and the sneers, even open laughter. And I internalize it: I feel small, I feel less, I get anxious, I want to run away, in pain. I let it get to me because when I look at myself, that's mostly what I think too. I know I have many good qualities, but few of them have to do with my outer appearance. People who get to know me treat me well, and find me likeable; people who don't regard me as less than, as a joke.

I have to learn to deal with it, to accept my shitty face, to love myself a little bit, to stop finding myself despicable. I also have to build some kind of internal defense mechanism against the attacks I get from the outside. My partner manages to undo my knot and soothe me, but that only lasts until the next bad experience.

Please help, any ideas or suggestions are appreciated.",asktransgender
I'm going to do it finally,"I'm finally going to talk to professionals tomorrow. I'm going to call my university's mental health group tomorrow. I'm making this post to force myself too. I've wanted to get help for years (2 years almost to the day that I realized I may be trans, but I was in denial for years earlier) and it's time I take action and stop being afraid of what they'll tell me. 

Also, anyone know if I can use my parents insurance for a long term psychologist without informing them?",asktransgender
It gets better,"A few years ago I became very close to a coworker who was struggling with depression. Her comments very quickly made me realize that she was unhappy with her gender presentation at the time and I told her I'd support her no matter what. We had become best friends very fast, and after a while, I realized I'd fallen for the woman she was becoming. I remember seeking out the help of this subreddit as I was afraid confessing my love would make her doubt my support and compliments. This group encouraged me to be honest and we've been a couple ever since. Together we walked to the courthouse on election day, and submitted her name change paperwork, even if we were sad when Trump won that night. She transitioned at work, and while it was rough with some, we made many friends who changed their views just seeing her blossom as her happy and true self. I watched my family open their hearts and see love for just love. On vacation this June, the midst of Pride month I asked her to marry me. And today, despite the crappy news going around, I sat in the waiting room as she finished her last step and had her surgery.

Despite the noise, the negative, the pain, there is love and happiness out there and I just thought today would be a good time to remind all of you that no matter how dark it seems, there is light out there. This subreddit helped me make the right, and what has been the best decision of my life. I've watched this beautiful women go through so much, and while she's sore and groggy from the surgery, I know we both want everyone to know that it gets better, and thank you to those who a few years ago told me to go with my heart. 

Today is rough. She was scared and cried when they wheeled her away, and my feed has been full of hurt and pain. For anyone alone today, remember that there's  a stranger sitting here thinking about you while the love of her life recovers in the hospital bed next to her. Someone who never thought she could make it this far, but did, even with the way the climate has been going. 

Hope this post doesn't bother anyone. I know it isn't much of an ask. I just ask that you don't forget you are not alone.",asktransgender
"I cannot find a pharmacy to fill my prescription, what do I do?","I have been on Estradiol Valerate since July of this year. I was meant to take my shot today but my pharmacy has been unable to fill my prescription since I called it in due to the back order. Despite me calling everyday, this is something they just told me yesterday. I tried calling around every pharmacy in a 50 mile radius and nobody has it and everywhere is affected by the back order.

I plan on calling my doctor today but what options are available so I don't get any negative side effects of not taking the Estradiol and will be able to go back on it when it does come in.",asktransgender
Very depressed.. Therapist thinks I am not Trans! Really?,"I have known since I was 4 that I needed to be a girl, but our countries conservative values just had me hide it really well and ""act"" male until now that I am 38. It is all that I could wish for my whole life and especially the last 10 years and now I discovered that the local health system assists MtF trans and after almost a year of struggling I managed to see the states gender therapist/psychiatrist last month.

1. Since I became so good at acting over 38 years and still present male, he believes I am not trans. Shocked!!
2. He thinks I am using coming out as trans to mask other issues in my life. Really, isn't being trans even more difficult and traumatizing?
3. Now he wants to bring together a panel of therapists, surgeons, endos etc to assess my situation, just because I have internalised my feelings and do not conform to what he believes the typical trans person he sees should be/act like.. While it feels they are just easily assisting other MtF trans.

This is currently making me even more depressed (beside my other depression issues another therapist is already assisting with).

&amp;#x200B;

It now feels like I won't be helped or understood.  Did anybody else experience something similar and how do you deal with that? 6 December feels like it is still a long way off for my 2nd appointment. :(

&amp;#x200B;

Thank you, I just needed to get this off my chest.",asktransgender
"Low E, at 6mg Estradiol Daily? What’s going on.","I have been on HRT for 3 months now, 1 month on 4mg E and 200mg Spiranolactone, and idk what my E levels were but now at 3 months with the last two months at 6mg E and 200mg Spiranolactone and 100 mg of progesterone. Just had my blood tested and my levels came back as 20 Testosterone and my E level was 58. I did miss a dose two days prior but my endo wants to check my blood in a month :/ what do ya’ll think? ",asktransgender
Is r/twoxchromosomes trans exclusionary or just an unfortunate choice of name?,,asktransgender
No easy way to transfer Google account information?,"I'm trying to update my google/chrome account and I've made it so email from my dead name emailed address forward to my new address, change my personal info on my old account, but my chrome account is still calling me dead name? Its driving me nuts. I've updated it all. I wish Google made this easier for us.",asktransgender
Help with waxing,"I'm sick of this I keep trying and trying and trying amazing Sally Hansen wax strips and I can't get rid of the goddamn facial hair 

Yeah I could shave but then not only does it leave a really bad for shadow it grows back the next day

I used so many wax strips it's just not pulling the hair I don't know what to do

The place around the corner does facial waxing for 70 bucks which I don't have

I can't even afford laser surgery",asktransgender
I'm 17 and I need some help with DIY HRT please help.,"So I have kind of already done a little research on transitioning by DIY and I understand the basics, I am planning to buy estradiol 2mg and Spiro 100mg but I'm not sure where to buy it, obviously I want to buy it online I live in the USA California and I don't really have no one to talk to or to be with me through this process so I basically am doing it by myself. I do have someone that can provide the money so I can buy the pills but I dont know where ? Does someone know of an online store that accepts debit cards ? and that is trustworthy? I will really appreciate since I have been going through some metal breakdowns lately over this. Thank you ",asktransgender
What are some things that have not changed in the last 24 hours? (US government thing),"Trans people have always existed. For the vast majority of history, we didn't really benefit from government recognition or support, but we still existed.

They can't erase the last 5-10 years. Things are really different from how they were a decade ago; we're on TV and in movies, we're all over social media, and we're in community with each other at what twenty years ago would have seemed like a mind-blowing volume. 

There are a LOT of support organizations. There are trans kids coming out in schools everywhere. Trans people are more visible - as people who are just doing their jobs- than ever before. 

People who want to be jerks haven't changed much, but there has been a TON of progress among people who want NOT to be jerks. 

The science around transgender people has not changed. The government can deny it, the same way they deny the science of climate change, but just like reputable scientists believe in (and agitate to address!) real science no matter what the government wants them to do, reputable therapists, psychiatrists and researchers will continue to believe what their eyes, ears, and legitimate science have made clear: trans people are not the bogeyman. 

Making it harder to get an appropriate ID or passport doesn't change any of this. It's a step back. But trans people have been working around this stuff since forever. 

Culturally, awareness that being trans is a real and legitimate thing is a cat that's out of the bag. They're going so hard against it because they're losing - and making laws (which can be overturned, just like they're trying to overturn laws that already exist) is not the end of the world imho.",asktransgender
I’m curious,What’s the best place or best anything to meet trans girls that aren’t just hookups. ,asktransgender
Remembering -November 20th,"Hi everyone! I apologize if this isn’t the appropriate forum. Please direct me elsewhere if needed. I’m trying to put together some education around November 20th, the Transgender Remembrance Day for my tiny office team here in Seattle. I know traditionally there is some ceremony around acknowledging the lives lost. I’m curious how others have paid tribute to this day in an office setting. Advice welcome. ",asktransgender
What do you do to avoid feeling dysphoria?,I avoid mirrors because my source of dysphoria only comes from my masculine face. I have social dysphoria and it's the only thing that I really can't do anything to make myself comfortable person in society without feeling the dysphoria of not being able to express my femininity that I'm feeling. Body dysphoria is avoidable by not getting to know how I look and how puberty changes me. ,asktransgender
Don't forget we have vulnerable people in this sub and others,Everyone is freaking out about the news on the Trump administration and the changes they're proposing and rightfully so it's not good but some of you guys are kinda exaggerating with your reactions. You're making it sound like we're going to be hunted and gunned down in the streets which is scaring the shit out of our more vulnerable members. I've read posts of people saying they're having panic attacks or that they're so scared they don't want to transition which quite frankly worries me. These are individuals who are already going through a lot. I'm not saying to downplay the situation. Just don't make it seem like it's the end of the world for us. ,asktransgender
Can we share our professions and how we got there?,"I think a lot of people(myself included) don't know how exactly we're going to make enough money to get whatever surgeries(if any) we want. Or to just make enough money to survive. There was a post made in the past 24 hours talking about truck driving as a career. There was a lot of great info there! I can't seem so figure out how to link it but it was made by u/Makeitcount67976 
So if some of the members of this subreddit who have things kinda figured out could share their knowledge that would be super helpful! Either by commenting here or making another post like makeitcount's, w/e works best for people. ",asktransgender
Every month,At least one week every mont i question if im trans but i think its just crossdreaming or transvestic fetishism i know a lot of trand people hate the term but i relate a lot to AGP and i have lots of problems in my life so i probably need to figure them out first. Its early in the day and im not on my computer so ill edit or make a follow up later but i watch a lot of tg tf comics sometimes its weird and i relate to r/egg_irl,asktransgender
"I told my parents two days ago, and they are not fine. At all.","I'm MTF. Itold them saturday night, and it was chaotic. My mom had a panic attack and my dad kept asking if I had gay sex (??), and they both think this is a decision i'm taking that was influenced by someone else.

Sunday was less chaotic, we talked, about how they feel, their massive fears and that they don't want me to make changes until I have a stable job (I'm 20, astronomy student, that means waiting until like 30 or more). I've been clear about my need for HRT, and they got that. My mom called me today asking about places we could go in orden to take the neccesary steps.

The problem is, they are not fine. My sister told me my dad cries by himself, and that my mom is barely eating. They are mad worried, and they feel their world and 'perfect family' (actual quote) fell apart. The worst thing is that I'm not even home on the weekdays, so all I can do is call them and talk with them, but this must be so incredibly hard for them, I don't know what to do.",asktransgender
US Passport - ok if my doctor letter is a few years old,"I got a letter from my doctor about two years ago (Dec 2016) so that I could get my name change court order and passport and all that. I've been dragging my feet on the passport part, but the past 48 hours have been a pretty big motivator.

The letter is original signed on letterhead, from an MD, stating I have completed transition, etc, but it's almost two years old. Anyone know if that matters? I can probably get another letter from my doctor, but it'll be quicker/easier/cheaper if I can use the one she already wrote/signed for me.",asktransgender
Some democrats are saying the leak of Trump's administration plans to redefine gender are a move to fire up their base and to push independent voters to vote red,"Apparently the presence of trans activists rallying on the streets chanting is supposed to help the GOP win. We're taking their ""bait"" according to few.

What are your thoughts? ",asktransgender
I’m stuck. I have no god damn idea what to do now. (rant),"I unsubscribed from all trans subreddits a while back to see if I could just suppress it all and get on with my life. 

I couldn’t, and now I’m even more aware of my position. 

I can’t afford a therapist to help me out with my feelings, and I can’t tell my parents. I have no idea how they’d react and I’m flat broke. I wanted to see a therapist to get some help to find a way to tell my parents.

I just found out that our insurance doesn’t cover any HRT or anything that could help me with costs, and beig flat broke just drives the stake right through my heart.

Now with what’s happening with the Trumpa Lumpa administration, I feel like there’s a huge ticking clock above my head counting down the seconds until it’s too late and there is absolutely nothing I can do about it.

I just want to live my life how I want to, but I feel trapped in this situation and it seems like there is no way out.

I’m sorry, I’m  just ranting to help get rid of this terrible anxiety I have over not being able to do anything.",asktransgender
Regret laser hair removal on face/ regrowth questions,"Was just wondering if anyone has experience with how much regrowth can be expected after laser hair removal on the face. 

Ive had 6 sessions of laser and like 95+% of my face hair has gone and I sort of regret getting it done as  i miss having the option to have a more masculine appearance after realising i think im more gender fluid rather than trans. 

Was wondering if anyone else has had similar experience with regret as I couldnt really find anything out there
",asktransgender
What was something that shocked you about what hormone therapy and/or surgery could do for trans people?,"For me, I was really surprised and pleased to learn that trans women can not only breastfeed but often also have a cycle that includes cramps and other menstrual symptoms. That's awesome for them (pain aside).

What is something that shocked you about what hormone therapy and/or surgery can do for your version of the trans experience (e.g. MTF)? And what about for the opposite (e.g. FTM)? Or nonbinary people?",asktransgender
Professor deadnamed me in front of my class and my friend today. I've never felt so much pain in one word.,"So I just need to talk about this, so of course I'm going to just make a Reddit post to vent. I've been going as Rachael (MTF)this year during college, and 3/4 of my professors have been extremely accommodating. However, 1 professor who teaches two of my classes is not very great. Not only does that happen to sometimes be embarrassing, my school email (which is used to communicate to basically all professors), still has my deadnamed attached to it. Apparently it won't change unless I get my legal name changed...

So I was in class today (it's an HR class how fucking ironic), and we were talking about sexual harrassment/discrimination. Near the end of class the professor calls on me to answer a question. HOWEVER; He proceeds to say ""Rachael, wait...yeah Rachael, no I mean dëªdńªmê, yeah dëªdńªmê can you tell me your opinion about this""

I fucking melted in my chair right there. I've been trying to stealth, and for the most part it's worked. I made a friend in my classes and she was sitting right there. She only knows me as Rachael, NOT MY DEADNAME. I wanted to cry and die at the same time. I meekly answered the question and ran as fast as I could out of there. 

And the fucking nerve of this professor. He emails me shortly after class apologizing for calling me Rachael instead of dëªdńªmê. AND he wants me to speak about my experience as a trans individual and title IX on Wednesday. I can't tell if A.) This dude thought I looked like a man; or if B.) I passed to the point where he thought I was trying to be FTM?????

H E L P",asktransgender
Testosterone levels returning to old amounts,"Hey everyone, just a quick question. I've been on 100mg of Spiro and 1 mg of Estradiol per day for about 5 months now.

If I were to suddenly stop, hypothetically, how long before my testosterone levels would return to their previous amounts?

How long before my body reverted back to before any changes took place like fat redistribution, foot shrinking, or breast development?

Is there any data available on this?",asktransgender
A way to survive for those who need to make Money for transition,"Hello everyone. I like to lurk but yesterday’s news has driven me to get more involved.  

I am 30 years old and started transition when I was 16.  I was a lost soul and drifted into the adult entertainment “business” to survive. This only lasted a couple years until I was rescued and showed how to make legit money by being a waitress. 

Fast forward to 3 years ago I discovered truck driving. Yes over the road living in the truck kind of driving. It is literally the best route I think for those who can just pack up the little they have or put the rest in storage and go out and make money without having to worry about bills.

I never went to college so of course if you have and are making strides in the tech industry, etc, this isn’t ideal for you but let’s just say my first year driving I made $50,000 and was able to save way over half of that since I have no bills. 

The “mega” carriers like swift, Werner, Schneider are all highly corporate and you will not have to deal with discrimination from them. You are on the road anyways so your interactions with people are at a minimum.  The road is a lot friendlier than it used to be, with apps that show all of the truckstops and friendly parking areas to your GPS and smart phone. I have a tv and PlayStation on my truck for entertainment, etc. the industry is about 10% female now, lots of friendly people but most keep to themselves. And you’re free to be yourself in your truck, practice your voice or makeup or whatever you want without dealing with roommates.

To get started I went to my community college and took a $3000 4-week class, which you can finance if you need to. Or some companies will even train you to get your CDL if you have nothing. My second year I am looking at about $70,000 and it only goes up as long as you keep your record clean and work hard.

Anyways didn’t mean to ramble and please excuse any mistakes as i don’t have time to proofread this. If you have any questions at all please feel free to PM or post here ",asktransgender
Does anyone of you have some kind of compilation of scientific studies on transgender people?,"Hello boyos! Title, essentially. I don't usually get into discussions about trans people with conservatives because it's mentally exhausting and infuriating even for a cis guy like myself, but when I do, I like to use scientific arguments. I'm a little tired of going around the internet looking for papers, so if any of you have a compilation, even better if it's kept up to date, I'd like a link!

Thanks in advance!",asktransgender
I loved her to learn how to love. Insight into why people we love come and go.,"Hi, my name is Kishote, I go by Lola when I don’t identify with my name that day, and I’m a 22 year old MTF trans individual. Last week, I basically completely lost my best friend because we broke up finally and not the decent kind, I mean we had the bad kind of break up. We are “friends” but we are not. My parents asked me recently why they don’t know me as a person, and it’s because this girl Suzie, has been my best friend for nearly a quarter of my life. She knew something was wrong with me before I even said words. I told her all of my problems whether we were dating or not dating. Suzie was my best friend. We’ve texted every day for 5 years. We’ve traveled the world together, we’ve held each other at our lowest lows. We were very close, the closest. After three years we started to seriously date. For the last two she’s lived with me and we have barely spent a day apart. She’s my other half, or was. Now she’s gone, because I believe that being trans mentally and emotionally stunted me as a person it made me too distracted to give her what she needed for the last year of our relationship when everything progressively went down hill. I have never had a serious relationship, not longer than two months. She taught me everything I know about caring for another person. She taught me how to be a better person. And most importantly she showed me who i was under the mask that I so blindly flaunted to society. She taught me the pain, brutality, and raw savagery of love. She taught me the courage I never had. She taught me to be romantic. Suzie took my angry, cracked, and flawed shell and chiseled it down to the core of what made me human. She hurt me so much when she left I wanted to kill myself. I still kind of do, especially after I feel the way she treats me when we text now. The person you used to kiss every morning and stare into their eyes is now a stranger. A stranger who is annoyed by your presence but tolerates you out of some obscure social obligation. Hurts to be so foreign to a person who loved you so much. She taught me to love, i don’t want anyone else now, but I hope that if I ever do, no I pray, that I remember these 5 years, what they felt like, and what it cost me when it blew away like ashes into the wind. I pray I remember how much she meant to me, so that I don’t throw away love like this again. ",asktransgender
They Will Never Win,"What can they do to us that has not already been done? Will they spit at us and scorn us in the streets, throw us from their homes and family? Because they've already done that for thousands of years.

&amp;#x200B;

Will they deny our existence? They are already doing it as we speak.

&amp;#x200B;

Will they call us insane, liars, perverts, possessed, heretics, devils? All of this, I know you see, is pointless, because here we are still after hundreds of years of being put to the stake and crucified and pushed from the cliffs into the sea below.

&amp;#x200B;

So what more can they do? Because you must recognize like I do that no matter how much hate they gather in their tiny hearts and expel from their mouths it's pointless: they will never win. Look at how they've gathered their hate over thousands of years, how near and far they've spread their vitriol to stamp out every last remaining trace of our kind, and yet here you and I are with hardly any effort on our parts. They must spend every last dime they own to force us from existence, yet all we have to do is *be* and suddenly all their efforts are pointless.

&amp;#x200B;

They say we do not exist, but we say that we do -- and it is stronger.

&amp;#x200B;

They say we are lunatics and liars, perverts and possessed, but all we have to do is turn away and suddenly their words lose all power like a broken medieval charm.

&amp;#x200B;

They say that they will stamp us out, shun us beyond all recognition and shame us until we are laid low like louses, yet all we have to do is turn up our chins and they are silent; they have nothing left to control us with. They have nothing because no petty words or tiny pieces of paper can ever, will ever, compromise who we are and how we are meant to be in this world. They will fight with hatred? We would fight with nothing, yet even still, it would be stronger than every inch of hatred they could muster against us.

&amp;#x200B;

So if you're still worried, then look around: what do you see? Tens of thousands of bright individuals in this subreddit alone who have survived and are surviving, even after all the hardship, denial, and strife they've endured in their lives and the lives before them. 1.4 million Americans who have done the same. Countless others who are living across the globe at this very moment. And against us: many people who will become very, very embarrassed when they learn how poorly they've treated us if they only live long enough.

&amp;#x200B;

Because let's get this straight: you are here, right now, the exceptional man or woman or anyone in between that you are and absolutely no one else, no matter what anyone says or tries to trick you into believing. And by trying to say something different, by trying to pretend that we're anything other than who we are, their bigotry is sealed: they have already lost.",asktransgender
The only thing I miss in being male:,"Is not being afraid walking a street during night.

Maybe I have bad luck but sometimes men talk things like ""A: look at this nice girl, B: she is too young.""  or other creepy things that make me want to run away in fear of being sexually assualted.",asktransgender
"2 questions, both i need help with and i think are a topic of interest for some","Disclaimer: This post may contain terms which you find offensive. Sorry in advance, I'm just curious as to what's right and wrong and need to use it for context

&amp;#x200B;

&amp;#x200B;

What i mean by trap: A trap is someone who purposely or accidently presents as another gender, but overall is comfortable with their assigned sex and doesn't have gender dysphoria.  NOT a transgender woman, another word that could be used to replace the word trap in this main post and outside the edit would be transvestite

&amp;#x200B;

my first question is the part of gender identity, i currently identify as a trap/hyperfeminine male (as u can see im a guy who likes acting like a girl and stuff)  and recently my friend and i were talking about our story of finding out gender identity, and to her mine sounds more similar to a closeted transgirl (one reason i consider myself a trap is because it feel more right to me) and such like . im curious to see what your guys story are since im currently in  a position where i dont know where i stand and such (please dont take offense to me using guys to this subreddit as a whole)

&amp;#x200B;

2nd question, in my opinion, traps are a type of transgender since transgender can be used as a umbrella term, i feel that traps can be considered a ""relative"" to drag queens due to the nature of it (however traps can be used to say u look like a girl when ur not trying to which can be considered an insult) so my 2nd question is, do you think that traps should be considered a type of gender, or do you believe that its solely a derogatory term, or do u believe that it is okay in certain contexts and can even be considered a compliment in some? feel free to post you opinion and please do explain your though process, i personally dont understand why some people think trap can be considered a derogatory term but im willing to see why

&amp;#x200B;

Edit: here is where im going to explain why im a trap or consider myself atleast at the time of posting, i am a trap from one characteristic, i dress up as a girl every so often and my mannerisms online are akin to those of a girl. when i trap i feel much ""free"" and i dont feel like uncomfortable in my body (partially due to my feminine figure and other feminine features) of course i have the issue of being told i was supposed to be growing up as a girl so being a trap could be a way of getting that guilt off of me, i also for some reason prefer people treating me like a girl online since it makes me feel better, but i dont if thats considered a closeted transgender or trap, so i opt for the latter

&amp;#x200B;",asktransgender
Almost Everywhere I turn there's a lot of Transphobia,"Its getting so hard for me now

I'm mtf pre-hrt pre-everything.


I'm not even close to even begin the proccess of transitioning.

and so much of what i see in the media and on reddit is really getting to me.

I'm a fighter I comment and reply to anything i see hateful.

but it feels so tiring; im so tired from fighting just to exist just to be seen as human.

it feels like my entire life is a fight and i feel like im slowly losing.


its getting too much for me.


i wanna cry but im at my university library right now, its such a public place


I think i might have a panic attack, like most of the people on this sub, i have a history of mental illness; Im actually on medication

I'm currently on antidepressants


I think it helps me cope but it can only do so much especially if one of my triggers is all around me


I'm sorry if this isn't appropriate for the sub

or if i made any grammatical errors


but its too much


I'm getting overwhelmed 

with everything thats happening right now


tell me it gets better ",asktransgender
"If you had depression, how long did it take to lift (if it did lift) upon going part or full time?","I’ve been going part time recently at home and very recently out in public. I’m still getting used to it and it really boosted my mood for a while, but it feels like it’s leveled out. Like I just feel me. I have a crush that I’m getting over so that’s bringing me down a bit, but other than that I should be excited and I feel like my depression should be going away. Is it a gradual process? Like does it take weeks or months full time to feel totally better? Or should there be drastic results from just a few days?",asktransgender
I’m doubting a co-workers claims that they are transgender. Am I a bad person?,"So I’m transgender, and I recently found out an old co-worker of mine is also trans. We’re both AMAB which is important to explain my predicament. While they no longer are employed at my place of work (for reasons that I will discuss later), I’ve learned from a few friends and eventually through Facebook that my old co-worker (for the sake of anonymity let’s just call them “M”) identifies as a women. They’ve begun presenting as a women in public, using gender-neutral and female pronouns, and I believe they are on hormones, however I’m not entirely sure.

Now M is not a good person, and from my experiences is a horrible person to work with. They were rude, invasive, made many inappropriate and offensive comments, and treated both customers and co-workers poorly.

Now this has absolutely nothing to do with them being transgender, you can be a bad person and be transgender. I’ve always stood by my beliefs that it never invalidates the way you feel about yourself and how you identify. However, the situation is a bit more complicated with M.

M was fired for sexual harassment. There has been many times where they made unwanted sexual advances on women in the workplace, and as I’m not out to anyone at work and present myself as male, they would try to engage in the typical “locker room talk” you hear all the time in the workplace. Some of the things M said about women were absolutely horrible. All this happened before M came out as transgender. 

Recently I’ve been overthinking this entire situation. I’m a huge supporter for everything lgbt (of course I am since I’m part of the community being both bi and trans) but I can’t help but feel at odds with M. I have trouble understanding how someone can identify as a women, yet attempted to dehumanize other women nearly every chance they get. I’m sure there are cis women out there who sexually harass and treat other women poorly, but if it’s to this extent it must be incredibly rare.

Basically, I’m doubting the sincerity of M’s claims that they’re transgender. And just typing that out makes me feel  sick. I can’t believe that I’m actually here invalidating someone’s identity. I strongly believe that if you have doubts about your gender identify or that if you experience gender dysphoria  then your gender identity may not align with your birth sex. But when it comes to M I have trouble accepting that someone so misogynistic can identify as female.

Am I a bad person for feeling this way? Is this some form of internalized transphobia? I really want to believe that M is genuine, and I want to be happy for them even if I dislike them as a person. I just have no idea how to feel about the situation and overthinking it is making me very uncomfortable.

(EDIT)

I should clarify that I am not absolutely certain that they were fired for sexual harassment. As I said in one of the comments, it’s not like I read the report or anything. HOWEVER, there have been multiple people that have came to me personally and said that M made unwanted sexual advances towards them, and based off their previous behavior it’s not unlikely to believe this is why they were fired. It could just be a rumor that this is why they were fired, and I apologize if I spread this rumor by not clarifying, but is is most likely true based of their previous actions and the multiple people who have said they sexually harassed them.",asktransgender
how do you find friends after coming out?,"Hi I've just come out as a woman and find myself very lonely. I'm yet to tell my devoutly religious family but I have been told I will be ""not welcome home"" if I come out as gay so I assume the same applies to being trans. My previous small friend group was made up of people who were either trans-phobic or people that have become uncomfortable and distanced themselves from me after coming out. As someone on the verge of losing their family and friends I'm very scared of being all alone, I'm trying to attend different LGBTQI+ events nearby but haven't made any connections yet (I'm a shy person when I first meet people). does anyone have any advice or similar experience?",asktransgender
A Partial how to for Starbucks transgender care coverage with insurance.,"Ok trans friends Ive been testing the starbucks health insurance system to see how it works so I can write a how to. So far I know that after 2 months of ~20 hours a week I have been offered insurance. They have a trans advocacy desk you can reach by calling 18668497103 and asking for a trans care specialist(they will ask personal info to determine if you are an employee, don't call unless you are). 

I am waiting on a list of Drs. that are in network for each of the options they have for providers. Aetna, BCBS, Cigna, and United. I should have that list next monday, and ill update this post or make a new one. 

Only therapy, endo, hrt, top and Bottom surgery are covered by the plan you choose. Everything else (face, voice, hair removal, BBL etc) are covered by the starbucks supplemental insurance. There is a separate process for those things. You will submit the Dr. referral to the primary insurance be denied and send the referral and denial to the trans support desk. 

They have a list of for example Drs for each that are covered in full(minus copay I assume). So far I do think starbucks part time is worth it for any of you who need these things covered. My bi weekly cost is 19 dollars with an in network copay of ~3000. I could instead pay ~40.00 and the copay is ~750.00",asktransgender
Why so many TERFs in the UK?,Hey I live in the US but the more and more I look at r/GenderCritical and really just interact with TERFs the more I realize a lot of the people there are from the UK and I was wondering why that is? Just curious,asktransgender
"It's been a rough day, but it gets better.","[It's been a ](https://www.nytimes.com/2018/10/21/us/politics/transgender-trump-administration-sex-definition.html)[rough day](https://www.vox.com/policy-and-politics/2018/10/21/18005594/trump-administration-transgender-sex-dna-test). I could barely function all day long, just because, well, Trump. I felt strong waves of meaninglessness. I could almost feel my utmost basic right, to be recognized as a human, is being stripped away. As if I was seen as something lesser, because of things I could not control. As if I was powerless. I just wonder, if at-righters would still say they're the oppressed, if they knew what it felt like to be treated as unhuman. And I'm sure I'm not the only one who felt like this. But there's good news: it'll get better. I promise. Trump will eventually go away. It will stop sometime. [We will win](https://m.facebook.com/assignedmale/photos/a.305470909635180/1015685351947062/?type=3). Because, as Sarah blasko said: [we won't run](https://youtu.be/z5RtLfE7K6Q) (and if you need more songs to get you in to a better, more hopeful mood, try [anthem](https://youtu.be/BCS_MwkWzes) by Leonard Cohen. Or [going home](https://youtu.be/9sA66l0j8do) by Leonard Coen).

Because we are strong.

Because together, there's nothing we can't achieve.

Because we are valid, and no one can tell us otherwise.

Because we are all voting dem this November (Seriously. I'm against the two parties system, but we can't risk it this time. Also, please contact your local representative about the vote. And if you live in Massachusetts, vote yes on 3).

Because you are never alone.

We're in this together. And we have the help of allies. To quote Obama,

&gt;And remember, no matter what happens, the sun will rise in the morning. 

And we will, we will survive.",asktransgender
What US organization should I be donating to?,"Cis person here, no sure if I’m allowed to be posting. If not, my apologies and please delete :)

I can run my mouth about current events all I want to, but money helps, too. I’ve never been in a position to put my money where my mouth is, but I’m getting paid next week, and yall need it more than I need my coffee fix next week. I’ve done some research of some of the organizations I could donate to (National Center for Transgender Equality?), but feel it would be irresponsible to do so without getting some actual input from transgender people.

What organization is doing good work? What do you recommend?",asktransgender
"“So, just to make it clear, you support a fully intact boy to use the locker room with my daughter in high school?” If you were to answer this guy, what is the best thing to say? (It was in reply to a fb border supporting trans people.)",,asktransgender
Are you happy or afraid of being yourself?,"Someone asked me one day how terrifying it is to identify as a trans woman. I told them that I fear for my life every second of every day, even when I don't show it. I could be alive today, but gone tomorrow. That's the harshest reality of being so much different.

Does anyone else feel this way?",asktransgender
2 Year wait times...?,"Throwaway account bc I post frequently on my main account and don't want to risk harrassment...

Basically I came out as transgender to my family this past week (most of my friends have known for a while). This is after I'd been struggling with Dysphoria for over 10 years and after many years of considering all the possibilities and options I had, I came to the conclusion that becoming a woman was the only way to solve it. So people close to me had to know.

Yesterday I finally started the official process by seeing my GP and asking him to refer me to a gender clinic, here in the UK. It felt like such a huge step and so surreal that the rest of my life was finally starting to begin - I will be a woman someday.

However, I've just found out (from the clinic website) that the average wait time for first appointment is 18-24 months... My dysphoria is worse than ever now that people know who I really am and I don't end to surpress it. I know after 10 years 2 more should seem very menial but that was 10 years of uncertainty. And now I know I've never wanted anything more, yet it's still so far away.

I can't spend two more years feeling trapped inside this body. Resenting everything about myself physically and just feeling wrong. I always said if I made this decision I'd go through the right channels, but knowing this I don't know if I could wait that long...

I suppose my question is what do I do? I know I can't just decrease waiting times so how so I deal with my (even worse) dysphoria?

Sorry for the rant...",asktransgender
Is there a way to make these feelings go away besides transitioning/undergoing HRT?,"Thanks for listening to anyone who reads this. Just wanted to vent some thoughts.  

Three years ago, I began questioning myself at 19. Some good people of this sub helped me out and listened to my rambling. Eventually I went as far as to buy myself DIY hormones after various therapists did not work out. I let the hormones run out and did not buy more. There were some effects I noticed and it felt pretty good, but I guess I was too much of a coward to face the music at the time. 

I wallowed in self pity and depression for a while, and I've just begun to dig myself out of this hole. (Interviewing for jobs, eating better, exercising daily, etc.) I was interviewing for a receptionist position the other day and it was great until the interviewer said ""You'll be our first male receptionist!"" I don't know exactly why, but this sentence must have triggered me because I cannot stop thinking about it and I'm feeling those same feelings I did three years ago. Basically an intensely uncomfortable feeling that something is not right and every part of my body is screaming ""I want to be female."" 

So...I guess this brings me to my question. **Has anyone found a way to successfully ignore these feelings?** Because every time I've tried to move forward in my life, something is always in the way and it really seems like this is the main issue. An unending uncomfortable feeling that something isn't right between my body and my mind.

Yes, these thoughts would be better addressed to a therapist and perhaps I will go to one again soon. ",asktransgender
Hi. US Passport deadlines before Trump drops the hammer? - Can anyone give a realistic time-frame for when rollbacks hit the state dept?,"Can anyone here forecast a realistic case scenario on when we are SOL for getting our gender documents submitted and completed with the state dept?

How close are we?",asktransgender
Estrogel(gel) and progynova(pills) combined,"So, my endo recommended me to try 4 mg of progynova daily(I was on 8 mg/day before, but my E levels are too low, 116 ng/L, but they were much higher later 2 months ago(177 ng/L)) and combine this with estrogel(1 dose morning, 1 dose evening). Does anyone here try this or hear about this? Is this can be effective or just loss of time and money? ",asktransgender
Reasons why people stopped hormones?,"So ive been on hormones for about a month and a half and i am wondering whether to continue. Just to be clear im not doubting identity stuff just about whether hormones are producing the chnages that i want. I identify as non binary and started hormones because i thought i wanted the physical and the emotional changes. I have really enjoyed them but i guess i am wondering if this is the path i want to go down - realising now that i am going to likely look like a guy with breasts for quite a while and possibly forever. Not exactly the way i had expected the changes to occur. Im ok with having breasts but I guess the implications of that for my life im starting to consider with a bit more weight.

I am considering stopping hormones for a bit to see how i feel and if the emotional changes are really that great. 

I was wondering if anyone else here had stopped for a bit and what were your reasons for stopping?",asktransgender
Trump trans erasure- how can I help?,"I’m trans and American, and I plan on being an active voter, but what else can I do to help my community in a meaningful way?

How do groups like the Transgender Law Center make actual change? I’m not doubtful, just unknowledgeable- their donation page says financial support helps them “advance the rights” of trans and gender non conforming people, and I believe them, but I’m curious as to exactly how they do so. What process does a group like that go through to make change? 
Can I make that same type of change on an individual level?",asktransgender
"What qualifies as ""strong desire"" (from DSM-V)","So this isn't for any gatekeepery purpose, just for myself trying to figure things out, but I'm sure we're all across the DSM-V definition of gender dysphoria as experiencing any 2 of the following for at least 6 months:

* A strong desire to be of a gender other than one's assigned gender
* A strong desire to be treated as a gender other than one's assigned gender
* A significant incongruence between one's experienced or expressed gender and one's sexual characteristics
* A strong desire for the sexual characteristics of a gender other than one's assigned gender
* A strong desire to be rid of one's sexual characteristics due to incongruence with one's experienced or expressed gender
* A strong conviction that one has the typical reactions and feelings of a gender other than one's assigned gender

So my question is what exactly constitutes ""strong desire"" here? Is it debilitating intrusive thoughts? Is it just persistent longing? Or something else? Because if you hang out in places like r/egg_irl or take the old ""cis people don't question"" thing too literally you'd think that any tiny inkling of wanting to be another gender == dysphoria/trans. Whereas according to the DSM it sounds like you could pretty legitimately desire this stuff, but if it's not ""strong"" then it's no biggie.

For those that didn't have that much specific physical dysphoria (ie: points 3 &amp; 5 above), how did you experience that kind of desire before cracking?",asktransgender
Need help cross dressing,"Hey I was hoping to start cross dressing publicly for the first time soon I’m 18 and finishing off year 12 and I’m not sure how to go about doing it.


Edit I recognise that it’s a poor choice of words but I’m not really sure how else to express it considering i can’t transition I’m feeling extremely disphoric and can’t miss school anymore than I have already and just want to be myself to the best of my ability I guess I just wanted help finding that courage",asktransgender
Being Forced to Detransition,"I met my straight boyfriend before I knew I was trans. We started dating and I came out as genderfluid and he stayed with me. About a year later I came out as transmasculine. He said he still loved me and has been very supportive. But he isn't as affectionate and I can tell he's not attracted to me. I asked him repeatedly if I was too masculine for him and he always said no, until recently. He finally admitted he wasn't attracted to me because I'm a man.

&amp;#x200B;

He has said he supports me and wants me to be who I am, but when I talk about it further he talks about me finding a new boyfriend. So I've had to decide between being a man and having my boyfriend, and I chose him. He's the only person I have in my life. Both of my parents died of cancer and the rest of my family refuses to talk to me. So if I want to stay with him I have to detransition and go back to being a woman.

&amp;#x200B;

I've cried every single day since deciding to detransition. I told myself I'd buy women's clothes on November 1st and donate all of my men's clothes. Until then, I would enjoy my final days of being a man. Instead I've been miserable thinking about being a woman. I'm so incredibly bad at it, I feel like a failure of a woman when I try. I can't stand in high heels, I feel like a clown when I wear makeup, I don't know anything about women's fashion, and least of all I don't know how to act like a woman. Imagine Chuck Norris wearing an ill-fitting dress and doing his own makeup. That's how I feel presenting as a woman. Pathetic, disgusting, and laughable.

&amp;#x200B;

I'm trying to find other people who were forced to detransition so I can have support. What little information I can find is about people who WANTED to detransition. My only friend is trying to help me but there's not much he can do as a cishet man. I need to learn how to be a woman but I don't know where I could learn. The only people in my life are said friend and my boyfriend, both cishet men. Before my Mom died she didn't teach me anything about being a woman. I never learned how to use makeup, how to straighten my hair, any of the things all the other girls growing up were so good at. If I could learn how to properly be a woman I'd feel so much better.

&amp;#x200B;

My friend suggested just being a masculine woman, but that's basically what I am now, I've only socially transitioned. I pretty much look like a butch lesbian -- short hair and men's clothing. But even that small bit of masculinity is too much for my boyfriend to handle.

&amp;#x200B;

**TL;DR** My boyfriend is making me choose between dating him and being trans. I'm trying to find other people who were forced to detransition and where I can learn to be a woman. Also, no, I'm not leaving my boyfriend instead.",asktransgender
Seeking statistics for LGBT violence in Canada vs United States,"I'm currently trying to do some research into the increase in violence against LGBT people in the United States, and I want to compare them to the statistics in Canada. Anyone have suggestions for where I can look into this kind of information?",asktransgender
Religious freedom to be trans?,"I wonder if there is anyway to use ""religious freedom"" to get around anti lgbtq+ laws? Argue that anti queer laws violate your religious freedom giving you a loophole against discrimination? ",asktransgender
How in the world will GC react to the new trump doctrine?,"I've gathered that a very large percent of them are very anti-trump, but what he is currently doing aligns with their beliefs. Guess I just gotta see if they get confused when the man they hate with all their might agrees with them ",asktransgender
Trans characters in games?,"This seems like the best (or only) place to ask this question. I apologize in advance if it offends anyone, because that is not my intent.

I'm an avid player of Magic: the Gathering and I recently encountered an opponent who insisted on use of agendered pronouns with respect to a certain character. That brings my next question. I feel really weird talking about anyone as ""they"" or ""it"" in English. The words seems really dehumanizing. How do I write while being respectful?",asktransgender
Does this sound trans to you (MTF),"Alrighty, so my story takes place over the course of a few years. 

One of my early memories was when I was around five or six years old, I remember walking through target with my mom and her boyfriend when I looked at my mom’s purse and thought “why don’t boys get to have purses? Don’t they want to carry things too?“ that question stuck for a bit. Around this same time was when I always wanted the girls toy from McDonalds. My mom had offered me one day and I went for it. I did every time. one day my my moms boyfriend took me through and forced me to get the boys toy. I cried, I cried so hard.. I was never too interested in boy toys. Sure, I loved legos, but legos arnt something im going to go putting a gender label on. Legos are basically creativity. And as far as the other toys id rarely touch them, there’s also Spy Gear I used to play with but then again.. MY STUFFED ANIMAL CAT FAMILY HAD DEEP MEANING TO ME. 

I never liked (and still don’t) to get haircuts, I always fight my parents when I came to a haircut.  And I was always a good kid.

On and off throughout life my name sounded weird to me, I always thought (more noticeable in later years) it sounded weird to introduce myself using my birth name.

I’d play dress up with my step-sister in my younger years. She’d paint my nails and I’d like it, my mom didn’t so much, but I did 

Later on came 5th grade, the puberty video. It was towards then end of the day. Everyone got separated based on gender. I watched it and laughed with the other boys (they were real immature about explaining things). Then few minutes after it was over it hit me. I was freaked out by puberty. I freaked out for awhile.

Then came puberty. I noticed myself developing body hair and realized it had started. I ran to my room and cried. I was freaked out for months, it was trauma. I’d pray every night to “skip puberty”. Every wish was to skip puberty. 

Years went by and my eyesight got a little worse. I was too self conscious to wear glasses. 7th grade I remember liking some of the girls frames. I loved my English teachers (she’s younger, so not old frames either)

The boys locker room wasn’t the best either. I wanted to be alone to change. One day I was with a group of them in a game we were playing, we had won and we’re celebrating. The bell rang and I headed off to my next class. I got there and thought “there’s.. something different about me..” I didn’t know what. 

This is around middle/high school time too, Around this time I also started having odd thoughts of getting rid of my male genitals, these thoughts would often be around over summer vacation 
It was around 8th and 9th grade, I’d be interested in the girls clothes, mostly tank tops, wishing I could wear them.


During summer vacation I was staying at my grandparents house. Suddenly I  wanted to try wearing a bra. Like, I felt like I should be wearing a bra. I took a bath  in the jacuzzi just for the chance to try one on while It was filling up. I took it off right away just Because of looking in the mirror. 

Few years later we get to the now. 
I started seeing a therapist due to depression and anxiety. She noticed how I sat with my legs crossed. Had longer hair. The higher pitched voice that I have (I’m 17 and still refuse to speak in lower tones, so my voice comes out squeaky) and the fact that I’d play with my hair. She brought it up with me, and kind of explained it. I got happy, like really happy! I left that appointment happy, I went home and started looking for signs. 
 Since then my and my therapist have kinda talked about it, she called me Colleen once and for like two seconds I felt on top of the world! 

I’m a mess right now.  But does it sound trans to you? Anything relatable? I’m just looking for answers so anything is appreciated! Thank you!",asktransgender
Human Rights Campaign calls on Trump admin not to go forward with potential rollback of transgender protections,[https://www.cnn.com/2018/10/21/politics/human-rights-campaign-hhs-transgender/index.html](https://www.cnn.com/2018/10/21/politics/human-rights-campaign-hhs-transgender/index.html),asktransgender
Will the title IX changes affect my HRT insurance coverage?,"I can't change my legal gender in Wisconsin anyways because its one of the stupid states that require bottom surgery, but I have no idea what I would do without hormones.... How bad is the risk towards availability of transition drugs and their cost coverage? 

Seriously though fuck this :(",asktransgender
"What's the fucking point of life if it passes. I'm 16, 17 in 3 days, I'm going to a gender therapist on multiple occasions and it could all just halt because old fucking white guys want me to be miserable what's the fucking point the entire world is against us",,asktransgender
"would you rather impregnate cis girl while being trans girl or be impregnated by trans girl, deliver a baby, and be an actual mom?","also, do you think it's good approach to find out if one's trans or not? i don't think so even though this question just popped up in my mind.",asktransgender
Outed to my likely transphobic father.. I don't know what to do.,"I'm an MtF closeted trans woman.. at least I think I am.. and I've been in a cycle of doubt, disassociation, and acceptance and it's been killing me.. My father, who I only see on Sunday but call a few times during the week noticed something was wrong but since he has verbally made anti-trans jokes in the past and is a bit racist, I couldn't trust him.

I recently told my grandmother who I thought I could trust.. She promised she wouldn't tell anyone, but yesterday my father called and asked her.. and she told him that I ""wanted to be a girl"".

I'm not even close to being ready for him to know and now he knows... I'm terrified to talk to him now because out of the four of his kids.. I'm the only one assigned male at birth, and he does not seem to be the accepting type. Although he's an alcoholic.. I love him and I'm terrified to lose him and I'm the only one of his kids that are in contact with him.

I'm terrified for both his sake and my sake.. I don't know if he's going to out me to anyone else or if I'll lose him. I need to talk to him soon, but I have no idea what to say. No one in my family knows besides one of my sisters, my grandmother, and now him.

I should add that he was totally against my older sister when she questioned if she was lesbian and he flipped out. If I fully come to terms that I'm female.. then I'm lesbian too which makes things harder.

Could anyone give me advice about how to handle this?",asktransgender
"Anyone else feel really, really alone right now?","So I'm sure pretty much everyone has heard about the Trump administration's latest bullshit regarding trans people. It's definitely a sign of worse things to come, and if nothing else is proof the administration doesn't value our humanity in the least, and that millions of people support this.

I don't think this would worry me as much if I was hearing anything other than crickets chirping from all the cis people in my life. I'm living in a house with 4 of my family members, most of whom follow the news pretty closely, and not one of them has brought it up at all. My facebook feed is silent aside from one trans person I'm fb friends with. Only a few cis people on my twitter feed have retweeted anything regarding it while most of the trans people I follow are definitely worried/pissed/etc. I don't expect every single person I know (or even most people I know) to be yelling about this, but this is the sort of thing that ideally would face a ton of backlash and yet barely anyone who isn't trans seems to care.

My family is left-leaning and was accepting when I came out, but every time I bring up my fears about 45's administration affecting my life as a trans person I'm met with ""you're overreacting"" or ""no, we're all equally in danger""(bullshit). How am I supposed to talk to them about this? I barely have any trans friends at all and all the people who are closest to me are cis. No one in my life understands what it's like going through the world knowing an overwhelming portion of the population not only openly hates your guts but denies your very existence, and that the federal government would rather you be dead than be who you really are. It's so lonely.

Sorry for the vent but sometimes I can't help but feel like other trans people are the only ones who have our backs. And we're such a tiny portion of the population. It scares me.",asktransgender
"Only sort of trans, but I don’t know where else to go. (NSFW)","We were doing a safe sex unit at school, and it was very straight/cis. It left me feeling scared of STIs and completely in the dark about what to do. (We need queer-inclusive sex ed, people.) I tried looking online, but there isn’t a lot of material, and most of my results were porn.

I’m an AFAB trans person and I’m into girls. How can I have safe sex with a cis girl? Also, I have strong top dysphoria. How can I have sex if I’m ashamed of my chest? 

(I’m on blockers right now, but I’m thinking about low-dose T. That’ll boost my sex drive, right?)

EDIT: My sex drive is NOT remotely why I’m going on T. I don’t really want it to, actually.",asktransgender
Okay im having trouble reconsiling about nb people and i need some help,"I think I might be what people call truscum on Tumblr or whatever, but I have a really really hard time with something. There is someone I am very close to who is afab, prefers she/her pronouns, but identifies as a demi girl, and she's always talking about how the both of us are trans, and it rubs me the wrong way a bit.she never prefers other pronouns(I have asked). It's hard for me to see her as part of the trans space? I know every transition is different and hormones/surgery are not required but like is it really trans if there  is absolutely zero trans-ition? It's been a bit hard for me to see nb like that as trans and maybe it's internalized transphobia or something? I've always seen it as a spectrum of cis on one side, trans on the other, and nb everywhere in between. And nb people are absolutely valid and everything like I'm not saying they aren't ""real"" or whatever and I try really really hard to remind myself that every trans experience is different but then I see her post on Facebook about the new news on the Trump shit and she says ""us trans people are going to need your help"" and it's just like ???? She isn't ostracized or discriminated against, nothing about her gender identity or experience will ever cause her an issue. I don't know I am really close with her and I need help figuring out how to not feel this way. ",asktransgender
I just want to cry,I don't even live in america but seeing what's happening there has got me feeling so down,asktransgender
Girls from Europe. Injections.,"Hi everyone. 
I have a question regarding estradiol injections that are available in Europe. To this day I was currently using neofollin from Czech but now Im not able to go there and buy it. Im working with my doctor on special document to our country's health administration about shipping but im curious are there any other injections available in UE. I know that people from UK were prescribed injections some time ago but I dont know what drug name was it and its availability. So im asking You. If You are on injections and from Europe what is the brand name that you are using and from what channels do you acquire it. For any help im totally grateful.",asktransgender
Help!! I'm going to Washington DC to speak at a youth conference on decision making but want to bring up trans issues,"Hey guys. So I'm going to be attending a conference in DC. Its sort of hard to explain what it's about, because they were very broad. But here's how they describe it: __*What: The Interagency Working Group on Youth Programs (IWGYP) is bringing together young people, supportive adults, and federal policymakers to better understand how youth and young adults make decisions. Participants will come together for two days of discussion and activities to answer the question, “How do young people make important decisions?” The listening session will culminate in a presentation to federal staff about recommendations for supporting youth in decision-making.*__

So yeah, I'm pretty sure I'm the only trans person going. And even though the conference doesn't sound too specific to LGBTQ+ issues, I would like to try an bring it up (especially the recent news about the Trump administration's attempt to basically erase trans people). How do I bring this up and present it as related to youth decision making? I was thinking something along the lines of LGBTQ+ youth need to feel safe and supported in order to make good decisions. That we need insurance coverage so we don't engage in survival sex work. ",asktransgender
"Sooo, weed","If i were to take edibles while on lupron, would there be any negative interactions? Would there be any others if i began to take estrogen?Thanks in advance &lt;3",asktransgender
Do you think I’m being overdramatic?,"I am scared. I’m getting married soon to my fiancé who is in the Air Force. The direction of this government is terrifying. We were saving up for a Brazilian butt lift but I’m thinking I might get an orchiectomy instead. I’m just scared since I’m getting Tricare that if the government says they don’t have to cover HRT they won’t. I don’t want my progress to reverse. My fiancé thinks I’m being overdramatic and has been trying to support me and calm me down, but I don’t want to take any chances. I would miss my oodles and so would my soon to be husband but I would miss them less than I’d miss the rest of body I’ve worked so hard for. ",asktransgender
Did anyone else have major body insecurities that turned out to be positives after coming out to yourself?,"Before coming out to myself (mtf) I was incredibly self conscious about my ""thin"" body and features, my narrow shoulders and little arms. I'd work out to ""bulk up and get bigger"" consistently with little results. I'd get really sad because I didn't want to be self conscious of my body anymore. I wanted to be one of those ""big strong bros"" because I felt like people would like me more.
Two years later, I'm almost a year into my transition and I've never felt better about my body. I love my little shoulders and arms and my soft face. I realize now that I couldn't be more fortunate for these things, never mind the fact that it's an entirely healthy and functional body that I should have never taken for granted to begin with.
It feels really wonderful to love the body you're in.
The only downside is I've been less motivated to work out since I don't have this sadness pushing me to do it, but I'm definitely focusing back on that just to keep healthy.

Has anyone else had a similar experience?",asktransgender
"The Executive Memo is Just Title 9, Right?","I've seen people talking about title 7, and I've seen people talking about passports, and a variety of other things. But the scope of the (very vague) NYT article was that it was about how sex was defined ""under title 9"" meaning ""with regards to title 9"" - right?

So, sure, it could theoretically escalate. But it is not, currently (as far as we know), a broad redefinition of the term sex in all aspects of government...just in the context of how our government interprets title 9.

I'm not saying it's not bad, just that it seems like there is some fear-mongering going on.

Am I missing something?

Article: [https://www.nytimes.com/2018/10/21/us/politics/transgender-trump-administration-sex-definition.html](https://www.nytimes.com/2018/10/21/us/politics/transgender-trump-administration-sex-definition.html)",asktransgender
Help. I'm freaking out. How high are the risk to develop a meningioma after 2 years of cypro?,"Hi. I'm 29 and taking androcur /cyproterone for 2 years (6 months 50mg/day and 1 and a half year at 100mg)
A new study was published that says it could multiply the risks of meningioma by 20.
I have a brain scan in 3 weeks but I'm totally freaking out I could have something bad (in fact, I could deal with cancer, but brain cancer is frightening me).
What are the risks I could have developed something in 2 years? ",asktransgender
How did people you hadn't come out to react the first time you presented to them? How did you respond?,"I've always been a bit set off by the formality of coming out. It's okay and actually kind of fun when it's with a friend but aproching someone you don't know super well just to inform them of your life decisions feels a bit forced. Because of this I often end up just running into people wearing a skirt with no explanation as to why. I'd like to hope they get the idea but I can never tell... 

Anyways just wanted to know how the people in your lives reacted to learning you're trans without you really telling them. Did they bring it up? Did they stumble over pronouns?",asktransgender
"DAE make the mistake of picking a ""gender neutral"" name for transition only to regret it later?","So, When I transitioned ages ago, I legally changed my name to one that was ... ""gender neutral"" a name that could go either way... it made the process a lot easier as I was able to get that started before I completely transitioned (though not much since I started transition only a couple months afterward)  


Still, it seemed to smooth things over .. I never really cared overly much for the name.. I started using a nickname due to participation in the ""Society for Creative Anachronism"" where folks often create a ""persona name"".. over the last 25 years that name has come to mean more to me than my ... ""transition name"" ever did.  


I finally worked up the guts to fix that.. Today I filed paperwork to change my name legally to the one I've been using for 25 years with anyone who calls me a friend... and I kind of look back at that ""picking an easier transition name"" as a mistake I made because it caused the usual amount of ""not sure if boy or girl name"" confusion in lots of cases... and just never really made me overly happy.  


Wondering about other peoples experiences.

  
Also to note: I had my original birth records adjusted and sealed after surgery years and years ago. I was told that legally I could check the ""never changed my name"" box on legal forms.. but I was concerned about not causing red flags or committing perjury on my forms... So, I talked to an attorney friend and he told me to check / fill out as my official documents currently show and add an addendum for the judge's eyes only where I explain full disclosure and request that this part of the application be sealed...  


When I got to the court house, the clerk told me that she could not keep the addendum private.. that it had to be scanned in and would thus technically become part of the record... so I told her why and she said ""fill it out this way... and I'll keep the addendum without scanning it and talk to the judge and will only scan it in if he insists.. and he likely won't because he's very understanding with these issues""  


So just a huge shout out to a certain clerk of courts for being super helpful and understanding!   


&amp;#x200B;",asktransgender
"Well, I confused my endocrinologist","I've been on 4mg of Estradiol and 100mg of Spironolactone since 10/31/17, but hadn't been able to see my Endocrinologist (due to fun insurance reasons) until 2 weeks ago. I got my labs done in advance so that I would only have to do one office visit, since I'm paying out of pocket to see her.

And here's the fun part. I'm still at genetic male levels of both estradiol (27) and testosterone (400+). I've officially confused the hell out of my endo, since she didn't understand how I'd managed to completely metabolize that level of estrogen (hint: I have a pretty high metabolism, and would be much fatter if I didn't). She recommended going to patches or injections if I manage to metabolize more than the 6mg of estradiol that she is now prescribing me, but that seems unlikely due to their increased cost and my current fights with my insurance company. I'll be doing another round of labs in a couple weeks to see if the higher dosage helps.

I don't really have any questions today, I just kind of wanted to post an update and let people know what's been going on. I'm not upset that I've made this little progress hormonally, as I still have made some physical progress and have been greatly enjoying the changes.",asktransgender
Did you notice your body and face change more when you switched from pills to injections?,,asktransgender
On today's news: We are forever stronger together,"Many of you probably saw this article today: [https://www.nytimes.com/2018/10/21/us/politics/transgender-trump-administration-sex-definition.html](https://www.nytimes.com/2018/10/21/us/politics/transgender-trump-administration-sex-definition.html) . It's scary to think about, but I want y'all to remember the love represented by this sub. These actions by few do not speak for the all the amazing positivity, tenacity and representation out there. Seeing the outpour of support and resistance shows how strong our community is.  We will continue to fight for our rights and to be seen, heard, respected as we want and need to be seen, heard and respected. We will not be erased.❤️",asktransgender
What are trans-related topics you'd like to see talked about more?,"(Long time member here, but thought I'd use a throwaway for this one.)

Given the current shited up situation all over the world I thought enough is enough and that I have to do something about it.

I'm a writer and a public speaker, and I won't talk about my field specifically but the point is that I have some okay recording equipment, video editing chops, and plenty of experience talking in front of thousands of people.

I wanna put these skills to good use, and by good use I mean I want to inspire other trans people so that they will be bold and brave, and live the lives they want to live, and not live in fear.

That's my main goal BTW: I believe fear is our biggest enemy, and I want people to know they don't have to be afraid.

I wanna help people know that we are valid, that things can be okay, that there is good in the world, and that we will get through whatever storm it is no matter scary it looks.

So, I thought a YouTube channel could be a good way to do that. And while I have no trouble speaking in public, recording videos, editing, etc., I'm not sure how to go about it exactly.

I know that the best I can do is talk about the subject in a voice that makes people know things *can* be alright. I think my main job is in the tone and the energy, and not exactly in the particulars of what I'm gonna be talking about. And the latter is actually what I need help with:

- What are the things you wish to see talked about? 
- What are topics you wish you had come across when you first started down this journey? 
- Is there something I'm obviously missing here?
- What is the best use of my time?

Here are some ideas so far:

- How does HRT work?
- How has HRT worked for me?
- How did the surgeries I had went?
- How does dysphoria usually manifests? How does it manifest for me?
- How to come out without putting yourself in danger?
- What happened to my marriage after I transitioned?
- Expenses you're looking at when you start transitioning.
- Being trans and your professional life.
- A ""for the allies"" section where I address people who know nothing about the subject—e.g. your mom—and explain things to them.
- How did I learn I'm non-binary?
- Dating as a trans person.

What do you think?

Any and all feedback is appreciated, and apologies for the huge wall of text.

And before you ask:

- I don't care about revenue, I care about impact and doing what's best for people.
- I don't care about getting flak either. I know there'll be haters, I can deal with that, and unless I'm actually murdered it's fine. Where I live it's very unlikely that that'll happen.
- Yes, I'm trans myself. HRT for years, surgeries, the whole spiel.",asktransgender
Sharing my story- insight requested,"So, I'm an 18 year old woman. I like feminine things,like to get compliments for looking pretty, have 90% female friends, am heavily involved in campus feminism, etc. I'm in a very male dominated major so I take some pride in being one of the only women.  

But when I was 15 or so, I was completely sure that I was a trans guy. I learned that tesosterone and surgery actually existed, and to me that seemed really amazing. I spent hours on trans sites. I told my guidance counselor, some friends, and my family. But no one was really accepting. So I went back into the closet and like...I was fine? I got over it and got busy with other stuff. 

But now I'm secretly really worried that maybe I'm not cis despite acting like I am. If I got turned into a guy tomorrow via magic or something, I'd be thrilled. I still spent time on trans sites and I'm so jealous of the handsome trans men.  I'm active with the campus LGBT group but....I've never told anyone how I really feel. And I don't know how to because everyone sees me as a really feminine girl. 

How do I find out if I'm trans? Where is the line between cis and trans? ",asktransgender
Need Help With My Hair - I Have High Widows Peaks!,"I'm a 31-year-old trans-female. While I haven't been out very long publicly, I have an extensive history of crossdressing and crossplaying at geek conventions. Since my teens I can remember my hair being very unusual in my opinion. It's super thick and fast growing below the ridge, however, the top is very thin and slow growing. I've had a lot of people try telling me that I'm going bald, however, that's doubtful since my hair hasn't changed very much since my early teens and my recent hormone lab test showed that my DHT levels were at their lowest for an adult male. I was called bozo-the-clown quite a few times.

[https://imgur.com/a/WY2gjEd](https://imgur.com/a/WY2gjEd)

I have my mother's hair, super curly and easily breaks, the only difference being she isn't thin on top as I am. About two years ago (earliest efforts of me coming out) I began to grow my hair out. I've mostly kept it in a ponytail ever since but at last check, it's roughly down to my shoulders. The bad news is; I have high widows peaks and everything is all the more noticeable when my hair is long. The top/front is so thin that I can barely find any confidence to going out or taking pictures in female mode without putting my favorite wig on. So I have questions and would like to know a few things!

**What can I expect from HRT?**

They claim HRT ""can"" stop/slow hair loss and that I shouldn't expect lost hair to regrow but what I've noticed when I look in the mirror is a large amount of peach fuzz that extends from my widows peak to a more natural hair line. I also have peach fuzz on my thin area too.

* Can I expect HRT to signal my peach fuzz to grow in like normal hair?
* Are there any products that can force peach fuzz hair to thicken - including prescription strength ones?
* What are other trans-woman's experiences on HRT and their hair?

I understand I shouldn't hold out very much hope, especially with that obvious thin area towards the back.

**Wigs:**

* There is a Youtuber I watch who also has high widows peak much like mine but she wears a type of hair toupee to give herself bangs and little more hair where it matters. Should I consider having to do the same?
* One friend of mine told me that she knows a couple transgender friends who exclusively wear wigs. What are your experiences with wigs? Are they passable or should I put more strive into my natural hair?
* Would anyone have suggestions for wigs that are a step above cosplay wigs - high quality, passable, and hopefully easy on the budget?

**Lastly:**

* Can anyone suggest hair styles that would look endearing and work while I wait for thicker hair?
* And whatever else anyone can say to help, this is makes me self-conscious about how well I'll past later and I feel it ages me in all the wrong ways.

Thanks for the feedback. I really hope my hair isn't a complete lost cause.",asktransgender
Nipple Discharge on Spiro - Is this bad?,"I've been on Spiro for about three months, and have had it as my only medication. Starting last week, I noticed soething different with my nipples. Each of them felt like they had gained tissue. My left nipple has definitely gained more than my right. It feels almost as if there is just more nipple directly underneath the surface. This means that my left nipple feels...pinchable and tweakable, while my right nipple is somewhere in between my left and a standard dude nip in size. I was investigating this, touching them, and I realized that it actually felt kinda good to touch the things, when it hadn't previously. It's as if the tissue is now tender. This feeling is entirely localized to the nipples and nowhere else on my breasts. There isn't any chafing that I've noticed.

So what follows is me, every once in awhile, absentmindedly fondling my nipples in private. Then, yesterday morning, I noticed that upon messing with my nips, a very small amount of clear fluid came out of them. I tried several more times throughout today and confirmed that yes, this is happening. I managed to get a small drop of the stuff with a hard squeeze, and it tasted kinda sweet. I tried again today, and it's still going on. My left nip also produces more fluid than my right.

So is this just a result of gynecomastia from Spiro? Is it breast cancer? Some other third thing? Anyone else had this? Any advice?",asktransgender
Question about the boobies,"Mtf here 15 weeks Hrt. I started budding  around the end of the fourth week. Up until a few days ago, the standard itching and feeling of bruised area behind the nipple. The random itching tapered off a few days ago, the soreness then followed. Area behind nipples is still slightly sore pressed, but not nearly like it was before. Any of you who have experienced early growth, is this standard procedure? 

Erections have returned as well.

Please tell me my new little boobies aren’t going away. I really enjoy them. 

",asktransgender
FTM Writers I Should Read?,"I’d love some recommendations for FTM authors I should check out. I’m particularly fond of poetry and memoirs, but I’m open to anything. 

I realized that most of what I’ve read has been by MTF authors so I feel like FTM voices have been underrepresented in my life. Please help me fix that. 

(And I don’t mean to be exclusionary as I’d love to read non-binary voices as well.)",asktransgender
I need a little help,"The last couple weeks have been bad. I started up my last year of school and I cant physically bring myself to care. I'm starting to scream in my sleep that it wakes up me and my boyfriend. I grind my teeth so hard I've broken 2 of my teeth(cracked and the result of one of them was a root canal). I've started drinking and smoking weed way too much by my standards. Tho I have cut back on alcohol lately. I found a job to make money but that coupled with school is eating me up and I want to quit after being so eager to get it. I just I dont think I can do it anymore. I have panic attacks every other minute of everyday. 
It all stems from me not being out yet after like 2 years of transitioning but I cant bring myself to do it. Maybe I'll never do it. But I cant keep going at this pace and dont know what to do. I just want to die right now. ",asktransgender
Make-up classes?,"I'm a mom to MTF 15 year old. I haven't worn makeup regularly for most of her life. Just special occasions, and not very well then! I was excited when I heard Sephora had Bold Beauty classes for trans girls/women, but it looks like that might have been a June/Pride gimmick, because none of our local Sephora's have offered them in months. 

I know there are plenty of YouTube videos, but does anyone know of other options? Or how best to search for options? Any ideas would be appreciated. 

My daughter did let her younger sister and her BFF make her up the other day, but they done have any sense of what looks best for a trans girl, and also they over did it a bit for her personal style. Besides, it wasn't educational for her. Just dress up. 

Thanks!",asktransgender
The Hunt For Bathing Suits,"Starting with a little backstory, I'm pre-op MTF and have been on HRT for over a year and a half. Before transitioning, I used to love to swim. I would usually wear swim trunks and a rash guard because I was uncomfortable with my appearance (It was dysphoria, but I didn't know that at the time). I haven't gone swimming since I before I started HRT, and I would really like to again. I tried on one of my old swim outfits, and it caused A LOT of dysphoria. I would be extremely clockable wearing something like that, and the women's bathing suits make be really worried about being clocked. I have been looking for a bathing suit that can conceal \*ahem\* certain unwanted parts, but I haven't been able to find something I would really feel comfortable in. Do any other MTFs here have this problem? Do you have any recommendations for swimwear that would fit my needs?",asktransgender
Can i expect changes faster due to being 16?,It's nearly 6 weeks of HRT for me. I'm wondering because all these effects feel like they are coming on so fast already. My boobs are already hurting. I've had a few changes already.,asktransgender
What was life like before you transitioned?,"Hello, just wondering what some lives we’re like before you transitioned, I know it can be a sensitive topic for some so please, only answer if your comfortable answering, I just heard somes were a mess (not saying that offensively, apologies if you read it that way) and looking to relate, thank you for everything 
P.S, I’m still a questioning MTF ",asktransgender
Looking for Resources for My Partner,"Hello!!

&amp;#x200B;

I recently came out to my partner and she has been absolutely amazing and supportive. But I am sure this is not easy for her.   


  So I was looking to try to pool any resources you all might have that would be helpful for me to pass along to her as the partner of a newly out MtF woman. 

&amp;#x200B;

  Thank you in advance, you all have been so wonderfully helpful. ",asktransgender
"As much as I want to be happy for people who transition younger, I can't help but feel extreme jealously too. Anyone else the same?","Now I want to start by saying, I would never be outright toxic towards a younger person transitioning after all it is fantastic for them.

It is just right now I am 22, I have no hopes of starting transitioning anytime soon and that is personally  heart-wrenching. 

It is something that I can't help but feel a lot of envy towards those that get to live as who they want to be earlier, it honestly makes me feel like an utter and complete failure personally. 

They will always get my support but it slowly kills me to know I can never get back the years I am slowly losing pretending to be this disgusting fucking thing rather than who I want to be.

In all honesty it makes me question can I ever be who I want to be? It always feels like it will be too late when I read or hear about these stories.",asktransgender
Can I Use My Out-Of-State Court Order to Update My Birth Certificate?,"My birth certificate is from Maryland.  I got a legal name and gender change court order here in California. The Maryland process states I can use a court order from a court of ""competent jurisdiction"", does California count in this case?

Bonus question - the form also requires I include ""My government-issued photo identification"".  I'm not about to mail them my actual Driver's License; so would a photocopy suffice?",asktransgender
Transitioning Questions - Doctors/Therapists,"How does someone, in a decidedly southern/Republican state find a therapist/consular/doctor to help them begin the process of transitioning? ",asktransgender
Getting fat on HRT mtf,"Hi all...I am just starting my journey and am wondering if it's possible to get female type overweight once on HRT. Like right now I'm a bean pole but can put on male pattern weight. I am kinda hoping to put on more female oriented weight. Like, I would like to develop into a slightly overweight female.... I know...weird question/desire.",asktransgender
HAS ANYONE RENEWED US PASSPORT WITH OLD BIRTH CERTIFICATE? (That has old name and gender),"I need to renew my passport as I am going out the country in a month. I called my city hall and they said if I had changed my birth certificate yet. I said no I still have the old one and they said they can send it in with the court order but could be a possibility that they send it back. Has anyone renewed their passport with their old birth certificate.? If so did they send it back? Or did they accept the old birth certificate with court order? 

I have legally changed my name and gender already on almost everything except birth certificate. 

Thank you for reading! ",asktransgender
"Very, very, very VERY bad news for everyone.",https://www.nytimes.com/2018/10/21/us/politics/transgender-trump-administration-sex-definition.html?action=click&amp;module=MoreInSection&amp;pgtype=Article&amp;region=Footer&amp;contentCollection=Politics&amp;fbclid=IwAR2v_pwlNzQagp2hPJIgr1J0TINJZgXEPAIrcIQhcyTM7pP_vxJjzdbXJnA ,asktransgender
weight problems? (trans boy),"hii, i have been on T for 6 months and a half
i have a question about weight since i wont be able to see my endocrinologist (the hormone doctor?) until mid january
when i started T i weighted 68kg and i am 1,67 m tall, right now i weight 76kg, i want to know if that is normal and/or unhealthy, also, im doing 3~4 hours of exercise per week (30 min of cardio and 30 min muscles) and idk if its normal to not dropping some weight, since i have been doing it for 2 months? 
idk i just want to look more cispassing by doing exercise and i think im not gettin there, id like some advice about all of this :(

ALSO i have like pain in my ovaries? and i would like to know if that is normal being 6 months on T, thanks!! 🌸",asktransgender
How can we help america?,I just read what the Trump regime is planning to do and I'm wondering if there is anything people can do to help this situation if they don't live in America. I think obvious one is being there to send all the kind words we can to any American friends in distress right now. But is there anything we can do politically to avoid this decision or at least convince the regime to give a slightly more leniant definition?  ,asktransgender
MtF coming out help,Struggling with trying to come out need advice I get really nervous and I end up getting mad at myself would like any tips sorry if is all over the place first time doing this,asktransgender
First full day tucking. How can I help discomfort when sitting?,"Hi all!! Today is the beginning of week 2 of my public (at least at work) presenting as a girl and I decided to wear my first pencil skirt today, which also meant my first full day of maintaining a tuck. I've felt relatively good so far, but I notice that I do get discomfort when I'm sitting, but standing I seem to be pretty comfortable. 

&amp;#x200B;

Any tips for a learning girl?",asktransgender
Healthcare complications,"So, I'm currently in the US but I'm gonna move to Canada (Newfoundland specifically) in the coming years, which is also when I'd be able to transition. As an immigrant to Canada, does anyone know what my health care options will be, can o get any trans costs covered, and any rough estimates on what ffs and srs would cost there. I can't really find solid numbers on any of this and it's got me super upset, I just wanna have some kinda outline for how to transition in the future.",asktransgender
(TW: Suicide) Moving Forward,"So, by now everyone has heard the news.  I'm still pre-everything and I'm terrified.  But I've started making steps and even with this bullshite, it's too late to stop now.  I can't go back to where I was 3 weeks ago.  If I do, I won't make it a few more months.  So... If going back isn't an option, I guess the only way to go is forward.  I'm going to try to get into some sort of therapy this Friday and hopefully get HRT soon after.  Seriously, Fuck Louisiana and the lack of resources here.

Wish me luck and the best of luck to all of you,
Cassie

Also, quick reminder, don't forget to go out and vote if at all possible.",asktransgender
Maybe we'll get our very own 3/5ths compromise? xD T.T,,asktransgender
Is it disrespectful to be romantically attracted specifically to trans people?,"I understand that it would clearly be disrespectful to *fetishize* trans people. I am looking for a consensus on whether it would likely be insulting to a trans person to know that a potential partner is attracted to them not simply as their gender identity but specifically as a trans person, if that makes sense? I have been trying to understand some changes taking place in my romantic preferences, and I can't shake that the image of my ideal partner that I get in my mind when I listen to a romantic song is a trans woman, so I'm trying to figure out what to do with that.",asktransgender
When are the Trump changes happening?,How will it effect a liberal state like Massachusetts? Should I not transition? :'(,asktransgender
To all transgender people,You are awesome and valid and you don't need to be a certain way or prove anything to anyone in order to validate yourself. Keep being awesome \~ \_\^,asktransgender
I'm going to visit a room to rent in a few hours. Should I tell the apartment owner I might be trans?,"Title. I'm looking for a room to rent in a shared apartment -I can't afford to rent a whole apartment just for me right now. And I think I need to tell the apartment owner I'm currently questioning my gender identity and that I might end up getting HRT before we make a rental agreement, to make sure he won't be kicking me out once he finds out, and so I can live without hiding.

And yes, I'll be sharing the apartment with him, a cis man, and with a cis woman as well.

What do you think? What would you do? Thanks in advance :)

EDIT UPDATE: I ended up telling him! After seeing the room and getting out of the building, I contacted him once again to tell him I wanted to talk something else I was not confident enought to talk about when the women there could hear us. So we sat in a cafeteria and talked. He didn't know much about the trasgender reality, so I had to lecture him about it. He just kept asking if that would mean any coexistence issue, and it's not the case. So he's completely fine. He'll ask her girlfriend and the other woman living there. If they have no problems, I've got it! I'll be able to live somewhere where no matter what they'll accept me :D Thank you all for helping me think about it!! You're always so supportive.",asktransgender
Trump Administration Eyes Defining Transgender Out of Existence,"From: https://www.nytimes.com/2018/10/21/us/politics/transgender-trump-administration-sex-definition.html

WASHINGTON — The Trump administration is considering narrowly defining gender as a biological, immutable condition determined by genitalia at birth, the most drastic move yet in a governmentwide effort to roll back recognition and protections of transgender people under federal civil rights law.

A series of decisions by the Obama administration loosened the legal concept of gender in federal programs, including in education and health care, recognizing gender largely as an individual’s choice and not determined by the sex assigned at birth. The policy prompted fights over bathrooms, dormitories, single-sex programs and other arenas where gender was once seen as a simple concept. Conservatives, especially evangelical Christians, were incensed.

Now the Department of Health and Human Services is spearheading an effort to establish a legal definition of sex under Title IX, the federal civil rights law that bans gender discrimination in education programs that receive government financial assistance, according to a memo obtained by The New York Times.

The department argued in its memo that key government agencies needed to adopt an explicit and uniform definition of gender as determined “on a biological basis that is clear, grounded in science, objective and administrable.” The agency’s proposed definition would define sex as either male or female, unchangeable, and determined by the genitals that a person is born with, according to a draft reviewed by The Times. Any dispute about one’s sex would have to be clarified using genetic testing.

“Sex means a person’s status as male or female based on immutable biological traits identifiable by or before birth,” the department proposed in the memo, which was drafted and has been circulating since last spring. “The sex listed on a person’s birth certificate, as originally issued, shall constitute definitive proof of a person’s sex unless rebutted by reliable genetic evidence.”

The new definition would essentially eradicate federal recognition of the estimated 1.4 million Americans who have opted to recognize themselves — surgically or otherwise — as a gender other than the one they were born into.

Understand the issues beyond red and blue.

“This takes a position that what the medical community understands about their patients — what people understand about themselves — is irrelevant because the government disagrees,” said Catherine E. Lhamon, who led the Education Department’s Office for Civil Rights in the Obama administration and helped write transgender guidance that is being undone.

The move would be the most significant of a series of maneuvers, large and small, to exclude the population from civil rights protections and roll back the Obama administration’s more fluid recognition of gender identity. The Trump administration has sought to bar transgender people from serving in the military and has legally challenged civil rights protections for the group embedded in the nation’s health care law.

Several agencies have withdrawn Obama-era policies that recognized gender identity in schools, prisons and homeless shelters. The administration even tried to remove questions about gender identity from a 2020 census survey and a national survey of elderly citizens.

For the last year, health and human services has privately argued that the term “sex” was never meant to include gender identity or even homosexuality, and that the lack of clarity allowed the Obama administration to wrongfully extend civil rights protections to people who should not have them.

Roger Severino, now at the Department of Health and Human Services, was among the conservatives who blanched at the Obama administration’s expansion of sex to include gender identity.

Roger Severino, the director of the Office for Civil Rights at the Department of Health and Human Services, declined to answer detailed questions about the memo or his role in interagency discussions about how to revise the definition of sex under Title IX.

But officials at the Department of Health and Human Services confirmed that their push to limit the definition of sex for the purpose of federal civil rights laws resulted from their own reading of the laws and from a court decision.

Mr. Severino, while serving as the head of the DeVos Center for Religion and Civil Society at the Heritage Foundation, was among the conservatives who blanched at the Obama administration’s expansion of sex to include gender identity, which he called “radical gender ideology.”

In one commentary piece, he called the policies a “culmination of a series of unilateral, and frequently lawless, administration attempts to impose a new definition of what it means to be a man or a woman on the entire nation.”

“Transgender people are frightened,” said Sarah Warbelow, the legal director of the Human Rights Campaign, which presses for the rights of lesbian, gay, bisexual and transgender people. “At every step where the administration has had the choice, they’ve opted to turn their back on transgender people.”

The Department of Health and Human Services has called on the “Big Four” agencies that enforce some part of Title IX — the Departments of Education, Justice, Health and Human Services, and Labor — to adopt its definition in regulations that will establish uniformity in the government and increase the likelihood that courts will accept it.

The definition is integral to two proposed rules currently under review at the White House: One from the Education Department deals with complaints of sex discrimination at schools and colleges receiving federal financial assistance; the other, from health and human services, deals with health programs and activities that receive federal funds or subsidies. Both regulations are expected to be released this fall, and would then be open for public comment, typically for 60 days. The agencies would consider the comments before issuing final rules with the force of law — both of which could include the new gender definition.

Civil rights groups have been meeting with federal officials in recent weeks to argue against the proposed definition, which has divided career and political appointees across the administration. Some officials hope that health and human services will at least rein in the most extreme parts, such as the call for genetic testing to determine sex.

After more than a year of discussions, health and human services is preparing to formally present the new definition to the Justice Department before the end of the year, Trump administration officials say. If the Justice Department decides that the change is legal, the new definition can be approved and enforced in Title IX statutes, and across government agencies.

The Justice Department declined to comment on the draft health and human services proposal. The Justice Department has not yet been asked to render a formal legal opinion, according to an official there who was not authorized to speak about the process.

But Attorney General Jeff Sessions’s previous decisions on transgender protections have given civil rights advocates little hope that the department will prevent the new definition from being enforced. The proposal appears consistent with the position he took in an October 2017 memo sent to agencies clarifying that the civil rights law that prohibits job discrimination does not cover “gender identity, per se.”

Harper Jean Tobin, the policy director of the National Center for Transgender Equality, an advocacy group, called the maneuvering “an extremely aggressive legal position that is inconsistent with dozens of federal court decisions.”

The agency’s proposed definition would define sex as either male or female, unchangeable, and determined by the genitals that a person is born with.

Health and human services officials said they were only abiding by court orders, referring to the rulings of Judge Reed O’Connor of the Federal District Court in Fort Worth, Tex., a George W. Bush appointee who has held that “Congress did not understand ‘sex’ to include ‘gender identity.’”

A 2016 ruling by Judge O’Connor concerned a rule that was adopted to carry out a civil rights statute embedded in the Affordable Care Act. The provision prohibits discrimination based on race, color, national origin, sex, age or disability in “any health program or activity” that receives federal financial assistance.

But in recent discussions with the administration, civil rights groups, including Lambda Legal, have pointed to other court cases. In a legal memo presented to the administration, a coalition of civil rights groups wrote, “The overwhelming majority of courts to address the question since the most relevant Supreme Court precedent in 1998 have held that antitransgender bias constitutes sex discrimination under federal laws like Title IX.”

Indeed, the health and human services proposal was prompted, in part, by pro-transgender court decisions in the last year that upheld the Obama administration’s position.

In their memo, health and human services officials wrote that “courts and plaintiffs are racing to get decisions” ahead of any rule-making, because of the lack of a stand-alone definition.

“Courts and the previous administration took advantage of this circumstance to include gender identity and sexual orientation in a multitude of agencies, and under a multitude of laws,” the memo states. Doing so “led to confusion and negative policy consequences in health care, education and other federal contexts.”

The narrower definition would be acutely felt in schools and their most visible battlegrounds: locker rooms and bathrooms.

One of the Trump administration’s first decisive policy acts was the rescission by the Education and Justice Departments of Obama-era guidelines that protected transgender students who wanted to use bathrooms that correspond to their gender identity.

Since the guidance was rescinded, the Education Department’s Office for Civil Rights has halted and dismissed discrimination cases filed by transgender students over access to school facilities. A restrictive governmentwide definition would cement the Education Department’s current approach.

But it would also raise new questions.

The department would have to decide what documentation schools would be required to collect to determine or codify gender. Title IX applies to a number of educational experiences, such as sports and single-sex classes or programs where gender identity has come into play. The department has said it will continue to open cases where transgender students face discrimination, bullying and harassment, and investigate gender-based harassment as “unwelcome conduct based on a student’s sex” or “harassing conduct based on a student’s failure to conform to sex stereotypes.”

The Education Department did not respond to an inquiry about the health and human services proposal.

Ms. Lhamon of the Obama Education Department said the proposed definition “quite simply negates the humanity of people.”",asktransgender
(Serious) How worried should we Americans be?,"Hey, sorry if there's a lot of other posts like this, but I'm currently gender-questioning and probably trans, and I heard about that Trump thing regarding how his administration announced that they wanna roll back transgender rights and regulations. I know that this is serious and awful either way, but this seems really complicated and I'm not exactly understanding what exactly is gonna/could happen. Sorry if I'm not being clear enough myself but could someone take the time to seriously explain what this is and what this means for the future of trans people, as well as future trans people? Could it become illegal in every state to simply change your legal gender, and could blue states make laws to counteract this? How worried should we be exactly? Will the outcome of the midterms effect this? What are the best and worst case scenarios? What's the most likely to happen?

&amp;#x200B;

Please only leave serious comments with thought put into them, don't say things like ""We're all fucked"" or ""Don't worry everything is okay"".",asktransgender
Does my passport gender marker *have* to reflect my current appearance? (US),"I'm looking to get my passport redone and I'm curious if I need to update my gender marker. If not, do I have to apply for a limited validity one? (2 years as opposed to 10 years)

&amp;#x200B;

Every time I tried looking this up I only found  \_how\_ to change it rather than \_if\_ I need to change it 😕

&amp;#x200B;

edit: As for why I'm asking this, I need an updated passport for immigration related stuff, and I'd like to have this in order as soon as I can. Getting the sex marker changed isn't really a priority for me.",asktransgender
How do I stop letting my dysphoria turn me into a recluse and a dick.,"I have an amazing group of friends who have always supported me, but my dad doesn't support me at all causing me to not be able to transition. I've got a few more months till college, but I've noticed myself getting more and more frustrated at the fact that I can't do anything about it now and it's coming out in ways I don't want it to. I've started not talking to them as much and when I do, I'm kind of an asshole. ",asktransgender
Sneaking coming out at the inpatient day centre of a local psychward lol,"So as I have mentioned before I will be visiting the Inpatient Day centre at the psychward everyday for the next 5 weeks. I'm doing this to help with my depression. Today I had a conversation with my psychiatrist and told her about my experience during the weekend with a group of catholics and about how I came out to one of them and was not rejected and so on. She asked if I had came out to other people in Inpatient Day Centre and I said I hadn't. Then she said that I should think about coming out to these people, because my trans experiences or at least some of them are related to my depression. And tomorrow we are having movie therapy, where we will be watching some movie(each of us can choose a movie and bring it to show it to others) and when will have a discussion about how the movie relates to ourselves in one way or another. So I thought that I will bring The Danish Girl. It would serve as my coming out and I wouldn't really need to say anything more. So yeah, tomorrow will be a stressful day, but since I wasn't rejected by a very religious person, I hope these people will accept me too. Wish me luck! :D

&amp;#x200B;

UPDATE: fail, I wanted to write ""sneaky"" in the title, but you get the idea",asktransgender
Insurance question!,How do I go about finding out wether or not my insurance covers HRT and bloodwork and all that stuff? I finally have my own insurance but I'm not sure how to go about finding if it covers any of the transition stuff. ,asktransgender
How do you seperate dysphoria from depression?,"I wasn't depressed, at least not before I found out I might be trans. But with some time I got/am getting over it. I don't feel depressed in my day to day life. I have anxiety, about life in general of course, this whole looking at transitioning thing is  certainly not helping. But I'm not activley suicidal, or even passivley so, in my consious thoughts. But yet, this last weekend I got blackout drunk, and according to my family, started crying and saying I wanted to kms. (I dont remember much other than yelling at one of my parents for a moment). I know that when this whole questioning thing started I felt dysphoria, or at least I think I did. Out of the blue, despite absolutely everything else being fine, I suddenly felt just wholly wrong in my body, I felt like a complete alien, and my brain kept telling me that being female would fix it. But since then... nothing, or, near nothing. The worst of it ended in a few days and it tapered off in the following months. And thus, I'm scared to go forward with anything. What if it was depression all along, and my brain just latched onto this. What could happen if I got on an anti-depressant and all this went away? What about the dysphoria I felt? Will it go up? Down? Would taking anti-depressants just be treating symptoms or is the cure I needed in the first place. Please can someone help me out here I'm scared. How is it that I don't feel suicidal in my consious thoughts, but I do when all the inhibitions on my mind are let go. The dysphoria doesn't act that way. Its all making me very confused, and making me think that I made up this whole thing.",asktransgender
Shall I wait to diet?,"So I've been steadily gaining weight over my HRT and at first I was worried about it, but now I'm just wondering if I should bother dieting now, or wait till a year or two into HRT. 
My reasoning is that I don't want to inhibit the hormones effects by going into a calorie deficit and the only way I can manage to diet successfully is intermittent fasting.  So would it be better to just not stress about it, and do damage control once a good amount of hormone time has passed, unless ofcourse the weight gain gets really out of hand? 
My diet isn't horrendous so I will be looking to tidy it up a little. I think the only issue is just being hungry all the time, but it's a weird hunger, as it almost feels like an absolute life or death need :P ",asktransgender
"Thank you all for always being reliable and supportive, you all diserve the best life has to offer.",,asktransgender
Sub for non-transitioning or delayed transition support?,"Is there a community focused on providing support for those who recognize they are transgender but, for whatever reason, have elected not to transition or who are delaying their transition? ",asktransgender
Trans Health Services in Colorado,"So, I've recently decided that I want to go on hrt and transition. Problem is, I live in South Dakota, which I'd need 12 months of seeing a therapist before I can get anything, even for blockers, much less hormones. I've been planning to go to Colorado to try to go to an informed consent clinic, but calling around, I have yet to find an appointment less than 3 months out. Are there any clinics that tend to be less busy? I can certainly schedule one that far out, but I don't want to wait that long and would rather not go the DIY route.",asktransgender
Opinion: Trans and GNC folk should treat pronoun usage more strictly.,"Shit title I know, but I'm nonbinary and often I'll hear a variation of this phrase from my friends: ""at least [person] gets my pronouns right"". Now, I get the idea behind this. I really do. It feels so nice to be referred to correctly, especially after a steady stream of misgenderings. But I think we as a community should hold the people in our lives to a higher standard.  

Using the right pronouns is basic human decency, and should be considered the default instead of a positive. Misgenderings, no matter how frequent, should be considered a negative instead of the default. We are all people. We live in a society. And we should learn to expect our identities to be respected, and anything deviating from that as disrespectful.  

Thoughts?",asktransgender
(X-post from /r/mtf )Dysmorphic due to transition and weight loss?,,asktransgender
What happens to a body with no hormones?,"This is a weird question. Bear with me.

I've been thinking a lot about whether or not I want to keep my ovaries. My main concern is whether or not I will always want to take testosterone. However, I'm also concerned about prolonged testosterone use increasing my risk for ovarian cancer, so I'm all sorts of conflicted.

Then I had this thought - certainly in part due to recent events despite not living in the US - if I do remove my ovaries, and one day am forced to stop taking testosterone for one reason or another, what happens to my body? Do I just... deteriorate? Is your health at severe risk without being able to produce any sex hormones? ",asktransgender
Intended use of birth certificate?,"Does anyone who has filled out a birth certificate revision form (specifically Pennsylvania's) know what I'm supposed to put here? I'm not *doing* anything with it, just getting the marker changed.",asktransgender
Questions about the social aspects of gender dysphoria and being transgender.,"I have been going back and forth on whether I should write this or not. My intentions aren't to invalidate, but while trying to learn about being transgender I have come upon some aspects that I have found hard to understand.

If my questions are insensitive or inappropriate in any way I'll remove the thread immediately, nor do I intend for any follow-up questions to be seen as anything than trying to inform myself. Nor do I believe that any paradoxes about being transgender invalidates in any way people identifying as such.


With that said, I am interested to know in what regard other peoples perception plays in to your own well-being as a transgender or as someone suffering from gender-dysphoria? To what extend is it important to you that others see you as your gender and does it hurt when others misgender you unintentionally?

I'm asking because unlike sexuality, gender seems far more elusive to me, and I have heard anecdotal examples that suggest being a happy transgender isn't purely about inward perception matching outward expression, but also how other people perceive you. Have I understood that correctly?",asktransgender
Rant on the curret state of everything with a question at the end,Life is shit. I am a minor who is trans in a state that classifies being trans as a mental disorder with no power to seek professional treatment until I am 18. Now all the trump bullshit trying to deny the most basic of human rights. There is no future in the us like I cannot live here anymore. And I have no power to change any of it. No one in physical life accepts me I have no friends in real life. I can't even do anything to change it when I came out as pan everyone in my life suddenly hates me. If anyone knows any cheap colleges in anywhere trans friendly please I need to be able to get out.,asktransgender
What if I see a gender therapist and they tell me I don’t need to transition?,"(Ftm) That’s my biggest fear, what should I say for them to let go on hrt? I’ve felt this way on and off since I was 14. ",asktransgender
am i transphobic for this?,i'm a straight cis girl and my SO recently came out as a trans girl. and i feel like i will lose attraction??? is this transphobic of me?,asktransgender
Feeling terrified,"I’m 19 y/o, a man (ftm). I’m in the UK. Some things have begun to scare me and it’s making me to be honest, feel suicidal. I’ve identified as male since I was 14. Finally started fully passing when I got my first short haircut this year. I got myself referred to a gender clinic at 18, and recently have been thinking about finally changing my title to mr as I’ve now saved up to do that. Suddenly, out of nowhere I felt this massive fear and doubted that I was transgender and ever since (a few days ago) its really messed with my head. It feels like if I change my title, it’s the first irreversible step. Don’t know why this scares the hell out of me. I know transition isn’t a narrow process and it’s probably clear I need to think about these things more. It’s as if I’m feeling as if I’m pressuring myself into changing my title. I can’t stand my female body, don’t want to live as female yet when I hear things like “him” and “sir” there’s still this weird uncomfortableness, however it beats over being called “she”. When I’m called “she” it feels weird as well, it’s like “oh thank god they didn’t see me as being weird (is this to do with the whole thing in the media just now, there’s this fear). I feel also if I transition I’m being a traitor to my birth gender. I expressed my fears to my boyfriend, who is cis, and he’d said he’d continue to love me regardless. I don’t know what’s happening to me. I’m sitting here on my bed and it’s 8am and I have to get up for university, and I’m exhausted and suicidal. ",asktransgender
The canary in the coal mine,"I've already spoken about this in other places and in replies to my last post, but I'd like to put my thoughts on this out there for consideration, now that I've sat and thought on it more.

No, this recent move from the Trump administration isn't necessarily a huge change from how things already were. We're not all gonna be fired and evicted come tomorrow, we're not all gonna be killed and eaten or anything. I understand that. This is, definitely, a scare/control tactic. But I want to argue that there's cause for further alarm. That this could be a warning for things to come.

Every single time the Trump administration has said they'd do something, or made some statement, people fell into the trap of believing that since it was a scare tactic (it was, to be fair), it wouldn't really happen. But basically without fail, not only did he follow through on his terrifying promises, they were worse than initially anticipated. And throughout history, other human rights atrocities and violations on a large scale started smaller, with the target group(s) slowly having their personhood chipped away at over time, their rights taken away bit by bit. Yes, this move isn't a ""huge"" shift from how things already were for us, but that's because this is only one step in a slow decline towards removing our personhood, and if it gets to that point, removing us from the world entirely.

I know it feels impossible, or ridiculous, but how many red flags do we need until that possibility, that danger is ""real"" enough to be worried about? I'm not saying to panic, I'm not saying the worst possible outcome is *certain*, or even that it's certain that things'll get worse at all, but this kind of thing has precedent, and while I'm not saying to start running around in terror, at least not at this point, I think it's dangerous to assume that it's not going to get worse, or that this isn't a ""big"" deal. 

Focus on what you can do right now, like voting, protesting, petitioning, spreading awareness, volunteering, getting all your information and paperwork in order as much as you can, ect........ first and foremost. And while we're doing that, let's think seriously about what we can do to protect ourselves in the event of things getting worse, and brace ourselves for those possibilities. 

**TL;DR:** Don't *panic*, necessarily, but be cautious, be vigilant, and be ready. This might not seem like a huge deal on it's own, in the grand scheme of things, but it could easily be a sort of 'canary in the coal mine', a beginning step in the process of slowly removing our personhood completely. Even if that never happens, it can't hurt to be braced in case it *does*. Because it can happen. Don't fall into the trap of believing it can't happen.

Focus on what we can do right now in the moment, but be prepared for worse. That's what i think, at least,,,",asktransgender
I Know This Isnt The Place To Post This But...,"Not only do I feel alone and extremely down but I also feel really unwanted. :/

Being a Transwoman who hasnt come out yet, it is really difficult for me to express my sexuality, my feelings and everything as the Woman that I am!   
I was just wondering if there is anyone on here that would want to perhaps roleplay or something...to make me feel wanted? :(",asktransgender
Are there any plans for protesting the birth certificate/federal documents bill?,"I can't find anything here or on Facebook, I reason someone better connected than me might know if anything is brewing",asktransgender
Working full time to fund SRS while being a fulltime college student?,"I'm a 21-year-old college student, and I put a lot of importance into my education. However, something happened recently that has made my dysphoria unbearable. For the first time in my life, I genuinely want to kill myself. I need to get SRS as soon as possible, as I cannot go on living like this. 

I figured if I worked ~40 hours a week for a year doing minimum wage, plus the student loans I am eligible for, I should have enough to fund my SRS. However, I know the reality of how tremendously difficult it is to work full-time while going to school. I want to get this done so badly, but I have to be realistic. Right now, I am in a constant state of misery, but I have big ambitions and I really cannot have my grades suffer.

I am just so lost and overwhelmed right now.",asktransgender
Is this a viable plan for HRT? (Question about informed consent),"Hi! I'm MtF in the very early stages and looking to start HRT soon. I was looking at informed consent clinics and was saddened to find there werent any super nearby. However, there is one a few hours away. My question is: would I have to go back to that place that is a few hours away in order to continue treatment? Or could I go there to start it then move over to another, closer clinic that would normally require a therapist's note? Thanks in advance!",asktransgender
Saw a GP about my trans feelings and I think I completely disassociated as things started to look like reality,"Prefacing with I’ve been seeing a gender lpc for the past couple months. And sorry for the long rant. 

I’ve got an extensive history, but some of the major things in my life up until about 1.5 years ago was relentless verbal abuse from brother/sisters/family/school kids my entire life about my weight as a former 300lb person. I’ve adopted the notion that *I am* nothing but what the scale says. It’s turned into eating disorders, and a current weight of ~150-160lb. My therapist doesn’t specialize in body dysmorphia so she doesn’t *help* me figure out what to do, but let’s me vent and bitch about it and just reaffirms that I’m more than a number. I still have trouble believing that one, but I digress. 

I’m nearly 25 and I’ve been a shut in my entire life, and only in the past year have made my own decisions as an adult. Once I graduated high school I didn’t do anything except sit at the house hoping I’d just die from a heart attack. Basically I have no concept of making choices for myself aside from leaving my mothers toxic house and getting a job in the past year. 

——

Well about 6 mo ago I had a familiar feeling of wanting to be a girl (something I’ve experienced before but always shut it up because I never truly understood it, thinking maybe being overweight affected my T. (Hint: losing the weight didn’t change my mind)). But this time I couldn’t shut it up and it kept eating at me for a like 2 weeks. Called in sick quite a few days because of how fucked up I was feeling mentally. Found a therapist who specialized in gender stuff on the suggestion of a trans girl I met online. 

After ~4 months of seeing the therapist, my way of looking at myself has changed. When I look in the mirror I look less at my flaws and more at the feminine parts of my face (because my body is atrocious) and while I don’t get happy (I’m generally not a *happy* person, I have a sense of calm. What flaws I do have seem to be dampened and less impactful on my day to day. When I see/saw myself as a guy I just have a hatred for everything because nothing is right and it ruins entire weeks

She asked me almost every week what I think about the possibility of starting hormones, and I said I’d like to, but I have a lot of hesitations (mostly revolving around my self image and the possibility of me changing my mind and permanently changing my body to look even more screwed up). 

Regardless I’ve more or less accepted the fact that I want to be a girl, the only reason I can come up with is I want to look cute and something about being a guy just doesn’t feel right and doesn’t fit my personality. I still struggle trying to find an actual reason.

Well finally I called a doctor she recommended. Scheduling it I was a little embarrassed, my voice is very deep and I imagine how dumb it sounded to the receptionist. I had a moment of “what the fuck did I just do” after I hanged up but went about my day. 

My appt came up and I was feeling good, still embarrassed having to talk to the doctor about it all but whatever. Then she finally started talking to me about my options and I completely froze up. I’ve known for months now I have an overwhelming desire to be a girl, why now would I freak out? My therapist told me a lot of people feel super happy and excited about finally getting their prescription. Me? I felt indifferent. Why would the most liberating moment (so I’ve read/heard) do nothing for me? Seeing my face in a wig &amp; clean shaven makes me genuinely happy, but when the moment comes it’s nothing. 

I think the doctor sensed my hesitation and just offered to do some blood work to see where I’m at and come up with a plan later which I went through with. 

Mentally I forgot about the appointment I just had and was feeling indifferent. I went to see my therapist who I had an appointment with a few hours later and as I had to actually process what happened I broke down. Once again completely questioning what the fuck is going on in my life, how being a girl isn’t for me, etc.. She told me to just sit on it and let the feelings simmer down and set in and i dont need to figure thIs out right now. She tells me its all normal, but im afraid its not and I actually dont want to be a girl. But it’s been 4 days and I’m still numb/depressed. 

I don’t have the same type of emotions like others overwhelmingly have, I don’t have the notion *I need hormones to survive*, although I’d certainly like to look like a girl. But super girly things like dresses/makeup/jewelry aren’t for me. I’m not into activism so you wont see me counter protesting outside of a PP and I don’t see myself posting on reddit telling other girls “you go girl ❤️!”   I’m not a flamboyant guy and i have no idea what white male privilege is. I imagine my wardrobe would look similar to my guy wardrobe, a couple of shirts, couple pairs of shorts, dress shirts for work, a pair of work slacks and a pair of jeans for when I’m feeling really adventurous, and probably some yoga pants. I just want to look like a girl, but I don’t know if I have the willpower to deal with all that comes with it. 

Why is it something can be desired so badly be unwanted at the exact same time. 

——

Not sure what I expect to get for posting this long ass sob story, but I just had to put it in writing and get it off my chest. This fucking sucks lol",asktransgender
What are some subtle / stealth ways to express femininity while still closeted?,I shaved my legs and omg they're so smooth and so validating. Anyone have any other tips that they may have tried?,asktransgender
Confused about blood tests.,"Hi.  I’ve been on HRT for 4 months now.  I’m taking 4mg estradiol sublingual and 100mg spiro daily for the last 6 weeks. My testosterone seems to be at a good level, 0.6nmol/L or 17.3ng/dL if my conversion is right.  But my estradiol level is 305pmol/L which converts to 83pg/ml.  It seems low to me but my doctor seems to think it’s good and that I should stay at the same dose.  6 weeks ago my levels were 0.6nmol/L testosterone and 377pmol/L estradiol, and that was after taking only 3mg of Estradiol daily along with 100mg spiro. 

So is that too low? Also is there anything else we should be monitoring from the lab results?  I’ve tried to look it up but get lots of conflicting info.  ",asktransgender
To the person who came into my work at the adult store today:,"Hey. You came into my work today and I chatted with you since it was empty. I had a bunch of customers come in and I didn't get to say bye when you left. You asked me about what it's like to have certain experiences of being a girl (I'm not really a ""girl"" entirely but close enough) and that how it's important to have a supportive network if you're transitioning. (You mentioned your transmasc friend who experienced a lot of medical gatekeeping and lacked a lot of support throughout his transition.) I'm posting this on reddit because you made a off handed comment that implied you use it and I thought if you were questioning you might see it on this sub. I just wanted to let you know that if you're questioning your gender right now or even wanting to start transitioning but feel unsafe or supported, if you feel comfortable enough, please come back and see me and we can talk. I'm sure you feel a lot of scary feelings and I know it's hard if you can't talk or feel no one understands. You can even message me on reddit if that's easier for you. I hope you will see this somehow even if it's a shot in the dark. The people around you, even if you only know them from a temporary connection in a transient space, really care more than you think.",asktransgender
Estrogen levels,"Hello I'm on pills(Progynova) for 7 months, my current dosage is 8 mg per day(2 pills morning, 2 evening)+100 mg cyproterone acetate(I m from Russia btw). I've had my analysis on 5 month of therapy(172 ng/L) just 3 days after jumping from 6 mg/day dosage to 8 mg/day dosage. Now(7 month) my level is on 116 ng/L. I've taken analysis about 13 hours after taking my medicine(2 pills of estradiol+50mg cyproterone acetate). Previous analysis was taken after 9-10 hours after taking pills. Are 4 hours such important in such a difference in results?  


Maybe high dosage of cypro can affect estradiol also? ",asktransgender
Social dysphoria concerns,"I came out to myself and a couple of close friends a little over a year ago as an 18 year old ftm. I've spent a long time soul searching, wondering if i was ""dysphoric enough"" to not regret transition, something that can't happen anyway because my fiance wants a wife and kids, something I don't have the heart to take away from him [though i still constantly entertain the thought in my head].

When I'm with strangers or the friends who met me as a male, or even alone, I'm full-on passing. I'm consistently getting ""Sir'ed"" in public situations, and it makes me feel like a million bucks.

However, when I'm with my family or the few times I go to church with them, I feel very self conscious of how I present male. I feel like a disappointment, and I'm constantly aware of how the conservative Christians around me think that the ""old me"" is gone and that I've somehow let the left media ""trick"" me into defying my birth gender. For this reason I tend to present slightly more female around them, and it feels good to trick them into thinking I'm still the old me, so that I will not be shunned [Not near as good as it feels to be Sir'ed].

This concerns me, and I feel like if I was ""trans enough"" I would never present as female nomatter the situation. The fact that I'm still willing to present female around the conservatives in my life just to please them worries the shit out of me and makes me wonder if my dysphoria is just ""fabricated"" or ""a phase"".",asktransgender
"In view of the news this morning, a friendly reminder that the HRC (Human Rights Campaign) has a history of not having our best interests at heart","Some may, or may not, have noticed that the HRC is collecting signatures to [""tell the Trump-Pence Administration That We Can't Be Erased!""](https://act.hrc.org/page/32262/-/1).

Before you sign, or even give them money, please consider that they have shown again and again that they don't care about transgender rights, including [opposing the inclusion of protections for transgender people](https://web.archive.org/web/20080409024947/http://www.gaycitynews.com/site/news.cfm?newsid=18883568&amp;BRD=2729&amp;PAG=461&amp;dept_id=568864&amp;rfi=6) in the [Employment Non-Discrimination Act](https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Employment_Non-Discrimination_Act) (still not signed into law). Other points of criticism with further links can be [found here](https://rationalwiki.org/wiki/Human_Rights_Campaign).
Current criticism can be found in the two opening paragraphs of [this article](https://www.currentaffairs.org/2018/09/the-human-rights-campaign-has-totally-betrayed-its-constituents).

Edit 2: Thanks, again, to u/enigmabound for providing this one: [HRC has spoken out against the proposed rollback](https://www.cnn.com/2018/10/21/politics/human-rights-campaign-hhs-transgender/index.html).

If you want to donate, there are plenty of other organisations that - as far as I can see, I'm still fairly new to all of this - did support our rights much more consistently, such as [Lambda Legal](https://www.lambdalegal.org).

Edit 1: As u/enigmabound pointed out, Lambda Legal is having [serious internal issues] (https://www.huffingtonpost.com/entry/lgbtq-lambda-legal-crisis-marriage-equality_us_5bbe6713e4b0c8fa1367c596) after a change in leadership, with a large part of their staff having left. She also mentioned the [National Center for Transgender Equality](https://transequality.org).

If you have other suggestions, or if some of the things I have written here are not accurate, I'm happy to amend this post. I'd just ask you to provide sources, as I have made an effort to do the same.",asktransgender
"What are the differences of a cis vagina vs a srs vagina, and what methods are avalible","the title really, and what methods are the best in your opinon

&amp;#x200B;

thanks in advance",asktransgender
Are silicone injections ever safe,Why do girl get silicone injections when the media says they ALWAYS go wrong ,asktransgender
How to make support group?,"I know like 8-9+ Trans people in my small town/local area that I am good friends with both online and have met them all at least once or twice in person.  


I have recently noticed that my current friend/support group is full of transphobes and assholes who are holding me back so I was wanting to contact these other people and form a ""new group"" so to speak though of course nothing formal so we could be friends/help each other/have fun etc.

&amp;#x200B;

Most of them don't know each other but I know we'd all get along well (I hope) so how do I go about doing something like that without it seeming really awkward or weird?",asktransgender
Requesting input: Writing a fantasy romance story and considering a trans character,"My wife an I are both cis and we're developing a romance fantasy web comic idea. The original idea was to do an inter-species piece, with a human soldier falling in love with an exotic humanoid creature on the other side of a war. While brainstorming, we realized that it might fit the story very well to have the creature also be trans. It seems to work well for the character and at least initially seemed like an opportunity to be inclusive.

&amp;#x200B;

I'm nervous about the idea, and maybe you can guess at why from that introduction: I'm worried that casting a trans character as a non-human will be dehumanizing. We arrived at this idea backwards, since we started from the angle of wanting an inter-species fantasy romance. My wife is excited at the idea, but I'm concerned that even if we try to be nuanced with this idea that it could be damaging.

&amp;#x200B;

We're making an active effort to educate ourselves since we're an ignorant if well-meaning cis het couple. Some of our research has been at this very subreddit. I wanted to ask for input so we can evaluate if this idea is appropriate to pursue.

&amp;#x200B;

Context for the story: We have a soldier who is striving for success and prestige in a military focused society. The society is inflexible, predatory, and values assertions of strength and pride. The soldier is cis, but he's a soft boy deep down and doesn't really fit in with his society but is striving against his nature to fit what his society expects. His success hinges on him hunting down the other major character, who is the humanoid creature. The design is the ball-park of the Qunari from Dragon Age or tieflings from DND. The creature is a member of a more peaceful society that is being targeted by the military one. It focuses on culture and science and is more socially enlightened, but is much smaller and is struggling to defend itself. 

&amp;#x200B;

The two characters are brought together by circumstances and have a enemies to lovers arc, culminating in the soldier turning against his country to side with the creatures. The creature helps the soldier throw off a lot of internalized toxic masculine ideas. The soldier helps the creature work through some ingrained trauma and resentment by tapping into an innate empathy and kindness that the military society tried to suppress. We want them to have a happy ending together.

&amp;#x200B;

The creature could theoretically be a trans male. This would be a setting where sex can be changed by magic but the magic involved may be prohibitively expensive or difficult to obtain. This would not be a transition story. The creature would already be comfortably established as male before the start of the story. The trans nature would likely be either implicit or just a background character element. The fact that the creature is trans would not be a reveal or a focus, but WOULD inform how the creature guides the soldier through grappling with the ways his society mistreats and others him. 

&amp;#x200B;

The biggest red flag for me in all this is that we have a trans character who, on the surface, can be interpreted as a literal monster. It doesn't help that Qunari and Tieflings resemble demons, either. The INTENTION is to have the military society be unfairly othering another culture, likely using them as a scapegoat for other political goals. But I'm worried no matter how nuanced we try to make the character that the knee jerk  reaction will be that we are treating trans people as something other than human. 

&amp;#x200B;

Now, it might make sense to make the creature just another sort of human. The interspecies angle is a big part of the appeal for us and we're pretty attached to the existing character design. 

&amp;#x200B;

I figure it will be impossible to please everyone with this, but I wanted to solicit some feedback to see if we are overstepping or if we're overthinking this. Thank you in advance for any comments you might have.

&amp;#x200B;

&amp;#x200B;",asktransgender
What's your take on what I should do after yesterday?,"I'm trans 18 been out sense a month before my 18th b-day and lasts few months ive  been looking into therapy, treatment and getting hormones. Yesterday though has me feeling horrible and I'm second guessing if it's worth to continue trying something to transition to just be who I am. I just don't know if i should continue or tell mom it was all a lie which is a lie and go hide in closet again. What is your take for what I should do? If this helps I live in Wisconsin.",asktransgender
"DAE Ever Get a Transdermal Patch that Just has no ""stick""","I've been using Estradiol Transdermal System patches for the last couple months... and in my first box, I got one patch that seemed to have no adhesive at all.  


I've just now gotten another patch from my second box which had a bit but just seems very tentative in terms of adhesive.   


I applied to clean, dry skin etc...  


I actually called the manufacturer and filed a report - they're going to contact my pharmacy and see if they can get me a replacement box and also going to send me a mailer so I can send them the current defective patch (I threw out the first bad one figuring 'eh, sometimes there's just a glitch in the system', but running into yet another, this is a pattern and also it's now causing me difficulty because my insurance won't let me refill early )  


Anyway, Just curious if anyone else has run into ""patch no stick"" issues (this particular one was from Sandoz which is a generic from Novartis)  


I did some reading and it seems that the adhesive and the medication are bound together so no stick means possibly messed up dose... so just slapping some medical tape on top to keep it in place isn't a viable solution from what i can tell.",asktransgender
it feels suffocating,"Going to school tomorrow morning. I am the only trans person on campus in my classes. I am sure none of my classmates care or know about the White House plan to eradicate my identity. But, I will wear my they/them pronouns on trans flag pin button tomorrow. no point to not be outwardly, loudly trans anymore. if I am going to be eradicated, I will be fucking loud. fuck cis white Christian people and all their shenanigans and elected goons in the white house.",asktransgender
Mom of ftm son - questions...,My son is 7 months on T. He has come a long way and we are proud of him. He mentioned he wants an STP for Christmas. I’m at a loss. I’ve found many sites. I’m wondering if anyone here has gotten one they’d recommend. I want to get him one that’s a good quality and easy to use. Any recommendations?,asktransgender
Where to start with HRT in Augusta GA?,"I have tried to find therapist through my job but most are booked through the holidays. 

I'm told go to planned Parenthood. We no longer have one here. 

However, we do have a equality clinic. 
FREE Blood Lab Work
FREE Pap Smear
FREE Dental Screening (dental work can be completed at AU dental school at a reduced amount)
FREE HIV Screening
FREE Mental Health Screening
LBGT Support Group


Issue is in order to be eligible for income must be under $30,000 and you are underinsured for the gender transition. 

I make a lot more than 30,000. They don't verify income but I don't want to lie. I just want to start the hormones. I do plan to get better insurance once open enrollment starts. 

Does anyone know where would be best to go? Thanks",asktransgender
Thoughts on Steven Crowder,"Hi,

I recently discovered Steven Crowder. He is good at making compelling arguments about controversial issues.

He recently released a video called ""There are only two genders, change my mind""

After watching most of his videos, I don't think he really wants his mind changed. 

What do you think about this? What argument would you use against him? What would you say to him if you could talk to him? 

https://youtu.be/WtftZPL-k7Y

**NO HATE, I HAVE NOTHING AGAINST THE LGBTQ OR TRANS COMMUNITY, I AM JUST CURIOUS**
",asktransgender
Anyone else feels like gender identity is seen as a choice? And that we are still seen as biologically our assigned at birth gender?,"I was just reading the comments about an interview of a non binary person in a liberal local news paper an I could not stop thinking that we are not making progress with focusing only on gender identity.

Gender identity is either a joke to people or they respect it but still believe we are biologically the assigned at birth gender.

An identity is fluent. I have not identified as a woman before but I do now. Does that not communicate that it is a choice? That we ""want"" to be that gender? Unless we communicate an explanation? Science has one but we seem to not want to communicate it.

I have been called a biological essentialist in the past and maybe I am. But I believe we need to fight more about the fact the we are not correctly assigned at birth because we are **biologically** not that gender. As there is no research that shows that we are but a ton of research like [this](https://sci-hub.tw/10.1016/j.yfrne.2011.02.007) that shoes that we are not. 

""Sex differences in cognition, gender identity and sexual orientation are programmed into our brain during early development. There is no evidence that one’s postnatal social environment plays a crucial role in gender identity or sexual orientation.""

I know that many are afraid of being determined by brain tests but we should not fear science. Only wrong conclusions from it. If brain scans will show a more feminine brain for someone who identifies as male than we just need to do more research but **not prevent transition**. But I still think that it is our responsibility to educate the general public about the fact that the brain does have a gender.

What alternative explanation about a gender identity is there? That it is partially social is still acknowledging that it is biological to some extend. That it is totally social? That contradicts the study I posted and it will male parents afraid of making a child trans...

&amp;#x200B;",asktransgender
"If this new law passes, will people who already received a name and gender change be forced to change back?","Asking for a friend, who also happens to be me. Trying to get my gender and name changed RIGHT NOW in case things go super south.",asktransgender
Trana individuals that are deadnamed/misgendered after death,"I'm writing an article for my Journalism class and I was wondering if people could send me links to trans people that got deadnamed/misgendered qhen their deaths were reported on.
Edit: please post them in the comments so my DMs don't get flooded ",asktransgender
What can I do to fight against this Transgender right bs?,"His midterm is coming up, but is other candidate even guaranteeing lgbt right? If it does not, which state is the least anti lgbt? And if we fail this, does that mean they just gonna abruptly take away our hrt? I have to do something, I want to transition, and I'm not letting any of these people stop me. If it come down to it, I move to Canada if I have to",asktransgender
Mom wants to meet with detransitioners.,"This goes hand in hand with [this](https://www.reddit.com/r/asktransgender/comments/9kuuji/parents_think_ill_regret_hrt/). I'm 14, by the way.

I really don't know what to do. I can't get on T until my parents agree, according to my therapist. My dad wants to wait. My mom wants to meet with detransitioners (and trans people, I guess, that's what she said) because she thinks that I'm going to detransition. Spoilers, I'm not gonna do that.

Their whole argument is ""well, let's wait for you to discover yourself more"" but when I pry it turns into ""I think you'll detransition and I don't want you to be trans"". My mom admitted she didn't want me to be trans today. I don't either, I guess, but it still kinda hurts because my parents are the ones I depend on for support and I like to think they're really supportive, too.

How can I convince my parents? What are my next steps? It doesn't seem like talking to them is getting me anywhere.",asktransgender
Feeling weak,"Idk if it's the stress from yesterday or the hrt but I feel really weak today. I'm moving slow, I have a little bit of dizziness and numbness and I'm worried it's something to do with my blood pressure. I know the common advice is to call a doctor but I just got a promotion and I start my new position today so I don't want to screw it up. Idk has anyone else experienced this?",asktransgender
Comics,"Are there any good online comics, either serious or satirical, that have a transgender focus?",asktransgender
Girlfriend's libido on decapeptyl,"After a good few months of pushing, we finally got a GP to prescribe her blockers so that she could stop taking Finasteride. After a rough few weeks, the decapeptyl has fully kicked in and her T levels are now nonexistant and things just feel weird.

&amp;#x200B;

Her sex drive has fallen off a cliff, along with her sense of physical attraction. I try to initiate things (something that I'm admittedly not super great at) and her response is lukewarm at best. It feels like I'm pushing her towards sexuality and if she has no interest it feels somewhat selfish and pointless.

&amp;#x200B;

Can anyone who has been on this drug offer me any advice or experiences? Is her baseline libido pretty much dead forever? Is there any advice for actually stimulating it?",asktransgender
Red rash on Alora Patches?,Anypne else get red blotchy rashes with the patch? What did you do and how did ypu fix it?,asktransgender
The Trump regime is undoing trans-inclusive definitions at a federal level. What does this mean for our rights at the state level?,"[Here's your depressing, depressing context](https://www.nytimes.com/2018/10/21/us/politics/transgender-trump-administration-sex-definition.html?partner=rss&amp;emc=rss)

I know red states are probably screwed. But I live in a blue state, and was wondering if defining gender as ""biological sex at birth"" at a federal level can undo the trans protections that exist here?",asktransgender
"Am I safe, if my gender marker is already changed?","In light of today’s news. I can’t figure out how much danger I’m personally in. My birth certificate has been changed and all my forms of ID (drivers license, passport, social security) are changed.

Could that be reverted, somehow? Or is it just gender markers would be frozen the way they are if these proposals go through?",asktransgender
What happens if you take TRT and HRT at the same time?,"Suppose you have male genitalia that no longer produce T and a mostly male physique, what kinf of changes would happen as a result of exogenous T and E? Has anybody done this before? Curious as to the results.",asktransgender
Bathroom anxiety,"I usually try to avoid public bathrooms unless it’s emergency and even then I use the unisex if it’s available. Unfortunate it wasn’t at Home Depot. I look too feminine to use the men’s and still scared to use women’s. Decided to use the women’s but waited outside for a long time to make sure that no one was inside. I was so wrong. I stepped in and noticed a long line of ladies waiting. I was almost about to run out before I noticed that some of them were actually looking at me with a smile. Im kicking myself for having all this anxiety for nothing. Not all situations may be as comfortable and simple, but it’s start I’ll guess. It was also so much cleaner then the men’s !",asktransgender
How can I get my gender marker changed on my birth certificate in California?,"I'm a minor and my mom is cool with it, idk about my dad but he's not involved in my life so he'll probably just sign off on it and go back to whatever he's doing ",asktransgender
Loneliness - warning potential dysphoria triggers,"I swear I've never felt more alone than right now. I need companionship, I feel like I've not just gone back into the closet, but now into a pit with only a small pocket of light seeping into the cavernous space around me. Somedays the light only seems to illuminate my lack of progress and heighten my dysphoria.

I've never felt such strong self hatred, I feel like I don't deserve love, I am wrong, I need to distance myself from everyone. Why? Why couldn't I just be right? Why can't I just be happy in my assigned at birth gender? Why couldn't I just be born as my true self? Why does the world hate me? Why can't I find someone who will love me for who I am and not be caught up with the fact that I'm trans?

How can I get over the self hatred? Sorry for potentially triggering but I can't deal with this alone anymore. Thanks in advance for your help.",asktransgender
i'm scared.,"cis het girl here. my SO of 3 years recently came out as a transgirl and i am so scared

she has changed in behaviour probably due to letting off all the repression and while i know it is the same person, i still never knew who they were. i guess?

and then theres the appearance changes which are more overwhelming than they should be. nothing like surgery or hormones but shes shaven her body hair and put on feminine clothing which i cannot help but feel... is off putting and a shock...

i go to mypartneristrans but its dead and not as active",asktransgender
Public Service Announcement (sort of) - Love Your Body,"I've been around here for a while.  I'm 35 and MtF, just recently started a small dose of estradiol.

I've suffered from a number of chronic physical and mental ailments during my entire adult life (which may or may not be related to my gender).

I've visited a number of different forums on Reddit, Facebook, and other web sites where people discuss their illnesses.

After well over a decade of this, I've observed many people (and myself!) despairing and hating their own bodies because they don't feel right.

I know that it's horrible suffering from gender dysphoria, depression, anxiety, insomnia, and many other ailments, but at the end of the day, we only have one body, and we may curse our luck that we were born into a body that makes us feel so wrong sometimes.

I've heard these words many times, and I've said them myself: ""I hate my body!""

It seems totally rational to be angry and hateful that we have so many problems with this vital thing that so many other people just take for granted, and I don't want to invalidate anyone's painful experiences.

However, I've found it much more productive to instead say, ""I know that there are many things wrong with my body, but I really want to take care of it as best I can because it's the only one I have.""

""I love my body.  How can I make it work better for me?""

At the end of the day, I find an attitude of self-love and compassion much more motivating to do what I need to do to feel better.",asktransgender
Is it possible to completely hide being trans from an employer post-transition given several years of HRT?,"I'm trying to decide whether I should transition.  I want to be a doctor, so if I end up transitioning I need it to be 100% hidden from an employer because if I end up on the hook for ~$200,000 in student loans I can't afford to risk my job on the hopes that my boss will be accepting.  

More than likely, I'm going to have roughly eight years of college.   I'm sure that that's enough time for HRT to get me to pass, but obviously my paperwork is going to be an issue.  What documents show my AGAB?  Can all of them be changed?  Is there any way for an employer to see if they've been changed?

I'm probably going to live in New York state.  I'll definitely have a job through college so I can afford HRT and fees for document changes.  I don't care if that job knows; it would be in a different field so word probably wouldn't travel.",asktransgender
Do I think I'm not a woman because I was never treated as a woman?,"I know everyone is justifiably freaking out right now but I just had a weird thought...

I'm pre most everything but I've talked to a lot of people about this at this point. I'm AFAB and my mannerisms are decidedly unfeminine, I feel like, a lot of the times. I know a lot of women have talked about how they are treated this way or not being taken seriously that way or whatever because they are women. And I do feel like I have gotten significantly less shit because of my unfeminine mannerisms in a lot of ways. I am also very ugly so I guess some of the crap that women complain about has never been my problem.

But this was making me think,

Do I not think of myself as a woman because I was never treated like a woman, and therefore never acted like a woman, or did I never think of myself as a woman and therefore not act like a woman and am therefore was not treated like a woman, or is me not being treated like a woman just a delusion based on me not perceiving myself as a woman, and it's irrelevant to my appearance and mannerisms?

&amp;#x200B;",asktransgender
"My disabled partner depends on me for her care, she wants me to halt my hormonal transition and I don't know what to do.","I've been with my partner over 7 years now, a year or two into our relationship she became chronically ill and now requires heaps of help just to live a semi-normal life. 

Late last year I realised that I wanted to hormonally transition MtF, she's always been supportive of my gender exploration and was really great about me coming out as a trans-woman. She (jokingly apparently) suggested that I start taking the contraceptive pills that hadn't worked out for her, which I did because I knew it was something I wanted but was anxious about talking to doctors and still somewhat gender-questioning so I thought doctors wouldn't take me seriously at all (cyproterone/ethinylestradiol pill started about November last year). 

I was really happy with how my body was changing and felt more confident about my gender having come out to my parents (they took it well), changes were slowing and pills were running out; it was making me really anxious so I knew I had to talk to a doctor. Fortunately he was really good about it and referred me to a clinic that have been really helpful, a few months back they prescribed me a more appreciable dose of cyproterone to take along-side my regular pill as an anti-androgen (apparently the usual prescription for MtFs in my country) and they're planning on putting me on the safer option of estrogen instead of the contraceptive pill in a month or so (can't remember the name but I think it's the same one used in the US).

**So here's the problem...** when I started on the higher dose of cyproterone I couldn't control my anger as well, I don't know if stressors where just piling up or if the hormones turned me into a real asshole but I started stupid arguments and said things I can't take back, the stress on her may have made her lose some of the sensation to her body and she tried to kill herself **four** times. I got really ragey and told her that I didn't want to hear when she was upset ever again, I was the only one she could trust to talk to and I just told her I never wanted to hear it because I was mad. 😢

So what the hell am I supposed to do? I keep trying to convince myself that it won't be as bad because the change will be different/lesser but I can't know that for sure. She said that if I go through with the change it proves that I don't really care about her and that if it turns out like last time she'll make an attempt on her life while I'm out of the house unable to stop her. She has nothing to live for but me and I can't risk being such an asshole to her again but on the other hand I feel like if I don't go through with this change it'll never happen and that scares the hell out of me. I feel like whatever choice I make is just going to lead to one or both of us suffering and I don't know what to do. Does anyone have advice? Please.",asktransgender
Thought about making this post for a while now. Recently got hit with a 30 year snowball. I think today is the day I should share my experience.,"How could I not know?

Even when I was little I fantasized about being a girl. I would daydream about being forcibly feminized by the girls in my grade and remade as ""one of the girls.""

Well apparently that wasn't enough to tip me off. 

I specifically remember once that I tried to wear my sister's Snow White dress from Halloween while playing with the girl from across the street. My mom put the brakes on that real quick (although, in hindsight, my mom is pretty chill about these things and I think she would've let it happen if there hadn't been other parents over to judge) 

I started crossdressing when I was around 13. Going through the laundry and drawers to find stuff to wear when no one was home. Still I told myself that these were normal fantasies. If I was somehow to become a girl, I would just fantasize about being a boy anyway.

But that didn't always satisfy me. I even remember once making up my mind to fake my death and get a sex change when I got older lol. Still, apparently, that wasn't enough to let me know what was going on. I always thought of being trans as something separate from what was going on with me. I told myself it was a fetish. I wasn't trans. Not possible. Especially since I didn't experience what I today understand as dysphoria. I was always ok with being male. But in the deepest recesses of my mind, I knew what I would rather be.

High School was pretty typical Americana. Played football and baseball. Chased girls. Got my heart broken. All parts of growing up. I was able to put my gender identity away inside me. When I went away to college I used my new found freedom to explore the world of internet porn. Apart from there, I would never acknowledge how I felt. Even if I would crossdress on occasion when I was home on break. 

College was also typical. Did well in school. Had a ton of friends. Had plenty of girlfriends. It eventually dawned on me that I was a pretty attractive dude. I think that played into my lack of dysphoria in a way. I was able to feel comfortable and validated as a guy. 

I bring this up because if you ran into me IRL, you would probably never suspect me. Within the last year I started checking out the trans subs here on Reddit. I told myself I was just being supportive. I was just learning more about other people. I saw the memes of r/traa and became familiar with the term ""egg."" And so, slowly my own shell started to crack. 

Started following famous transwomen on Instagram. Again. Just out of support. In private I started dressing again and experienced new things like femalePOV porn. And I began experiencing jealousy of girls that I saw. 

I still had no idea apparently.

Anyway, Chanel Santini and Aubrey Kate finally burst that shell of mine lol. Something that was nearly 30 years coming. I realized I would consider doing something about my gender if I could guarantee to look that good. My shell didn't stand a chance and I finally I got hit with a snowball that spent 30 years rolling down a hill straight for me.

It was then that I thought about making this post. I wanted to tell someone. I wanted some slice of the human populace to know the truth.

This lead me to another realization though: I'm not as brave as you guys and girls. I won't be doing anything about my new found realization. My friends wouldn't understand. My family probably wouldn't disown me but it would be hard on them. I also have the love of an amazing woman and I don't want to put her through that.

Like I said. I thought about making a post like this for a while. I wanted to be honest just once. Not for myself. But I believe I owe it to all you brave men and women out there.

Today's news finally pushed me into sharing. Not because of how it will affect me. But how it will affect you. I can hide. I can adjust. But not everyone has that ability. Rather than dysphoric, I feel euphoric when I think about being who I would choose to be. It's something I have always felt. Perhaps if I was 10 years younger and could choose how I look as if I had a ""Character customization menu"" I would do something about this. But unfortunately science isn't quite there yet. 

So I'm gonna stay here. On the inside of cis society. Subtly dropping knowledge on people. Trying to get them to see transpeople as people. Never tipping my true hand. I feel like it's the least I could do in solidarity. Because in all likelihood, the only people that will ever know my truth are the people that read this post. 

With love,

Me",asktransgender
How do I find an accepting roommate?,"I’m planning on renting an apartment when I turn 18 in December and I’m not sure how to find a roommate without putting myself at risk. I’m afraid that if I just go on Craigslist and say that I’m trans someone might target me or something. I might be paranoid, but I could really use some advice. How did you all find roommates? 
I live just outside of Kansas City if that matters. ",asktransgender
"In light of the current US news, should I get surgery, change my name, and change my BC as soon a possible?","(I'm required to get top surgery in order to change my BC, so that kind of *has* to come first)

And what can I do to speed up this process as fast as possible???? I'm realizing very quickly that my state could feasibly change its laws any time so that I can't change my BC even if I get surgery. Especially with, uh, current news. But I'm poor, disabled, have no credit, and am only able to work part-time. I know it's a long shot, but is there *anything*, however minor, I can do to speed up this process (any organization that can help me, any tiny odd-job like things that don't take up a lot of time/energy/transportation, ect).

And...... would it even be worth it? Or would it just open me up to being eventually considered a non-person by the US entirely? I was going to start trauma/OCD therapy, which I desperately need, very soon, but I'm very seriously considering just canceling on that and....... somehow pulling through somehow, if I have to, to get this done. 

I want honest thoughts on this, please,,,, What do you think is best? What should I do? Is it even worth it to try? Is there any hope for me to be able to get this all done in a year? Is there anyone or anything that can help me?? 

Please,,, I'm kind of freaking out.",asktransgender
Uh-oh... People aren't too happy about that trans woman who won the cycling championship...,"https://www.reddit.com/r/news/comments/9q279k/not_fair_world_cycling_bronze_medalist_cries_foul/?st=jnj0v5gx&amp;sh=6daa1860

For the love of god, don't delve too deeply into those comments...

So... honestly I'm not sure where I stand on this specific situation. She argues that she shouldn't need to be on T blockers (but, presumably, she was, otherwise I'm not sure she'd be allowed to compete)... Cis women are tested for doping with T, so this bronze medalist might have a bit of a point in that this isn't quite fair.

Regardless, I dont think this story is going to be a very good one for public opinion of trans women competing in women's sports.

What's everyone's opinion on this?",asktransgender
Am I trans if I don't feel dysphoria?,"I'm amab and have been questioning my gender for over a year now and in the past I've basically just been able to ignore the issue? Like I'd feel like absolute shit for a day or two and then go months without thinking about it. Then I found egg_irl and now I think about my gender nearly every day. What has me stuck is that I don't hate my body, and I don't think I'd consciously change my behavior at all to be more feminine. I just think I'd be happier as a woman. I'd like a more feminine body shape, I'd love to have my hair back, but I don't think there's anything wrong with how I am. I'm slowly starting to experiment more. I think I experienced gender euphoria when my partner called me by my chosen name. I couldn't stop smiling and it was an extremely intense feeling. I had to ask her to stop because it was so overwhelming. I also have a history of idolizing women that goes back to as far as I can remember, and when I was a tween I created a female alter ego for myself on runescape, ha. Not just to get free stuff, I created a backstory for myself. After a while I abandoned that because I was lying to people and it felt wrong. The person I pretended to be still influences me today. I also have wanted, sporadically, throughout my life to be a woman, and eventually started wanting to be trans so I could be a woman. Is that enough to be trans? I feel like I'm shoving these feelings down, but I don't want to be. I want to face this head on, but I can't",asktransgender
Birth certificate changes,"I’ve been having trouble finding a clear answer online, does anyone know (in the US) whether you change your birth certificate through the state you were born in or the state you are a resident of",asktransgender
Just talked to my dad for the first time in 4 months,"And it went terribly. He refuses to gender me correctly or use the correct name no matter what I say. I've tried everything. But nothing gets through to him. At one point he even told me to stop transitioning because I was only thinking about myself and not about my family. He claims that by calling me a different name that it somehow throws away all the memories he had of me from before. He also didn't believe me when I said a doctor said I was female and asked to see my letter so I had to show him that just to prove it. Seriously it was ridiculous. He also believes being gay is an illness, so that's great.

Sorry for the bitch session. It was just so disheartening. I just came out of one of the most important weeks of my life. I came out on Facebook, I came out at work, and then to have this conversation happen just killed all momentum I had going. My family is my biggest obstacle, and I'm not sure how I'll ever get past them.",asktransgender
DAE in the US regret transitioning due to increased federally sanctioned discrimination?,"EDIT: if I could retitle this post it would say ""Is Anyone Else Shook and Absolutely Outraged""? I fear the point of what I had to say is lost due to my poor choice of words. -end edit

Less than a week after I started HRT the moron-in-chief was ""elected"". Ever since then, it's been a shit show for trans people and it's only getting worse.

https://www.nytimes.com/2018/10/21/us/politics/transgender-trump-administration-sex-definition.html

At 43, I chose transition over misery. But it's been nothing but shit like this and it's hard/unrealistic to see it changing or getting better.

I just hate being trans. There's zero upside. It's a life of strife, pain and struggle whether you transition or not. The world does not want us to exist and that's hard to wake up to every single day.  I don't know how many more years I'll be able to ""hang in there"". It's crushingly depressing. The closet was at least safety.

If you're not terrified, you're not paying attention...

EDIT: it's concerning that there are trans people who dismiss this with a wave of the hand and some comment about ""the arc of justice, etc..."" what about Right Now?? What about your rights - right now? There is no arc - there is no justice to be found in complacency. I know it's not anything anyone wants to hear but denying it or dismissing it solves nothing.  But I'm the asshole for pointing out the world around you? Smh... we're doomed",asktransgender
Best Healthcare Insurance For Trans People?,"Hey so I was looking up insurance for my pet cuz she's not feeling well and the animal hospital is trying to get it in for free really deep x.x And I saw a great plan that covers acupuncture for pets? Anyways it got me thinking, I have decent health insurance (state medicaid) but it doesn't cover glasses and idk what other cool shit it might cover. I was wondering what the best insurances are for us so I can start there and see which also have not only like lhr and hrt covered, but also like...well stuff like acupuncture for people for example. Help me trick out my healthcare?",asktransgender
MTF becoming impotent and feeling bad for my GF,"I'm using cyproterone and estrogel for 2 months. I'm with my girlfriend for 6 years and wanted to transition for one year. My girlfriend told me she would be OK with it if I still could use my penis (no problem, I don't want SRS) .
But for few weeks, i don't get as hard as before. I am still able to have PIV intercourse and still enjoy it. But yesterday she wanted to try anal (me being on the top) and even after hours of trying I couldn't get hard enough.
That's very pleasing and frightening at the same time. Pleasing cause I see the hormones are working and frightening and because I loose this one part my GF love and don't want to be frustrated.
Did it happened to you?  How did your significant other reacted? I heard viagra works. Is it true? And if it works, does it have an effect on hormones? ",asktransgender
"Good, informative literature to give to people on the fence about being supportive?","My parents are, while not hateful, very much not okay with me being trans (they've chosen to ignore it thus far). Their initial response was to give me a book about why being trans was wrong (the author's intent was to ""criticize the trans agenda"").

So, I figured I could strike back and give them something that might actually explain where I'm coming from. Does anyone have any book suggestions that might help them empathize with me?",asktransgender
every statistic is a story and a lifetime,"trigger warnings beware

made a throwaway account just to post this. theres just so, so much i need to get off my chest. ive been watching all of you for so long from the outside on my main account that it actually feels frightening being here, but i am desperate and i know that only you guys would understand. i am tired 

people who arent transgender will always tell you theres no rush. people in my family wanted me to get a nice degree and whatever else before starting my transition. i of course went ahead to start working so i could start it. even now people act like theres no hurry to do srs, but no one understands the dysphoria pre op and the amount of unfortunate circumstances youre exposed to while stuck somewhere in between. some will go so far as to say that we chose to be this way. no one will know how it feels to have someone at a distance from you but you cant call their name loud or there will be base in your voice. or clothing restrictions to hide certain things. or the lies you have to tell to people you love to conceal yourself if youre stealth. or to look in the mirror and hate what you see. i have DID with constant voices in my head. each time i look in the mirror i hear ""freak"", ""ugly"" etc. and lets not go on to relationships. my first relationship was a traumatic experience being abusive, physically sexually and mentally. i withdraw from relationships for a while just to find myself with an emotionally abusive man. i think part of me took it because i feel guilty about being stealth and i lied too. but fact remains that the nature of both relationships is such that i know wouldnt have happened had i been a cis female. or maybe it would, but i wouldnt have had such a bad self esteem and just take what i can get because the first relationship made me feel more validated as a woman. i have broke time and time again even when i had thought it not possible anymore because of things i had been exposed to being a pre op female. on a clean slate its already important to know you cant birth your own kids after srs , and depending on your genetic lottery you might need other ops too to experience the closest thing to a normal life. but now , i feel like too much has happened already and i have incurred damages that will last me well after srs too. i am so tired i just want it all to end, but i have such a loving god sent mother to think of so i cant , but theres not a night that goes by where i pray i wont wake up the next day , so that it wouldnt be as hard for my mom as if i commited suicide. if god exists , hes evil, i hate him for doing this and giving me a happiness deprived life. i am still very young , and instead of having a youth like everyone else that i can look back on in future and smile at , its being consumed by endless dysphoria. no one whos not transitioning will truly know the importance of srs. 

and kudos to those countries who offers it for free to us. it is most certainly a step in the right direction but i still feel the importance of it is neglected considering there are years of waiting lists. to those who complain your tax money is going to fund these, you would be grateful for it god forbid you have a child who ends up needing a procedure like this , and trust me it wouldnt seem as cosmetic then 

we see so many stastics of transgender men and women who commit suicide but forget to see that each and every one of those numbers contains a lifetime, a story, each without a happy ending. sometimes happiness isnt a choice and thats a cold hard truth. kudos to leelah acorn for actually sharing a story behind her statistic, and a big fuck you to her parents for misgendering her and calling her by a male name even in death. might as well go piss on your kids grave 

the day i make my decision, i will be sure to share my story first. the whole thing, from start to end, in hopes that people may see the full implications of being transgender. because unfortunately society is such that bad things must first happen before people pay attention. i may feel more at peace knowing that maybe, just maybe the right person/s would see the meanings in my words.

tldr; losing hope that i can be happy even after srs and i dont see a way out anymore 

edit: i thought i should be more specific and give a clear example, i guess its more for non trans people to understand in case they see these. i was raped by a paedophile in my early teen years. i wasnt close to my family and they didnt know so i didnt tell them but i felt like i needed to let it off my chest with someone. i told my cousin who was in the same school as me, we grew up together and i wasnt closer with anyone at the time. the next day i went to school and next thing i know people were talking about it and laughing at me. if i were a cisfemale, being raped wouldnt have been funny , in fact the person i trusted wouldnt feel the need to tell everyone about it either. heck, cis males get raped and its not remotely funny either, but hey if youre trans guess you dont deserve to be treated like a human. 
the experience added on to the trauma and degradation, adolescent me dissociated and started deludedly rewriting the story in my memories that it was a younger guy who did it because at least that way it would feel more validating (pretty sick i know, but thats what being trans does, some of us begin to think so little of ourselves that we do these things) ",asktransgender
What are some good ways of making trans friends in person?,I'd like to surround myself with more trans friends. I have a small group of allies but they're all cis. I want to come out of the closet soon but I don't yet have the confidence and I think having more trans friends and role-models in real life would help that. I've had mostly negative results from support groups. Any other ideas? I'm in Los Angeles. Thanks!,asktransgender
Should I tell careers counsellor about cutting urges?,"I met with her last week for career counselling she doesn't know im transgender. For a careers counsellor she was very open we had a talk about my crappy childhood and my life in general. It's her who asked the questions btw i didnt vomit infos on her she was 110% confortable talking about it. I think she may be a social worker too I don't remember.

The thing is today I was super depressed all day because I was wondering if i'm trans like an idiot as usual because I had no body dysphoria as a teenager. I went to take a nap to cool off. When I woke up, I was in a state I've a lot of trouble to describe. I had this urge to cut myself because I didn't feel like I was in the right body and I wanted to 'release the pressure'. I was talking to myself trying to talk me out of it, then trying to convince me to do it, bargaining to just do 1 arm etc. After 30 minutes of ranting alone like a madman I ended up convincing myself to not do it. I was still very unstable hours later I took a knife and dropped it 2 seconds later. I did cut myself before but that was years ago.

I wished for body dysphoria, I guess I got my wish granted today. I'm so stupid

&amp;#x200B;

I want to tell her about it but I'm scared she will transfert me to a psychologue and I don't want to im want to stay with her I trust her. Is she going to transfert me if I tell her even if I don't want to? Should I just not say anything?",asktransgender
Chances of transitioning slowly,"Hi everyone!
For a while I've been thinking about trying starting HRT and I've finally decided that I want to do it. Thing is, I live in a fairly transphobic place so if possible I just want to look androgynous with some more feminine elements. I was wondering if I could take something similar to tamoxifen to stop my breasts from growing until I move somewhere else.
Was wondering what other people would recommend that I do and I'm also curious if I will be able to develop breasts later on after I stop taking tamoxifen?",asktransgender
"Gender-Neutral alternative to ""bridesmaid"" or ""groomsmen?""","Im a nonbinary person *hopefully* getting married soon, and was wondering what I could call my right hand people during the wedding.",asktransgender
Yay I look like a girl! The next day: How is it possible that I pass?,Anyone else going through loops of seeing yourself in the mirror and then it's like gone again the other day?,asktransgender
What am I supposed to do?,"And when I say I, I don't just mean myself. I mean the people like me.

The people who are too young to vote. The people who are still in high school and have to pretend that everything is okay. The people who watch from the sidelines, betting on whether or not their lives will be turned to ash. And I say ""we"" because I can guarantee there are people like me who feel the exact same way.

&amp;#x200B;

What are we supposed to do at this point? What are our options? What can we do to make this easier on ourselves, our friends and peers? I feel alone. I feel afraid. I feel like I can't do anything to remedy this pain, but the truth is that I actually can't do anything.  


I... I don't know what we're supposed to do. What's expected of us at this point.",asktransgender
Mtf and tired,"It's been a while since i actually talked to anyone about this. 
I am a transgender mtf girl from the middle east
I am in the closet,  very deep in the closet
No one knows about my story except my wife, and 2 friends,  knowing that one of them has cut ties with me. 
I live in fear,  and i am very paranoid. 
There is a war inside me,  between the dire need to express myself,  and the extreme panic i get whenever someone suspect who i really am. 
I am saving up to leave my country ASAP. 
I even applied for the DIV program (the american citizenship lottery). 
Sadly i know how hard could it be to actually win the lottery,  and i am not making enough many to travel any soon. 
The fear of losing everything and get killed is really ugly,  as i know no one could actually mourn me!  They will just say a sinner has passed away after receiving his deserved punishment. 
I hate the suit i have to wear everyday to work, and having to wear heavy clothes even in summer just to hide that i am shaving, 
And being teased just for acting a little girly or being a bit shy. 
Lately i became very alcoholic person!  Luckily alcohol is legal to buy where i live,  eventhough it's illegal to drink publicly. 
My greatest wish,  is just to feel like myself,  is that very huge to have?!. 
I just want tp scream heeeeey!!  I am a girl!!!!  Get me out!!. 
But those bastard with their fairy tails wont let me survive afterwards. 
I wish lgbt communities will give more attention to gays and transgender in muslim countries,  they suffer daily,  with every breath coming out. 
I dont mind dying,  i am exhausted already,  i just wanna be remembered as a good person earning his living and would never harm anyone!  Not as a devil and criminal. 
I just love everybody,  why cant everybody loves me back?! ",asktransgender
How did you know...,"How did you know that you were trans? I get feeling different or not right or uncomfortable in your own skin, but what was it that enabled you to identify that feeling as gender dysphoria? ",asktransgender
Operator!! find me an exit...,"You know every transphobic asshole will use this change in law as proof their hate is valid... shit could get ugly..  be careful!!!

So I think everyone is right to start freaking out.   The Christian base is showing their teeth and I don't think the show is over.  If we are going to survive this we are going to need to work together.  

Is there a need yet for an action group?  Is there some I don't know about? Do we need safe carpools out of politically unsafe areas to larger safer cities / north?   Does anyone reading this need out?  How do we define hotspots?

I recommend you spray paint your local nationalist hq... this lets everyone in your hood know where the haters are at.  Don't get caught by the pigs.  Dont take selfies with your picaso.

If the government no longer serves us we will have to serve ourselves!  Print your own identity cards!! *Just don't forge a government ID*.  While this won't solve your problems with your spot in the United Stasi pyramid(insurance, bathrooms, armed forces) it will stop the casual ID check from outing you.  Feel free to message me for your free transmetro global I.D. w/ custom gender markers... we can forge our own identity with gimp and a pcb printer.   truestorytime.. I got stopped by a bike cop so I tried my luck with my transmetro ID as well as a library card .. he gave me a ticket to my name on the card and address.  No questions.  I paid it, so apparently I'm a real human after all!

/rant",asktransgender
"Possible TW: I experienced prowling harassment yesterday, and I feel horrible. Kinda long post..","I wanted to go for a bike ride yesterday because I haven't gone in a while, and it's a good workout. So I went. I have a route I take that keeps me on populated roads but away from the really busy ones. Out of no where, this guy in an SUV slows up and starts asking for my number. I'm like no bro I'm good. He doesn't like my answer/reaction and stays persistent, keeps pace with me. At this point I'm kinda freaking out, and decide, I'm just going to go straight to a friends because her apt complex is closer than my house. I turn away, and he goes the other way. Next thing you know, there he is again! I'm like fuck me... He's like ""you don't like black guys, lemme get at that pussy!"" Im like, ""quit harassing me"" and I pull into a driveway and grab my phone out of my bag. I wait a few minutes as he drives away and I make a break to the busy road to my friends, making sure I wasn't followed (I wasn't, thank God).

A little while ago, I was catcalled while driving to work. That was the first time that ever happened to me, and oddly, I felt valid that day. I even posted about it here, and someone commented along the lines of ""that's nice, until your raped and or killed."" I was like wow, thanks for the extremism. 

Touché.. Touché.

I've known for a long time how unsafe it can be for a woman to be in public alone, but now I know first hand, and it's disgusting. It's so shitty to think that from now on, I may not be able to go for a bike ride alone in the middle of the day. This doesn't deter me away from my goals of womanhood that I wasn't raised into. But gosh, I feel like I should carry my gun now, or pepper spray at the least. It makes me feel shameful and inhuman.. fuck that guy, and any human that behaves like that. Fucking animals.. ",asktransgender
How did you realise your truename?,"Edit: thank you for your responses. I’ve changed my name on Facebook to the femme version of my birth name to try it out for a while, as I’m not settled on a first name yet.

The other ones I’m considering are Sabrina (the witch), Sabriel (Garth Nix book) and Alundra (PS1 game).

The middle name I’ve decided will be in memory to my big sister who passed away at 10 days old.",asktransgender
Humira and HRT? Safe?,"Is anyone on Humira and also doing HRT (MTF specifically)?  Or do you know if there are any serious risks from this combination?  I tried searching google and reddit but didn't really find anything.  I see my GP later this week and will ask but I very much doubt they have any experience with this combo either, and I'm not sure who would?",asktransgender
Organizations to donate to?,"In light of recent news, I was wondering if they are any good organizations that I have may have overlooked that can help the transgender community get medical care and work to push back against Trump and other right wing authoritarian. 

Thank you.",asktransgender
Sexual Orientation Change?,"I’m just curious because I’ve heard about it somewhere. After transitioning, has anyone’s sexual orientation changed? ",asktransgender
Best horror movie?,Just wanted to know. Has nothing to do with gender.,asktransgender
How can I learn more about the informed consent process?,"After spending hours trying to look for nearby therapists and endocrinologists that are trans-friendly and covered by my healthcare I feel like I've hit a wall. I've overheard people talking about informed consent before and I think it could maybe be easier for me to get what I want so bad (hormones). 

Would I still get my hormone levels checked if I went down this path? Would my dose eventually go up? I'm super clueless so any information to help me learn more would be much appreciated. Thank you ❤️",asktransgender
Self-Harm Question,"I don't know if this belongs here, but I don't know where else to put it, and I don't have a therapist, so there.  
  
So for pretty obvious reasons, I hate my body. While I've never had issues with cutting or anything like that, it makes me feel good when I see my body injured. Like, when cut myself or start bleeding pretty bad or whatever, it doesn't make me anxious or panic, it makes me sort of... glad. Like, it actively reduces my anxiety and improves my day when I see myself bleeding all over the place.  
Does this count as self harm, or is it just an unhealthy relationship with injury or something? If I were to put myself into dangerous situations to achieve this end, consciously or unconsciously, would it be self harm then?  
I'm just worried there might be a problem here  
Thanks",asktransgender
Am I trans? (18),"Okay so I’m an 18 year old male (I think 😂), and I’ve always kind of thought that being a girl would be better. It hasn’t been a strong thing, and I have not felt gender dysphoria. Growing up I’ve always been attracted to girls, and some guys, but the weird thing is, I’ve always thought being a lesbian felt most right to me, even though I’m a guy... 

Another piece of evidence is that my girlfriend is bi, which makes me kind of uncomfortable, and I don’t think it’s because she’s bi (because I’m fine with that), I think it’s because it shows me what could be if I was a girl. It shows me we could both be girls in love, which feels so right, but instead I’m a guy. If you get what I mean... 

My attitude has pretty much been that I think I would prefer being a girl if I could just choose from birth, but that feeling is not strong enough at all to warrant a transition. I am fine with being a guy, and the amount of hassle a transition entails I don’t think can be justified by the amount I want to be a girl. I know there are some people who just know and they have such bad dysphoria and for them transitioning is the way to go. For me, I don’t mind being a guy, and although being a girl seems a bit better, the extent of which I want this is not enough to warrant the damage to relationships, awkwardness of having to come out and transition, hassle of hormones, risking the chance of regret, surgery, etc. that comes with transitioning.

I have always been turned on by the thought of being a girl as well, so I figured maybe I’m not really trans, maybe this is just a kink of mine... anyway yesterday I set out to explore my feminine side a bit. I shaved my body, I bought some cute girls underwear and girls clothes and after seeing myself like that I honesty love it. It’s like opening a can of worms. In the past day, every single picture I see of a cute girl, I just want to be them. I want to be pretty, and have soft skin, and ughhhhhh

And I almost feel sad that I won’t ever be like that... this feeling just like started today after experimenting with femininity, so I’m so confused. I really don’t know what to feel I’m super confused right now. I think I should still stand by my initial attitude of not transitioning tbh. I can probably still get these experiences without transitioning with clothes, makeup, etc. 

Tl;dr always thought being a girl would be nicer, but I have never felt uncomfortable about being a guy, and am fine with it. Decided to experiment with my femininity and loved it, and now I’m confused as hell. ",asktransgender
"How many of you who play video games, have always played as your opposite birth sex even before you realized you were transgender?",,asktransgender
[MtF] Does your voice ever become natural?,"Hi all,

So I haven’t started any voice training or anything and one of the near-insurmountable tasks facing me seems to be overcoming my “natural” male voice. Does speaking femininely ever become totally natural, or is it like...permanently and consciously putting on a voice/higher pitch?

Edit: thanks everyone &lt;3",asktransgender
I don't get sublingual dosing.,"Hi everyone!

Hope you're all well, and I recently under the suggestion of my doctor tried sublingual dosing instead of just swallowing my estrodial. 

Under the tongue and wait till dissolving... No problem.. Till the saliva starts seeping in and dissolves everything... Then it's just a pool of blue... 

Did I finish it properly? Do I need let it soak in for a while? Can I swallow this gritty blue pool?  What do I do ahhhhh..

",asktransgender
Looking for HRT and facial hair removal recommendations (san francisco),"I currently have the san francisco health plan (medical) and am looking for a free trans health center for HRT. 

Also looking for a place to get laser facial hair removal. Any suggestions would be helpful.

So far I've found the mission castro health center and the lyon-martin center and I think they're free or take my city insurance.

As far as laser I had a consult at laseraway and it was $149/treatment and they recommended 10 treatments.

Thanks in advanced :)",asktransgender
SRS questions: dilation and depth?,"I have recently been researching hormone therapy and reassignment surgery in the hopes that one day I might be able to transition myself, but I keep coming across two things that I am curious and slightly frightened by. Unfortunately, I have been unable to find actual answers by browsing so I've decided to ask instead.

People keep mentioning dilation and I am confused as to what that is. I know that it is painful, it lasts forever, and that there is something (I don't know what, exactly) that needs to be done about it, but that is all.

Another is SRS depth. I may have misunderstood how SRS works, but if I am correct in my assumption, my depth would be 4-5 inches. I've heard that this might be painful during intercourse and that does worry me. Is there a way to increase that number, even if it costs more?

All-in-all, I feel as though this procedure seems very painful despite its benefits. Is this true? I do like the idea of fully transitioning but I am scared.",asktransgender
Estradiol vs Conjugated estrogen,"So, i just started HRT a couple of days ago and my endo prescribed me 0.625mg of conjugated estrogen every 24 hrs with 100mg of Spiro as well. I wonder what do you think of this and if anyone knows pros and cons of taking conjugated estrogens instead of estradiol? Thanks!

&amp;#x200B;

Edit: a word.",asktransgender
Anyone know the current wait times for GRS Montreal?,"I got approving for my funding in June. I am curious about current wait times. My friend got her funding approval the same date I got mine but she already has had a surgery date for almost a month now, but I haven't heard of anything.

I called last week and they said to wait. ",asktransgender
Does anyone else feel that being transgender tends to define who you are? And complicates or overshadows your aspirations?,"I'm not sure exactly why I feel this way. But when I see a transgender person for some reason that aspect of their character seems to manifest itself in every other aspect of their character. It's hard for me to see a transgender person as just another individual. When I think about the concept of transitioning. My initial thoughts are that I'd have to sacrifice many of the things I aspire to achieve. Like being a politician, scientist, or journalist. 

Part of me sees it almost as the ""easy way out"". For some reason. Since the act of transitioning is so overwhelming it seems like an excuse for me to discard some responsibilities somehow. idk",asktransgender
Help me understand what being transgender means,"Long story short, I once hated gay people. It was a religious thing that was taught to me. ""Being gay is wrong"". You know. Religious brainwashing.

I'm now 100% accepting of gay rights, and I understand that it's not a choice. People are born this way. EVEN if someone doesn't act gay, it could be because of their surroundings. Maybe they act straight because they don't know what their family will think of them, or their friends. They don't want to be judged. Whatever. But deep down, you know these people have always felt a certain way.

Is that the same with being transgender? I mean I'm sure you didn't wake up and be like ""Hm... I don't want to be a man anymore today"". Did you ALWAYS feel a certain way about yourself, but just kept it hidden because maybe you felt your family or your friends would judge you negatively?

I'm posting here because obviously I'm open to having my mind changed. One of my good friends is trans. I'm taking the right steps I believe.

It's just... deep down I still don't see my friend as what she wants to be identified as. It's a biological born male who is transitioning into a female. And I try to use the proper pronouns out of respect, but like...

In short, I feel like I'm lying to my friend. Telling him that he can be a woman. And it's just... no. You are a man. You were born a man. And biologically you will always be a man. I'm lying to my friend and giving him false hope that he can be what he wants to be. And he can't. No matter how many hormones he takes. He will always be a man. That's who he is.

I've seen the mental breakdowns that my friend goes through, and honestly I feel like he needs professional help. Like it's bad. The breakdowns are really bad.

I'm not here to stir the pot as the rules on the side say. I'm honestly asking because I want to be more open and understanding of transgender people. I just feel like I'm lying to them by telling them they can be something that they're not.",asktransgender
Anyone around or east of Atlanta want to help in a photo series?,"So I'm a photography major and I'm also a transwoman. I've been wanting to do a photo series on other transppl for a while now and it would actually line up to be perfect for a final for a class! I want to create a story that's like a ""day in the life of,"" where I just spend a day with each person and kind present it in a very raw but refined way. It could be anything at all, but I want it to be an intimate look into the life of trans people and kind of what we go thru day to day - whether as normal as eating dinner and brushing your teeth or putting on a binder or taking HRT. It's not really modeling much - though some unique posing and maybe even some nudes could be really interesting in the story - but rather being open and forming a connection with the photos. I feel like there isn't enough work about us and our lives, so I'd love to contribute something with my art. 

Basically if you know Atlanta I'm in the suburbs east of it, right between Atlanta and Athens so both location are pretty equal distance lol If you know anyone around here who might me interested don't be afraid to hmu!!",asktransgender
What are the chances of becoming pregnant while on T and birth control?,I’ve been on T for over a year now and started getting the depo birth control shot and have been keeping up with it since February. I had unprotected sex on Tuesday morning and today noticed some cramps and a bit of spotting. Has anyone else dealt with this? Is it possible I somehow got pregnant? ,asktransgender
My career or my gender identity?,"I'm 17 AMAB, and something that keeps holding me back (as I'm sure it does many people) is thinking about my future. Now, that in itself is a whole other topic, but I guess the TL;DR is: Was pressured to be a doctor all my life but have no interest, the only careers I can see myself being in revolve around fine arts, specifically acting. 

Just yesterday I talked to a family friend who has been acting for 40 years. Due to my upbringing, I never considered that acting can actually be a viable career. She told me ""Yes"". She's seen my shows, and I'm starting to get more involved within my local acting community, which is actually fairly big.

What I'm thinking is, this door has just opened: You can be an actor. You can do theatre, TV, ect. You can enjoy your career. 

Personally I have no plans on settling down, I mention that because it's usually one of the arguments, ""Oh you can't afford to raise a family as an actor"". 

But with this door opening, I feel like the door to my true gender identity is closing. Acting is already hard enough, the industry is tough. Being trans would make things even worse. If I transition soon enough, will I be able to pass? What about voice though, I couldn't do musical theatre. I'd have to pick something else.

Or, I could do what I did for ten years: repress. Repress the dysphoria, the confusion, the yearnings. But get to do this. Get to have fun. Maybe the fun will be distracting enough. Although I'd get cast in male parts, sing tenor, ect...

So I'm wondering if anyone has a similar experience, related to their career and their gender identity, who could provide some insight or advice.



",asktransgender
Feeling like “One of the girls” or “One of the boys” (MtF perspective),"Hi everybody!

Transition is the best thing I have ever done by far, so don’t the wrong idea with this post, especially questioning folks.

I’m around six months on HRT and I have started passing (usually at work when I’m wearing a hat and people make very quick decisions on your gender) and I’ll get called ma’am and she and all that and it feels amazing, and so right. But the problem I’m running into is I still “feel like a man.” I feel like I shouldn’t even consider myself a girl (I do, I haven’t misgendered myself in months). I just don’t *feel* like a woman, which was a worry I had from when I was questioning. As my body changes and I start to see a woman in the mirror, will this get better? Or is it due to internalized transphobia or something? I can’t figure it out. I just kind of hate it when people think I’m a cis woman because that’s NOT who I am. I feel estranged from other trans women too, like I just feel like a hecking man and I don’t FEEL like a woman and it’s ripping me apart!! Does anyone have any tricks or tips to get past this and feel like your gender? Or even encouraging words. It’s really getting me down. Also I don’t feel like a sister to my sisters at all. I still feel like their brother and it’s killing me.

Thanks all!",asktransgender
Help with internalized transphobia,"In case you don't see the title, I AM TRANSGENDER! PLEASE DON'T ATTACK ME FOR BEING A BIGOT RATHER THAN HELPING ME!

I was raised as an Orthodox Jew. I was taught your gender is determined at birth, gender and sex are the same thing, you can't change your gender, along with other stuff. I used to be homophobic, too, but I got over it. I'm still struggling accepting that gender identity is real, especially nonbinary genders. I'm binary, (I'm a trans man) but I don't get how nonbinary genders work. Though I don't get how being transgender works, period. I get gender dysphoria, but I hate myself because of it and take my anger out on others. There are no therapists nearby who understand, and I can't drive, nor do I have any local friends, so those are out of the question, too. I'm very poor making under 10k a year, so I can't afford online therapists, either. I'm on T, and it has helped, but the social pressure and being around transphobia makes it really hard to accept myself. Any help? ",asktransgender
When you transition from male to female does one's penis become a penwas?,I have no friends so this is the only place I could think of posting this joke,asktransgender
What is your method for sleeping?,"I'm pre-everything and I've started wearing panties more however it's difficult to sleep comfortablely in them, it's not recommended to tuck and sleep so what is your trick to sleeping with girl dick?",asktransgender
I(13FtM closest) think my older sister (17F) is catching on. Help,"So i got 2 older sisters and im close with both of them and i am very comfortable around them well i haven't shaved my legs in like weeks and my sister saw hair poking out of my pants i geuss. She said ""why haven't you shaved your legs *dead name* i froze in fear and without saying anything ran into my room. I think she is catching on i don't know I finally convinced my mom to let me get my hair cut short and more masc while still just looking like a raging butch lesbian. So i think she is piecing thing together i dont know what to do I'm scared help.",asktransgender
"Any recommendations for health insurance that might cover HRT, FFS, and possibly bottom surgery in GA, US?","My current health insurance is through my job and has a $1,500 deductible. Doesn't have co pay and they cover 80% after the deductible has been met. October 29th is when open enrollment starts. Wanting to find some insurance that will cover most of the MTF process so I don't have to fork out so much money for the process. I know not everything will be covered. 

When open enrollment starts, I'm told to call around and ask the following questions:

""• Is there a network of trans-friendly doctors and/or doctors who have training working with or currently work with trans clients? If you do not have a health care provider but would like to fnd a trans-friendly provider, contact The Health Initiative at 404-688- 2524 or info@thehealthinitiative.org.
• Are procedures like facial feminization, breast augmentation, or hair removal covered? What is the copay for these services?
• Are procedures like breast reductions/mastectomies, chest lifts, and hysterectomies included in the plan? What is the copay for these services?
3
• Is hormone replacement therapy covered for individuals on this plan? Remember that if hormone replacement therapy is covered for anyone on the plan, it should be covered for transgender individuals too.
• Are reconstructive surgeries covered for individuals on this plan? Many transition-related surgeries (like hysterectomy, phalloplasty, and orchiectomy) are covered for cancer treatment/prevention or in cases of injury. If the procedures are covered in these cases, the plan should also cover them as part of a gender transition.
• If I am transgender and obtaining transgender-related care that will make me infertile, is there coverage for retrieving and storing my eggs/sperm?""",asktransgender
Dysphoria out of a sudden?,"Hi, some weeks ago I finally realised and admitted to myself that my identity and more importantly my gender identity doesnt fit my birth gender. In my head I now go by Thea, so nice to meet you. Before I've mostly felt euphoria by doing specific femme things, but now after coming out I've begun feeling dysphoric over some things that i havent felt before, like my facial hair. Im not even sure i want, or even can transition considering the medical gatekeeping in Norway on the whole hormone subject. Even then I've ordered my first laser appointment cus I cant stand feeling it on my face, even tho i had a full beard 3 months ago. I am being referred to a therapist for this whole thing, I guess I just need some validation or something.. I dont know, its confusing, anyway, thanks for listening to my rant and sorry for the broken english. Btw, funny thing, i used to feel dysphoric the opposite way about my gynocomastia and low t levels and tried several times to become more manly, denial maybe? I also suffer from a dissociation disorder, so Im not even sure if the whole female part of me is a fake personality I've created to cope with some things... This got out of hand, im done now, thanks 😊",asktransgender
Day 1 of HRT had to share! (25mtf),Im super excited about this not a lot of friends know im trans yet and just needed to share! One step closter to being the big tiddy goth girlfriend!,asktransgender
was there an event which made you know for sure?,"im not sure if this is the right place to ask since this will be long so please bear with me. im a 20 year old healthy dude. Over the past 2 years i have been increasing having transgender thaughts and fantisizing about taking hormones and becoming a woman. When i come home from work on the train i cant stop looking at womans shoes and legs and thinking how much i would like to look like that. some days it consumes me 24/7 and other days its not as bad but its always there. I look at woman and just wish i looked like them. I dont hate my body and i dont hate being a guy think i would have a much better and more fun life if i was a woman. see im quite short for a guy 5""2 and have a very small petite bone structure. i dont command respect as a guy and women dont have time for me. Im also very shy and submissive in social situations. i  think part of my desire to become a woman is because i have never had a woman show me any interest, i want to become what i want so bad but can never have. These feelings get worse the longer i go without masturbation. When i masturbate i feel like a guy again for a little while but then the feelings come back. When i masturbate i imagine myself as a female and recieving during sex from men. Im so on the fence right now about which direction i should take my life in since im pretty sure these feelings will never go away. Has anyone else here had similar experience to me and can you please give me some advice.  ",asktransgender
Alterations and fittings,"Hello friends!

I am costume design graduate assistant at a university that values social changes and lgbtq representation. We have a couple of trans undergrads and one of my jobs is to train undergrads on how to do fittings and measurements. I know measurements can get, well, intimate, as I have to measure things like, chest, hip, and inseams.  My question is what can we as seamstresses and tailors do to make the process as comfortable as possible? ",asktransgender
hair,"Hey everyone,
Just spent about 20 minutes silently sobbing on the kitchen floor. I feel so not-okay, in a very visceral way that just creeps right up on me and then suddenly I am having a full panic attack breakdown that to anyone else seems incredibly scary and irrational. I think it is because I cut my hair. I have had long hair, like past my boobs and almost to my waist long for years. I am AFAB, have been questioning, wearing binders, etc for about 6 months. plenty of eating disorder history, with one hospital stint that I told my dad was because I ""didn't want to be a woman."" 
I decided to ""go for it"" and get my hair cut because I thought I was finally ready to give up my long hair and because it's such a ""boy"" signal. But, I got scared in the chair and the stylist ended up giving me what is now basically a cute, very girlish bob. I was okay for a few days and recently have been like literally laying awake at night unable to sleep because I am thinking of my hair and when it will grow back because I am so sad it is gone. I can't stand photos of myself. I can't be on dating apps right now, like I cannot do life like this. I know the only solution is to wait. I don't want to go near a salon for the rest of my life. I don't know what happened, if this is me freaking out because I changed, because I look more fem, or because I am too scared to go all the way and chop it to full short masc-looking status. I feel like I don't recognize myself in the mirror now, and while I didn't much before, at least I had the very familiar feeling of being able to hide my face with my hair, tie it all up on my head, etc. It's like my security blanket is gone. I don't know what it means about my gender, I feel like maybe it means I am just cis and was wrong this whole time. I also know that one of the big reasons I went in to get it cut and explained to the person was that I don't like my hair to look ""neat"" and straight and shiny and silky and all the things traditionally associated with nice hair and so i just don't brush it for like a week and leave it super messy all of the time and it dreds up a bit and then I have to comb out all the knots etc etc. But that never really bothered me. It bothers other people and I think part of me knew that I would be objectively prettier and better if I had smooth clean knot-free hair and I feel like I was trying to turn myself into that thing so I would be seen as normal in a way and trying to go aggressively normal just made everything so so so so much worse for me. If I could give anyone a warning it would be to not do what I just did. I was comfortable with my long hair but thought no one would see me as masculine with it and also that if it was messy people would think I was unclean and unattractive and that somehow I needed to ""get my life together"" and fix it. I was WRONG. I don't know what to do. Everyone around me is saying I look so cute. It only makes me feel worse, I don't want to be cute. I just want to be me and I want to be safe and I don't feel either of those things and I am falling apart. Any insights or personal experiences shared would be so welcome. I hope you all are doing better than me right now&lt;3 ",asktransgender
Statistics about regret,"I keep hearing these statistics saying a significant amount of transgender people regret their transition and specifically that they regret having SRS.
I know these will be used against me when I come out to my parents. Are they accurate? Can I prove they aren't?",asktransgender
Can I just hold off mentally transitioning and accepting who I am until my body agrees?,"MtF, pre-HRT, but I think this topic is relevant to transgender folks of all varieties and I'd value the other perspectives too. :)

I find it exhausting trying to explore the idea that ""I am a girl"" when the physical world is telling me ""OBVIOUSLY you are a sweaty hairy amorphous blob of masculinity and stoicism"". Sigh!!!

And I am really quite hesitant to try dressing up my current body because I'm fairly sure it's *not* going to be pretty and the image is going to be burned into my brain giving me an extra boost of dysphoria-on-demand.

I'm desperately craving the gender euphoria to come back, but since discovering myself as trans, coming out to a few supportive friends, and spending far too much time obsessively absorbing trans subreddits.... ahhhh for some reason the gender euphoria seems harder to get. Maybe because I'm starting to come to terms that I have gender dysphoria?

Soooooooo can I like.... go on HRT and then go back to presenting male and thinking male and just trying to be a dude again, and basically just forget about the whole thing but keep popping girl-pills, until my physical body is ready to back me up when I tell the world that this is real?

Preeeetttty sure the answer is that I'm tying too much of my identity to my physical form (and to those flashes of euphoria) and it would be healthier to accept that I'm a girl regardless of what my body says about that.... but it's just hard and I don't know how to believe it and I just haven't been getting that gender euphoria this week so I feel like a robot :(

On the plus side, I have my first gender therapist appointment today, so that should hopefully give me some paradigm shift or new perspective...

On the downside I'm terrified that I'm going to step into that appointment and emotionlessly describe what the euphoria felt like as best I can remember it.... because I'm SO good at repressing emotions I can do it without even trying.... :(",asktransgender
Working/Traveling in Russia,"Hello all,

I am an American mtf and about 9 months in. I don't really pass, but am comfortable as ambiguous presenting. 

I probably need to go to Russia for about 9 months next year for work. I have lived and worked there before and speak pretty good Russian. I absolutely understand the very serious risks of being in Russia as a trans person. I'm fairly familiar with LGBT communities there and feel comfortable as far as having a community and being able to live more or less safely there. 

I am, however, deeply unsure if anyone has advice on passing the border and obtaining (or importing) hormones while there. Does anyone, particularly non-Russians, have any experience with transporting meds or getting them there? I would have the option of traveling to Germany or Finland, too, on occasion if it is possible or easier to get them there and bring them back with me. 

I have not changed my documents yet and am unsure if I should before going. Because I have been there before, changing my name in my passport would definitively out me and could cause serious issues with the authorities. Does anyone have experience traveling to Russia after a name change, especially after having visited before? Would they automatically know if I applied with a different name that I had been there before under a male name? Do any non-passing people have experience with this?

Thank you   ",asktransgender
Should I leave my current job?,"Hello everyone, my name is Serena and I am a transgender woman. So I currently work at a hardware store as an assistant manager. I have been there 5 years. I have been out full time for the past 4 months or so. My coworkers are for the most part respectful and supportive of my transition. I have been on hrt for the past 2 years and on my good days (voice and confidence) I can ""pass"" to most strangers that come in the store.

The problem that I am running into though is that I have worked at this job for the past five years. Much of that time being before I came out. So I have about 70% of customers that only see me as a man. I find it hard to be myself when I am constantly referred to as my deadname. The store and some of the customers also have a close relationship to my parents. My parents unfortunately are completely unsupportive of my transition. So it can be rather difficult when people that know my parents come in and ask me how they are. I haven't spoken to them in months.

So all of that being said I have been seriously contemplating leaving this job. There would be some benefits such as starting at a new place as myself, having more separation from parents, and also not being in a male dominated space. There would also be some negatives in leaving such as taking a cut in pay, leaving supportive co-workers, and leaving a job that is flexible with my school hours.

I am split I don't know whether it would be better to stay and just deal with the customers who knew me before or to just find a new place to work. Do any of you have any advice you could offer me? I appreciate everyone who took the time to read this.",asktransgender
I'm Conflicted about my Gender Identity,"Hello everyone, I am having a bit of a internal struggle as a male(at least I think). I've always sought my friendships around women and I think this is leading me to the thoughts I've been having recently (or it´s purely coincidental, but regardless, I still have these thoughts). The thoughts I've been having are mostly about how I've been able to express myself. I.e., I'm okay with having the body of a dude, in fact I quite like it, there are a lot of aspects that I like about it, the biggest issue I've felt as of lately has mostly to do with how my views and expressions don't feel in touch with my masculinity/dudeness/gender. I'm always weirded out about how I weird I feel whenever I say or express things that might seem unmasculine to people as well as me, and I always feel like I'd be more comfortable expressing these things as a woman. These topics and issues that I've had these feelings with have always been close to my heart and I love discussing these things, but I always feel limited by my gender for how I should be expressing myself towards them. 

  
Can someone relate to what I'm saying? I'm not very knowledgable in Gender Dysphoria(at least not on a personal level, I've read about it and stuff but outside of that, I don't have any experience with it), and so I wouldn't want to draw any hasty conclusions. Could it be that I'm just thinking of making myself easier because of my interests? 

Is it possible to feel comfortable with your birth-assigned gender physically but not with the spectacle you have to put up with socially? 

I'm not out to find a definite answer, but conversations that would help me draw my own conclusions better, so if you have felt what I'm feeling or know anything about it, I'd be grateful for your contribution.",asktransgender
Anyone in the same position as me want to chat?,,asktransgender
Has anyone been prescribed steroid cream for granulation? how did it work?,,asktransgender
Halloween Costume ideas?,"I’m 18, closeted MTF. I want to go to Halloween as a girl, but I can’t really decide what I should go as. I can’t just go ‘as a girl’ since that could out me before I’m ready to come out, so I need some sort of character or theme to go with it so I have a reasonable excuse. 

Any suggestions?",asktransgender
Question about sexuality,Did any of you believe you were asexual before realizing you were trans and it was just you couldn't feel that way about someone in your current body?,asktransgender
Should I come out tonight?,With the news  (outraged btw) should I come out tonight?,asktransgender
How do you convince someone that cyproterone acetate is safe?,"I live in New York, over here you cannot get HRT before the age of 16. Although you could get puberty blockers with the consent of a parent/guardian, but my parents are not supportive. But I do have a supportive sister, but she cannot consent me, so I asked her if she could get me some cyproterone acetate, she told me she cannot because I don’t know what changes will happen to my body, and it might be unsafe. How should I convince her to get me some cypro and answer these concerns from her?

• You don’t know the dosage.

• This might not be safe for you.

• You don’t know if ADC or IHP is legit.

•You might regret the changes later.

• Wait a few years.

• Why do you want this so much?

Any help is appreciated : ), thank you.

",asktransgender
What determines sex? Trying to learn about sexuality. Would anyone be able to help?,"Hi, I'm a straight white male diving deep into the physiology and psychology of human sexuality finding out it's *complicated*. So far I have some general ideas but honestly I wonder if I am even asking all of the right questions. Could someone help me understand what makes up sex and all its parts? This is what I have so far:  
  
&gt;**""Sex""**  
Your genitalia. Lots of conditions which can result in intersex individuals. Developed at birth, influenced by hormones, can be reassigned with surgery

&gt;**""Gender identity""**  
The gender which your brain subconsciously identifies with and accepts. Ex: man/woman/neither/both. Influences gender transitions. Determines which pronoun should be used

&gt;**""Sexual orientation""**  
The gender(s) which your brain subconsciously finds attractive and has measurable physiological effects when in a romantic setting, in close proximity, or maybe even just seen. You can be attracted to men, women, to both, neither, etc.

&gt;**""Romantic orientation""**  
The gender(s) with which you personally desire strong, intimate relationships with (or don't)

&gt;**""Sexual behaviour""**  
How one interacts with other people sexually. It's different from sexual orientation in that a priest (for example) may be heterosexual in orientation but does not engage in any sex due to their religion so is celibate in sexual behaviour

&gt;**""Gender role""**  
The way in which society categorizes and interacts with the individual. For example, a transitioning woman may still be expected to hold doors open for other woman and pay for dates if they still have outwardly obvious masculine biological features which make them appear male to society  
  
Is any of this wrong? Right? Is there more I haven't even thought of? I would like to learn, thanks",asktransgender
"I feel my father is trying to dissuade me from ""being trans"" sabotaging my steps forward and trying manipulating me...","I'm sorry for the throw away, but you can understand why. 

I am writing here to put what I feel into words, and trying to see better what is happening.

Since I came out as ""possibly trans"", it seems that my father is doing a lot of things to make me feel guilt, ""love-bombing"" me, ""hoovering"" me, faking him being sick and exaggerating sickness when he is actually sick, even trying to put others against me being explicit on ""how he is suffering because of me"" and making me feel guilt for that, blaming me and making other blame me.

I think I am seeing this right... I feel that he feels threatened by me and what I am... and he doesn't want me to ""be that"" 'cause he doesn't want things to change, he doesn't want to change, he would probably feel exposed in some way I don't understand...

Since I was a child he always had issues with life in general, and always tried to control others and to boost his self-image, while suffering a lot on the inside. He does it still today, that he's almost 70. He is hugely worried about his self and being less than others.
The most scary thing is that.. he remembers me pre-realisation, he might also be an egg, according to what I see... Just, I never tried to sabotage anyone, even if I felt exposed in many cases...

I know that I cannot do anything about it, and the only thing I can do is to not being influenced by him and live my life. Also because I feel he really doesn't care about me or my family, he seems to not care about anything... just like me pre-realisation... But I can't think about it. I am doing my part, and he has to do his in his life without wanting others to be like he wants, that is NOT DO ANYTHING...

It is more though that I was expecting...

Thanks for listening to me... love u all!

",asktransgender
"For those who didn't realize they were trans until adulthood (18 +), what was your eggiest moment growing up?",,asktransgender
[NSFW] Are wet dreams normal ?,I’m having a really hard time dealing with this I’m 7 months into my transition. They started at month 5. I stopped having sex about a month before it started happening to focus on my transition. It happened twice in month 5 and once in the first week of month 6 then it stopped for the entire month so I figured I was over it. Welp needless to say I’m 1 week into month 7 and it happened yesterday morning and this morning. I always take a T blocker to try and bring the level back down but I always loose the puffiness in my breast for about a week and it’s really frustrating. What can I do to make this stop ?,asktransgender
Just received HRT prescription and want to ask some health related questions,"Hello, this week I received an HRT prescription from my endo and want to double check with the community for my own peace of mind. 

My endo asked me to provide a cholesterol profile, as well as a renal and hepatic function test. He prescribed me 200mg of Spiro, two pills per day, and an estrogen shot (estradiol enanthate, which as far as I know is a form of bioidentical hormone, and dihydroprogesterone acetophenide which is a synthetic progestin). He wants me to have my bloodwork done for prolactin and testosterone after a month of treatment. As far as I know my endo is has had a lot of trans patients and is very informed on the issue, as far as being in charge of designing the public policy project that is currently being worked on for public health services here.

I have a couple of questions regarding health issues. The first is that it seems to me that the spiro dose is a high dose to start with and he didn't really give me any warnings i.e. watch out for potassium intake or anything of the like. When me and my mother asked him whether there was any possibility of a serious complication he said that there was nothing to worry about, either regarding Spiro or Estrogen. So I wanted to check if indeed I can more or less proceed with this dose without any major concerns and what side effects might I experience. I already have low energy levels and Im concerned that fatigue might render me non operational.

The other question I have is regarding the estrogen shot. I've found a few studies that compare oral, sublingual, gel and patch use of estrogen and its relationship with VTE and DVT, as far as I can tell sublingual and patch are better than oral and bioidentical safer than synthetic estrogen. But I didnt really find anything about injected estrogen. Also, I dont know if the fact that my shot has a synthetic progestin puts me at some other kind of risk.

I would very much appreciate any info, I want to be sure of the risks that come with this treatment before starting.",asktransgender
"""Why I want to be a girl?""","So, I'm currently in my 20 and I want to start transitioning, before that though I've got depression and plenty of other things... the matter is, my psychologist always asks me ""why would you like to be a girl?"" And I don't really know what to answer, I want to be of the opposite sex since every year I can recall but I can't really put it into words, besides from the obvious like ""I'd like to grow breasts, I want my skin to be smoother, I want to be considered a woman and dress like one"" I don't know what to say to him or what to answer to that question. I just want it. I'm sure of it? 100% and even more! Do I really have to answer that question? What could I say?",asktransgender
"Need help, please","OK, I'm not very good at this, scratch that, I'm abyssal at asking for help or anything of this sort, I never seem to explain my problem correctly, but here we go.

&amp;#x200B;

Is there any way to know for definite whether I'm trans? I've looked a lot online and a lot of it goes on about feelings and accepting yourself, and I'm actually starting to hate it! I can accept myself however I am, it's figuring it out that's the problem. And for the feeling part, I'm a very logical person and on the autistic spectrum for better or for worse, so sometimes, especially in regards to myself, I plain suck a feelings. So my last resort, I'm asking actual live human beings for help. Please help me, what should I do? Am I trans? Is there a concrete way of figuring it out? Am I just messed up in the head? Who can I talk to that has the best chance of helping me figure all this out?

&amp;#x200B;

Anyone who's read this wall of text, thank you and sorry I wasn't more concise.

Anyone who replies, doubly so.",asktransgender
Dating cis guys,"Im ftm trans, I'm gay, and really want to get in a relationship with a cis guy; mostly for the pyschical side if Im being honest. But I have no idea how to. Like, im pre hormones, 16, and lacking what most gay guys want. Any tips?",asktransgender
sexual trauma and being trans (TW: sexual assault),"im just coming to terms with the fact that I was sexually assaulted about 2 years ago. I’ve gone through a lot of repression and it feels strange to finally face it. being trans is already hard enough, especially for dating, but now i have this additional baggage that is something potential partners are gonna have to hear about and put up with.

im curious as to what other trans peoples experiences with sexual assault has been and how they have recovered. i don’t really know where to start, i feel kind of confused.",asktransgender
Are there any ex-terfs out there,Are there any ex-terfs out there that could share what made you change your view? ,asktransgender
Is this dysphoria?,"Hello!

I'm AMAB and in the last 2/3 years I've been experiencing extreme discomfort when I'm close to girls, specially when they're pretty. When I'm looking at pictures is fine, but in real life I got extreme jealous of them, that makes me really uncomfortable and unhappy until I got home and manage to forget about it.

I feel like they're screaming at face ""we can use heels, skinny jeans, dresses and makeup in public without being judge and you not, and you don't have a smooth and girly silhouette like us"", that really hurts me, I feel like something is melting my chest.

I also used to be attracted to girls, but this is changing as well. I'm asking because in the past I've read somewhere that envy is not a good sign of dysphoria, but if what I'm feeling is not gender dysphoria, serious idk what it is.

And if I'm actually feeling dysphoria, that would be a good argument to give to a gender therapist in the future.

Thanks!",asktransgender
3 years HRT - My transition failed,"   
(Sorry for the English, I'm not very well, I wrote the message below with the help of google translator).

I feel like failure. I have had hormonal treatment with endocrinologist for 3 YEARS and I do not pass at all. I do not wear bra because I practically do not have breasts (only a gynecomastia), I still live as a man, I still use men's dressing room, practically every stranger treats me with male pronouns, if I go to look at a women's clothing for me in a shop the seller thinks it's for gift ... I do not know where my life is going. ",asktransgender
Is testosterone responsible for trans women being taller than cis women?,"Is it testosterone or it is growth hormone that is responsible for height? Testosterone plays role in bone maturation and growth, it causes the bones to develop in masculine pathway. Estradiol causes the same but in feminine pathway. I'm 6'3 tall AMAB and I'm 16 already non passable cause testosterone made my facial bones masculine and big enough. Why cis women aren't as tall as cis men? What's the main reason for it?",asktransgender
"I might possibly be trans, but I have many issues regarding starting the process. What do I do?","I am an Australian AMAB 19 year old who is currently questioning their gender identity.

Most of the issues I have concerning whether or not to start the process of transitioning come down to: 1) How I discovered the possibility of being trans, 2) My political disposition, and 3) How I identify myself now.

1) When I was about 13 years old, I discovered Gender Bent porn and since then I have only used that exclusively. I am almost not capable of climax without either explicit MTF content, or internalising the content from the perspective of the female. Obviously, the fetishistic aspect to trans issues is a sore point and I fear that this being a primary driver for starting the process will not win me any friends from either the trans or the cis communities.

2) While I consider myself to be slightly left-leaning and mostly libertarian on the political compass, I am definitely right-leaning compared to the typical transperson. Over the years I have softened up on certain issues, but some cause me particular grief about starting this process. I still associate Gender Dysphoria with mental illness, and considering my current headspace due to questioning my identity, it's hard for me to shake that. 

3) I am currently a male, so I consider myself to be a man. Even if I was to start the process, I would still consider myself to be a man until I consider myself to be androgynous enough. This ties into my political feeling, but I would not feel comfortable calling myself a woman or wearing woman's clothes until that point.

However, despite that negativity about being trans, there are a few points that push me into believing I am trans. 1) I cry myself to sleep some nights at the thought of never being a woman. 2) I have always, since I was 13, had a name I would use as a female. 3) I have ""come out"" to three of my friends recently about the possibility of being trans, though I made not indication that I would start transitioning. 4) I have experience what I believe is called here, ""gender euphoria"", after being called by said female name. 5) There has also been the standard fair in terms of gaming, I exclusively play female characters in RPGs, and I play half/half male/female when playing D&amp;D. 

In terms of family and friend groups, I am reluctant to come out until deep into transition. In terms of family, while they are supportive of me and we share a close bond, they tend to lessen the importance of some of my previous ""coming out"" moments. In particular, when describing a romantic interest I had in a boy even though I considered myself straight, they essentially described it as a phase that would pass. They meant well, as they were trying to console me due the fact that the relationship was never going to happen, but I don't think I could take that dismissiveness. It might be for that reason that I am reluctant to come out without showing ""proper dedication"" to the idea.

I have researched the transitioning process thoroughly, using mostly [https://www.reddit.com/r/transgenderau/comments/6fdw3s/tgau\_guides\_and\_statespecific\_info/](https://www.reddit.com/r/transgenderau/comments/6fdw3s/tgau_guides_and_statespecific_info/) as a basis. 

In any case, I feel going over text is the best way to get this out there, considering I am a compulsive liar when it comes to therapists.

TLDR: I have some problems starting transitioning, but I think I want to do it. Please over me your advice.",asktransgender
My life,"Hi, I’m not one to ever talk about how I feel online (Im really anti social about personal things) but I’m at the lowest point in my life that idk what to do... it all started when I was 10 years old, I knew I was always different always wanting to do feminine things instead of masculine things but I hid it from my entire family so well because I was always afraid of disappointing them. So over those years I did certain things like mess with my sisters things or my mothers in private and got caught a couple times but never really raised any suspicions oddly. When I entered high school that’s when everything hit me so hard, I was losing myself and I didn’t know who I was anymore, my attitude was so nasty and I just distanced myself from everyone and everything which lead me to not focus on anything which I didn’t graduate my first senior year. At that point I wanted to die, just wanted to be me and I told my mom (who’s super religious and is a pastor along with her husband) and came out to her and she took it as a joke.. I told her everyone was feeling and even the secret boyfriend I hid and she didn’t say anything and walked to her room and stayed there in bed for weeks getting sick and crying each day, my mom has a really weak immune system so it’s really easy for her to get really sick, she said I was going to hell that the devil is controlling my mind etc. I git so angry that I blamed myself for getting my mother sick that I told her I was just confused because I didn’t want her to hurt herself. I sacrificed my happiness for hers. Now moving forward I’m at an even darker state of mind because ik if I say something it’ll be a lot worse and it’ll make my living situation hell. I’ve fucked up my life in so many situations because I can’t get my mind of everything, I got no car, no friends in my town, no license at 20 years old. Everybody around me is doing fantastic then there’s me. Just wanting to be me and make my dream career a thing. I don’t know what to do anymore, I honestly just want to end everything this pain is too much and I can’t take living and growing into the wrong person. This was really hard for me to type and it’s made me feel a bit better I’ve spoken to people like me. ",asktransgender
Women’s Room,How many of you changes restrooms during transition? Do you must be passable? How did you handle this? ,asktransgender
"Hey everyone, quick question: am I transgender?","So first things first, I want to be female more than I want to be male, but I don’t experience significant disphoria, like not very much, with being male. I often think about what it would be like to be female and i would honestly want to be like that. 

It’s been a thought I have been having for a while and haven’t told anyone about it. I am just not sure if this is a phase or like something that will change with time.

I’m not sure if this is something that is asked often or not or even if I am allowed to ask her but yeah. 

Thanks everyone.",asktransgender
MTF Post Op Challenges (NSFW),"I am having difficulty framing this question due to my ignorance on the subject. The one time I managed to write it in a way I felt comfortable with it disappeared on me (technical difficulties). My apologies if I offend anyone here and if I were unintentionally say anything demeaning, assuming, etc. in this post; that is not my intention, and I would be immensely appreciative to be called out if I do so.

Half an hour to an hour ago I was scrolling across Twitter when I came across some j*ckasses trying to invalidate post-op trans women on the basis of the daily tasks required to maintain their bodies, which these fellows claimed were ""disgusting."" I wanted to retort somehow but because I'm so uneducated on the subject I didn't really know how to; I tried to look into what they were talking about but found myself unable to locate  information on it. Here was the only place I thought I might find that information. Unfortunately, as I'm having difficulty putting into words what they're referring to, I must quote them. I have attempted to censor any outright hateful garbage they said and focus on what is relevant, but as someone who is cis I'm not quite sure I'm in the position to be arbiter of what is inoffensive. Because of this I alert any of you who are uncomfortable viewing potential hate-speech to cease reading here. They said,

&gt; [Explicative]s literally have to shove a dildo in their . . . hole at least 4 hours a day for the rest of their lives in order to prevent their [vagina] from closing, since it's literally an open wound trying to heal. . . .

And,

&gt; During dilation [I do not know what this means] their hair from the inside gets torn off and clumps up in the back of their vagina. Every few weeks they have to dig out a giant hairball, or else they risk a greater chance of infection.

Are these struggles MTF women experience after sex reassignment surgery? I don't trust some assholes on the internet to be honest.

Thanks to all of you for taking the time to read this rubbish post.",asktransgender
Odd question... Can I stop breast growth on mtf hormones?,"So... Weird question.. But here I am wondering if I can stay on hrt, but stop breast growth. I want everything else and am completely happy with everything... But I think if my breasts grow *more* it'll start reaching the dysphoric phase I'm worried about...    

So I really want to know if I can stop it, or slow it, without coming off hormones... Or if I have to just wait and see what my genes have in store and get reduction surgery later? I'm not sure...     

This isn't a humble brag,they are small. But I never wanted big breasts, C/D and beyond sound nice on paper, but if I actually think about it I don't think I'd feel comfortable.   

I knew I would eventually have to flirt with dysphoria going on hrt, but I didn't think it would be so soon, and I'm not sure what to do now.     

-Upset and concerned enby :\",asktransgender
[Serious] Validation... melts me?,"Hi, I'm 15 and haven't been on any hormones yet.
Basically I feel a tingly sensation in my stomach down to my thighs and then spreads to the rest of my body sometimes when being called cute or validated. It's strange as I never felt this before my egg cracked, and I'm not sure if it's a bad thing? It just feels amazing and almost makes my brain shut down in bliss. When I explain it to people they say ""I melted"".",asktransgender
"Trans-people of reddit who work in industry, what color Loctite do you think would make a good nail polish?","I was thinking red, but we all know you can’t remove it without a cutting torch. Maybe I’ll go with dykem blue. ",asktransgender
How do you view trans-ness?,"I was at a conference talk last night with a bunch of trans people, and some of the panelists noted that the trans community needs to move away from a ""trapped in the wrong body"" mentality to describe trans-ness to cis people, and instead start emphasizing the social/gender aspects of trans-ness instead. I felt really isolated, since I am one of the trans people who feels like the ""trapped in the wrong body"" narrative fits me really well, and I don't really associate with the purely social/gender aspects of trans-ness, which I feel like are more geared towards non-binary individuals.

I think it is a very nuanced issue, and I am personally in favor of using both explanations to show cis people that not all trans people have the same reasons for being trans. However, I think some might complain that this divides the community, and that we should pick one narrative and stick to it, even if it doesn't strictly apply to everyone.

What does everyone here think?",asktransgender
How/Where to start transitioning? And a little catharsis (FTM),"I'm a 19 yr old student I really hate the fact that I haven't at least started socially transitioning when I got to college. It hasn't even been half a semester but it's bugging me so much because I'm constantly reminded by new friends that I'm not male (which isn't their fault-- they just sometimes ask me if I'm ok with being ""misgendered""). What's worse is that I feel as if my anxious feelings and dysphoria have gotten even worse every time I go outside: I'm afraid to walk, to talk, to stand up straight, to use my hands too much because to me, all of it will somehow broadcast to everyone that I'm female. 

Things are starting to get overwhelming when it comes to transitioning-- or lack thereof-- and I really want to start T and even get top surgery within 2 years because I'm so desperate and frustrated. I don't want to rush things, but I feel trapped into this idea and dread that I'll have to wait until I'm at least a graduate student (in about 3years time) to start anything because i think, ""I'll be *real* adult by then and I can make my own decisions and choose my therapist and doctor, etc."" 

I think the biggest thing holding me back is communicating these things to my family and those around me. I've come out to my family and close friends (none of them go to my university, though), and my parents are so supportive, especially my dad in the small ways like when he greets me with ""welcome home, sunny boy."" Thing is, it's extremely hard for me to be upfront about myself to anyone, idk why but it's always been that way. And when I do talk about it, it's always prompted by my parents, even though I always want to explain how I feel and my plans to transition.

I've only gone to my regular doctor once since I came out to my family, and I told my doctor I was transgender. It felt awkward for me and my doctor, who said she'd look into it and contact us about transgender youth groups, which was nice, but then she never followed up on it. It really put me off, and I don't know how to bring up that fact and that I want to have a therapist (who can help me with dysphoria and other non-trans problems) and a more concrete plan for taking testosterone, top surgery, and legally changing my name.

There's a lot to this, and hopefully I'm not the only one who wants to explode from the sheer amount of ache from wanting to transition but can't/haven't/don't know how to (actually I hope no one else feels like this, because it's shit). And because of all these things I need to do, *I don't even know where to start.* How do i even bring up being trans to my friends? Will they be ok with it? Or do I just try to get a therapist first, and once I start T, explain how I feel? These worries are eating at me.",asktransgender
Where do you put your phone while listening to music through headphones?,"I'm a music fanatic, basically any time I'm alone I'll have headphones in. However, something I've realized in my veeeerrrryyyyy few times in girl mode is that there's no good pockets! So where do you girls who also obsessively listen to music stash your phone where you can still listen to (wired) headphones?",asktransgender
My brain won't shut up.,"Every time I stop thinking about trans stuff and do something else my brain comes in and is like ""See? You are not trans, you stopped thinking about it for ten minutes."". It's like another person is teasing me all the time. Do you experience that too? ",asktransgender
Anyone out there like to regularly wear headscarves?,I am pre-transition MTF. I also have male pattern baldness across the top. I was wondering if any women have regularly worn headscarves as part of their female style and what the reaction was?,asktransgender
How do you guys get over dysphoria,"How do i get over my dysphoria sadly i cannot start hrt until i move out due to my parents not being accepting about this stuff and i have all these dysphoria's that i'm gonna grow taller and my face will become more masculine in the time i am i cannot take hrt it scares the crap outta me i have been checking my height everyday and i grown 2 inches and freaked and my face is becoming more masculine scaring me.

&amp;#x200B;

sorry for bad grammar very tired and a little drunk.",asktransgender
Pre opp 20 yrs MTF transgender,Can someone help me out here I’m going thru a rough time right now. I’m 7 months into my transition(pill form) and I’m starting to experience wet dreams. I never had them before I started. They started coming about around month 5. about a month or so before month 5 I stopped having sex all together to focus on my transition. It would happen twice a month but for the entire 6th month I had nothing. Well I had one yesterday morning and this morning. It always happens a hour before I normally get up. Is there any way to stop this ? I take a tblocker whenever it happens to bring the T level right back down but it’s very depressing every time it happens I loose puffiness in my breast for about a week and then it starts to build back up somebody please helppp,asktransgender
"Thinking of going full time female pre hrt, need some encouragement","I can't stand to dress like a man anymore, it physically hurts me, and I want to go full time female. At the same time I'm terrified of peoples reactions to me, and am not sure what to do. Any help is truly appreciated.",asktransgender
How high are the chances to get bigger hipps,"So I started hrt 2 weeks ago and I turned 21 this year. One of my biggest problems is right now my hip, which is extremely samll and my shoulders are really wide. I was told with muscle athropy it will get better with my shoulders but I am already really skinny, it's just my bones making them that wide. 
So how good are my chances to get a better figure?",asktransgender
being mid-transition is an eyesore and im so fucking self conscious i cant leave the hous,"i have generalized anxiety and social anxiety and paranoia (so many little things can set me off into being convinced im autistic when everyone says im not, convinced of other paranoid thoughts).  i cant leave the house without feeling like im walking weird, body language is weird, not enough self awareness, too much self awareness, talking weird, and then on top of it all, the trans stuff.  voice, face, body, lack of fitting clothes (all the shirts i bought are too small, fuck me, right?), no makeup, only one ear pierced, huge feet, no fitting shoes, and well   


the reason im writing this is because yet again ive been invited somewhere (happens rarely) and yet again ive declined (happens always).  and i regret it because the place i woulda gone seemed awesome, a restaurant befit with mini golf and arcades among other things, what a blast that woulda been--if i didnt fucking hate myself and people simply looking at me setting me off.    


so--how do you cope?  because i cant. ",asktransgender
A quick question to any fellow musicians who are in bands (or anyone else with advice),"(To preface, I know this may not be the best place to ask this but I’m sure the responses I do get here will be more informed and less bigoted than if I posted it somewhere else)

So my band just recently lost our bass player which means we will need to be searching for and auditioning a new bassist soon

This will be the first time my band will be searching for someone since I came out (I’m full-time, but not passable so I’m kind of obvious lol) and I’m wondering what would be the best time to bring up that we have a trans member in our band to make sure that any potential candidates aren’t transphobic or TERFy?

Should we have it in any ads of posts we put out, when first talking to them, wait till we meet them, or should it not be brought up at all and just assume if they don’t like being in a band with a trans person they’ll exclude themselves?

(and same question for when I’m looking to join another band, when should I bring it up to make sure they’ll be ok with me?)",asktransgender
Insurance and Therapy,"I've been considering finding a therapist for a bit now to talk about gender (as well as other things) and am unsure about insurance.  I am still under my parents insurance and don't have access to my own yet although I am legally an adult in the US.

Does anyone know if I were to use the insurance it would be reported to my parents potentially on a monthly report or something similar and if there was a way to avoid that.

I'd also be really interested in hearing any tips for finding someone good.",asktransgender
Started Testosterone two weeks ago but my parents dont know it,"So that is two weeks on T And stil in the closet in front of them 


(Sorry my first languague isnt english)

I am 19 years old and I live with my parents they do not have a very closed mind, but even so I do not like to have serious conversations and not know how they can react.

Since I started bringing other trans friends home they have suspected a bit about me but I have never confirmed anything.

they have told me that they think the medical process is very difficult, that's why I have taken charge of getting the hormones on my own, also in the institute I came out of the closet.

really everything is going well with me about the transition and the only bad thing that could happen to me is that they reacted badly

But I feel unable to start the conversation and soon you can start to notice changes and I'm running out of time


",asktransgender
Can you ask someone out if you’re trans? How?,"I’m college age (MTF) I’ve never had a boyfriend before. I’m nervous to ask someone out because I don’t want to put them in that position. I just feel like it’s weird to ask *them* to go out and then make them decide if they’re okay with the fact that you’re trans. It feels like I’m not only setting myself up for failure, but setting them up to be in an uncomfortable position :(",asktransgender
"Anyone who has has SRS, did you regret it at all?","I need to decide if im having it and id like to hear womens actual experiences,   thanks if you reply ",asktransgender
Going to the gym? Lockerroom etc.,"Hey guys,

I've recently became a member of a gym. I am a transwoman, am on hormones for a while now but presenting as female clothing wise etc is not an option yet. 

I am very unsure of what to do when it comes to lockerrooms. I went into the men's lockerroom last time and I got some stares but nothing too crazy, but still it makes me feel so uncomfortable knowing that some people in there may think I am a woman invading. On the other hand, changing in the women's lockerroom is also not an option as the women in there may think I am a man invading. 

In my day to day life sometimes I get gendered as a woman and sometimes I get gendered as a man.

It's just so difficult and I don't know what to do. I've been sitting here for 4 hours now, and I am scared that I might just blow it all off. 

So would you change in the men's or women's lockerroom?

",asktransgender
"Girls that are out but haven’t had srs and use the ladies restroom, when you sit down to pee do you aim the pee to hit the water or do you just let it hit the toilet wall and hope no one realizes?",,asktransgender
What is the general opinion of Youtuber Kalvin Garrah and his more recent stunt of Dogpiling of a smaller Trans channel?,"Just recently a Transmed Youtuber by the name of Kalvin Garrah responded to a video by a smaller trans channel called Elliott James.
https://m.youtube.com/watch?feature=youtu.be&amp;v=BTvRiy716c8


Followers of Kalvin Garrah soon started disliking the video for fact that Elliott James was criticizing Garrah and mocking the way that his voice sounded.
https://m.youtube.com/watch?v=cbWj4czwYsw

I failed to understand why others would do this to a smaller channel. Especially when they have a bigger fan base and their targets don't. Not only to I find this cowardly and pathetic on Kalvin Garrah's part, but also bullying.


Edit: grammar mistakes.... so tired....",asktransgender
3 years since coming out with no progress-my femininity that comes naturally feels overdramatic and whorish/slutty in its subconscious need for attention; i feel like ill never transition properly and im better off being a sissy,"trigger warning and NSFW: feminine ideals, sissification, sexist norm thoughts, autogynephilia, surgery, sexual stuff, BDSM

i want to transition but

transition ~~feels me~~ fills me--wow now i cant type--with shame.  no, rather, im filled with shame because of how i lose my desire for complete and utter feminization after penile orgasm.   i still have a bit of--oh i wouldnt mind being mistaken for a girl feelings, maybe ill wear my hair in an androgynously feminine way, but the reality of my maleness is too strong to go against.   worse, i very much link my genitals to my gender/sex.  i dont think ill ever feel like a woman without SRS.  i want SRS, but there are times i wake up with the morning wood and i think, well, i could get used to this, i imagine (being virgin) it would be really pleasurable to have sex with it, or to get a blowjob (which practically feels sexist to say, but red pillers would call me a cuck for being weirded out/afraid to talk about male pleasure at the hands of women, but well, idfk).

i cant get realistic about transition and its been 3 years with no progress.  i dont feel right in womens clothes when i dont pass. i just dont.   i dont feel right in womens clothes with a male voice, with my face structure, with my penis.

i was always into the forced feminization stuff when i was closeted.  then i came out, went on hormones during a depressive episode of my life, hormones and that depression (and anxiety and paranoia all aside from hormones) didnt mix well.  doctors gatekept me from hormones after i mentioned my depression/anxiety/paranoia, and sometimes i feel it was for the best that i was taken off hormones.  off of hormones, the forced feminization stuff takes up my sexual free time again.  but while i was on hormones i was very confused and scared (it doesnt help that i didnt reach out and get help in social transition at all, i was very alone).  i was very confused and scared mainly because losing the male libido made me lose a lot of desire to transition, and seeing how linked my transition was to my sexual feelings in that very direct way, after learning about autogynephilia and the world seeing me as a pervert well...that is a very strong feeling (i struggle to even talk about this stuff because i feel like a fraud for not being trans enough and being conflicted with how hormones affected my libido and genitals, yet also like a true trans for how i feel about my penis) however, i hate smelling like a man again, hate that my facial hair is coming in (endocrinologist didnt think i would masculinize anymore, clearly she didnt realized my beard wasnt finished developing, yay XP) but sometimes i wonder if i cant get used to that too, beard hair and whatnot.  i still dont really like being a man but i sorta feel i can live with it.  it makes me more interesting to be a feminine man. it makes me more likeable to be a feminine man.  it makes me more attractive to be a feminine man, especially when my body feels not feminine enough to be a proper woman.  in other words, my body feels too testosteronized and i worry the only way id have ever been comfortable transitioning is if i had started before puberty.

puberty feels like pandora's box.  now that i experienced male puberty, i cling to it despite so much of maleness being something i hate about myself.   maybe that makes me genderfluid or something.  course even women get the urge to penetrate, from what ive read on forums.  not so different from everybody wondering what its like on the other side of the binary i guess.

edit to add the part about feeling whorish and slutty for attention.  i remember noticing myself acting like a tease in front of my male roomates when i was high (drugs r bad, caused my paranoia to spiral out of control), bending down to grab something with my butt showing in tight pants and going red in the face when i realized it, and when i realized what i was doing i was fucking horrified (whore-ified) and disgusted.

so why dont i try being a sissy in real life right? well i have no life.  i dropped out of college after the depression/anxiety/paranoia and the HRT, and i have failed to get a job for three years while also failing to socially transition for three years.  maybe if i find this idyllic unicorn household where i can be their third, their plaything in a kinky way, maybe that forced feminization will take away some of the guilt and responsibility, and the shame of looking at women and feeling like im looking at her like a man when women can simply admire women for their beauty without being a threat to men--always felt like i got in the way of couples that i knew when i looked at (another) girl, their girlfriend, with admiration and envy...and lust?  but maybe with forced feminization and freedom from guilt and responsibility eventually ill come into my own and be able to take transition by the reins myself? well im afraid to even reach out for one thing.  my therapist basically diagnosed me with avoidant personality disorder after taking some tests and it feels accurate.   and with that sortof stuff, even using a site like fetlife, how can i trust someone doesnt have STDs. or that theyll treat me right. or etc etc etc.   and further, how do i know that it wont make things worse--

\--how do i know that i wont rope (BDSM pun lightly intended) femininity and submission tighter together until i truly cant be feminine without utter submissiveness and well, i dont want that...right? but that seems to be how i am and i just dont know if i can change while being true to myself--that is to say, idk if i can be a proper feminist in the streets and a rope bunny in the sheets, when whenever i try to be feminine it comes out all perverted and sissified and wrong and its just too embarassing to ever try to be public--unless im literally being a forced femme sissy in public at the behest of a domme or whatever (clearly i want to tell the world about my fantasies, oh well).  how can i ever be a dominant woman when all my dominant attitudes and actions feel utterly fuckign masculine and male to me, in an almost triggering way.  it doesnt feel right trying to be a woman when so much of it (for me) is based around my penis.

*i dont want to be a male, to be a husband in the future, but for the male self that the world knows me as, it somehow feels right.  does that make sense?*

i cant separate my female self or become my female self from the male self that i was and have been and basically reluctantly am, and it feels unchangeable.  my entire family and extended family and friends have been (verbally) supportive and some of the women have even tried to get me to do feminine activities but when it feels so driven by my goddamn penis, its like, how can i not feel like a fucking pervert.  and the fact that HRT made things more confusing not less (altho i was very depressed/panic attacks/paranoid issues at the time) only makes me less sure that im really trans.

i hate this.  i know its something to talk with a therapist about but i struggle to do that and my regular therapist doesnt get it, and my gender therapist is booked for months.  


edit 2: i shoulda just stayed closeted and saved myself the trouble of not being sure and certainly not being ready for real life transition.  i almost want to tell everyone i was wrong about transition but for one i dont want to hurt the trans movement by encouraging the ""i regret it"" stereotype and for two then whatll happen, two years later ill say ""hey everyone actually transition was right hah..hahah..nervous laugh""  and then people will think less of transition and less of me, since clearly i cant make up my mind on anything and transition must be a simple whim decision and nothing to take seriously.  obviously not the case but ugh, kms",asktransgender
So I created a female character for p&amp;p...,"...-none of the others knowing i'm trans- which let to the following dialog:

&amp;#x200B;

""So, you want to be a girl?""

""Jep""

""Alright, cool""

&amp;#x200B;

it's not much but i thought it was kinda funny in context and i might just share it :)",asktransgender
Dating advice,"So I’m pre-HRT, AMAB, and going to be doing MtF, 22yo. 

I been single for about six years now, partially due to a lack of a social pool, and also a crazy schedule. I prefer women, but I’ve been bi-curious for about a year now, and that may become more prominent in the future. For the time being though, I’m mostly interested in females. 

Do any of you have suggestions on how to go about getting into the waters as a trans woman looking to date women? Or even just tales of success in that regard? I’m not against dating other trans women, or men(I’m still trying to undo the programming I got regarding this from my upbringing, but I think it could be a real thing for me in the future), but I’m just trying to settle my mind right now and get some perspective and advice ",asktransgender
Brow microblading: should I disclose I'm trans before booking to see how trans-friendly they are? If so what should I say?,"I'm nonbinary and transmasc, prefer gender neutral language but okay with he/him.

The studio I'm interested is pretty LGBT friendly as far as I know, but  I'm anxious and very sensitive, so I want to avoid a situation where I've put down a deposit and start a session only to be made uncomfortable by an ignorant comment or something. 

I could also try to pretend to be a cis guy, IDK. Thoughts? What should I say? I haven't booked yet.",asktransgender
A question for MTF about pre-transition from a concerned but supportive wife.,"Husband and I have been together for 10 years.  He turns 40 this year &amp; I’m 31. I am not shy and make no apologies for my sexuality, I’ve been pansexual since I was 12 and I do not hide it. My husband is the polar opposite, he carries a lot of shame for the things he likes, partially because of the fear of our incredibly religious community, but also because his family are bigots. They surpass just being bigots but they’re also narcissists, my husband has spent his whole life trying to make them happy, often putting me and his kids on the back burner for them.

He came out a year into our marriage, I was surprised but ultimately accommodating, but the masculinity was deeply engrained and caused him to be very back and forth with what he wanted and how he wanted me to see him. Ultimately the idea of his family disowning him shut him down to the idea.

Fast forward with no mention of him wanting to transition for 8 years, when mentioned he would say “I’m over that idea” and put his walls up.

This summer he expressed an interest in one of my biggest kinks that we never explored together, Cuckqueaning (opposite of cuckold, where the man is with multiple women). Things went well aside from usual stresses of him being new to it and me walking him through. His last experience got messy and confusing as he started having problems achieving erections. I instantly worried about his health, heart, etc. he said it was probably stress from work, or from my kink (that I recommended we put on hold several times) because he had to play a dominant role when he is usually submissive.

He told me that for months he’s been looking at feminization again, and wonders if since the basis of feminization &amp; cuckqueaning are opposite, if it could be a factor. He wanted to cross dress, he wanted to become a sissy. Again, I am a sexual scientist, and having always found him to be slightly submissive, easy peasy! I also thought this would help with his erection issue, He hadn’t been able to achieve an erection in weeks, &amp; somehow managed to orgasm completely soft once.

The minute he put on the panties and clothing I had went out and bought him, he was good to go. Not only was he able to achieve an erection, he had multiple orgasms! That was a week ago, switching from one kink to another is exhausting so one night I opted for just a quickie and the ED came back. I didn’t say anything but I began to wonder and he had created multiple social media accounts for his new Sissy persona, who he rightfully named. While scanning through his tumblr hoping for ideas, as this is new to me and he doesn’t share much of his wants or desires aside from dressing and telling me he wants to be with men. I noticed his posts aren’t sexual, they’re more like inspiration boards, women he wants to looks like, he frequently asks if I think he’s too old to transition, what would happen, how would I feel. 

Now we’re back at transitioning again, what he wants changes from day to day. But during our talk lastnight I just came out and said “I think not going forward with transitioning is effecting your libido”  and for a moment he was defensive (deeply embedded masculinity) but then he started to consider the idea before thinking about his family and giving me a flat out “NO I could never do that”

For now he wants to stick with this Femdom dynamic (sporadically) which I’ve embraced but struggle with him fighting his internal demons, hot and cold. And I just really want him to be who he feels like he should be. But he refuses to believe it could be an issue at all. To me it’s sort of simple, no erection with any girls (not even able to masturbate)  VS multiple orgasms while imaging a full transition.  Is this body dysmorphia? Could the erectile dysfunction be from forcing himself into his family and societies box built for him?

TL;DR: my husband has wanted to transition for almost 20 years and hasn’t. Could his current erectile dysfunction be caused by this regret? Did any MTF here have problems with erections prior to transitioning? 

Hoping for advice on how to help him. 

",asktransgender
Fate forced me tell my dad!,"Apologies this might be long and drawn out...

So, I’ve been coming out to my friends. And it’s all been a ‘fate’ kind of thing to tell them. Things feel like they are moving fast.
When I see them I hear fate telling me to tell them. And it’s been a really positive experience, it could’nt be more amazing!

... I’ve been holding off telling my dad. Even considered not telling him. He’s approaching 80 and lives in a mediteranean country. Where trans anything is taboo. However, the ocean view is stunning!

I had planned on telling my brother and sister first, and I promise I was building up to telling him ...Maybe? I guess I took to long to tell a sibling, because today FATE rang my phone and on the other end was my father, his voice cheerful, asking how I am. Oh my god. How can i not tell him now? A lump in my throat. Fear in my heart,  Tears welling up in my eyes of the shame and rejection to come... I had a moment of silence, I just couldn’t say anything. Finally I managed to tell him I had to tell him something deeply personal which may affect our relationship as father and son, and that  I would understand if it’s something he cant deal with or rejects and doesn’t want to see me again.
(I’ve been building up for rejection in my head for the last few weeks, so it’s easier to say it than I thought it would be even if it took what seemed like forever to get it out through silent tears.

His initial response took me by surprise and the questions kept coming: “who made you wear women’s clothes when you were 13?” Does that mean you want wear g-strings?, Does that mean you want to wear stilettos?” Does that mean you’re gay? Have you slept with men? Does your wife know? Your 50 you have a mans body, mans legs. You’ve got a big nose, wear pants if you come here. Your wife is going to leave, does that mean you want to sleep with men?  You should see a psychologist, see two, get them to “fix” you. This is because of your mother and your grandmother. It’s all in your head, you read to many books and they’ve affected you.

It was one question after another.

I was left reeling. I know he was to. He said he didn’t see this coming. Understandable. I was good at keeping this a secret. Considering i only see him every other year. But he did say he loves me, though there’s nothing he can do for me. I told him I’m considering HRT. His words of warning were are you sure you want to change your body? Your wife will leave you, does that mean you want to be with a man? /really?

I’m not thinking about this being so I can ‘sleep with a man or a woman. I would prefer to stay with my wife! We’re a powerful team.

But he did say he loves me and that I am capable of making my own decisions. Even though I didn’t hear from him the perfect script: “ I love you whatever you want to be and will support you regardless of any difficulties ahead” I think I got what he was willing or capable of giving me at this time. I can imagine how difficult it is to imagine your  son as a woman, because all you see is a mans face in a dress and heels and the image is so incongruous it could just be a Monty python grotesquerie on display. And if that’s the image in his head I totally get it. And. I want tell him HRT makes your features more feminine. Of course the nose and chin need some work what can I do about that dad?
But I didn’t want to tell him that. This is a lot for him to process, and I just gave him one helluva download. Sorry dad.

This shit is hard!
I don’t feel completely rejected - which is a better scenario than I expected. And he still asked me when i would be coming to visit next? I love my dad. And now I’m double guessing myself. Not as much as I would have a few months ago. And I’m not feeling overwhelmed with shame of who I am. Sure the road ahead is uncertain, but isn’t that what an adventure is? Uncertain of success or failure - hoping for success the most.

As long as I am content with who I am - that’s important.




 ",asktransgender
Anyone have experience with Dr Brassard in Montreal?,I hear a lot of bad stories about him but i'm not sure if that's the vocal minority or if it's the expected result. ,asktransgender
How important is nose and forehead for passing as MTF?,I'm planning to get nose job when I save money. I don't have big forehead but it isn't rounded like cis women have. I also plan on gettimg chin and jawline surgery. I successfully hide my forehead with hair style and I like the hair style that I'm wearing. But there is nothing that I can do to hide my big nose. It's long and big at the same time which sucks. How important is nose for passing? Jawline and chin are within feminine range but I'll still change them to look more feminine. ,asktransgender
So it's been a weird week. Am I.. You know?,"Hi. 

&amp;nbsp;

My name is not John. Obviously. Made the account as a throwaway and got too lazy to actually throw it and make a new one.  
&amp;nbsp;

I'm not proud to say that my acceptance of trans folks was nothing but an ignorant man thinking with his dick. They were ""exotic"", so to speak, and I didn't know anything about them below the surface. That is until I started following them on twitter for free newds. Ended up seeing their shitposting, their interactions with each other, that weird moment when they tweet about what's troubling them, or when they tweet advice for other trans about hrt and crap. My ignorance was remedied, bit by bit. Except for the biggest one. Believe it or not, I've only learned about ""gender dysphoria"" about a month or so ago, and learned about what it meant/feel like last week.  
&amp;nbsp;

One of the people I followed talked about her experience with gender dysphoria, her body, her attitude back then. And I ended up drawing a lot of parallels with her experience. I got worried, started questioning myself, because I have shit self-esteem. I started to examine more of my past. There was a lot of stuff that I went through but blamed it on something else because I had no idea that this was a thing. Like a guy who never knew what a cold is despite having it his whole life.  
&amp;nbsp;

Things like&amp;nbsp;

- Body hatred. Blamed it on fat. Even back when I was skinny and handsome that married women paid me 30 bucks just to strip (and do that other thing) on camera, I still felt ugly and detested my body.
- Innate feeling of ""This isn't my body."" I blamed that on my weeby chuunibyou-ness. Combined with the first one, I just gave up and stopped taking care of my body. Gained weight, bad skin condition, bad scalp condition, everything went to shit because it's not even my body and I couldn't care about it. Just couldn't.
- I was never happy ever since I hit puberty. Blamed that on shitty dysfunctional family. And yet when I went to college, far away from home, never called never write, spent my time ""having fun"", never thinking about family or home or anything remotely close, I was still not happy.
- Started doing ""gay shit"" like painting my room pink, walking with a gait when I'm alone, putting stuff in me (you know what I'm talking about), developing a taste and craving for feminine fashion, staring at a bridal shop across the street during lunch just wondering how I'd look in those wedding dress. Changing my online moniker to girly engrish-sounding version of my real name. Blamed that on me being ""rebellious"" and trying to break the mold for gender roles. I'm disobedient, but I don't rebel. Too much of a coward and a sloth to do any rebelling.
- Dressing in my mom's clothes when I was a in my teen years. Not for kink or anything. I just wore them and took naps. They were comfortable and relaxing.
- The only selfie that I can accept is the most girly-looking one. Rationalized it as ""well everything else was ugly."".  
&amp;nbsp;

There's a lot more that I fished out from the depth of my memory but as of this moment, those are the ones at the top of my head. Anyway, on their own, they just seemed like random crap I do. People who knew me knows I do random shit and paid no mind to isolated incidents. But ever since last week, it's like I found a keyword to this cipher and those gibberish started making sense.  
&amp;nbsp;

I went to my online friends whom I know pretty accepting about things like this. Talked it over with them. One of them is gay and pretty observant, told me that he noticed when I was talking about trans, it seemed more like I wanted to be them rather than be with them. They were supportive, and it felt good coming to them about this. But I was still scared, I was afraid that all this is just my fucking brain playing tricks on me. Part of me suspect it's pulling a ""wolf in sheep's clothing"" move, because this thing is fucking evil. 5 minutes alone with it and you'll see how evil it gets. ahem. Sorry. Anyways.  
&amp;nbsp;

Last night, I tried something. When everybody's asleep, I'm in my room alone, I said to myself just loud enough for me to hear it. ""I'm a girl."" I felt a rush I never felt before. I ended up repeating it over and over, I felt... Happy? I was smiling, on the verge of tears, I felt so good about myself for the first time in years. For once, I didn't hate the face that was in the mirror. I ended up repeating that phrase over and over until I fall asleep and it was the best fucking sleep I've had, except when I slept after having some edibles but those were chemically-induced so they don't count.  
&amp;nbsp;

My friends took that reaction to affirmation as deciding point and offered to call me by feminine pronoun and once again I was on the verge of tears. I declined, still afraid. Still not sure despite how good and liberating it felt from that simple phrase.  
&amp;nbsp;

This brings me to why I'm posting here. What was it like for you? How did you know who you are? How were you so sure? What's it like after you cross over that line and started your transition? I'm in a place where such decision cannot be taken lightly, and once I come out, shit will be stirred. If this is just my brain fucking with me, I'll have to deal with the aftermath and not even happy about why I have to. That and it's pretty much impossible to get diagnosis for GID here since the bigotry runs deep and my last experience with psychologists were less than ideal (bitch sold me out to psychiatric ward to sell more pills &gt;:c)",asktransgender
Going on a work trip to Germany. 1-2 days to do whatever I want. Anyone know any German Transgender communities?,"I'm a pre-everything MTF  going to Germany tonight for a week  of work. Deeply closeted in my home country (Singapore).I have 1-2 days of freedom to dress however I want.

Problem is, I have short hair and don't know anything about makeup. I'm wondering if I could reach out to the transgender community for help. Or even just to hang out.

If you know of anything (forums, discord servers) please let me know, it will be much appreciated!

Thanks for reading!  


Edit: I'll be in Cologne",asktransgender
Are some people just doomed to never pass?,"I'm 21 years old, been on HRT for a year and a half and I've been full time for 5 months. I have never male-failed, I don't pass and I doubt I ever will. 

Even when I'm presenting as femininely as I can in public and I keep my mouth shut I'm still called sir. Is there something wrong with me? Am I just so ruined by testosterone that I'm never going to get to look normal?

This all feels so pointless. I don't feel like a woman and I don't feel comfortable at all. I don't use women's toilets anymore, I don't give a female name for stuff. Part of me thinks I should just go back to presenting male and pretend I never even came out.",asktransgender
What to expect from a gender therapist?,"Soon I will try and get on a wait list to see a gender therapist, which should take something like 2-3 months. For those of you who have seen one, what was your experience like? What exactly did it help you with? Did you find out things about yourself that you couldn't have otherwise? Was it worth it overall? Thank you.",asktransgender
Restoring fertility to have a baby,"Hi,

My partner and I, who is also trans (FTM), are wanting to have a baby. I've been transitioning medically for about six months. My AA is androcur and while I started with patches I didn't get adequate oestrogen levels until I changed to tablets two months ago.

I should have banked sperm, but never saw children as being a possibility... until I met the love of my life.

Does anyone know how long it will take for my sperm production and a decent count to return? Or is it already too late?

Best wishes to everyone,

Darian xo",asktransgender
How do I ease her voice dysphoria?,"She absolutely hates her voice. Which I do understand, I really do.

&amp;#x200B;

Tonight we sent each other a couple voice messages, and on the last one she sent me I made a comment on the background music. She was saying something mushy and there was a movie on tv that she was watching and the music just sort of timed up perfectly with what she was saying (it was some sort of romantic/suspenseful sounding music (if that makes any sort of sense), I thought it was kinda a cute coincidence). And she didn't know what I was talking about, so she went to listen to it. Listening to her voice in that clip just seemed to crush her. It really bothers me that she can get put down so quickly about it.

&amp;#x200B;

Again, I do understand. There are things about myself that sometimes they can completely crush my spirit, even on an otherwise great day. And I know that it's a case by case basis on voice for trans lads and ladies alike. I just need some sort of insight, I guess. What I really want to do is just sit here and tell her just how much I absolutely adore listening to her voice. I love the sound of it, I love the way she pronounces words, I love her tone and volume and it's the most amazing and comforting sound to me. However I know that it's a very bad idea to focus in on it and bring even more attention to it.

&amp;#x200B;

I just don't ever want her to feel discouraged from talking. And I wanted to know if you guys have any suggestions/ideas/\*halp\* for just helping to ease that in some way or another. She's my first girlfriend, and the first trans person I've personally known, so I'm still in pretty new waters here. I know that I can't fix it, but if I could just help to ease it, I think that would help a lot. ",asktransgender
How many people here are POC,Maybe this is a bad question. I'm mixed hispanic and white.,asktransgender
Can't accept myself I guess?,"This is my first time really posting on here, but this seems like a good sub and I thought I would sort of get some stuff off my chest and seek advice.

So I'm the type of person whose always been sort of insecure about herself. Throughout my transition (1 year HRT plus laser hair removal) I always looked for the smallest changes, the smallest things that don't look right about me, and so on. I have always been super self conscious about how I look throughout my transition and look in the mirror every day scrutinizing myself over every thing about my appearance and going out every day (full time now) feeling like I am being started at by every other student at my university when it's probably not the case in addition to being incredibly anxious to the point where I am sometimes shaking. I've turned down invitations to things just out of fear of letting other people see me. 

And the thing is I have changed \*a ton\* in terms of appearance in addition to my voice passing pretty well. I've had people who use to tell me I don't pass start to say I am really cute. I get compliments on my hair all the time by other people. Every month I am getting gendered correctly more and more. Objectively, I am headed in the right direction and doing a lot better, but for some odd reason \*I don't\* feel that way. Everyones been nothing but super nice to me. I wake up every morning criticizing myself to death. Every-time I meet other trans people, I wish I was them and not \*myself\*. Sometimes I miss the days of pre-transition and feeling that like at least fit in with everyone else, despite having way more dysphoria then. 

Honestly I don't know what to do about it. Some people have told me that it just takes time to really build self confidence and self esteem. I just didn't know if anyone else in the course of their transition has felt this and has advice for ""coping"" with it I guess...",asktransgender
Is it wrong to want to exclusively date trans girls?,"So, I haven't ever been in a serious relationship before in my entire life. I'm an adult child of an alcoholic, and have issues with PTSD and anxiety so it really hasn't ever been on my radar.

I'm in my mid 20s, and from the outside you'd never think I have problems meeting or even speaking to women. But every time I try I just feel apathetic about it. I just assumed I'd be forever asexual.

I've used tinder for about a year, get tons of matches from girls to the point where I could probably hook up with anyone I want if I had the confidence. But I don't, and I can't fake it. Have never even messaged anyone or asked for a date or even flirted. Online or in person.

But recently I met this trans girl, and we hit it off so well. We went on a date a couple days later and wanted to do it again. I made some pretty nice plans, but she flaked. We made more plans, she flaked again.

Then some crazy ass random drama happened out of nowhere like god snacking me in the face. From then on she couldn't trust me, now the relationship is over and I'm so torn. Meeting her was the best I've ever felt, and I thought we'd be perfect to at least try to get to know each other. But it didn't happen.

I was probably too forward with my intent on creating a long term relationship without actually getting to know her completely first. That mistake will haunt me.

Oh yeah also she was a dom, and I'm sub.  So that turned me on like no other. Plus the fact we are both ridiculously attractive, which I let her know.

I've never even looked at trans porn, this hasn't even been on my radar until recently. I was into vanilla stuff, I stopped watching porn altogether anyway.

Anyway, I can't really ever see myself with a cis woman. Maybe it has something to do with the abuse I received as a child, and the fact I feel it makes me a note empathetic person. Which makes me feel I can relate to a trans girl more.

**TL;DR: Is wanting to date only trans girls a possibility without being a chaser? Just be genuinely attracted to them? Or am I living in a fantasy?**

**Also I'm reeling from a rejection(not really sure what to call it...) from a girl I related to in a way I have never had either another person. We had so much in common and it was never even given a chance...**",asktransgender
An apology.,"A week ago I made a post about non-binary people that, looking back, it was exclusive and it upset some users here.

I'm sorry, I'm deeply sorry and I feel awful for even posting it. I realize I'm not better than the people who hate us and that I have a lot of internalized transphobia.

I just hope that no one actually left the community because of it. Again, I'm so sorry.",asktransgender
[Rant] Made up stories about trans people is just dumb.,"I saw a post on r/&lt;redacted&gt; (I'm sure you know which sub) that claimed the person had ""escaped the cult of trans"" and listed all these blatantly wrong things about trans culture.

1. I have never heard of ""berry flavored"" estradiol, and I'm pretty sure it isnt real. A quick Google search didnt come up with anything
2. No one shunned you for de-transitioning. It happens. Sometimes for medical necessity, some for social necessity, or something for other reasons. Detransition is valid, too.
3. No mature trans person will tell you that you are trans and HAVE to transition JUST BECAUSE you like artsy movies and wine. Trans people dont identify as their gender because they feel they fit into certain norms, it's more than that. By claiming that's what you were told by trans people, you're blatantly admitting you're a spiteful cis person with a defamation agenda.
4. No, you did not just create an alt because you dont want your rant linked to your main reddit account. You did it because the whole post it a lie, used to stir hate in an already hateful community. Stop creating fictitious arguments so you can feel righteous in your own unjustified anger.

Heck TERFs. There, I said it.

Thanks for reading!",asktransgender
Realistically what is the duration you should expect for HRT to do all it can? 1 2 3 4 5 years?,I am actually really concerned about my body as it is getting injectable E and CPA for close to 9 months now and it is doing jack. I still look like a incel. Before I was on tablets/patches. Totally I am 1 year 5 months on HRT.,asktransgender
Gift ideas for Trans sibling,"My sister came out as trans a few months ago and I would really really like to get her something nice for Christmas. I'd like to give her something that shows my support and also maybe helps her settle in somewhat as a female. I'm not sure how much sense I'm making, but I really just want to give her something she'd like and would make her feel comfortable and accepted. I was wondering if anyone might have any suggestions on what might be a good present? ",asktransgender
Whis else finds that their dysphoria skyrockets when drunk?,,asktransgender
What to get for a women's wardrobe?,"Hi. I'm looking to come out as mtf soon, but the only items of women's clothing that I have which I fit are a red dress and a scarf.

So what should I buy for a wardrobe? I'm not looking for anything too fancy. Hopefully just things that won't go out of fashion immediately or look terrible on a pre-everything trans woman.

For reference, I'm relatively thin (not very, just neither really fit nor really out of shape) and somewhat shorter than your average US man.

Also, is r/femalefashionadvice trans friendly? I considered posting this there, but I didn't know how good they were about all that.

Thanks! :)",asktransgender
Recently started lactating after a little over a month on E. I’ve heard this can be a problem should I be concerned?,,asktransgender
Is being short an advantage? (MTF),"Hello,

Within the next few weeks I will begin the journey, but I'm not very tall only 5ft 5in. I also carry a bit of extra poundage and I'm working towards losing another 86 pounds alongside muscle mass. I'm also 31 but I've had people guess I look as young as 21 let alone being ID at times. I have a small nose and chin with 0 jaw line and a round face with chubby cheeks that my family finds funny... I've also had a few laughs with Face App with it converting my face to a little girl lol.

I can't show a picture as I'm not ready to present but would you say the Dice are in my favour.",asktransgender
Am i doing the right thing?,"I'm terrible with explaining my feelings to my parents (usually end up a emotional mess) so i've written a letter explaining how i'm trans, how long i've known and what i want to do about it. They're very supportive ( especially when i told them i'm bi) but it feels kind of impersonal not telling them directly.

Maybe i'm nervous and just overthinking this?",asktransgender
